<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4016</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / The Queen's Awards For Export and Technology 1991: The
export experts line up - From marmalade to mites, Andrew Jack surveys some
of the winners
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Queen's Award crest of cogs intertwined with arrows has not become a
logo that exporters increasingly quest after. There were 849 applications
for the 1991 awards, down from 969 in 1990. Applications have been fairly
static since the awards were launched in 1966, when 734 companies were
scrutinised.
The activities of this year's 118 export achievement award winners do not
accurately reflect the contributions of their sectors towards the balance of
payments: traditional manufacturing companies, exporting physical goods in
crates, still dominate at the expense of services.
The 1991 list contains a number of 'invisible' exporters, including Baring
Securities, the only stockbroking firm to win an award, which generates 98
per cent of its earnings overseas and 70 per cent from Japan alone. Another
winner, London-based Industrial Markets Research, carries out work for
clients in Europe, the US and Japan.
Most of the University of Surrey's foreign earnings come from fees charged
to overseas undergraduate students, with the rest from technology transfer
contracts and post-graduate courses.
Other winners' products are more tangible: B&amp;H Exchangers builds heat
exchangers for marine and industrial use, and Lee Steel Strip, a Sheffield
forge founded in 1888, produces stainless and carbon steel strip.
Some exporters capitalise on British crafts, such as Elsenham Quality Foods,
purveyors of marmalades and preserves, and the Ballantyne Cashmere Company,
which has marketing subsidiaries in the US and Japan for its hand-finished
cashmere garments.
Other companies export goods that they do not actually produce. ICL's
Workstations Product Group designs and distributes personal computers which
are partly assembled overseas; B. A. Peters distributes sports yachts and
cruisers; and Designers Guild designs and markets furnishing fabrics, but
production is sub-contracted.
Some large, well-known names are among the recipients: Formica, which
produces decorative laminate sheets; Weetabix, the breakfast cereal
manufacturer; Cadbury Schweppes Overseas, the chocolate maker; and British
Aerospace, which has a military aircraft division building Harriers, Hawks
and Tornados.
Most awards have gone to small and medium-sized companies with less than 200
employees: 67 per cent compared with 57 per cent last year. Wayfarers, based
in Cumbria, employs just seven staff to arrange walking holidays in the UK
for overseas visitors while JPW Loudspeakers from Plymouth, with eight
employees, exports 70 per cent of its hi-fi speakers. It has overseas
markets in 30 countries, including the Far East.
All winners can demonstrate a rapid growth in exports. The awards are judged
on the increase in volume going abroad over the previous three years
compared with the performance of competitors and general market trends.
Many of the businesses have trebled overseas earnings during the period.
Burn Stewart Distillers of Glasgow, under new ownership and management since
1988, has an intensive overseas programme to sell whisky to Europe, the Fast
East and South Africa. Carrs of Sheffield, the largest UK manufacturer of
silver and silver-plated photograph frames, has also trebled exports and
they now comprise one-third of total production. The company points to the
importance of frequent visits by senior staff and joint participation in
overseas trade fairs to help win foreign contracts.
Even a large, established company such as Leyland Daf, which makes vans and
trucks, has more than doubled export earnings in the past three years while
Synon, a software house, has increased the contribution of overseas earnings
13-fold during the period.
There has been some concern in the past that many of the export award
winners were foreign owned. That proportion is down slightly this year to 23
(or one-fifth of award holders), compared with 27 in 1990. Bechtel, the
engineering contractor, Motorola, the manufacturer of cellular telephones,
and Sun Valley, which processes chickens and turkeys, are all owned by US
corporations. ComDev Europe, which manufactures parts for satellites is
owned by a Canadian company while Komatsu UK, which makes earth moving
equipment, is owned by a Japanese company.
Some home-grown UK businesses have performed sufficiently well to attract
creditors from abroad. Technophone, a cellular phone producer, won export
awards in each of the last three years as well as a technology award in 1988
and has recently been acquired by Nokia of Finland.
The age of companies varies tremendously. Key Organics, which produces
agro-chemical and pharmaceutical screening products, was formed in 1986. At
the other end of the scale, the Old Bushmills Distillery Company in Northern
Ireland has been producing whiskey since 1608. Oxford University Press, the
academic publisher, also began operating in the 17th century.
A handful of winners export 'green' products: Combustion Developments of
Bakewell, Derbyshire, produces pollution monitoring equipment; and Bunting
Biological Control, which exports chiefly to North America and Europe, rears
'beneficial' insects and mites which reduce agricultural damage without the
use of pesticides. Constance Carroll Holdings, based in Skelmersdale,
Lancashire, produces cosmetics which are not tested on animals.
The products of the winning companies often reflect changing global demand.
Securon, a seat belt manufacturer, has responded rapidly to new legislations
in foreign countries making seat belts compulsory. Cabletime, part of
Carlton Communications, has grown rapidly by supplying cable television
equipment across Europe and capturing nearly half of the UK market.
Dunlopillo, the latex bedding and seating producer, highlights its use of
natural materials in contrast to the synthetics used by other manufacturers.
L. A. Rumbold is in a niche of its own, making internal fittings, such as
galleys and seats, for aircraft. It recently won a contract to install
lavatories on Boeing 737 aircraft.
The changes in eastern Europe and the Soviet Union are beginning to be
reflected in order books. The special projects division of A. P. V. Baker
spent months in the Soviet Union during 1988 and 1989 negotiating to supply
machinery for 10 cereal making plants. Payment has been arranged in Ecus and
the Soviet Union's first sugar-coated cornflakes are already being produced.
Several of the winning companies stress their export role in the developing
world. Allmakes sells automotive spare parts and has a large contract to
refurbish Soviet-built trucks in Angola. It has opened local offices with
multilingual staff to help generate business.
The most mobile business operation is Steiner Group. Its hairdressing and
beauty salons hold concessions on 30 cruise liners, including the QE2. Staff
are trained in London, where they sleep in dormitories and work long hours
to ensure that they can cope with the rigours of life on board ship, where
the salons are open from 8am to 8pm every day.
Three companies won both technology and export awards this year: Fibreguide,
which makes units for textile machinery; Bede scientific Instruments, which
produces X-ray analytical equipment; and Synon, which has now won awards for
four consecutive years. A dozen of this year's winners have previously
received the export award within the last five years. Josiah Wedgwood, the
ceramic company, receives its fourth export award this year, the 11th for
the Wedgwood group as a whole since 1966.
When asked about the tangible benefits of a Queen's Award, some executives
mention staff morale and international prestige. While entries each year
seem to be static and unrepresentative of UK exports, many award holders
obviously consider it worth re-applying year after year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10 Graph (Omitted). Graph (Omitted). Graph (Omitted). Graph
(Omitted). Graph (Omitted). Graph (Omitted). Photograph Geoff Kipling, Mac
Kilburn and Andrew Jenkinson of Scmidt, makers of road cleaning equipment
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4017</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / The Queen's Awards For Export And Technology 1991:
Deep-seated doubts remain in industry - In spite of ERM entry and high
interest rates, the 1991 Awards follow a year of relative success for
British exporters. But change is in the air and many remain concerned at the
level of government backing for overseas sales efforts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MONTAGNON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT HAS become easy over the past few years of yawning deficits in the
balance of payments for Britons to assume that their once proud trading
nation has become an exporters' graveyard.
A closer look at recent statistics, however, reveals this defeatist attitude
to be wide of the mark.
In 1990, for the second year running, the volume increase of British non-oil
exports exceeded the overall growth in world trade by a wide margin.
That such an achievement was possible in a year of high real interest rates,
not to mention entry into the exchange rate mechanism of the European
Monetary System at a level regarded as high in the export industry, is
remarkable enough. It adds a general piquancy to the specific razzamatazz
surrounding this year's Queen's Awards celebrations.
Yet, even in spite of this success, there remain deep-seated doubts in
industry about whether Britain is properly organised to make an assertive
way on world markets.
The occasion of the Queen's Awards is an appropriate moment to examine these
doubts insofar as they relate to government commitment to exports.
The awards themselves are typical of the government approach, in that they
are a low cost, high profile marketing instrument. Companies which win them
say the royal imprimatur helps their sales overseas.
This year, however, the awards come at a time when the relationship between
government and the export industry is both fraught and subject to change.
The short-term business of the Export Credits Guarantee Department is being
privatised, while the Treasury has become increasingly anxious to rein in
ECGD's activities in insuring long-term credit to politically risky
developing countries.
On the promotion front, the British Overseas Trade Board has a new chairman
in the form of Sir Derek Hornby, a former chairman of Rank Xerox.
The government recently announced the creation of a joint directorate
linking the export services provided by the Department of Trade and Industry
and the Foreign Office. Henceforth all the services will be marketed under
the brand name of 'Overseas Trade Services'.
The basic philosophy behind the government's approach to trade in the 1980s
was the non-interventionist one that comes naturally to a Conservative
administration. In a recent interview, Mr Tim Sainsbury, trade minister,
described the government's role as being that of 'enabler'.
It was the job of government, he said, to try and break down barriers to
trade, for example through the Uruguay Round talks in the General Agreement
on Tariffs and Trade.
Government also had a part to play in drawing the attention of industry to
export opportunities, but the actual decision-making, choice of market and
sales effort had to be left to the companies themselves.
It is a point of view echoed by Sir Derek Hornby.
'We tread a very careful line', he said. 'In our relationships with
industry, we are the enabler and facilitator. I honestly don't regard it as
any part of my job to go out and arm-twist people.'
The government, he said, was particularly well-placed to provide information
support for exporters because of the store of knowledge built up by its
embassies overseas. The change a couple of years ago to a system of charging
for market intelligence had gone well. The willingness of exporters to pay
was an indication that they appreciate the services provided. It also helped
the BOTB to determine priorities.
Shortage of resources means that BOTB has to concentrate its efforts on the
most promising markets. In its current forward plan these are defined as
western Europe, Japan, North America, Asia and the Pacific Rim, but Sir
Derek stresses that this does not mean other areas are neglected.
In fact, it is in precisely such areas as Latin America that government
strengths are greatest. It has a fund of information through its diplomatic
presence that a private sector purveyor of information could not hope to
rival.
The creation of the new Overseas Trade Services directorate is intended to
give a greater impetus to this effort and promote a single sense of purpose
among the DTI staff who occupy many of the domestic positions and the
diplomats resident in posts abroad.
Officials say it is not the forerunner of an Italian-style trade promotion
effort, where commercial affairs have been taken out of the the hands of the
foreign ministry and passed to a separate, quasi-autonomous institution.
This regards itself as much more of a deal-maker than an information
provider, and has even been known to look for ways of promoting imports to
help create two-way trade with a given market.
One problem with the UK government effort is that it is almost impossible to
measure the results. Critics say the government's reluctance to be
pro-active reduces the value of its contribution. Supporters argue that the
present system is preferable to the idea of picking markets and spending a
great deal of money and effort only to discover that the wrong industry is
receiving support in the wrong place.
The recently-ended first phase of the Opportunity Japan Campaign saw exports
to that country fail to meet their target of doubling to Pounds 3bn in three
years, although they did come within a respectable distance, having ended up
at Pounds 2.6bn last year.
The increase in exports recorded during the period was roughly in line with
that recorded by the UK's competitors.
On the one hand, this suggests that the campaign achieved little. On the
other, one has to wonder what would have happened if no action had been
taken to boost trade at a time when the business world was awash with
stories (some of them completely false) that Japanese trade barriers made
the market not worth tackling.
Significantly, the second phase will pay greater attention to the need for
investment flows to follow trade, so that the UK may end up promoting inward
investment to Japan.
This broader view reflects the reality of the marketplace better than a
system whose bottom line is simply the total of exports from the UK.
Great hopes are also being pinned on Kuwait, where, after a somewhat
hesitant start during which the field was left open to the US, export
collaboration between industry and government has reached an unprecedented
pitch.
According to seasoned businessmen such as Lord Limerick, former head of
British Invisibles, the co-operation has been remarkable. 'This is something
that very much makes its mark on the Kuwaitis', he says.
Trade was one aspect of the visit to Kuwait by Mr John Major, the first head
of government to visit the emirate following the ceasefire in the Gulf.
Business missions have also been led by Mr Douglas Hurd, the foreign
secretary, and by Mr Peter Lilley, the trade and industry secretary.
Exporters to Kuwait are uniquely dependent on the government, not just for
contacts with the Kuwaiti officials responsible for reconstruction, but even
for getting to Kuwait at a time when air services have not resumed and the
best approach is a bumpy ride in a military Hercules transport.
For the government, the attraction is clearly that the additional cost of
supporting businessmen is small and the political profile high.
There is a typically British danger, however, that the exercise will
degenerate into an orgy of self-congratulation in which less attention will
be paid to the level of business won at the end of the day.
For the time being, the Kuwaiti effort offers the government a publicity
distraction from one of the exporting industry's biggest worries - namely
what many see as the single-minded way in which the Treasury is seeking to
undermine the activities of the ECGD.
The well-publicised troubles of ECGD almost certainly constitute exporters'
biggest concern.
For all the pleasure they take in last year's successes, for all the
richly-deserved satisfaction of the Queen's award winners, for all the help
they receive from the BOTB and the new directorate, many exporters believe
that without ECGD, they will be fighting on world markets 'with their right
arms chopped off', as one succinctly puts it.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
VOLUME CHANGE (%)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
              UK         World
          on-oil         goods
         exports       exports
1981       -1.45           0.5
1982        0.71          -3.0
1983        0.54           2.5
1984        8.64           8.0
1985        6.61           2.5
1986        2.42           4.5
1987        7.57           5.5
1988        4.39           8.5
1989        9.21           7.0
1990        7.32           5.0
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: Datastream, CSO, GATT
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9 Illustration (Omitted). Illustration (Omitted). Illustration
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4018</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / The underclass is no illusion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
There is no underclass', screamed a headline in the Wall Street Journal last
week. I was tempted to phone the Journal's editor and suggest that he spend
six months living on welfare in a decaying part of south-east Washington.
The headlines might change if he could feel the filth, hear the gunshots,
smell the drugs and see the despair of the jobless.
The article, to be fair, was sober and well-informed. Mr Christopher Jencks,
a sociologist at Northwestern University argued that the term 'underclass'
is likely to mislead. It conjures up a chronically jobless high school drop-
out with no money, two or three illegitimate children, a criminal record and
a history of welfare dependence. Yet few people, claims Mr Jencks, fit such
a stereotype. In reality, the US has many different social problems which
are only loosely connected. Some, such as long-term unemployment, are
growing more severe; others are gradually improving. Instead of wasting time
searching for a single blockbuster cure for an illusory disease, the
problems should be tackled one at a time.
Mr Jencks's argument is developed in The Urban Underclass, a book co-edited
by Mr Paul Peterson, a Harvard political scientist. Last week, the Brookings
Institution (the publisher) hosted a high-powered seminar to launch the
book. Mr Jencks and Mr Peterson, the supposed stars of the show, proved to
be grey, professorial types. In purely theatrical terms, both were
overshadowed by two figures occupying polar opposite positions in the
underclass debate: Mr William Julius Wilson, a black sociologist from the
University of Chicago, and Mr Charles Murray, a conservative fellow at the
Manhattan Institute.
Oversimplifying somewhat, Mr Murray regards the underclass as the product of
lax morals - such as public acceptance of out-of-wedlock childbirth - and
over-generous social benefits. Mr Wilson sees the ghetto poor primarily as
casualties: victims of the structural decline in urban manufacturing
employment and the upward mobility of the black middle class, who migrated
out of inner cities to a better life in the suburbs.
Both were on form at the seminar. Mr Murray, an unabashed advocate of an
extreme form of 19th century laissez faire, has cultivated a soft,
exaggeratedly polite speaking style. His argument is usually outrageous but
the sweetly reasonable tone seems to be saying 'listen to me, I'm really a
terribly decent chap'. It is the kind of voice that would tempt an
inarticulate opponent to punch his nose.
Mr Wilson is more emotional, but seems to project an almost tangible moral
authority. The ghettos, I am sure, offend his heart as much as they offend
his reason. Last week, his booming, angry voice filled the auditorium as he
dismissed Mr Jencks's classroom thesis that the underclass, as such, does
not exist. He smouldered when Mr Murray suggested that kids suffer in
ghettos because unmarried black women are simply bad mothers, not caring
properly for their children even when they have the resources. When Mr
Murray proceeded to argue that the failure of ghetto labour participation
rates to rise when the economy is buoyant shows that young blacks do not
respond to economic incentives, he erupted.
'That's a diabolical suggestion,' he shouted at Mr Murray, who remained
unruffled, as though the topic were how to make cucumber sandwiches.
Mr Wilson defines an underclass as a group that is weakly attached to the
labour force and lives in a social environment that reinforces this economic
marginality. In practice, the definition applies to areas of concentrated
poverty in big US cities. Looked at this way, the underclass has certainly
grown significantly in the past two decades. It is, moreover, as much an
ethnic as a geographic phenomenon: two thirds of America's 2.4m ghetto poor
are black; only 2 per cent of poor whites live in urban ghettos compared
with 16 per cent of poor Hispanics and 21 per cent of poor blacks.
Mr Murray believes passionately that government action is likely to
aggravate the problems of the ghettos. Mr Jencks seems happy with piecemeal
social policies because his graphs of crime, joblessness, illegitimacy and
so forth diverge somewhat. Mr Wilson's diagnosis seems nearest the mark: the
location and composition of the underclass can be identified; therefore,
given political will, the nexus of problems it represents can be tackled
simultaneously.
An underclass is formed by a physical concentration of social problems. All
the evidence suggests that the prospects of the poor and jobless improve if
they can escape an environment in which most of their neighbours live in a
similar condition. The long-term solution thus appears obvious: the ghettos
must be razed and the residents relocated to suburban middle class areas -
thinly spread, of course, so as not to disturb the social character of
stable areas.
It could be done: few of the ghetto poor would refuse an opportunity to live
in a clean, safe neighbourhood with good schools and plentiful jobs. And the
cost might be less than that of the space programme. It will remain a dream
mainly because white middle class Americans will not stand for it: black
families who move into the 'wrong' districts still run the risk of being
fire-bombed. So far as comfortable America is concerned, the underclass
should stay out of sight and out of mind. And if helpful professors can
prove that it does not exist, so much the better.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 38 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4019</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Interference: duties and rights
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN DAVIDSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
With appalling swiftness, the Kurdish refugee catastrophe has put the
brilliance of the military victory in the Gulf into a chilling new
perspective. Even before a shot was fired, it was obvious that the UN-backed
coalition was courting political disaster. These fears are now confirmed.
But it is a terrible pity that it has taken the deaths of tens of thousands
of Kurds and Shias to prick the bubble of nave self-satisfaction over what
looked like a surgical military victory.
As US illusions have been shattered, President George Bush has been harshly
criticised for the apparent failure of plans for a new world order. Military
victory seemed to promise a rapid return home for the troops; instead, the
US, with Britain and France, is embarking on a new operation to protect the
Kurdish refugees - one which must be open-ended in time and scope, and will
probably end badly.
Some blame the disaster on military errors in the tactics of war
termination. The US had command of the air, and could have prevented Saddam
Hussein's helicopter massacres of Kurdish and Shia communities. In narrow
terms, this criticism may be well-founded; but it is beside the point.
The point is that the war was likely to start a political chain reaction,
which could not be controlled from outside nor interdicted by military
means. The UN coalition was always confident of military victory against
Iraq, but thereafter it was likely to face two uncomfortable options: it
could take responsibility for the ensuing mess, or it could walk away under
cover of a convenient UN resolution or two.
The least likely scenario was that an efficient war would be followed by an
effective peace; and so it has proved. Victory was quick and total, and the
mess is comprehensive.
Some have compared the Gulf war of 1991 and the Falklands war of 1982. In
both cases an autocratic regime invaded and captured a neighbouring
territory to which it had long laid claim; in both cases the invading power
was breaking international law, and had to be evicted by military force.
The analogy breaks down, however, over a difference of geography: Kuwait
shares a land frontier with Iraq; the Falkland Islands are separated from
Argentina by a large stretch of Atlantic Ocean. British military operations
in 1982 were confined to a restricted zone round the Falklands; once the
Argentines were defeated militarily on the islands, the UK was insulated
from any responsibility for the political fall-out in Argentina by 500km of
open sea.
In the Gulf war, there was no sensible way of evicting Iraq from Kuwait
without carrying the war into Iraqi territory, first by bombing, and then by
invasion; but once the primary military victory was won, and US forces had
come to rest in southern Iraq, they were saddled with significant
responsibility for the local political fall-out. That responsibility could
not be ended by the formal end of the war.
In response to the Kurdish catastrophe and the desperate sufferings of the
refugees, President Mitterrand has put forward a new concept for the
international law books: a 'right of interference' which, on ethical and
humanitarian grounds, should be able to over-ride the domestic sovereignty
of a national state. His moral feelings do him credit; but his proposal is
altogether too modest when set against the reality of the situation on the
ground.
The historic plight of the Kurds antedates the Gulf war by many decades, and
the primary responsibility for their suffering must be laid at the door of
the governments of the region. But since the Kurds' present distress is
directly linked to the Gulf war, the UN coalition has not just a right, but
a moral duty to interfere on their behalf, and perhaps on behalf of the
Iraqi people in general.
Mr Bush is criticised for not delivering his new world order, but the
criticism is unjust. If a UN-authorised war to drive Iraq out of Kuwait is
part of the new world order, then you have to take what comes with it: the
right of force projection comes with the duty of interference. If the
problem is Iraq and Saddam Hussein, then there is no surgical solution.
It is not clear whether Mr John Major has reached, in principle, a similar
conclusion. Yet the British prime minister's plan for safe havens for the
Kurds has carried the duty of interference a long way forward. No matter if
his initial motive was primarily domestic, to rebut accusations of political
weakness; his impulse has nevertheless changed the international agenda.
It is also having a double effect in Europe: it is changing the political
agenda for the Europeans, and it may be changing the European agenda for the
British.
In response to the unification of Germany, Mr Mitterrand insisted that
political union in Europe must go hand in hand with economic and monetary
union, and Chancellor Helmut Kohl was only too ready to agree. But the Gulf
crisis has proved that the stakes in political union are much more than
theoretical, and former great powers such as Britain and France have
demonstrated that they intend to play a world role.
But a world role for these countries is now only possible in the context of,
and with some moral backing from, membership of the European Community. If
Mr Major needs to add some inches to his stature, the Community is the place
that can supply platform soles. He already knows that there are no political
prizes to be won from foot-dragging on economic and monetary union. So maybe
it is better politics to represent the Community, not as the black citadel
of supra-nationality, but as a gleaming fortress to sustain British
greatness.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 38 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4020</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Monday Interview: Sweden's restless iconoclast - Pehr
Gyllenhammar, Volvo's executive chairman, talks to Robert Taylor
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Pehr Gyllenhammar is a man who arouses strong and mixed feelings among
his fellow Swedes. For nearly 20 years he ran Volvo, building it up to
become the largest private company in Scandinavia. His personal style of
enlightened despotism upsets those Swedes who dislike entrepreneurial
success and prefer equality to individual achievement. Some question his
business acumen, others think him vain and arrogant.
His admirers like his imperial style of running Volvo and his keen
sensitivity to changing customer tastes which has given the company a
favourable image to a more discriminating car owning public.
Above all, no one has been able to ignore him. For the past five years since
the assassination of the former prime minister Olof Palme, Mr Gyllenhammar
more than any other has personified to the outside world the changing face
of Sweden.
Last October he stepped to one side and handed over the actual running of
Volvo to a younger executive, Mr Christer Zetterberg, whose background is in
banking and forestry. It was a move that surprised many who could not really
believe the charismatic Mr Gyllenhammar was going to disappear quite so
easily from the corporate scene he has dominated for so long.
In fact, his resignation as chief executive has not signalled his early
retirement. On the contrary, as he will demonstrate at Volvo's annual
shareholders meeting on Wednesday, the dapper 56 year old is more ebullient
than ever in his new role as the company's executive chairman with more time
and energy to take a wider strategic view both of Volvo and Sweden's future
in the new Europe.
Articulate and opinionated, he remains an iconoclast ready to point a
questioning finger at Sweden's taboos. Take that long-standing holy of
holies, Swedish neutrality. 'It was the single biggest psychological
obstacle to our country joining the European Community.' Or the often
insular attitudes of his countrymen: 'We still have an island mentality.'
Last August he gave vent to such views in a controversial article in
Sweden's leading newspaper Dagens Nyheter. His passionate diatribe brought a
surprisingly sympathetic riposte from Sweden's prime minister Ingvar
Carlsson and a short debate on the subject erupted. It ended less than two
months later with the astonishing announcement by the ruling Social
Democrats that they now favoured Swedish EC membership.
'We move slowly in this country,' he explains. 'We take small steps in the
same direction.' His sense of timing on that occasion was acute. He did not
dictate the change in attitude but his words hit home publicly at the very
moment when Sweden's policy-makers were reappraising what neutrality meant
in post-Cold War Europe.
Mr Gyllenhammar has helped on other occasions to focus national attention
and cast doubt on traditional Swedish attitudes. He argues that the tide of
opinion is now moving decisively in the free market direction he has
advocated for a long time.
'Over the past 20 years Sweden went much too far in creating an
over-dominant public sector based on high taxation. The Social Democrats did
not nationalise industry but they thought they were free to nationalise
people's incomes,' he explains. 'As a result the country became unbalanced.'
Mr Gyllenhammar believes Sweden is suffering from what he calls a 'lost
dynamism' resulting from stagnant economic growth. But he also thinks it is
moving rapidly towards the creation of a social market economy under those
same Social Democrats who did so much to make the country uncompetitive.
Unfashionably, he has words of praise for the much reviled Mr Carlsson. 'I
think he has been very courageous.'
'Sweden could have been paralysed over the past two years but it has not
been. Mr Carlsson's government has been making all the changes necessary.'
He points to the country's recent reform that shifts the tax burden from
incomes onto goods and services; the compromise over nuclear power that
means reactors will not be closed down prematurely; and above all to the
abolition of foreign exchange controls and the greater financial freedoms
that have come to Sweden.
In his opinion, the current record low unpopularity of the Social Democrats
(they only have 30 per cent support in the polls) five months before the
next general election stems from the bewilderment of many of the party's own
loyalist supporters at the magnitude of the liberalising changes it has
made. 'The exceptional domination of Sweden by the Social Democrats may well
be coming to an end,' he says.
Mr Gyllenhammar is also convinced opinion is moving favourably his way on
the vexed question of collective bargaining. For years he has campaigned to
break up Sweden's famed system of centralised wage negotiations. 'We have
much more flexibility in Volvo than we had 10 years ago,' he argues. 'In the
past we more or less had equal pay for everyone. It seemed rational at the
time.'
He is also convinced the Swedish Krona should be linked to the exchange rate
mechanism of the European Monetary System. 'We cannot devalue any more. Now
we are about to apply for membership of the EC, it would be good for Sweden
to accept the necessary financial disciplines from the outside that we need
to reform ourselves.'
Unlike other Swedish employers, he takes a highly radical view of the
controversial issue of company law. Mr Gyllenhammar is a strong opponent of
Sweden's elaborate two-tier system of share ownership which enables
companies to be controlled through acquiring a large number of voting shares
but very little equity. 'I have always been in favour of the principle of
one vote, one share,' he says.
In his new job Mr Gyllenhammar spends a great deal of his time on the
construction of Volvo's new strategic alliance based on cross-ownership with
the French state-owned company Renault, a move which has aroused doubts and
criticisms across the auto industry worldwide. Many observers question
whether the two companies have enough in common to work closely together and
point to what they see as the lack of any single central control in the
alliance.
Moreover both Volvo and Renault have suffered financial setbacks over the
past year, with Volvo recording a loss in 1990 for the first time in 60
years.
Mr Gyllenhammar does not seem unduly worried. 'We are going through a rough
time, especially on the car side, but we have strong reserves,' he explains.
'We have new models in the pipeline over the next five years which will
return us to a highly competitive position.'
And he still insists the marriage will work. 'There are no escape clauses in
our agreements with Renault,' he admits. 'There is only one way for us to go
and that is forward. The realisation of this is what is pushing us
together.'
Fluent in English and French, Mr Gyllenhammar himself moves easily around
western Europe as a founder member of the Business Roundtable of European
industrialists.
And he is concerned about how Europe will develop during the 1990s. He has
co-founded another organisation designed to promote the cause of the north.
'In Germany interests are moving south. We are already talking about a
Milan-London axis and one from Madrid to Frankfurt.' He believes this must
be counter-balanced by another axis that links up the Nordic region to north
Germany.
It almost sounds as if Mr Gyllenhammar is devoting more time to such grand
strategic questions these days than to his own business. But he is certainly
not short of work. On Wednesday, he will be confirmed as deputy chairman of
Sweden's largest bank, Skandinaviska Enskilda Banken. Last week he became an
adviser to the newly-formed European Bank for Reconstruction and Development
in London.
Sometimes, he implies, his energy level seems too high for the lofty
position he now occupies. 'My new job is a big change for me,' he admits. 'I
am nervously active and there are days when I do feel uncomfortable.' But he
insists he is never tempted to stride down the corridor from his own office
in Volvo's ultra-modern headquarters to become Mr Zetterberg's back-seat
driver. 'On the contrary, I walk the other way.'
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
PERSONAL FILE
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
1935 Born in Gothenburg, son of president and chief executive, Skandia.
     Educated Lund University.
1959 Married Eva Christina, daughter of Gunnar Engellau, the then chief
     executive of Volvo.
1961-64 Amphion Insurance Co, Gothenburg.
1965-1970 Skandia Insurance Co, becoming president and chief executive
     officer.
1971-1990 Chief executive, Volvo.
1990 Executive chairman of Volvo.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 38 Photograph 'We are going through a rough time' (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4021</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Money Markets: Political risks
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
STERLING HAS moved from the bottom of the European exchange rate mechanism
to be second strongest within a short space of time, leading to attacks on
the DM3.00 level against a generally depressed D-Mark. This poses the
question of how much higher the pound is likely to go and in this context it
has to be admitted that levels of DM2.9250, DM2.9500 and DM2.9750 proved no
barriers to the advance.
An attack on DM3.00 failed early last week but when the German Bundesbank
left interest rates unchanged at its council meeting sterling edged up
towards DM3.00 again.
The strength of both the wide ranging currencies in the ERM, sterling and
the Spanish peseta, has led to suggestions that they may soon move to the
narrow 2.25 per cent band.
Reaction from the UK Treasury was to refer back to the chancellor of the
exchequer's Budget speech. At that time Mr Norman Lamont said it was his
long term intention, but there were no plans for the time being.
This still appears to be the government's policy during a period when
sterling could become vulnerable to political risk. Local government
elections take place in England and Wales next week, amid expectations that
the results will influence the timing of a general election.
If Conservative candidates do well locally it will increase speculation
about a June election. Mr John Smith, the shadow chancellor has tried hard
to dispel the idea that Labour is the party of devaluation, but foreign
investors are likely to remain nervous. On the other hand a return to power
of the Conservatives is unlikely to provoke a strong surge in the value of
the pound, which tends to leave most of the risk on the downside at present.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 35
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4022</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Syndicated Loans: Attention focuses on the MGN flotation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS Mr Robert Maxwell dominated the headlines last week with the launch of
the 'pathfinder prospectus' for Mirror Group Newspapers' flotation, it was
hardly surprising that attention in the syndicated loan market focused on
the loan facility which has been arranged for the new group.
The Pounds 150m three-year facility was well-received and was
over-subscribed two-fold. Bankers suggested four main reasons for
over-subscription: the structure of the loan (which is amortised); the
price; the covenanting (which places limits on MGN's gearing); and the fact
that banks see MGN as a profitable company with a good cash flow.
Repayment of the loan is amortised, with Pounds 50m due in June 1993 and the
remaining Pounds 100m due after three years. Barclays, which is the
book-runner and one of four arrangers of the loan (the others are Lloyds
Bank, Credit Lyonnais and Midland Bank) claims that banks prefer signing up
for amortised loans rather than 'bullet loans' where the money is repaid in
full at the end of the term.
The interest margin is 75 basis points over the London interbank offered
rate and the commitment fee is 37 1/2 basis points. The front-end fees are
10 basis points if the lender commits Pounds 10m, 15 basis points on Pounds
15m and 20 basis points on Pounds 20m.
However, as the arrangers wanted the loan to be syndicated as quickly as
possible, they wooed banks with a 15 basis point 'speed fee' which was added
to the front-end fee on condition that banks were committed by the beginning
of last week.
Barclays says that the loan completes the banking facilities which MGN needs
to take it into the flotation. One participating bank said that lenders
regard MGN as one of the least geared of Mr Maxwell's assets and are
reassured by the fact that once floated, the company will have to meet more
stringent disclosure criteria.
In an otherwise quiet week, bankers said that syndication would soon be
closed for the Pounds 1.325bn financing for Inntrepreneur, the holding
company in a pubs-for-breweries swap between Grand Metropolitan and Elders
IXL. The financing, which has been put together by Citicorp and S. G.
Warburg, has been in the market for several weeks now: it is underwritten by
a group of 13 banks and there are about 40 banks in the syndicate so far,
although bankers are awaiting a handful more responses.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
EUROMARKET TURNOVER (Dollars m)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Primary Market
                  Straights       Conv       FRN       Other
USDollars           1,833.2       96.9      95.0    13,039.4
Prev                1,360.2        0.0     141.0    12,275.0
Other               1,713.1        0.0     248.8     8,687.7
Prev                2,462.0      130.8      35.6    11,397.4
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Secondary Market
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
USDollars          17,704.9      852.3   6,948.6     9,263.4
Prev               18,711.6      661.2    8873.5     9,427.5
Other              26,983.3      945.5   4,569.5    57,791.2
Prev               27,247.4    1,825.9   3,258.1    37,919.9
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
                      Cedel      Euroclear      Total
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
USDollars          17,664.7       32,169.0   49,833.7
Prev               20,088.1       31,361.9   51,450.0
Other              40,463.5       60,475.6  100,939.1
Prev               33,094.2       51,182.9   84,277.1
Week to April 18, 1991
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: AIBD
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4023</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Capital Markets: Cater Allen quits market
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CATER Allen Holdings, the UK financial services and broking group, has
closed down its gilt-edged market-making division.
It joins a long list of houses that have pulled out of the gilts market
since Big Bang in 1986 as a result of over-capacity.
Mr James Barclay, chairman of Cater Allen, said there were no signs of
market conditions improving, despite the fact that the government has
returned to borrowing in the gilts market this year.
Cater Allen Securities, incurred a loss of Pounds 2.5m in the year to April
1991 after a slightly lower one previously.
Since Big Bang, the number of gilt-edged market-makers has fallen from 27 to
18.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4024</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Bonds: Renewed demand encourages borrowers in
sterling
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON LONDON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A STEADY supply of sterling denominated bonds has been one of the few
consistent features of the international bond market this year. So far this
year Pounds 4.9bn of non-government sterling bonds have been sold in the
international and domestic bond markets, against Pounds 5.7bn during the
whole of 1990.
This flow of new issues has been supported by renewed international demand
as overseas investment institutions have increased portfolio exposure to
sterling. Enthusiasm has grown as the UK currency's position within the
European exchange rate mechanism has looked more secure.
In recent weeks this process of sterling stock building has been accelerated
by the weakness of the D-Mark on the foreign exchange market. Fears of a
further devaluation in the German currency have prompted defensive buying of
sterling paper by European investors.
European investors have also been extending the duration of their exposure
from short-dated bonds to maturities between five years and 10 years.
This has been matched by disaffection among UK institutional investors with
the longer end of the sterling yield curve. The UK government's funding
programme is overhanging the longer end of the gilts market, against which
Eurosterling bonds are priced.
Hence there has been a convergence of demand from UK and overseas investors
at between five years and 10 years. Borrowers including Sears, National
Westminster Bank, ANZ Bank, Nippon Telegraph and Telephone, and
Export-Import Bank of Japan last week tapped this ready pool of demand.
Moreover, fears that the UK government's extensive funding programme will
crowd corporate borrowers out of the market have been partially allayed.
Investment institutions are increasingly looking for value in non-government
or supranational bonds.
There is an increasing body of opinion that the yield spread of corporate
bonds over sovereign paper is no longer an accurate reflection of additional
credit risk - there are bargains to be found.
This has already been reflected in a narrowing of corporate yield spreads in
the secondary market. For example, the yield spread on Trafalgar House's 10
7/8 per cent Pounds 100m bond issue maturing 2014 peaked at 340 basis points
over gilts towards the end of last year and has now narrowed to 270 basis
points.
In the new issues market, it is perhaps significant that both National
Westminster and ANZ could place in total Pounds 160m of 10-year subordinated
paper in the same week. The cost of capital to the banks was high (225 basis
points over gilts for ANZ), but such paper can now be sold in the mainstream
of the market.
Indeed, far from fearing 'crowding out', many analysts regard the return of
the UK government to the bond market as a positive development for corporate
borrowers in sterling. The government funding programme has attracted
attention to the sterling bond market and increased liquidity in the swaps
market.
Overall, the prospects for companies borrowing in sterling appear
favourable. Since many companies are finding it hard to raise committed
funds from banks - themselves short of sterling capital as last week's
issues demonstrate - a receptive sterling bond market could be important.
The question facing corporate treasurers is choosing the correct maturity
and timing for new issues. Without the full support of UK investment
institutions for long-dated bonds, the cost of traditional debenture issues
may be punitive. The long end of the market also faces most competition from
the anticipated flood of government paper.
Yield spreads at the longer maturities are already less attractive than
under 10-years. For example, Halifax Building Society's six-year paper
yields 50 basis points over UK gilts whereas its bonds maturing 2014 yield
180 basis points over gilts.
In addition, fewer corporate treasurers are willing to lock in at current
interest rates for 20 years or more now that sterling is in the ERM. In the
longer-term, ERM disciplines should ensure convergence of European interest
rates and result in lower sterling bond yields.
In contrast, locking into five-year funding with gilts yielding a little
over 10 per cent may seem more attractive. UK interest rates may not fall
much further this year and may even rise again next year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29 Table (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4025</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / US Money and Credit: Traders confused by mixed signals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE STORY in the US bond markets last week was all about what did not
happen.
Ten days ago, traders were confronting two sets of relatively benign
inflation data, in turn preceded by some grim employment figures. Not
surprisingly, they concluded that there was good reason to stimulate the
economy further, and sufficient scope for a further easing of US interest
rates to take place.
A couple of hours into Monday morning, this conviction was disappearing
rapidly. The Federal Reserve moved into the open market for Treasury
securities earlier than usual, draining reserves from the banking system.
That was immediately interpreted as a signal that any speculation about a
further rate reduction was off the mark.
Accordingly, bond prices fell back, and the yield on the 'benchmark' long
bond descended to 8.24 per cent, compared with 8.12 per cent at the end of
the previous week.
Newspaper stories - in the Washington Post, in particular - suggested that
the Fed had decided against any further action before its next
policy-setting Open Market Committee meeting in mid-May.
Coming on top of the recent speculation about policy divisions within the
Federal Reserve Board, dealers concluded that there might be more than a
grain of truth in the rumours. So by the end of the week, and after some
sharp price falls on Thursday and Friday, the yield on the 30-year Treasury
bond had widened to 8.25 per cent.
Signals from the corporate sector are, at best, mixed. The current reporting
season, for example, only covers the first three months of the year, when
Gulf-related factors were confusing the commercial environment. Although
numerous executives have said that they view the months ahead with
confidence, firm evidence to back this up is flimsy.
April, moreover, will be the first month this year to reflect the 'post-Gulf
environment', and data for this period will only arrive in early May.
So it is scarcely surprising that views on the rate at which the economy may
recover - and the future scenario for interest rates - should vary. Wall
Street brokers, Donaldson, Lufkin &amp; Jenrette, for example, suggest that 'the
recession is either over or is just about to end'.
They go on to argue that 'there is little reason to believe that the Fed
will ease monetary policy further - in fact, at this point in time, any
easing of monetary policy would probably be a mistake by the monetary
policy.'
Britain's James Capel, by contrast, is less emphatic. 'The chances of
another Fed ease are certainly not zero if inflation continues to fall and
the recovery proves to be elusive or slow, but it will clearly take at least
another month . . . for further clarification,' its analysts say.
But if developments on the interest rate front proved a vain hope, there is
still activity in the corporate bond segment.
According to one estimate, around Dollars 6.5bn-worth of new non-convertible
issues were brought to the market last week, compared with little more than
Dollars 3bn-worth a fortnight ago. There was even some talk of a revival in
'junk bond' issues, as a chunky offering from RJR Nabisco, the tobacco and
food combine that was taken private through a Dollars 25bn leveraged
buy-out, pulled in investors.
The RJR deal was certainly not modest. The size of the issue of senior notes
was doubled from the initial plan - Dollars 1.5bn-worth against Dollars 750m
 -and carried a 10.5 per cent interest rate.
The scale of the offering, moreover, looked all the more impressive when
placed against the total value of junk bond offerings in 1990 - just Dollars
1.3bn. And it was, perhaps, just bad luck that the stock's trading debut
should coincide with Friday's tumble in bond prices. By the close, the new
bonds were down  1/2 at 99 1/2 .
However, it would be dangerous to conclude that RJR's success heralds the
rebirth of junk bond finance.
For a start, there is a barrier on the investment side. In the past, two of
the main sources of demand for such stocks have been thrifts and insurance
companies, and both have had their wings seriously clipped.
The RJR yield, moreover, was scarcely typical of the 'junkier' end of the
non-investment grade market.
In short, a little extra risk for a little extra return may sell. Beyond
that, it is probably unwise to go.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
US MONEY MARKET RATES (%)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
                             Last   1 week   4 wks 12-month 12-month
                           Friday      ago     ago     High      Low
Fed funds (weekly average)   5.63     5.00    5.94    11.00     2.00
Three-month Treasury bills   5.91     5.66    6.04     7.94     5.54
Six-month Treasury bills     6.02     5.84    6.14     8.04     5.62
Three-month prime CDs        6.15     5.98    6.37     9.01     5.90
30-day Commercial Paper      6.00     5.80    6.20     8.28     6.05
90-day Commercial Paper      6.01     5.80    6.20     7.98     5.95
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
US BOND PRICES AND YIELDS (%)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
                           Last      Change            1 week    4 wk.
                           Fri.       on wk     Yield     ago      ago
Seven-year Treasury   99 11/32       -13/16      7.99    7.83     7.99
20-year Treasury       109 1/2       -27/32      8.24    8.32     8.36
30-year Treasury      95 29/32       -31/32      8.24    8.15     8.31
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Money supply: In the week ended April 8, M1 fell by Dollars 10.4bn to
Dollars 841.4bn
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4026</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Swedish Bonds: Heavy supply of paper pushes up yields
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TRACY CORRIGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A HEAVY supply of paper in the Swedish government bond market pushed yields
up about 15 basis points last week, ahead of another large debt auction
today.
A SKr5bn issue of 11-year government bonds will be sold at the monthly
auction, marking a further increase in the level of government debt sales.
Recent auctions have been for around SKr4bn, compared with only
SKr2bn-SKr3bn last year. Dealers are now speculating that the monthly
auctions will soon total SKr6bn.
In addition, the Swedish debt office announced issues of six and 12-month
T-bills totalling SKr7bn, which added to the surplus of paper.
The Swedish bond market, with outstandings of SKr367bn (including T-bills),
is open to foreign investors, but bonds must be held by designated Swedish
institutions.
Ten-year government bond yields rose from 11.48 per cent to 11.64 per cent
last week. However, the market's weakness follows a sustained rally during
recent months, which pushed yields down from a high of 13 1/2 per cent.
Lower than expected tax revenues, as a result of economic recession, account
for the increased level of debt issuance, according to Mr William Ledward,
European economist at Nomura Research.
In addition, the government has been adjusting the profile of its debt by
using foreign exchange reserves to buy back foreign currency debt, then
issuing domestic bonds. For example, last week Sweden announced a tender
offer to buy back over Dollars 1bn in Eurodollar bonds and Yankee bonds.
On Tuesday, the Swedish government will present its revised budget for the
financial year 1991-1992. The deficit for 1990-1991 is now estimated to run
to SKr18.5bn, a sizeable jump from the government's January estimate of
SKr2bn.
Bond traders are concerned that the ruling Social Democratic party may move
to increase public spending to counter its current political unpopularity.
With the September election now on the horizon, recent polls give the Social
Democrats only 30 per cent of the votes. Any such expansionary policy could
spell further weakness for the bond market.
In the longer term, however, there are positive signs for the market.
There is widespread speculation that, either before the election but more
likely later in the year, the Swedish kronor will be linked to the European
currency unit within a narrow band.
Currently, the kronor is linked to a basket of currencies, in which the
dollar has a 25 per cent weighting.
Such a change would push bond yields down, dealers say, and encourage
investment by European institutions. The relatively high level of yields in
Sweden currently includes a risk premium, because the currency has often
been devalued in the past, according to Mr Karim Basta, senior analyst at
Merrill Lynch.
Linkage to the Ecu would be considered a stabilising factor, as well as
representing a positive step in the development of Sweden's relationship
with the European Economic Community, which the country has announced plans
to join.
In addition, favourable balance of payments data and expectations of 4 per
cent to 5 per cent inflation in 1992 are likely to support the bond market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4027</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / UK Gilts: Possibility of big issues casts a pall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE possibility of large amounts of gilt issues over the next year cast a
shadow over the market for UK government bonds last week.
The pall was particularly perverse in view of large doses of gloomy news on
the recession front - which at other times would almost certainly have
lifted the market.
In the event, gilts at the long end of the market lost ground by more than
half a point on the week, with shorter gilts staying at roughly the same
price. The 10 per cent Treasury benchmark stock maturing in 2008 closed on
Friday at 92 13/16 , compared with 93 7/16 the previous week. The yield was
pushed up from 9.79 per cent to 9.87 per cent. The shorter dated 10 per cent
bond maturing in 1994 closed at 99 5/16 , the same as a week previously, to
yield 10.25 per cent.
Three sets of economic data at the end of the week argued strongly for the
UK recession turning out longer and bleaker than had been forecast.
The UK jobless total passed the 2m mark in March with the biggest monthly
increase on record. That leaves open the possibility that the total out of
work will climb to 3m by the end of next year.
The government announced the biggest fall in manufacturing output for three
years. This declined by 1.6 per cent in February compared with January and
officials now estimate the year-on-year fall is about 9 per cent, an
increase of one percentage point on earlier in the year.
Fears of a credit crunch were aroused by figures showing that bank lending
in March plunged to its lowest level for 15 years. The Bank of England
announced that bank and building society sterling lending totalled just
Pounds 700m last month, a fraction of the median City forecast of around
Pounds 4bn.
These figures had economists reaching for their history books to examine the
chances of the current recession matching in intensity the one in 1980-81
when the peak-to-trough decline in output reached 6 per cent. Until last
week, many economists believed the current economic decline would result in
a fall of about 3 per cent until the expected recovery this summer: now they
cannot be quite so sure.
Without the prospect of a large amount of gilt funding hanging over the
market, news of this kind might be a cause for satisfaction in bond markets.
The gloomy indications provide every sign that the annual rate of retail
price inflation, 8.2 per cent last month, may come down by more than the
Treasury's forecast rate over the next few months.
It would easily hit 3 per cent by the end of the year, as opposed to the
official projection of 4 per cent. That, of course, assumes a further
reduction in the annual rate of rise in wages.
The annual rise across the economy was 9 1/4 per cent in February, as
opposed to 9 1/2 per cent in January, and all the signs are that the rate
will come down more as the year progresses.
The chief worry for the market, however, is that the public sector borrowing
requirement for the current financial year will turn out to be much more
than the projected Pounds 8bn.
Gilt traders are already resigned to gilt funding over the year of about
Pounds 14bn. Should the borrowing total run to Pounds 12bn or so, as some
predict, the market could be faced with gilt issues of well over Pounds 1bn
a month - a level of supply which could push prices down.
Some of the fears were underlined by figures last week showing that the
borrowing requirement in March, the last month of the financial year,
reached Pounds 3.1bn, the highest figure since 1988.
Although the last month of the year normally provides a high number for
borrowing, the figure could presage the start of high borrowing totals over
the next few months as public expenditure mounts and tax income falls - both
aspects being linked to the recession.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 28 Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4028</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: Sales at Fruit of the Loom jump
7.9%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA DURR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FRUIT of the Loom, the leading US producer and marketer of men's and boys'
underwear, reported first-quarter sales of Dollars 349.2m, a jump of 7.9 per
cent from Dollars 323.7m a year earlier.
Net earnings rose 25 per cent to Dollars 15.9m, or 25 cents per share, from
Dollars 12.8m, or 20 cents per share, last year.
Operating earnings increased 10.8 per cent to Dollars 63.4m from Dollars
57.2m.
Mr William Farley, chairman, said that the 1991 first quarter benefited from
stronger distribution in Europe and the introduction of 15 new product
lines. Nearly completed plant modernisations and debt-to-equity improvements
also helped improve first-quarter results, he said.
Fruit of the Loom, a leading supplier of T-shirts for speciality imprints,
was boosted by the Gulf war. American demand for patriotic T-shirts boomed
during the quarter.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4029</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: GAN slips as claims mount
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GROUPE des Assurances Nationales (GAN), the third largest French
state-controlled insurer, has announced a 4 per cent net profits fall, a
slightly smaller drop than forecast.
Net earnings fell to FFr2.4bn (Dollars 416m) last year, from FFr2.5bn in
1989, a decline which GAN attributed to high disaster claims from storms at
the start of the year, plus a lower contribution to net profits from Groupe
CIC, its banking division.
Despite having to pay out FFr431m for storm damage claims, net profits from
GAN's insurance activities rose from FFr1.8bn to FFr1.9bn.
Premium income climbed by 22 per cent to FFr33.5bn from FFr27.5bn, led by
the life insurance business, which achieved strong growth.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4030</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: Spanish oil refiner buys rival
from Elf Aquitaine for Pta38bn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BRUCE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MADRID
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CEPSA, Spain's second largest oil refiner, has bought its smallest domestic
rival, Ertoil, from Elf Aquitaine for Pta38bn (Dollars 355m).
As part of the deal, Elf is to raise its stake in Cepsa from 25 per cent to
33 per cent.
This will make it the second largest shareholder after the big Spanish
commercial bank, Banco Central, which has 35 per cent of Cepsa and controls
its management.
Ertoil was sold in January to a secretive Elf intermediary for Pta46bn by
its former owners, Ercros, the chemicals group ultimately controlled by the
Kuwait Investment Office.
In addition to the Pta38bn Cepsa has agreed to pay, the company could also
pay an extra Pta9bn if current due diligence procedures revalue Ertoil and
demonstrate as yet undeclared profits.
The purchase gives Cepsa about 25 per cent of Spanish refining capacity,
although it still remains well behind the sector leader, Repsol.
The agreement marks just the latest in a spate of large French investments
in Spanish industry and finance and is the first big stake taken in a
Spanish refiner by one of the big Western oil multinationals. The Abu Dhabi
oil producer, IPIC, owns 10 per cent of Cepsa.
Meanwhile, it was being strongly suggested last week that the country's
other main refiner, Petromed, might be sold off to a foreign oil group by
its owner, Banco Espanol de Credito (Banesto).
The bank's reserves have fallen close to their permitted level of 8 per cent
of assets after taking a large charge on last year's results.
The resale of the Ertoil assets to Cepsa was not unexpected, as each Spanish
refiner is being given a large string of service outlets, in proportion to
refining capacity, owned by the state-controlled monopoly distributor,
Campsa, which is being broken up.
The move will mean Elf products will have unfettered access to at least a
quarter of Spanish service stations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4031</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: McDonnell Douglas profits take
off
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A SHARP increase in jet airliner deliveries and the benefits of cost-cutting
measures helped McDonnell Douglas, the US aerospace group, to post strong
profit gains in the first quarter to March 31.
All three of its aerospace businesses contributed to the improvement in net
income to Dollars 58m, or Dollars 1.50 a share, against Dollars 2m, or 5
cents a share, the previous year. Revenues rose 13 per cent to Dollars
4.32bn from Dollars 3.83bn.
The company, the largest US defence contractor, had earnings from continuing
operations, before income taxes, of Dollars 99m compared with a loss of
Dollars 11m a year ago.
During the first three months of 1991, McDonnell Douglas delivered 31 MD-80
aircraft, six more than in the same period in the previous year, and six of
its first nine new MD-11 aircraft.
Lower expenses and improved performance at McDonnell Douglas's combat
aircraft business helped the unit report income of Dollars 137m in the first
quarter against Dollars 104m a year earlier in spite of a 20 per cent
decline in revenues to Dollars 1.35bn from Dollars 1.68bn.
The lower revenues were attributed to the government's decision to cancel
the A-12 attack aircraft programme after the cost went over budget.
McDonnell Douglas took a Dollars 350m pre-tax provision in the fourth
quarter to cover the Pentagon's decision to scrap the programme.
During the first quarter the company reduced its workforce to 115,482 from
131,097 a year earlier, reflecting the impact of the cancelled A-12
programme and efforts to cut costs.
McDonnell Douglas has been struggling under a stretched balance sheet, a
heavy capital spending programme, sharp reductions in Pentagon spending and
a troubled civil aircraft division.
It recently cut its quarterly dividend from 70.5 cents to 35 cents a share.
McDonnell Douglas's transport aircraft segment had operating earnings of
Dollars 11m compared with a loss of Dollars 84m in 1990.
The company's missiles, space and electronic systems operations had income
of Dollars 40m compared with Dollars 13m a year ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27 Photograph Six of the new MD-11 aircraft, worth about dollars
100m each, were delivered in the quarter (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4032</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: Actimo to buy Canadian chain
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
ACTIMO, a private French property group, plans to buy Pascal, the Canadian
hardware chain which is in receivership, for an undisclosed price.
Furniture and hotel supply businesses which also operate under the Pascal
name will remain in the hands of the Pascal family. The hardware business
had annual sales of CDollars 200m (USDollars 173m) before running into
trouble last year. Varity, the Canadian car parts, diesel engine and farm
equipment group, says existing shareholders will retain all their rights
when it moves headquarters from Toronto to the US later this year.
Varity will set up a US holding company, Varity Corp, registered in
Delaware, but with headquarters in Buffalo, NY. The assets of the existing
Canadian company will be amalgamated with the new company and the Canadian
company will be wound up.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4033</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: 3M shows first decline in
earnings since 1985
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE IMPACT of recession in the US and slower growth abroad was reflected in
the first-quarter results of Minnesota Mining &amp; Manufacturing (3M), the
diversified US manufacturer, which yesterday reported its first decline in
quarterly earnings since 1985.
For the three months ended March 31, 3M returned net income of Dollars 300m,
or Dollars 1.37 a share, against Dollars 335m or Dollars 1.51 the previous
year.
Mr Allen Jacobson, the chairman, said that although results should improve
in the second half, an increase in earnings this year was not certain. 'Much
will depend on the degree of economic recovery and the value of the US
dollar,' he added.
Looking ahead, 3M sees no sign of economic improvement and expects the
pressure on profits to continue in the second quarter.
A sharp downturn in 3M's Brazilian business reduced earnings by about 9
cents a share in the 1991 quarter. However, favourable currency translations
added about 13 cents a share to first-quarter earnings and a lower tax rate
added another 3 cents a share.
Wall Street had expected a weak quarter, but the results were somewhat
weaker than anticipated.
Mr Jacobson said profit margins were squeezed in the 1991 quarter by the
combination of lower product demand and strong price competition. During the
latest quarter, 3M had sales of Dollars 3.38bn compared with Dollars 3.16bn
a year earlier. Unit sales in the US rose 2 per cent, while overseas unit
volume grew about 5 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4034</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: Square D falls 44% to Dollars
15.3m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA DURR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CHICAGO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SQUARE D, the Illinois producer of industrial control and electrical
distribution products and services fighting a takeover bid by Groupe
Schneider of France, reported first-quarter net earnings of Dollars 15.3m,
or 60 cents per share, a sharp drop of 44 per cent compared with last year's
Dollars 27.1m, or Dollars 1.09 per share.
Total first-quarter sales were Dollars 377.5m, down 3 per cent from Dollars
388.5m a year ago.
The company was hurt by recession in its key markets, in particular by low
demand for electrical distribution products due to a drop in housing starts.
It also took one-time charges of Dollars 5.3m in the first quarter for
consolidation of two lines of business.
Results were mixed from the company's international operations, with
improvements in Latin America being offset by declines in Canada.
Square D did not report any additional costs associated with its defence
against Schneider.
Mr Jerre Stead, the company chairman and chief executive, said Square D
started the year in a strong position and that with an improvement in
economic conditions, 'this will be another year of excellent financial
performance'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 27
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4035</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: Marketchief loan restructure
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER, Property Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE OF the biggest property restructuring packages in recent times has been
arranged between Barclays and Marketchief, the consortium that took over
Imry Merchant Developers for Pounds 314m in July, 1989.
Mr Stephan Wingate, chairman of Marketchief, said that Barclays had agreed
to take 'a medium/longterm view' of the Pounds 200m loan that was originally
expected to be paid back from the sale of Imry's investment assets.
In its first year, Marketchief made disposals of about Pounds 100m but
stopped when the property market deteriorated. 'Everyone agreed that it was
not sensible to sell,' said Mr Wingate.
He said the package did not involve disposals until prices improved or a
moratorium on development. Selling at current prices was, he said, 'out of
the question'.
In addition to the Barclays loan, the original deal was financed by Eagle
Star, Prudential Bache, Mr Wolfgang Stolzenberg, a Canadian investor, and by
Mr Wingate's own vehicle, Development &amp; Realisation Trust. DRT has already
written off its Pounds 1.25m investment.
Imry Merchant is perhaps best known for erecting an office block on top of
Shakespeare's Rose Theatre in Southwark.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4036</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: Sale Tilney moves to staunch
losses from UK food side
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE THOMPSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SALE TILNEY, the mini-conglomerate whose businesses cover the manufacture
and distribution of engineering products, the importing, processing and
distribution of foods, and insurance broking, has moved quickly to staunch
the losses from its UK food operation.
It has brought in a new head for that division, appointing Mr Roger Begy to
lead the foods subsidiary, Peabody Foods.
That subsidiary was almost entirely responsible for the Sale Tilney group
pre-tax losses, reported last month, of Pounds 9.6m for the year ended to
November 30 1990. It accounted for Pounds 9.08m, after taking in exceptional
provisions of Pounds 5.07m.
Mr Begy's is the first senior appointment at Sale Tilney made by Mr Andrew
Coppel, the company chief executive who was appointed in October last year.
He is viewed as the key figure in returning Peabody to profitability.
A food industry specialist, Mr Begy moves to Sale from Berisford
International where he was deputy managing director of Bristar, the food and
ingredient division.
Previously he headed a major marketing reorganisation of British Sugar's
industrial sugars division, and then became executive director of sales and
marketing at British Sugar.
Other senior management changes are expected shortly at Sale Tilney where Mr
Coppel, formerly finance director at Ratners, the high street jewellery
chain, is in the process of rebuilding the main board.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4037</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: Headline for market with Pounds
11m valuation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HEADLINE Book Publishing is coming to the main market by way of a placing of
5.73m shares which will raise about Pounds 4.8m net of expenses.
Mr Tim Hely Hutchinson, managing director, said the listing should help
Headline to attract more prominent authors and enable it to take advantage
of any acquisition opportunities that might arise.
Proceeds of the placing - including 5.25m shares by the company - will go
towards reducing borrowings and financing further growth. The market
capitalisation of the group, at the placing price of 100p per ordinary
share, will be Pounds 11.1m.
Headline was founded in 1986 by four of the present directors. Pre-tax
profits for 1990 rose from Pounds 313,000 to Pounds 637,000, after a loss of
Pounds 115,000 in 1987, the first full year of trading. Sales have grown
from Pounds 1.59m in 1987 to Pounds 5.26m in 1989 and to Pounds 8.34m last
year. Earnings per share were 6.9p.
The group publishes popular books in both hardback and paperback. The
principal authors include Mr Dean R Koontz, the horror writer, Mr David
Morrell, the creator of Rambo, and Ms Ellis Peters, the writer of medieval
detective stories.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4038</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: Jenbacher has 29.9% of Telfos
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
An extraordinary general meeting of Telfos, the troubled railway engineering
company, has approved the subscription for 12.3m shares by Jenbacher Werke.
The purchase takes the stake held by the Austrian maker of rolling stock to
29.99 per cent.
Dr Norbert Froemmer and Dr Bernhard Ebner are to join the Telfos board as
Jenbacher's representatives.
As planned, following the completion of the capital injection, Mr Stephen
Cockburn is stepping down as chairman and a director and Mr Douglas Morton
has been invited to act as chairman.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4039</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: THF offshoot expands
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVE THOMPSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GARDNER Merchant, the international catering arm of Trusthouse Forte, the
hotels and leisure group, has established itself as the second largest
contract caterer in Australia following its cash purchase of Rowland
Commercial Catering, writes Steve Thompson.
It is paying an initial ADollars 6m (Pounds 2.6m), plus a further
performance-related amount over the next three years, for the Australian
company.
Gardner moves into second place in contract catering after Nationwide
Catering, by far the biggest of Australia's contract catering businesses.
The acquisition of Rowland will increase Gardner's contracts to 125.
Rowland employs over 1,000 personnel and has well-known corporate clients
including Shell, ICI and Coles Myers. It operates restaurants in the Sydney
Opera House and the Art Gallery of New South Wales.
Gardner has made rapid strides in Australia's contract catering industry
since its initial entry in 1988, when it bought Imperial Food Services in
Melbourne.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4040</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: A fixture that sets even tougher
goals - Manchester United prepares for its stock market kick off
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JANE FULLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHILE Manchester United's players prepared for their appearance in
yesterday's Rumbelows League Cup final at Wembley, the head of the business
had a set of even tougher London fixtures.
Mr Martin Edwards, chief executive and holder of just over 50 per cent of
the shares, came to the City last week to seek support for Manchester United
plc's flotation next month.
He was expecting a mixed reception, not surprisingly when Tottenham Hotspur,
the only football club on the main market, has its shares suspended pending
refinancing or a takeover.
Mr Edwards's message is that Manchester United is different.
Although he shies away from analysing the Tottenham debacle, the contrast is
as visible as Paul Gascoigne's tears:
Tottenham floated to relieve debt, United has cash.
Tottenham lost a lot of money by diversifying into clothing, United swears
it will stick to what it knows.
Tottenham has suffered from a part-time approach to management, United
claims to be more professional.
United has, for example, sought the services of Professor Roland Smith,
chairman of British Aerospace and a prolific holder of directorships, as
non-executive chairman.
In hunting for a finance director, it is said to have laid far more stress
on professional rigour and public company experience than on the wearing of
a red and white scarf.
Mr Edwards, a board member since 1970, succeeded his father as the club's
head in 1980 after running the retail side of the family meat business. He
has run the club full-time and looks more like a sober northern businessman
than a footballer manque: not for him the coiffed hair, Riviera tan and
tendency to call women 'sweetheart'.
His conservative demeanor should help with a sale of shares that aims to
raise about Pounds 17m, valuing the company at between Pounds 35m and Pounds
40m. In the process, the directors' holding is set to come down from 76 per
cent to less than 40 per cent and Mr Edwards will receive several million
pounds. He is coy about what he will do with the money, other than paying
off the debt run up to build his stake. About Pounds 7m should come to the
club through the sale of new shares.
The expected value placed on United is way ahead of the Pounds 20m tag
attached to the abortive 1989 takeover offer by Mr Michael Knighton, a
property dealer.
Mr Edwards said the new investors apparently had additional funds available
to complete Old Trafford's redevelopment, but the deal was called off when
doubts arose about the ultimate destination of the shares.
This time the proposal is to go to the stock market to raise about half the
Pounds 12m-Pounds 13m needed to rebuild the Stretford End. Apart from
fulfilling the Taylor report requirement on all-seater stadia, the project
will complete United's complex of restaurants, executive boxes and bars.
Work is set to start in 1992 and be finished by August 1994.
United has picked an ideal time to present its figures and forecasts. It
happens to be in the middle of two excellent years of profit growth.
Substantial increases in revenue from cup runs, price rises and TV fees are
coinciding with a comparative lacuna in spending on facilities and players.
In 1989-90, a profit of Pounds 2.1m (Pounds 1.8m) was knocked back to a
pre-tax loss of Pounds 3.1m by spending on players. This year, which ends on
July 31, profit before tax and transfer fees is forecast to reach Pounds
5.5m with between Pounds 500,000 and Pounds 800,000 coming off for
transfers. Mr Edwards reckoned about a third of the Pounds 5.5m could be
attributed to cup runs.
For next year, United and its merchant bank Henry Ansbacher have been
working on the likely 'core profit', based on league games and the first
round only of domestic cup competitions. The pre-tax figure they have
arrived at is at least Pounds 5m, a near 40 per cent increase.
Mr Edwards says this will be helped by two extra home games from an enlarged
first division and by price rises. Over two years the gate revenue from each
home match, which attracts an average of 44,000 people, could rise from
about Pounds 260,000 to Pounds 400,000.
Assuming a normal tax charge of 35 per cent and 12.5m shares, earnings per
share on a 'core' Pounds 5m would be 26p. If the flotation price was 300p,
the prospective p/e would be 11.5, bang in line with the leisure sector.
The figures also suggest that United's resources would be sufficient to
cover the Pounds 4m it must find for the Stretford End development, after a
Pounds 2m grant from the Football Trust.
But what of the transfer-fee drain? Mr Alex Ferguson, team manager since
1986, has spent at least Pounds 13m on players, offset by about Pounds 8m
sales. The club was, nevertheless, cash positive in July 1990.
Ansbacher says one way to smooth out the impact is to have a reserve fund to
which money is transferred below the line. It would be fed from 'non-core'
money made in cup competitions.
Tottenham's method of putting players on the balance sheet and depreciating
them is not favoured. Working out the potential residual value of a human
has its complications, and United was also wary of possible changes in rules
governing transfers.
Mr Edwards said United would try to limit the expense of team building by
bringing on more of its own players. But following two seasons of cup
success, he could also relate the investment to considerable extra earnings.
It all sounds hunky dory, but the uncertainty of such runs is reflected in
their exclusion from core profit. And to present a steadier picture, Mr
Edwards draws attention to the less glamorous revenue from catering and
souvenirs.
For the sport's sake, the hope is that United will at long last show that
football can be a sound investment, laying to rest some of the ghosts raised
by Tottenham.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26 Photograph Martin Edwards, United's chief executive and
holder of some 50 per cent of the shares (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4041</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / International Company News: Sage rights issue success
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SAGE GROUP, the Newcastle-based computing services combine which is spending
Pounds 9.5m to buy DacEasy, a US-based accounting software company through a
combination of Pounds 3.5m cash and a 1-for-5 rights issue at 200p a share,
said that some 98.8 per cent of the shares had been taken up by existing
shareholders.
DacEasy's ultimate owner, the Insilco Corporation, recently filed for
protection under the provisions of the US bankruptcy code, but contrary to
our report on Friday DacEasy itself is not in loss. Last year it made a
Dollars 2.15m pre-tax profit on sales of Dollars 15.5m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4042</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Lord Aldington in libel costs deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN HUNT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SUN ALLIANCE insurance company, the UK's biggest household insurer, will
disclose in its annual report and accounts today that it has given an
interest-free loan, estimated at Pounds 500,000, to Lord Aldington, its
former chairman. The loan is to cover the legal costs of his nine-week libel
case against Count Nikolai Tolstoy in 1989.
The directors justify the decision on the grounds that the case arose from
his duties as the company's chairman.
Earlier this month Sun Alliance reported a 1990 loss of Pounds 181m due to
claims arising from bad weather and the recession.
The loan to Lord Aldington is repayable if he recovers costs. The legal bill
has been estimated at Pounds 500,000 plus other expenses of about Pounds
100,000.
The company says that Mr Nigel Watts, a Kent Property developer and a
co-defendant in the libel action, had claimed that Sun Alliance wrongly
refused to pay a Pounds 50,000 accident policy after his brother-in-law died
in 1975.
At the trial Lord Aldington's counsel said there had been a 'disgraceful
campaign' to force Sun Alliance to reverse its decision over the insurance
claim.
The court was told Mr Watts had circulated 10,000 copies of a pamphlet,
written by Count Tolstoy, attacking Lord Adlington's war record.
It alleged that as a senior officer in Austria at the end of the second
world war he repatriated thousands of Cossacks and anti-Tito Yugoslavs to
the Communists knowing they faced torture and death.
At the end of the trial Lord Aldington, a former deputy chairman of the
Conservative party, was awarded record Pounds 1.5m damages plus costs but
neither Count Tolstoy nor Mr Watts were able to pay that sum.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4043</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Industry with changes in the pipeline: Process plant
contractors are confident that the latest crisis in a history of booms and
busts is behind them
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW BAXTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHEN Davy, Britain's biggest independent process plant contractor, was
pushed into selling its German process operations last month, the
transaction was a sharp reminder of the risks inherent in the business.
The sale was triggered by Davy's disastrous Pounds 120m contract to build
Emerald Producer, an oil production platform on which it has already made
provisions for losses of Pounds 70m.
Process plant contracting - designing and building everything from chemical
and pharmaceutical plants to oil rigs and refineries - has always been
risky.
If all goes well with a contract, the profit margin is likely to be between
3 and 5 per cent; if things go disastrously wrong, the contractor can end up
losing 25 per cent of the value of the deal or more.
Despite these risks - graphically illustrated by Davy's problems - UK-based
process plant contractors are confident that the latest crisis in a long
history of booms and busts is behind them.
While other sectors of the economy flourished from 1982 to 1987, markets for
big plants were battered by collapsing oil prices, the Iran-Iraq war and the
Third World debt crisis.
Now the boot is on the other foot. The UK-based contracting industry, the
world's biggest after the US, is watching its counterparts in manufacturing
suffer.
'That's a reflection of the different cycles on which these sorts of
investments are made,' says Mr Michael Milner, director of the British
Chemical Engineering Contractors Association.
'Home office' employment in the UK - designers, managers and other staff but
excluding employees on UK sites - has risen from 14,000-15,000 at the low
point for the industry's fortunes in the mid-1980s to about 22,000, in line
with the last boom at the end of the 1970s.
In an industry which depends crucially on its people skills this is a good
indicator of business conditions. The upturn has been spurred by increased
orders from North Sea clients and - until recently - from the petrochemical
industry, and by worldwide demand for pharmaceutical plants.
The UK outlook remains patchy. Earlier this month the Chemical Industries
Association forecast a 14 per cent fall in new capital spending in 1991-93
compared with 1988-90.
But a wave of rationalisation, changes in ownership and cross-border
link-ups over the past decade have created a much stronger, more
international industry.
Two of the five biggest players in the UK - John Brown and Matthew Hall,
ranked numbers four and five - are owned by broad-based publicly-quoted UK
companies, Trafalgar House and Amec. The two biggest, Bechtel and Foster
Wheeler are of US ownership and origin, and Humphrey &amp; Glasgow, number
three, is US-owned but of UK origin.
The UK industry is attempting to protect itself from downturns by following
a three-pronged strategy, leading in each case towards collaboration deals
or acquisitions:
Gaining access to new markets. The most important is continental Europe,
where acquisitions are necessary to compete against entrenched local
companies such as Technip of France and Italy's Snamprogetti.
Last month Amec, the engineering and property group which owns Matthew Hall,
announced the FFr110m (Pounds 10.9m) purchase of a 20 per cent stake in
Serete, France's leading independent design engineering and construction
management group.
Amec was following in the footsteps of John Brown, Britain's leading
engineering contractor. Over the past decade, John Brown has considerably
expanded its European presence, notably through its 49 per cent stake in
Sofresid, the second biggest French process plant contractor.
Other deals are in the pipeline. Humphreys &amp; Glasgow International, part of
the US company Enserch since 1983, and a venerable name in UK process plant
contracting, is looking at a joint venture in Czechoslovakia.
Broadening the technology base.
In 1989 John Brown, probably the world's leading polyethylene plant
contractor, bought Chemetics, a processing systems specialist, from ICI, and
is now looking at another similar deal, says Mr Allan Gormly, managing
director. 'As a matter of deliberate policy, we are starting to increase our
portfolio of proprietary processes,' he says.
For every takeover there are dozens of working arrangements that often begin
with a particular contract and develop into long-term collaboration. 'The
way we get into Europe is by collaboration,' says Mr Frank Hart, H&amp;G's
managing director. 'Someone like us says to Lurgi (of West Germany) 'You've
got some technology which we can use in the UK, can we work together?' or
vice versa.'
These deals have put the UK contractors roughly in the middle of the world
industry in technology terms - they have more proprietary processes than the
large US contractors but fewer than the more specialised German companies.
Searching for finance. UK companies feel they are at a disadvantage in
arranging export credit for deals. 'The UK is now applying criteria for
creditworthiness that were being thrown out of the window in the 1960s and
1970s,' says Mr Hart.
The solution is to take the search for credit elsewhere. Mr Hart is talking
seriously to Japanese suppliers with readier access to financing. 'To make a
project work you need reputation, technology and finance,' he says.
Such finance opens the door to opportunities in the promising Asia-Pacific
region. Faced with competition there from a growing number of competent
indigenous plant builders, UK contractors have a competitive weapon in their
relatively balanced range of technologies.
Another potentially promising market, eastern Europe, poses different
problems. UK-based groups feel they will find it hard to make an impact in
eastern Germany, because Lurgi and Uhde, the two best-known German
contractors, are owned by Metallgesellschaft and Hoechst, both of which
intend to invest heavily in the east.
Elsewhere in eastern Europe, contractors face the problem of wondering who
to talk to now that centralised purchasing has collapsed.
In coming years, UK contractors are likely to move design work abroad to get
closer to the local contractors with which they will have to co-operate in
Asian markets.
Despite its problems, Davy has made as much progress as any of its rivals in
preparing for these changes. Where it can, it is moving detailed design and
engineering work to its Indian affiliate Davy Powergas, and in February it
inaugurated a South Korean joint venture, marrying its process technology
and project management with Shinwa Engineering's detailed engineering,
procurement and construction skills.
The company's share price, at 134p is less than half its peak in July 1989 -
but double the fire-sale 65p it reached last November. Spie-Batignolles, the
big French construction company, owns 14.5 per cent of Davy, and close to
another 20 per cent is in the hands of three big institutional investors.
The increasing cost of bidding for contracts and the need to share
development spending will lead to a continuing consolidation in the
industry. Davy's misfortunes, coupled with this industry trend, make it
increasingly likely that the company's days as an independent contractor are
numbered.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25 Graph (Omitted). Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4044</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Reuters plans joint venture into telecoms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN HUNT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
REUTERS, the international information technology group, is holding talks
with Thames Water and STC, the British telecommunications group, about the
possibility of forming a network to transmit Reuters financial information
to clients in the City of London.
The new telecommunications company would provide a challenge to British
Telecom and to Mercury, the Cable and Wireless subsidiary, which are used by
Reuters to transmit information to its City clients.
Expansion into other markets, such as Tokyo and New York, would be a logical
next step if a London operation proved a success. However, Reuters declined
to discuss such a move.
A spokesman for Reuters yesterday confirmed that exploratory talks had taken
place with Thames and STC but said that they were still at an early stage
and no decision had been taken.
'It would be to form a network primarily to provide information to Reuters'
clients within the metropolitan area,' he said.
He said that any challenge to BT and Mercury would only come once a decision
had been reached. 'We are far from that stage yet.'
Reuters wishes to take full advantage of the newly liberalised
telecommunications market. In the new company Thames would provide the sewer
pipelines through which fibre-optic cables could be laid to provide the
network.
STC, which was bought late last year by Northern Telecom of Canada, would
provide technical expertise and Reuters the clients and the knowledge of the
financial information market.
The new regime in telecommunications has prompted several outsiders to enter
the market. Last week it was announced that British Waterways, the public
utility which runs the UK canal system, had lined up with US Sprint, the
third-largest US long-distance telecoms carrier, to provide an alternative
long-distance network in the UK.
The newly privatised electricity supply industry is also considering
entering the market.
British Rail earlier announced plans to lay cables alongside its tracks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4045</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Bill aims to ease US swaps
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Financial Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A BILL passed last week by the US Senate on the reform of the futures
markets will remove significant legal uncertainties for the huge market in
interest rate and currency swaps, according to the International Swap
Dealers Association.
The legislation, which will allow swaps to be exempted from the provisions
of the Commodity Exchange Act, 'will benefit users of swaps and swap dealers
by removing legal uncertainty,' according to Mr Mark Brickell, the
association's chairman.
Swaps are agreements to exchange cash flows. They are usually entered into
by companies, banks or governments to regulate their exposure to movements
in exchange or interest rates.
The association said it lobbied for three years to be exempted from the act,
which requires the trading of commodities on exchanges. The association
claims that this requirement has, in the past, pushed significant swap
activity to offshore markets.
After the bill is enacted and swaps exempted from the act, dealers would be
able to develop new swap products and risk reduction techniques, the
association said in a statement.
The bill will now move to a conference of the Senate and the House of
Representatives before enactment. Its easy passage of the Senate was an
'important step', the association claimed.
The bill, which was 2 1/2 years reaching the Senate floor, tightens trading
rules on futures exchanges and strengthens the Commodities Futures Trading
Commission.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4046</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Gorbachev critics demand early crackdown
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT Mikhail Gorbachev is under increasing pressure to choose between
building a reforming coalition government and tackling the Soviet Union's
economic crisis through repression.
An influential group of hardline Communist deputies, Soyuz, called on the
Soviet leader on his return from a far-east trip at the weekend to impose a
state of emergency throughout the Soviet Union to combat economic chaos and
bring rebel republics to heel.
'Let Gorbachev impose the state of emergency and show he is a man,' said Mr
Yuri Blokhin, co-chairman of Soyuz, at a meeting which featured impassioned
attacks on Mr Gorbachev's leadership. 'If he does not, the situation will be
more painful,' he added.
Soyuz has decided to set up a national movement to press for a crackdown.
But efforts are also under way behind the scenes to persuade Mr Gorbachev to
unite with opposition democrats and republican leaders and form a coalition
government capable of conducting effective economic reform.
Mr Vadim Bakatin, a presidential adviser and the former liberal interior
minister, said he hoped Mr Gorbachev would heed his advice to compromise.
'There are only two possible outcomes: either war or co-operation,' Mr
Bakatin told reporters at a conference of economists and politicians. 'He is
an intelligent man.'
The liberals are advocating a return to the ideas of the 500-day plan
supported by the republics but rejected by President Gorbachev last year.
These include an economic union among republics allowing for a single market
and currency, a drastic financial stabilisation programme and an early start
to privatisation.
Mr Valentin Pavlov, the Soviet prime minister, is due today to present to
parliament an anti-crisis programme including price rises, slow
privatisation and a ban on strikes. But the plan has been criticised as too
vague by the country's leading economists. It also assumes political support
which the government lacks.
Striking coal miners demanding a new government and market reforms are
threatening to bring crucial industrial sectors to a standstill. Republics
seeking genuine sovereignty or outright independence have cut sharply
contributions to the central budget. Recent price rises have angered the
population without significantly improving supplies. Workers from around the
country are threatening to join the miners' strike.
Mr Grigory Yavlinsky, the main author of the 500-day programme, said the
latest government plan failed to provide solutions to the budget crisis, the
threat of hyperinflation or the steep decline in output and foreign trade.
Mr Nikolai Petrakov, until recently the president's economic adviser,
denounced the Pavlov plan as 'nothing more than a political declaration' and
a 'ruse' to attract western support. He said it offered no serious
solutions.
'Given this approach, the only kind of solution proposed by the government
is a violent one, leading all the way to a state of emergency and martial
law,' he said yesterday.
It is this option which is being urged on Mr Gorbachev by Soyuz, which has
threatened otherwise to try to vote him out of office at an emergency
congress of the country's super-parliament.
This would do nothing to cure the troubled Soviet economy. Soyuz's economic
proposals seem limited to putting the transport system under military
control, and banning strikes and all political activity.
The extent of support for Soyuz - which yesterday appealed for support from
the KGB, the armed forces and industry leaders - remains unclear.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4047</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1ABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Letter: Pharmaceutical sector not the best health educator
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Ms JH EWIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Three cheers to Mr Ernest Mario, of Glaxo Holdings, for his article,
'Educating the patient' (April 17) and its presentation of the case for a
well-informed public. A medically aware population should contribute
significantly to greater effectiveness and efficiency within the National
Health Service.
However, I question the role of the pharmaceutical industry as educator.
Having seen some of the campaigns thus sponsored in the US it is hard not to
worry that people are encouraged to focus more on those complaints for which
there are expensive medical cures rather than on some of the more basic
issues of self-help.
The National Health Service was built on the belief that the government and
medical community must provide the medical care maintain the highest
possible level of health among the population. Unfortunately, the public
were never made full partners in this responsibility. Is it not time we
demanded a more direct means of participating in decisions concerning our
living and dying? As a start, we need more and better organised health
education.
If the pharmaceutical industry wishes to contribute to the cost of such an
educational effort, we thank them. But please, do not allow the piecemeal,
illness-oriented public relations efforts of the past masquerade as the
public health education we so desperately need.
Jeannette Haase Ewin,
Alton Wordsmiths.
20 Seymour Square,
Kemp Town, Brighton,
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4048</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Letter: Equity on property valuable and popular security
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr OSMAN STREATER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Some time ago, you published a trenchant article saying that the
Conservative government 'has undermined the long-run financial security of
many individuals' (The Long View, January 6). It had, you warned, done this
by deciding to wind down the State Earnings Related Pension Scheme, even
though the UK was spending only 7.5 per cent of national income on state
pensions, as against 14 per cent in France and Germany. Millions of
investors in the new personal pensions, you stated, 'have no idea what
benefits their contributions will eventually buy' - the implication being
that they would be sorely disappointed.
Later, you published another editorial decrying the rise in capital value of
housing during the lifetime of the same government ('Housing and inflation',
April 16). 'A modified capital gains tax', you suggest, 'should be applied
to owner-occupied housing.'
For many people in this country, the rise in the capital value of their
house provides the best long-term security they can expect. Yes, those rises
in value have been much more marked in Britain than in France and Germany.
But then in France and Germany the state does more for its pensioners than
is done in the UK.
Like mortgage interest relief, the ability to use the growing equity in the
value of one's house for purposes of one's own choosing is not just, as you
say, one of 'Mrs Thatcher's sacred cows'. It is universally popular. It is
needed. And it takes the place of benefits which British governments, unlike
French and German ones, are not prepared to provide for their citizens. So
why can't it be left alone?
Osman Streater,
Savile Club,
69 Brook Street, W1
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4049</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Letter: Capital gains tax of no concern to grim reaper
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr PHILIP CHAPPELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Your leader 'Housing and inflation' (April 16) accurately describes the
mess that we politely call a policy for housing finance - a mess that is
typical of the shambles, in both the modern and the slaughter-house meaning,
that pervades all our policies towards personal saving and investment.
But you should not fall into the trap of suggesting any form of capital
gains tax on equity withdrawal from owner-occupied housing. The case for
roll-over relief is well made: but since the grim reaper does not normally
give as much as seven years notice of his plans, most owner-occupiers will
die with their estate owning a house, a highly visible asset. On death, the
tentacles of inheritance tax (which makes no allowance for purely
inflationary gains on savings) wrap up any tax advantages that capital gains
tax exemption may have offered during life.
Take away mortgage interest relief and the tax treatment of housing then
provides the ideal for taxing all forms of saving, on the personal equity
plan/tax-exempt special savings accounts precedent. All investment is made
out of after-tax income and thereafter accumulates free of all income taxes
and gains taxes, until death levels us all. The Inland Revenue can sleep
content in the sure knowledge that we are all under sentence of death,
albeit with a temporary reprieve.
Philip Chappell,
AITC Investment Trusts,
22 Frognal Lane,
London NW3
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4050</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / The mystery of German money
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SAMUEL BRITTAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
One minor but conspicuous cost of German unification is the statistical
confusion that has ensued. A leading example concerns the monetary
statistics, which are now being published for the whole of Germany.
Comparisons with a year ago are, however, impossible as monetary unification
only took place last July and it took a little while for the population to
adjust.
Some economists who should have known better have fallen straight into this
trap and have been saying that the German money supply has been growing at
20 per cent, using this figure as part of their campaign against both the
European Monetary System and the goal of European Monetary Union. This
percentage is wholly spurious and results from comparing the broad money
supply for the whole of Germany with that of west Germany alone a year ago.
The Bundesbank's recommended method of assessment is to compare the latest
available all-German figure for February with the average for the fourth
quarter of 1990 and annualise the result. This gives 3.5 per cent growth for
broad money, which is well within the Bundesbank target range. Narrow money
(M1) is not targeted. The best estimate here is 6.1 per cent, little
different for the west German average of the last few years.
Bundesbank analysts warn that the monetary numbers may give too favourable
an impression, as there have been downward distortions due, for instance, to
the dismantling of the former east German trade monopolies. But the
underlying rate of monetary growth is still nowhere near 20 per cent. The
true reasons for concern arise from a broader range of indicators.
For instance the weakness of the German Mark is telling us something. It is
more than the mirror image of dollar strength, as the D-Mark has also fallen
against the yen and been relatively weak inside the EMS currency grid. A
falling exchange rate may be both a symptom of over loose monetary policy
and a direct contributor to inflationary pressures, as experience in
countries such as Britain and France has long shown.
The Bundesbank's fears are still modest by the standards of other countries.
While inflation speeds up, growth is likely to slow down, a typical
experience of any country late in an economic cycle. Wage settlements may be
7 per cent rather than the 6 per cent hoped for early this year. Consumer
price inflation is expected to increase from 2 1/2 to 3 1/2 per cent by the
end of the year - half of the rise reflecting tax increases. But there is a
worry that this forecast may be exceeded and inflation rise to 4 per cent or
slightly above.
There is indeed more than a 50-50 chance that for a few months from this
autumn, headline German inflation rates may exceed headline British rates.
One cringes in advance at the way in which the more partisan UK tabloids
will celebrate. But this completely artificial crossover will reflect
nothing more than the different cyclical positions of the two economies,
plus the deficiencies of the British Retail Prices Index, which produce wild
gyrations around the underlying inflation rate.
A look at underlying cost comparisons might bring even British Conservative
publicists to their senses. Pay costs per unit output have been rising by 2
per cent per annum in German industry compared with a purported 11 per cent
in the UK. The last figure is another British statistical own goal
reflecting an exaggeration of the productivity slowdown normal in recession.
But even if we take 4 1/2 percentage points off the official British
measure, there is no doubt whose underlying inflation is likely to remain
higher. Sterling is unlikely to take over the anchor role from the D-Mark in
the foreseeable future.
So far the Bundesbank has concentrated on fighting unreasonable US demands
for an easing of policy. Even if it has to tighten further, there will still
be scope for other EC countries to narrow or even reverse their interest
rate differentials against Germany instead of following suit. The D-Mark's
sound money reputation is an international public good to be preserved.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4051</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Letter: Pension choice
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ROGER LYONS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, When Mr Peter Stirrup, the chairman of the National Association of
Pension Funds (Letters, April 15) argues that pension schemes should not be
forced to make retrospective changes in order to give sex equality, he is
actually arguing for sex discrimination to continue for another 40 years.
His argument that pensions are earned is certainly one trade unions support
but it has taken the European Court to establish the principle that pensions
are deferred pay, something opposed by the government and the NAPF.
The nature of company pension schemes is such that their members'
entitlement to benefit is not really determined until they cease
contributing, for whatever reason. Schemes have been only too happy to make
retrospective changes to the benefits of early leavers including those whom
sponsoring companies have made redundant. Benefit structures do provide for
such contingencies but schemes have been happy to profit at the expense of
members' lost expectations. Now the reverse situation applies, but despite
large surpluses they are resisting members' new expectations of equality.
Trade unions believe that a fundamental principle is involved in ending sex
discrimination and so we want equality at the earliest possible date. Legal
commentators not dancing to the company tune, orchestrated by the NAPF,
believe the European Court was inclined to support this view and intended
all pensions claimed after its judgement to be equal.
Finally, Mr Stirrup should have declared, in saying the NAPF is keen for
equality as soon as possible, that it is advocating equality at 65.
In other words, it is not influenced by the news that most pension scheme
members want the choice of being able to retire on a full pension at 60.
Roger Lyons,
assistant general secretary,
MSF, Head Office, Park House,
64-66 Wandsworth Common, SW18
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4052</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Letter: Do not ignore the European Parliament
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr MARTYN BOND
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Dick Tavern's valuable letter on the size and effectiveness of the
European Commission (Letters, April 18) makes one erroneous assertion. He
states that it is 'the only European institution which represents the
interests of the Community as such, rather than those of the nation states'.
To overlook the role of the European Parliament as the voice of the people
of Europe is regrettable, especially at a stage in the negotiation of
political union in the intergovernmental conferences when it will, in all
likelihood, acquire considerable additional responsibilities.
Martyn Bond.
European Parliament,
UK Information Office,
2 Queen Anne's Gate,
London SW1
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 23
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4053</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Target for discontent: Microsoft has become a focus for
industry ire
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
When Microsoft's popular 'Windows' program received a 'Best New Business
Software Product' award at a recent computer software industry event in San
Francisco, the audience of industry executives booed and hissed.
This outburst of public animosity reflects rising resentment towards
Microsoft among its competitors and even some of its partners in the
personal computer industry, who charge that the company is using 'bully
tactics' to expand its dominant position in the market for personal computer
programs.
Industry grumbles have now come to the attention of the US Federal Trade
Commission which has told Microsoft that it is conducting a broad anti-trust
investigation into 'third-party allegations that the company has monopolised
or has attempted to monopolise the market for operating systems, operating
environments, computer software and computer peripherals for personal
computers'.
'I don't believe we are doing anything illegal or unethical,' insists Mr
Mike Hallman, Microsoft president. The commission has not raised any
specific charges, he says, adding that envy of Microsoft's success is behind
much of the criticism. Industry observers agree that there are a lot of
'sour grapes' among those who wish that they could have matched Microsoft's
performance. Certainly, as the world's largest and most profitable computer
software company, Microsoft makes an easy target.
With 1990 revenues of Dollars 1.18bn, Microsoft dominates the market for
programs that run on personal computers. Already for the first three
quarters of fiscal 1991, Microsoft has reported revenues of Dollars 1.3bn.
The company is widely acclaimed as one of the best-managed computer groups,
and PC users clearly have benefited from its dozens of products.
Yet within the computer industry, Microsoft has become the company that
competitors love to hate. Mr Bill Gates, its chairman and founder, receives
much of the blame. At 35, he is an entrepreneurial legend, a self-made
multi-billionaire. Intensely competitive, Mr Gates 'always plays to win '
and to leave the other guy knowing that he has lost', says a long-time
business associate.
Founded in 1975, Microsoft rose to power in the early 1980s as the developer
of MS-DOS, the 'operating system' program that controls the basic functions
 -such as retrieving or saving data - of IBM-compatible personal computers.
Since then, the company has played a pivotal role in the personal computer
industry, in part because of its ties to IBM.
Microsoft has expanded its hold on the systems software market with programs
such as OS/2, a more powerful PC operating system, and 'Windows', which
gives IBM-compatible computers many of the attributes of an Apple Computer's
Macintosh.
But the company has also established itself as the premier supplier of
applications programs - such as word processors and spread sheets - for
Macintosh and as a challenger to market leaders in two of the main segments
of the market for IBM-compatible applications programs.
As Microsoft has grown, so has its power to influence the industry,
particularly in the areas of standards and the direction of technology. But
this power has also bred resentment.
Microsoft 'is like a tall teenager who has yet to achieve the maturity that
goes with his stature', says Mr Dick Williams, president of Digital
Research, a long-time Microsoft competitor. Aggressive sales tactics may
have been acceptable when Microsoft was a 'small, scrappy company', he
suggests, but today 'they have an extremely adverse impact upon all other
players in the industry'.
Even IBM, long Microsoft's closest partner, appears to be distancing itself
from the software company. Last week IBM held a series of seminars to lay
out its future PC operating system strategy. Microsoft played no part in the
presentations.
The long-time allies now acknowledge differences of opinion over the
direction of PC software. While Microsoft is promoting its 'Windows'
program, in combination with DOS, as the operating software of choice for
most PC users, IBM is firmly committed to a new generation of software based
upon OS/2, an operating system that the two companies developed together.
Since Microsoft has an interest in both programs this might appear to be an
'in-house' squabble, but in reality its outcome could determine whether
Microsoft takes control of PC software standards, or cedes that role to IBM.
'IBM intends to deliver OS/2 2.0 . . . that will provide a better DOS than
DOS and a better 'Windows' than 'Windows,'' says Mr James Cannavino, IBM
vice-president in charge of personal computer operations.
In another move that has raised questions about the Microsoft-IBM
'marriage', IBM has recently been licensing PC software from several
Microsoft competitors.
Microsoft's relationships with some other key players in the personal
computer industry are also strained; for instance, the software company is
in the middle of a legal fight with Apple Computer over alleged copyright
infringement of Macintosh software. Hewlett-Packard, the leading supplier of
desk-top computer printers, is also antagonistic. 'Microsoft cares more
about winning than relationships,' charges Mr Doug Carnahan, general manager
of the printing systems group at HP.
Microsoft's strategic relationships last only as long as the company sees an
immediate benefit, according to other industry executives. Its loudest
critics are, however, among its competitors in the market for personal
computer applications programs. They take a dim view of Microsoft's dual
role as both a systems software and applications programs developer.
Critics charge that Microsoft's in-house applications program developers
acquire advanced knowledge of future changes in operating systems and
related software, giving them an unfair advantage over outside competitors.
The company can beat competitors to market with applications programs that
take advantage of new features of the operating systems developed in-house,
competitors complain. Yet even if Microsoft's applications developers do
benefit from advance information about systems software, the company is not
doing anything illegal.
'Microsoft is not unique in developing both systems software and
applications,' Mr Hallman protests. 'IBM, HP, Digital Equipment and Apple do
it too.' Microsoft is, however, the only sizeable PC software company that
straddles both sides of the software market.
'We treat our applications division just like any other software developer,'
adds Mr Hallman. Microsoft holds regular developers' conferences to share
its plans with outside applications programmers, and has a senior executive
in charge of 'developer relations', he points out.
This has not dimmed the dislike of Microsoft among dozens of smaller PC
software companies. Those that attempt to compete head on in the PC
operating systems market claim that the market leader uses 'tie-in pricing',
linking purchases of its applications programs to prices for its operating
systems programs.
Others make claims of being drawn into sharing their product secrets with
Microsoft in licensing or acquisition talks, only to see Microsoft launch a
competing product after the talks have broken down.
To allegations that Microsoft has exploited smaller companies, Mr Hallman
responds that it is difficult to address 'non-specific' charges. 'But we
have a very clear set of guidelines on business practices. We have to deal
with other companies without exploiting those contacts.'
The FTC investigation into Microsoft's business practices could go on for
months, even years, and may lead nowhere. Legal experts say that no evidence
has emerged to suggest that Microsoft is in violation of anti-trust laws. In
the meantime, however, Microsoft may be forced to confront its lack of
popularity in an industry where inter-company relationships are crucial.
'One lesson we have learned,' Mr Hallman acknowledges, 'is that we need to
make sure that we communicate fully with all our partners.'
Another lesson may be that Microsoft must temper its marketing tactics while
it is under the scrutiny of federal regulators. Though it is a midget in the
computer industry as a whole, in the personal computer software industry
Microsoft is a giant. It cannot throw its weight around without being
labelled a bully.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22 Illustration Microsoft chairman and founder Bill Gates,
always plays to win (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4054</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Arts: Chamber Orchestra of Europe - Barbican Hall
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD FAIRMAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Following their television series devoted to the earlier Beethoven
symphonies, Nikolaus Harnoncourt and the Chamber Orchestra of Europe came to
London at the weekend to complete the cycle. This was the first time that
Harnoncourt had conducted the Ninth Symphony and the Barbican audience can
count itself fortunate to have caught his interpretation at white heat
straight from the intellectual forge.
Everything about the evening was as invigorating as one could have hoped.
Harnoncourt's performances, with their combination of controversial new
ideas and pounding energy, are guaranteed to exercise the mind as much as
they do the physical senses. The puffing and grunting of the conductor and
his enthusiastic stamping on the podium are only the most obvious outward
signs of the latter.
It is hardly appropriate any longer to refer to Harnoncourt as a specialist
in early music, when he is so often found these days in front of symphony
orchestras. But what he has learned from working with period instruments was
everywhere to be heard here: bright, forward, harsh, aggressively strange
sounds. It was as though Beethoven was to be thrust before us as new and
radical as he must have sounded in his own day.
This was an elemental Ninth Symphony. More raw at the nerve-endings than
Norrington; more expressive than Hogwood, the 'authentic' performances which
it most closely resembled. It also exhibited some of those Harnoncourt
quirks to set musicologists thinking: for example, just when the conductors
named above have argued the case for taking the second movement trio slowly,
Harnoncourt raced through it at double their pace.
The performance was tinglingly alive and is indeed to be recorded live in
Graz later in the year. The COE did not play to the best of its very
considerable ability for Harnoncourt on this occasion; but by then both
orchestra and soloists (Charlotte Margiono, Birgit Remmert, Robert Tear and
David Wilson-Johnson) should have sorted out their problems. The Tallis
Chamber Choir is superb already. I trust that it will be kept.
Nor, in the rest of the evening, was there any hint of routine. For the
platform had earlier played host to not one inspiring musician but two. In
the first half Martha Argerich played Beethoven's Second Piano Concerto with
a spontaneity of feeling, now fiery, now poetic, that must have rivalled the
spirit of the concerto's early performances, when the composer himself, a
great improviser and impassioned soloist, performed it.
Altogether this first of the COE's spring series at the Barbican was an
uplifting occasion. A repeat of this programme is scheduled tonight and the
other two concerts follow over the next week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4055</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Arts: Die Zauberflote - Frankfurt City Opera
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW CLARK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Depleted and disillusioned, the Frankfurt ensemble is back in its home,
three and a half years after the Opera House fire. There is really not much
to celebrate. The production team and some of the cast for Die Zauberflote
were brought in at the last minute. The new stage machinery does not yet
function properly and the repertory for the rest of the season consists of
tried old favourites.
After camping out for so long, the company must now make do with stop-gap
artistic leadership, while a new intendant and music director are sought. We
are a long, long way from those heady days four years ago, when the
company's identity and achievement were so clearly stated by the
Gielen-Berghaus Ring.
Much of the blame for the current mess lies with Gary Bertini, who resigned
as director last December after a vote of no confidence by the orchestra.
Despite his success in engaging talented young singers, Bertini never
convinced the Frankfurt public or opera ensemble that he was the right man
for the job. He was a poor manager of people and he was away too often to be
an effective leader.
Die Zauberflote, staged by Wolfgang Weber with designs by Toni Businger, was
solid and dependable, but without any special touch. The decor consisted of
plain proscenium frames and drop-cloths, linked by variations on a
splintered sun motif. A slim set of dangling strips, red and then blue,
served for the trial of fire and water, and all masonic associations were
dropped. The amplified thunder preceding the Queen of the Night's entries
was hideously loud, but the music was conducted fluently and efficiently by
Marcello Viotti.
The singing had splashes of distinction. Matthias Holle presented the ideal
Sarastro - majestic in voice, every phrase beautifully sculpted and
weighted, a handsome, well-built figure with an air of dignity and youthful
maturity. An unqualified welcome, too, for Teresa Seidl, a Pamina of rich,
noble tone and faultless voice production: 'Ach, ich fuhl's', self-contained
yet expressive, was outstanding. The production could also boast an
unusually well-matched trio of Ladies and Knaben. Christer Bladin's Tamino
was prone to sing flat, Amanda Halgrimson's Queen of the Night cleared the
hurdles with little to spare and Michael Vier - not a natural comedian -
showed that Papageno just cannot fail. After the turmoil of the recent past,
perhaps it is no bad thing that Die Zauberflote should turn out to be such a
low-key affair. From here on, things can only get better.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4056</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Arts: Today's Television
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Orwell and Swift would split their sides if they could see the Dispatches
episode screened again tonight in Channel 4's 'Banned' season (11.50). No
doubt neither would be surprised that, so long after their deaths (41 and
246 years) the powers that be are exerting as much effort as ever to keep
people in the dark. But amusement might verge on incredulity with the way in
which the words of republicans such as Gerry Adams and Martin McGuinness are
dubbed onto pictures of their talking faces to comply with government
restrictions. Nothing in Animal Farm or Gulliver's Travels is more far
fetched.
Horizon provides yet another programme about Chernobyl (8.10 BBC2) this time
filmed right inside the concrete 'sarcophagus' built to contain the
radioactive ruins of the nuclear reactor. It joins scientists trying to
prevent another catastrophe. The third of C4's Truth About Lies
documentaries (9.00) suggests, using the example of American network TV,
that people may lie about reality more effectively when there is virtually
no formal censorship.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4057</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / The Week Ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
RESULTS DUE
ICI's first quarter pre-tax profits, reported on Thursday, will be far below
the Pounds 414m the chemical giant made in the first quarter of 1990. But
with the petrochemical margins rising temporarily in the first three months
of this year, the profits are unlikely to be as low as the Pounds 84m
recorded in the final quarter of 1990. The outcome is likely to be somewhere
in the Pounds 140m - Pounds 180m region.
Ratners Group, the jewellery chain which has been plagued by doubters since
it bought Kay Jewelers in the US is due to report its annual results today.
The flamboyant Gerald Ratner is likely to provide a vibrant defence of the
company's long-term strategy in expanding in the US in spite of announcing a
slight fall in pre-tax profits from Pounds 121m to Pounds 115m.
But unusually for Mr Ratner, his comments will probably concentrate more on
the sober measures the company is taking to control costs than on the latest
jewellery craze.
A clutch of fashion retailers are also likely to show the effects of
difficult trading. On Wednesday, Laura Ashley, the fashion and furnishings
company, will report annual losses of up to Pounds 8m as it struggles to
combat its difficulties in its US operations.
Meanwhile fellow retailer, Etam, will on Thursday produce only meagre
profits of Pounds 6m although it is thought the company may have seen some
more encouraging trading this year.
Tarmac, Britain's biggest housebuilder, is likely to show tomorrow a steep
drop in pre-tax profits for 1990 to around Pounds 180m - Pounds 190m from
Pounds 377m a year earlier. At the interim stage, the deep recession in
construction had already marked it down some 36 per cent. It was a
disappointing setback for the group which was one of the fastest growing in
the UK construction industry in the 1980s.
UK COMPANIES TODAY
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Abbey National, Grosvenor House Hotel, Park Lane, W, 11.00
Capita, Hill Samuel Bank, 110 Wood Street, EC, 10.30
Grovewood Securities, 53 Mount Street, W, 9.00
Scottish Eastern Inv. Trust, 29 Charlotte Square, Edinburgh, 12.00
Wilkes (James), The Moat House Hotel, Chesterfield Road South, Sheffield,
12.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Boot (Henry)
Conrad Continental
Farnell Electronics
How
Kingston Oil &amp; Gas
Ptarmigan
Ratners
Travis Perkins
Interims:
Clydesdale Inv. Trust
Jakarta Fund
Synapse Computer Servs.
TOMMOROW
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Brown &amp; Jackson, Battle Bridge House, 300 Grays Inn Road, W, 10.00
Cityvision, 3/5 Norwich Street, EC, 12.00
Dunedin Income Growth Trust, 25 Ravelston Terrace, Edinburgh, 12.00
Global Group, 7 Birchin Lane, EC, 11.00
LASMO, Barbican Centre, EC, 11.30
National Westminster Bank, 15 Bishopsgate, EC, 11.00
Pacific Assets Trust, 1 Charlotte Square, Edinburgh, 12.30
Second Market Inv., Norfolk House, 13 Southampton Place, W, 10.00
Sumit, Davies House, 1 Sun Street, EC, 2.45
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Bridgend
British Fittings
Cannon Street Invs.
Edinburgh Inv. Trust
FR
Fields (Mrs.)
London American Ventures
QS Hldgs.
Tarmac
Tyne Tees Television
Ward
Interims:
Allied London Props.
Cosalt
Keystone Inv.
McCarthy &amp; Stone
McKechnie
St. Ives
WEDNESDAY APRIL 24
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Ansbacher (Henry), Priory House, One Mitre Square, EC, 11.45
Beradin Hldgs., Tubs Hill House, London Road, Sevenoaks, Kent, 11.30
Campari Intl., Intl. House, Priestley Way, Staples Corner, W, 12.00
Carlisle Group, Howard Hotel, Temple Place, W, 11.00
Courtaulds Textiles, London Marriot Hotel, Duke Street, W, 10.45
Delta, The Waldorf Hotel, Aldwych, W, 12.00
Expamet Intl., The Royal Automobile Club, 89 Pall Mall, SW, 12.00
Hall Engineering, Telford Moat House, Forgegate, Telford Centre, Telford,
Shropshire, 10.30
Lloyds Bank, 71 Lombard Street, EC, 3.00
Manders, Goldthorn Hotel, Penn Road, Wolverhampton, 12.00
Memec, Chartered Accountants Hall, Moorgate Place, EC, 10.30
More O'Ferrall, The Cafe Royal, Regent Street, W, 10.00
Partridge Fine Arts, 144-146 New Bond Street, W, 12.00
Williams Hldgs., The Donington Thistle Hotel, Castle Donington, Derby, 12.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Austin Reed
British Dredging
Brixton Estate
CI
Dencora
Hopkinsons
Sovereign Oil &amp; Gas
World of Leather
Interims:
Haemocell
Jessups
Majedie Inv.
Shani
THURSDAY APRIL 25
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Automated Security, 259 City Road, EC, 12.00
Barclays Bank, 30 Threadneedle Street, EC, 2.30
Bensons Crisps, Clifton Arms Hotel, Lytham St. Annes Lancashire, 12.00
British Aerospace, London Marriot Hotel, Duke Street, W, 3.00
Calor, British Council of Shipping, St. Mary Axe, EC, 11.30
Cooper (Alan), Burnley Road, Todmorden, Lancashire, 12.30
Doeflex, 56 Holmethorpe Avenue, Redhill, 12.00
Fife Indmar, 115 Hanover Street, Edinburgh, 12.00
Fired Earth Tiles, Hopcrofts Holt Hotel, Steeple Aston, Oxfordshire, 12.00
Isle of Man Steam Packet, Castle Mona Hotel, Douglas, 2.30
Kalon, Huddersfield Road, Birstall, Batley, 11.30
Lloyds Abbey Life, Inn on the Park, Hamilton Place, Park Lane, W, 11.30
Mayborn, Dylon House, Worsley Bridge Road, Lower Sydenham, SE, 10.30
Microvitec, Stakis Norfolk Gardens Hotel, Bradford, 12.00
Padang Senang, Tubs Hill House, London Road, Sevenoaks, Kent, 11.00
Reuters, The Sedgwick Centre, EC, 11.30
Throgmorton USM Trust, 155 Bishopsgate, EC, 12.30
Try Group, Cowley Business Park, Cowley, Uxbridge, Middlesex, 12.00
Vickers, Millbank Tower, Millbank, SW, 12.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Acorn Computer
Fleming Universal Inv. Trust
Folkes
Holt (Joseph)
Liberty
Plastiseal
Ryan Hotels
Securities Trust of Scotland
Interims:
Gleeson (MJ)
Govett Strategic Inv. Trust
Kalamazoo
FRIDAY APRIL 26
COMPANY MEETINGS:
Baltic, Brown's Hotel, Dover Street, W, 11.30
Hillsdown, 128 Swiss Cottage, King Henry's Road, W, 2.00
Imperial Chemical Inds., Royal Lancater Hotel, Lancaster Gate, W, 11.00
Macallan-Glenlivet, The Macallan Distillery, Craigellachie, Banffshire,
12.00
Pickwick, Brewers' Hall, Aldermanbury Square, EC, 11.30
Ransomes, Post House Hotel, London Road, Ipswich, 12.00
Transport Development, Chartered Accountants Hall, Moorgate Place, EC, 12.00
Wimpey (George), Savoy Hotel, W, 12.00
BOARD MEETINGS:
Finals:
Clayton, Son
Downiebrae
Expedier
Slingsby (HC)
Usborne
Walker (JO)
Interims:
British Assets Trust
Investors Capital Trust
National Home Loans
New Frontiers Dev. Trust
TR Far East Inv. Trust
Company meetings are annual general meetings unless otherwise stated.
DIVIDEND &amp; INTEREST PAYMENTS TODAY
AIM 1.5p
Asda Finance 10 3/4 % Cnv. Cap. Bds. 2005 5.375pc.
Britannia Bldg. Soc. Fltg. Rate Sub. Nts. 2005 Pounds 36462.33
European Economic Community 10 5/8 % Nts. 1995 5.3125pc.
Hibernian 3.45p
North Surrey Wtr. 7% 3.5p
Do. 3 1/2 % 1.75p
Do. 3 1/2 % (Fmly. 5%) 1.75p
Do. 4.9% A 2.45p
Do. 4.9% B 2.45p
Persimmon 4.85p
Texas Instruments 18cts.
TOMORROW
Bank Leumi (UK) 11.5p
Bank of China Fltg. Rate Nts. 1992 Dollars 420.24
Christiania Bank OG Kreditkasse Fltg. Rate Sub. Nts. 1997 Dollars 429.72
Kleinwort O'seas Inv. Tst. 1.7p
National Westminster Fin. BV Gtd. Fltg. Rate Cap. Nts. 2005 Dollars 420.24
Shoprite 5.2p
Tokyo Tatemono 7.4% Bds. 2001 3.7pc.
Do. 7 1/4 % Bds. 2001 3.625pc.
Woolwich Bldg. Soc. Fltg. Rate Nts. 1995 Pounds 174.14
WEDNESDAY APRIL 24
Bristol &amp; West Bldg. Soc. Fltg. Rate Nts. 1992 Pounds 174.91
Britannia Bldg. Soc. Fltg. Rate Nts. 1996 Pounds 349.21
Coronation Syndicate 14cts.
Co-Operative Bank Sub. Fltg. Rate Nts. 2000 Pounds 174.91
Dunedin Inc. Growth Tst. 16p
Lloyds Bank Sers. A Var. Rate Sub. Nts. 1998 Pounds 364.01
Marubeni Intl. Fin. 7.3% Bds. 1994 3.65pc.
THURSDAY APRIL 25
Bankers Tst. New York 63.5cts.
CPC Intl. 55cts.
Conversion 9 1/2 % 2004 4.75pc.
Exchequer 11% 1991 5.5pc.
Five Arrows Chile Fd. Ptg. 30cts.
Gen. Electric 51cts.
ICI 34p
Manchester (City of) 11 1/2 % Red. 2007 5.75pc.
Manufacturers Hanover 47cts.
Murray Inc. Tst. 2.1p
Partridge Fine Arts 1.85p
Serco 7.5p
Tokyo Leasing (UK) 8.665% Nts. 1996 4.3325pc.
Williams Hldgs. 7.25p
FRIDAY APRIL 26
Alliance Tst. 27p
Do. 4% Prf. 1.4p
Do. 4 1/4 % Prf. 1.4875p
Do. 5% Prf. 1.75p
Anglo Amer. Indl. 240cts.
Australia (Commonwealth of) 11 3/8 % Ln. 2015 (Br) 5.6875pc.
Do. (Reg) 5.6875pc.
Bank of Nova Scotia 25cts.
Beatrix Mines 39cts.
Beradin Hldgs. 0.45p
Brandon Hire 1.11p
Cons. Plants. Berhad 4sen.
Cornwell Parker 1.6p
Do. A NV 1.6p
Cramphorn 0.53p
Microvitec 0.2p
Pacific Assets Tst. 1.875p
Padang Senang 0.6p
Pifco Hldgs. 3.5p
Do. A 3.5p
Provident Financial 15.5p
Sedgwick 8p
Sinclair Goldsmith 1p
Singapore Para Rubber Est. 1p
TR Pacific Inv. Tst. 0.25p
Takare 0.725p
Throgmorton USM Tst. 3.65p
Trinity Intl. 5.4p
Walker (Thomas) 0.175p
SATURDAY APRIL 27
Exchequer 13 1/2 % 1994 6.75pc.
Do. 15% 1997 7.5pc.
Macallan-Glenlivet 0.82p
PARLIAMENTARY DIARY
TODAY
Commons: Private members' motions. Coalmining (subsidence) bill, remaining
stages. Motions on the agriculture and forestry financial provisions bill.
Lords: Representation of the people bill, 3rd reading. Criminal justice
bill, committee. Motions on legal aid regulations. Foreign corporations
bill, second reading.
Select committee: Public accounts - subject, inland revenue issues.
Witnesses: Board of Inland Revenue officials (Room 16, 4.30pm).
TOMORROW
Commons: Ports bill, remaining stages. Motion on the industrial training
levy (engineering board) order.
Lords: Criminal justice bill, committee. Motor vehicles (safety equipment
for children) bill, second reading. Local government finance (publicity for
auditors reports) bill, second reading.
Committee on opposed private bill: London Underground bill (Room 6,
10.30am).
Severn Bridges bill (Room 20, 10.30am).
WEDNESDAY
Commons: Atomic weapons establishment bill, remaining stages. Motion on the
broadcasting (restrictions on the holding of licences) order.
Lords: Debate on the growth of unemployment, particularly in the regions.
Debate on the role of government in promoting sport. Education (swimming and
water safety) bill, second reading.
Select committees: Welsh affairs - subject, the NHS in Wales: elective
surgery. Witnesses: Professor Kim McPherson, Dr Nick Black, Dr Myfanwy
Morgan (Room 8, 10.15am).
Environment - subject, main estimates for 1991-92 and the DoE annual report
1991. Witnesses: Departmental officials (Room 15, 10.30am).
Severn Bridges bill (Room 20, 10.30 am).
Trade and industry - subject, takeovers and mergers. Witnesses: Sir John
Clark. Cadbury Schweppes (Room 21, 10.45 am).
Defence - subject, options for change: RAF. Witnesses: MoD officials (Room
16, 10.50am ).
Energy - subject, clean coal technology and the coal market after 1993.
Witnesses: Powergen plc and National Power plc (Room 18, 11am).
Defence - subject, options for change: Review into naval support. Witnesses:
Naval base trade unions (Room 21, 4.15 pm).
Environment - subject, PSA services and DoE property holdings estimates,
1991-92. Witnesses: DoE property holdings officials and PSA officials (Room
16, 4.15pm).
Foreign affairs - subject, events in the Middle East. Witness: Mr Afif
Safieh, Palestine Liberation Organisation (Room 8, 4.15 pm).
Public accounts - subject, marine pollution. Witness: Sir Alan Bailey,
Department of Transport (Room 15, 4.25 pm).
Transport - subject, EC air transport policy. Witnesses: European Commission
officials (Room 17, 4.15pm).
Committee on private opposed bill: London Underground bill (Room 6,
10.30am).
THURSDAY
Commons: Natural Heritage (Scotland) bill, remaining stages.
Lords: Child support bill, report. Prayer to annul the social security
(overlapping benefits) amendment regulations 1991. Motion on the industrial
training levy (engineering board) order 1991.
Severn Bridges bill (Room 20, 10.30am).
Committee on opposed private bill: London Underground bill (Room 6,
10.30am).
FRIDAY
Commons: Private member's bill.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4058</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / The Week Ahead: UK markets focus on trade figures -
Economics
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RACHEL JOHNSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AFTER last week's grisly unemployment figures, the UK markets should be
focusing on tomorrow's trade and current account data for March.
Last time round, sharp re-estimates of the UK recorded trade inflows on the
invisibles produced a smallish deficit of just Pounds 192m in February.
Economists do not expect to be so pleasantly surprised by the March figures,
which should more closely reflect the underlying trend in imports. This is
suffering from slower world trade growth and the weak level of sterling
against the dollar.
March retail sales are today expected to rise by 0.5 per cent - primarily
predicted on the back of the recent cuts in interest rates to stimulate the
economy.
Trade figures are out in France on Wednesday, with the markets expecting a
Ffr4bn deficit. The annual French unemployment rate is likely to rise to 9.3
per cent in March.
The UK data is bound to be recessionary, but recent evidence of producer
price inflation and average earnings is likely to slow the pace of interest
rate reductions.
In the US, durable goods and shipments orders out tomorrow and gross
national product on Friday should give further clues as to the depth of the
current downturn. So will retail sales and wholesale trade figures in Canada
 -another recessionary Anglo-Saxon economy.
Other important events and statistics, with median market forecasts from MMS
international, the financial research company, include:
Today: UK, CBI/FT survey of the distributive trades, provisional retail
sales for March (0.5 per cent). Australia, housing finance for February (3
per cent).
Tomorrow: Canada, 30-year government bond auction. US, durable goods (0.1
per cent) and shipments orders. UK, visible trade balance (down Pounds 800m)
and current account (down Pounds 300m) for March. Germany, Q3 and Q4 gross
domestic product. Japan, personal income and expenditure for February.
Canada, retail sales (flat) and wholesale trade for February.
Wednesday: US, International Monetary Fund publishes world economic outlook
report, auto sales (6m). France, 1990 GNP revision, trade balance (Ffr minus
4bn). Japan, second quarter economic outlook. UK, provisional constructional
orders for February. Bank of England holds auction for Pounds 1.2bn 10 per
cent Conversion stock due 1996.
Thursday: US, import and export price index for March and Q1, existing home
sales and first quarter housing vacancies, money supply, initial claims. UK,
building society new commitments (Pounds 3bn). France, unemployment rate for
March (9.3 per cent). Japan, retail sales for March (4.9 per cent).
Switzerland, Basle and Geneva consumer price indices for April.
Friday: US, officials meet to prepare IMF/World Bank spring meetings, first
quarter advance GNP (minus 2.5 per cent) and deflator (4.1 per cent) fourth
quarter after-tax profits (1 per cent) bank credit for March, commercial and
industrial loans. Japan, March CPI (3.8 per cent) unemployment rate,
industrial production (down 0.2 per cent).
During the week: Germany, April cost of living (0.3 per cent), March import
prices (0.5 per cent), Japan trade balance, and current account, Italy CPI
for April and trade balance for March.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 20 Chart (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4059</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Management (Training on Trial): A Tec in microcosm - Paul
Cheeseright considers the progress made by one of the smaller councils,
North Nottinghamshire, in its first year
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL CHEESERIGHT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The board met for 48 hours. It looked at what it had been doing, marked
itself out of five on each sector of its activity and came to an average of
about 2.5. It peered into the next year.
This was not a major international group brainstorming its way out of
recession, but the North Nottinghamshire Training and Enterprise Council,
one of the smallest of the 82 Tecs set up by the UK government to nudge
national training practice into line with business needs and to foster local
economic growth.
North Notts was the first Tec off the mark in the East Midlands, starting
work a year ago in a flurry of local publicity. But the board, designed, as
in all Tecs, to be the instrument for private sector supervision of
training, remains incomplete. There was one vacancy, for a representative of
the leisure/tourism industry, before the embarrassing resignation last
November of Anthony Darbyshire, the then chairman, when his group called in
the receiver.
Composition of the board reflects both the government's preference for the
private sector, and the structure of the north Nottinghamshire economy. The
biggest employer is the local health authority. The biggest private sector
employer is British Coal. Both are represented on the board.
The other private sector members come from medium-sized companies, for north
Nottinghamshire is an area of small and medium businesses: pockets of high
technology industry and some textiles but an economy which has been based on
agriculture and a slimmer mining industry.
Tony Wilkinson, now the chairman, comes from one of these medium-sized
companies - a hardware store chain bearing his name, with an annual turnover
of about Pounds 120m.
For Wilkinson and his private sector colleagues, hand-ling public sector
money demands a new mode of thinking. The fact that the UK government is
reducing spending on training is frustrating, but, beyond that, there is
concern that discussion time for the Tec budget is limited, and that
government funding goes in blocks of 12 months.
In the Wilkinson business, budget discussions for any financial year start
five months before. With the Tecs, 'there is just a few weeks between
discussions and the money arriving,' Wilkinson notes, and then, at the end
of the year, 'if there is a surplus, all the money goes back.' This, as he
puts it, 'is an unusual concept for business.'
By February, North Notts had an indicative budget for the financial year
beginning in April, but nothing more. It remained in negotiations with
Whitehall about the treatment of allowances, hitherto administered by the
Employment Service, for those engaged in what North Notts calls adult
training, but is usually known as employment training and aimed at the
unemployed.
If it can obtain control of these allowances then its 1991-92 budget will
rise. If not, then it will show a slight increase in money terms over the
previous year. That is, it would decline in real terms.
The amounts of money are not vast because North Notts is one of the smaller
Tecs. In 1990-91, the government grant was Pounds 8m for youth training,
Pounds 3m for employment training and Pounds 1.5m for business support.
These proportions demonstrate how, in financial terms, the 'enterprise'
element of 'training and enterprise' is a minor addition to what the
government had in any case been spending on training through the Training
Agency. North Notts in this respect is typical of the Tecs nationwide.
But it is different from some and will feel the effects of this minor
addition more than many because of the emphasis laid on 'enterprise' in its
corporate plan. There is a similar emphasis in the plans of the Lincolnshire
Tec, while the Birmingham Tec, for example, seems to be putting its stress
on the 'training' element.
The economy of North Nottinghamshire is such that without the enterprise
there will not be jobs for the beneficiaries of training. Unemployment runs
up to 25 per cent in some districts. Hence, the injunction in the Tec
corporate plan that investment in training opens the way for improved
business performance and thus to improve the survival rate of small
companies.
The small business support budget and the 5 per cent limitation on the
amount which can be switched from one budget heading to another mean,
however, that the main burden of fostering the enterprise will have to come
from company resources.
North Notts is trying to win company support through a membership scheme of
the Tec. The target is 200 members by June; so far it is 87. Membership is
conditional on signing a code of practice which states, inter alia, that
'every employer should have a clear but flexible plan which sets out
objectives' and that 'business plans should consider how employees will
contribute to the plan and specify the arrangements for meeting their
development needs'.
This notion of the Tec encouraging companies to help themselves is followed
through in the plans for a new business centre, where the Tec has aligned
its ideas with proposals along broadly the same lines from the Mansfield
District Council. Such a centre, which would provide technological and
business advice facilities, would be open to companies only if they are
making provision for training and have a business plan. On the steps taken
towards the formation of the centre, the Tec board gave itself two out of
five.
Such initiatives, although likely to bear long-term fruit rather than have
an immediate impact on companies wrestling with recession, are the
concomitant of the efforts to provide a better trained and educated
workforce. The focus of these efforts, in budgetary terms, is youth
training. In the North Notts area, 80 per cent of the places for which the
Tec has signed training contracts are occupied and 34 per cent - more than
double the figure at March 1990 - of the trainees are in employment.
Since last June, no contracts with the training institutions have been
signed unless the institution has plans to raise the quality of its service.
(Tec Board mark: four out of five.) But there are two catches here, and both
of them have national implications as other Tecs face the same problems.
The first is that North Notts has not yet been able to establish a mechanism
of evaluating those who provide training, because it is not immediately
obvious who should do the evaluating. It could be they Tec itself.
Alternatively, consultants could be hired. Either way there would be an
extra burden on a straitened budget.
The second is that the measurement of quality is the number of national
vocation qualifications which are granted to those taking the courses. The
difficulty here is that the framework of national vocation qualifications
has not been fully established. 'You can't ask someone to deliver something
which is not deliverable,' Wilkinson commented.
Against the background of these difficulties, it is not surprising that the
Tec board gave itself a mark of two out of five for the action, as the
corporate plan put it, 'to build relationships and reach agreement with
industry training organisations on the establishment and monitoring of
standards locally.'
Even less satisfying for the TEC has been the question of employment
training. Just a quarter of those going through the system end up with jobs.
Of those referred to training only five per cent end up with jobs. 'This is
abysmal if we are honest with ourselves. We need to do something radical,'
says Pat Richards, the North Notts Tec chief executive, who has worked for
most of her life in the Department of Employment.
Outside the Tec, among those which provide training such as the chamber of
commerce, there is some confusion about local policy on employment training.
The Tec had initially given emphasis to directing the training towards the
grant of national vocation qualifications.
Now it appears more anxious that those who take the training have a job. But
the jobs are not available.
All of this suggests that relations between the Tec and those who provide
training - that is those who obtain contracts to undertake youth and
employment training schemes - are in a state of flux. But the numbers are
relatively small.
The North Notts Tec deals with some 30 training organisations. In the
Birmingham area the number of organisations providing training for the
financial-clerical sector alone is three times that.
Two consequences flow from the small number of training organisations
involved in North Notts.
First, while the training contracts absorb the greater part of the Tec
funds, there should be few accounting problems. Spending can be controlled
centrally.
Accounting at Tecs generally has become the subject of scrutiny following
expressions of Whitehall concern that some Tecs had lost control of money
spent on training contracts. North Notts has taken consultancy advice from
Price Waterhouse on its business planning.
The second is that the Tec can organise its activities simply along
geographical lines, as does Lincolnshire, but in contrast to Birmingham Tec
where there is an attempt to establish a series of sectoral agreements
between employers and training organisations.
The simplicity of the organisation means that there is no interposing layer
of control between the Tec itself, on one hand, and the employers and
training organisations, on the other.
Indeed, in the long run, the great strength of the North Notts Tec may be
that, for the first time in a community that is more tightly knit than that
of a conurbation, it is the instrument for bringing together all the players
in the game of training and enterprise: the employers and unions, the
training organisations and the local authorities.
Previous articles in this series were published on November 28, December 3,
10, January 2, 7, February 4 and March 18.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19 Illustration (Omitted). Illustration (Omitted). Illustration
(Omitted). Illustration (Omitted). Photograph In spite of cuts, British Coal
is still one of the main employers in the North Nottinghamshire area
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4060</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Management: Bulletin Board
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LISA WOOD and JAMES BUXTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The Association of British Travel Agents (ABTA) has launched a campaign to
educate its 7,500 members about National Vocational Qualifications, writes
Lisa Wood.
'Eventually the travel industry will have a range of NVQs for all the travel
and tourism related sectors,' says the ABTA National Training Board; it has
assessed and set standards for the NVQs and has incorporated the Certificate
of Travel Agents Competency (COTAC), the original basic educational
qualifications for the industry.
No qualifications are necessary to become a travel agent although ABTA
members must have one individual in each branch who has a COTAC
qualification plus 18 months' relevant experience.
Take-up of COTAC qualifications traditionally has been 'fairly low'
according to the ABTA training board, with personality and ability to sell
to travellers considered by many employers to be more important than
qualifications. The travel industry is, however, the seventh largest
provider of Youth Training (YT), funding of which is increasingly becoming
dependent on the acquisition of NVQs.
The range of NVQs for the travel industry include:
Level 2 for travel agents which takes in COTAC 1 (Air and General) together
with Travel Agency Tasks from June 1991.
Level 3 for travel agents which takes in COTAC 2 (Air and General) together
with Supervisory Skills from June.
Level 4 for agency managers which takes in the Certificate of Travel Agency
Management plus suitable experience.
The NTB is currently working on an NVQ level 1 qualification for entrants to
the travel industry.
An extra Pounds 16m has been allocated by the government for intensive
occupational training in high technology.
This sum will be used as part of the Department of Employment's programme of
High Technology National Training which forms part of the Employment
Training.
The courses of intensive professional level training leading to Higher
National Certificate or postgraduate level qualifications will be run at
Colleges of Further Education and Higher Education Institutions throughout
the UK.
The Department of Employment says the courses would provide opportunities
for people who would otherwise be unemployed. The courses selected are
intended to meet a skill shortage, lead to vocational qualifications at HNC
up to postgraduate level and include an industrial placement with an
employer.
The Pounds 16m will fund 327 courses and provide 5,100 training places.
According to Robert Jackson, the employment minister, 'these courses will
play a vital role in the government's strategy to provide excellent
opportunities for unemployed people to obtain high level qualifications.'
The British Institute of Innkeeping is hoping that magistrates will take
greater account of training and qualifications before they grant licences to
potential new publicans.
The move, endorsed by the governing council of the Institute, is the first
clear call by the licensed trade's professional body for increased attention
to be given to standards of entry.
The Institute, with its series of induction, qualifying and membership
examinations said it had established a proper infrastructure for progressive
professional career development. It said that with the running of public
houses increasingly acknowledged as a complicated balancing act of
commercial business pressures and recognised social responsibilities, the
Institute was keen to see that improved standards were both encouraged and
fostered through minimum training requirements.
A significant number of former Training Agency staff have either rejected
offers to work for Scottish Enterprise (SE), the new body which, with local
enterprise companies (Lecs), is responsible for training and enterprise
development in Scotland, writes James Buxton.
SE, which came into existence this month, has replaced the Scottish
Development Agency and the Training Agency (TA) as the parent body of 13 new
local enterprise companies in Scotland outside the Highlands. It has no
equivalent among the Tecs in England.
Of the 701 TA staff in Scotland who were offered positions with SE, 482 have
accepted posts either with the parent body or the Lecs, either leaving the
civil service or joining SE on secondment. Some 197 have refused to join SE
and a further 22 are still undecided. Of 641 former SDA staff, 600 have
accepted jobs with SE or Lecs.
TA staff are offered the choice of leaving the civil service for SE or
joining SE on a three-year secondment, an arrangement which some Lec chief
executives have criticised. 'It was a sensible arrangement for TA staff
joining Tecs in England where there is no central body like SE,' says one,
'but here it just complicates matters creating two categories of staff.'
The SE core should have an establishment of between 410 and 420 people but
60-70 posts are still unfilled.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4061</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Women managers
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE small number of women managers in industry was highlighted yesterday by
Ms Gina King, head of the Industrial Society's equal-opportunities unit.
'The fact that recent estimates claim women fill only 1 per cent of top
management posts and 4-5 per cent of senior and middle management jobs is a
disgrace,' she said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4062</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Readers' inquiry service
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Financial Times has started a reader service in response to the growing
number of inquiries the newspaper receives each day.
The purpose of the service is to provide an efficient response to readers
who have questions about the contents of the newspaper or about specific
articles.
Simple requests for the dates of, or references to, articles in the FT will
normally be provided free, but a reasonable fee may be charged for copies of
articles, surveys or financial data.
Inquiries can be made by telephone on 071-873 4211 or by letter and will be
answered as soon as possible, usually on the same day. Inquiries can also be
made by fax to 071-873 3084.
Four researchers staff the service, which is open Monday to Friday, 9.30am
to midday and 2pm to 4.45pm. A call queue system is in operation.
If there is a charge for the information, payment will usually be by credit
card - all main credit cards are accepted - or by a cheque in advance.
Callers will be informed of the cost of the inquiry in advance and will be
asked to quote their credit card number.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4063</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Venezuelans pick telecom contenders
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOE MANN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VENEZUELA has picked eight international companies to tender for the
privatisation of the state-owned telephone company, CANTV, writes Joe Mann.
They are: Ameritech, Bell Atlantic, Bell Canada, France Telecom, GTE, Nippon
Telephone &amp; Telegraph, Southwestern Bell and US West.
The government wants an international company to take over CANTV operations
and install around 300,000 new telephone lines a year. This would require
annual investments estimated at Dollars 800m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4064</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / De Klerk aims to revive economic ties with EC
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL HOLMAN, Africa Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE REVIVAL of economic ties with the European Community as a key factor in
South Africa's efforts to ensure that political negotiations are accompanied
by economic recovery will be stressed by President F. W. de Klerk during his
visit to London, which officially begins today.
Pretoria officials are confident that the sanctions battle is all but over.
Last week the EC lifted embargoes on imports of iron and steel and gold
coins, and the US is expected to lift trade and investment bans later this
year.
But officials, increasingly concerned about the political consequences of a
continuing recession marked by rising unemployment, admit that prospects for
new investment are poor unless the violence that has cost over 4,000 lives
in the past four years is stopped, and formal talks on a new constitution
get under way.
Mr de Klerk, due to have a working dinner tonight with Prime Minister John
Major as well as holding talks for the first time with the Labour party
leader, Mr Neil Kinnock, is expected to defend Pretoria's efforts to end
township violence and to place the burden of responsibility on the African
National Congress (ANC).
This charge will be countered by accusations of government complicity when
Mr Nelson Mandela, the ANC deputy president, arrives in London later this
week. Earlier this month the ANC threatened to break off contacts with
Pretoria unless the government met the terms of an ANC ultimatum on violence
by May 9.
Mr de Klerk, who has gone some way towards meeting the ultimatum, is also
expected to argue that the recession exacerbates political tensions.
Before leaving South Africa for London, he said: 'Sanctions are crumbling,
and they will continue to crumble. We have reached a stage where one could
even say that sanctions have become a contributing factor to violence.'
In meetings with bankers and businessmen during his visit, Mr de Klerk is
expected to urge them to take advantage of trade and investment
opportunities, portraying South Africa as a locomotive for growth in the
region.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4 Photograph Can de Klerk keep the lid on South Africa's
political cauldron? (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4065</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Red faces in Mexico over phone taps
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAMIAN FRASER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MEXICO CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MEXICO'S NATIONAL Human Rights Commission (CNDH) has deeply embarrassed its
paymasters, the federal government, by complaining officially that its
telephones are tapped and that the offices of its president, Mr Jorge
Capizo, were being bugged.
The Commission found two microphones and a transmitter hidden in its offices
early last month, and after failing to find out who was responsible for
putting them there, sent the offending technology to the Attorney General's
office last week. In a brief statement the latter said the listening devices
were extremely unsophisticated, thus suggesting that they were not planted
by the government.
Although telephone tapping is illegal in Mexico, it is widely believed to be
one of the favourite activities of Mexico's security-conscious Interior
Ministry, known as Gobernacion. Last September, Mexico's two leading
opposition parties, and the Mexico City Assembly Commission demanded an
official inquiry into allegations that opposition and business leaders,
journalists, and even government members were having their phones tapped.
The CNDH was set up by President Carlos Salinas last June amid growing
concern about Mexico's deteriorating human rights record. This latest
incident will do nothing to abate that concern. At the time CNDH was
inaugurated, Americas Watch wrote that torture was 'endemic' in Mexico
'practised by most, if not all, branches of the federal and state police, as
well as by the armed forces'. A few months later Amnesty International
reported that 'Mexico today is a human rights emergency.'
Even though CNDH nominally answers to Gobernacion, it has been surprisingly
effective in discovering and reporting human rights violations, which
probably explains why its phones were bugged. Its recommendations have led
to the release to a number of quasi-political prisoners.
The CNDH has reserved some of its harshest criticisms for the Federal
Attorney General's office, which, ironically enough, is responsible for
finding out who put the bugs in the commission's offices.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4066</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Disinflation and convergence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARTIN WOLF
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
1990 AND early 1991 have seen monetary contraction in most of the world's
main economies. Monetarists would argue that this also explains why it has
been a period of recession in the US and UK, and of slowdown in most of the
other big countries.
Particularly significant has been the decline in the year-on-year rates of
growth of US M2, the country's most closely watched index of broad money.
The year-on-year rates of growth of broad money also fell sharply in the UK,
although they have remained very high by any other country's standards.
Under the ruthless guidance of Mr Yasushi Mieno, governor of the Bank of
Japan, the year-on-year rate of growth of Japan's M2 plus certificates of
deposit (CDs) has halved, accompanied by the stock market crash, whose
effect appears in the rise in the yield on equities. France, too, has seen a
slow-down in the growth of broad money since early 1990 and a more rapid
slowing still in the growth of narrow money. For its part, Italy has avoided
a decline in the growth rate of broad money, although the year-on-year
growth rates of narrow money have fallen.
The main exception to the general trends is Germany, not only because of the
direct effects of economic and monetary union last July, when D-Mark
monetary stocks jumped by about 15 per cent: driven along by unification,
even the growth rates of the monetary stocks in west Germany did not fall in
1990, as in other big countries, although they did not accelerate
significantly either.
Whether the monetary expansion that followed unification will prove
inflationary is uncertain, depending as it does on economic behaviour in
east Germany. But unification has already had an important effect on German
monetary conditions and on convergence within the European Community, via
the interest rate.
As the chart shows, long-term rates of interest have converged among the
four large economies in the EC. This matters because the German government
has stated that interest rate convergence is one of the conditions for
movement to economic and monetary union in the EC, arguing that it would
also indicate convergence of long-term inflationary expectations.
Yet the marked convergence that can be seen in the chart is a result of the
virtue of the other three only to a modest degree, at least over the past
five years. It is also a reflection of doubts about Germany, where the
long-term nominal rate of interest has risen by 2 percentage points above
its level in 1988. Whether this increase reflects higher inflationary
expectations or higher real interest rates within an imperfectly integrated
global capital market, it has done far more for interest rate convergence
than lower rates in the other countries.
All this emerges from the third table in our new series of indicators for
the six largest industrial countries, which follows the National Accounts
(April 8 1991) and Balance of Payments (April 15 1991). The table presents
the most broadly watched monetary aggregates and interest rate series in
each of these six countries.
The narrow measures of money supply (M0 and M1) include highly liquid,
generally non-interest bearing assets, while the broader measures (M2, M3
and M4) include assets that are likely to be used as a means of saving as
well.
In the US the Federal Reserve has argued that the long-run growth of M2
should approximately equal the trend growth in output, if price stability is
to be achieved. M2 has remained within its target range of 3-7 per cent in
both 1989 and 1990 while the provisional target for 1991 has been reduced to
2 1/2 -6 1/2 per cent. Meanwhile, the Bank of Japan has announced a
projection of 8 per cent growth for M2 plus CDs in the year to the first
quarter of 1991, a forecast that seems eminently reasonable.
Abstracting from the one-off impact of German monetary union, the
Bundesbank's 1991 target for the growth of all-German M3 is 4-6 per cent.
According to the Bundesbank's own calculations (not reported in the table)
growth of all-German M3 between the fourth quarter of 1990 and February
1991, on an annualised basis, was 3.5 per cent. This is below the official
target range, although it is expected to rise once more. Meanwhile, growth
of all-German M1 between November 1990 and February 1991 was 6.1 per cent.
For 1991 the table shows month-on-month growth rates for all-German money,
starting with January 1991 over December 1990.
For EC member countries other than Germany the principal monetary indicator
is the exchange rate against the D-Mark within the exchange rate mechanism
of the European monetary system. In the case of the UK, for example, the
Financial Statement and Budget Report released at the time of the March
budget, states that 'interest rate decisions must now be set consistently
with keeping sterling within its announced bands.' But some countries have
supplementary monetary targets.
Like the Bundesbank, the Banque de France, has chosen M3 as its target
indicator, its range being 5-7 per cent, marginally less expansive than the
growth of 8.5 per cent between 1989 and 1990.
In the UK, by contrast, the extraordinarily rapid growth of broad money led
the authorities to abandon it in the mid-1980s. The target is M0, instead,
which is almost entirely cash in circulation. The current aim, growth of 0-4
per cent in the financial year starting April 1991, is fully consistent with
recent performance.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4 Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4067</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / The European Market: Single Community market in gambling is
a long-odds bet - The prospect of placing a cross-border wager post-1992 is
not much of a runner
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PUNTERS BETTING on whether the European Community will have a truly single
market by the end of 1992 would be well advised first to check whether they
can make a cross-border wager. They will not find it easy.
The 1985 White Paper on the single EC market said nothing about harmonising
the myriad national rules fragmenting the European gambling market. Such
regulation has traditionally been been devised either for social reasons or
to raise national tax revenue.
But it is becoming harder to ignore the economic impact of Europe's 'luck
industry', encompassing race betting, football pools, gaming and lotteries,
which chalks up an annual turnover of some Ecu45bn (Pounds 31bn). Brussels
is also receiving increasing complaints from gambling companies seeking to
expand beyond their national boundaries and from governments as eager to
protect tax revenue as their citizens' morals.
So, the European Commission is priming itself with a major study on gambling
being prepared by management consultants Coopers &amp; Lybrand, and trying to
see whether a dash of Euro-regulation is warranted.
Most of the cross-border disputes concern the two biggest money spinners:
National lotteries. These turn over some Ecu17bn a year, of which about
Ecu3bn goes in tax to the 11 EC governments which permit national lotteries.
Curiously for a country which tolerates most other forms of betting, the UK
limits the pay-out on lotteries, effectively restricting them to local
charities.
Football pools operators such as Littlewoods have quashed recent talk of a
national UK lottery by doing a deal with the Treasury. The latter is cutting
the pools betting levy, from 40 per cent to 37.5 per cent, provided all the
saving is put into a trust, which will get Pounds 40m a year from the pools
operators and will fund sports and the arts.
Britain will therefore continue to attract attention from foreign lottery
operators, particularly the Germans whose big money prizes have tremendous
drawing power, even though it is illegal to solicit Britons' participation
in foreign lotteries. Last year UK Customs impounded 3m German lottery
tickets. That cost the German agents some Pounds 2m, and temporarily stopped
the trade. But such policing will not seal the British market off for ever.
Many Danes, Belgians and Dutch already nip into Germany to buy lottery
tickets. These three countries' governments worry about losing tax revenue
to Germany. One option is to follow Luxembourg's example and do a
revenue-sharing deal with the German lottery in return for letting the
latter operate openly in the grand duchy.
Horse race betting. Regulation varies widely, coming under agriculture
ministries in the Netherlands and Italy, the Pari Mutuel Urbain (PMU) state
monopoly in France, and regional governments in Germany. Only Britain and
Ireland allow corporate bookmakers on a big scale.
The ambition of two of these organisations - Ladbrokes and the PMU - to
spread out of their home bases is rocking the status quo. Ladbrokes has
taken the initiative by filing a barrage of complaints against PMU with the
European Commission.
Brussels is now investigating whether the PMU has received illegal state aid
from the French government by means of tax write-offs; whether it is abusing
its dominant position by giving French punters poor service; and whether it
is discriminating against Ladbrokes by refusing to extend to the British
bookmaker in Germany the broadcasting of French races which the PMU already
provides to German bookies.
Ladbrokes is also fighting to establish itself in Germany, where a
loosely-worded federal law against corporations entering bookmaking is being
interpreted differently in the Lander (states). Rhineland-Palatinate has
allowed Ladbrokes in, but North Rhine-Westphalia and Hesse have not.
However, Brussels discounts any special discrimination against Ladbrokes by
the latter two Lander because they bar all corporations from bookmaking.
PMU has countered by contesting Ladbrokes' allegations and by making a
partial entry into Belgium, a market dominated by Tierce Ladbrokes' 900
betting shops. Since last month, PMU punters in northern France can bet on
Belgian races. The PMU appears to be hoping for a change in Belgian law
which would allow it to take Belgian bets on French races, as Ladbrokes can.
Ladbrokes has not yet carried the fight into France, the second biggest EC
horse race betting market after Britain. The PMU could easily fend off such
a challenge if it got the French government to impose on British bookies the
financial conditions under which it operates, according to Mr Frank
McFadden, a former Ladbrokes employee who is writing the Coopers &amp; Lybrand
report for the Commission,
The PMU pays 73 per cent of stake money to punters, 14 per cent in tax to
the government and returns 13 per cent (less its own costs) to its owners,
the French race courses. British bookmakers give punters a better deal,
paying only 8 per cent tax on stake money and 1 per cent to the Levy Board
for the upkeep of race courses. Mr McFadden believes that as profit-making
organisations, British bookmakers could not live with the rake-off demanded
from the PMU.
Governments are generally less allergic to organisations such as Ladbrokes
or PMUs, which establish themselves in the countries where they take bets,
than to companies which solicit bets across borders. One of the largest is
the London-based SSP. Mr Peter Andersson, SSP's managing director, says that
while countries like Britain and France do not allow foreign companies to
advertise for bets, it is almost impossible for them to prevent direct mail
or telephone sales.
Liberalisation of telecommunications and financial services in Europe will
further erode obstacles to cross-border gambling. 'What's to stop me setting
up McFadden Sky Television and, on the pretence of running an English
language educational channel, taking credit card bets on a lottery?' asks Mr
McFadden rhetorically. The 1989 EC directive on trans-frontier broadcasting
was silent on betting.
What ultimately distinguishes gambling from other financial services such as
banking or insurance is that many people think it ought not to expand. Yet
cross-border competition will create growth in gambling, which responds in a
highly elastic way to new products. UK betting turnover has grown 20 per
cent in the four years since satellite broadcasting of races began, while
introduction of a lottery in Ireland barely dented horse betting there.
So the Commission may decide, in the end, that gambling is one sector of the
EC market that should be kept deliberately fragmented.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4068</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Palestinians likely to seek closer links with peace talks
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TONY WALKER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CAIRO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PALESTINIAN leaders, who began meeting in Tunis yesterday to review
post-Gulf war developments, are expected to call for closer co-ordination
with Arab states engaged in peace talks with the US.
The Palestinians' Central Council or 'mini-parliament' is also likely to lay
down guidelines for Palestine Liberation Organisation participation in any
proposed peace process.
PLO officials have expressed strong reservations about the latest US Middle
East peace mission. They fear the US will seek to exclude the PLO from the
process.
But the organisation, sidelined regionally and internationally since its
support of Iraq in the Gulf war, is anxious to use any opportunity to
re-establish working relations with Egypt and the Gulf states.
Mr Abdullah Hourani, a member of the PLO's Executive Committee or 'cabinet',
said yesterday that 'co-ordination between Arab positions is important. . .
in particular, total agreement between the PLO and Jordan on all stages in
the peace process.'
The Central Council is likely to review the PLO's performance during the
recent crisis and to discuss ways to revive its flagging fortunes.
Among options to be discussed are convening a session of the Palestine
Nations Council, the Palestinian 'parliament', to express confidence in the
PLO leadership. There has also been talk of seeking UN backing for elections
in the occupied territories for delegates to the PNC.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4069</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Al Sabahs keeping their hold on power: Kuwait's new cabinet
still includes no opposition members
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARK NICHOLSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KUWAIT's organised opposition groups yesterday condemned the emirate's new
cabinet as 'frustrating and disappointing', saying it indicated no will by
the ruling al Sabah family to cede any power.
Although there were 11 new faces among the 20 men sworn into cabinet by
Sheikh Jaber al Sabah, the emir, yesterday to replace the government which
resigned four weeks ago, no opposition or resistance members appeared on the
new cabinet roll.
Moreover, although the list contained fewer members of the al Sabah family,
those who did appear continue to hold the most powerful ministries.
Opposition groups, which have been calling for cabinet representation as a
prelude to the establishment of full democracy in the emirate, were quick to
condemn the new team.
'Kuwaitis will be frustrated and disappointed with this cabinet,' Mr Isa
Shaheen, spokesman for the Islamic Constitutional Movement (ICM), said
yesterday. 'Despite the immensity of the disaster in Kuwait, it seems that
nothing has happened as far as the government is concerned.'
Nevertheless, the emir did not turn a completely blind eye to Kuwait's
post-liberation pressures for change in appointing his new cabinet - a
process which appears to have been the subject of strong internal debate,
given the four weeks it consumed.
He responded to widespread criticism of the government's handling of events
leading up to Iraq's invasion by replacing the defence and foreign
ministers, Sheikh Nawaf al Sabah - who moves to the Social Affairs Ministry
 -and Sheikh al Ahmed al Jaber al Sabah, who have taken the brunt of popular
charges of incompetence.
Equally, though, the emir kept an al Sabah hand on each key ministry by
naming Sheikh Salem Sabah al Salem, the former interior minister, as the new
foreign minister and Sheikh Ali Salem al Sabah as the new defence minister.
Sheikh Salem, made himself unpopular with the opposition through his tough
response to their pro-democracy rallies in early 1989. His replacement,
meanwhile, was another al Sabah, Sheikh Ahmed Hamoud al-Jaber.
The other significant change was the removal of Dr Rasheed al Almeeri as oil
minister after what is widely seen as his belated and inefficient action in
dealing with the oil well fires. He was replaced by Mr Hamoud al Rogba,
formerly minister of electricity and water.
Although no opposition members appeared on the cabinet list, this came as
little surprise to the anti-government groups which have emerged since
liberation, most of whom recognised that the government was not going to
accede to their conditions for joining the government.
These included the replacement of the entire cabinet and a firm government
commitment to a date for elections to the national assembly, which was
suspended in 1986. The emir has promised only that elections will be held
some time next year.
The organised opposition, including the ICM and Democratic Forum, a
predominantly leftist umbrella group, yesterday promised to sustain their
anti-government campaign by holding demonstrations both inside Kuwait and in
European and Arab capitals housing large numbers of Kuwaiti exiles.
Their options, however, appear limited. 'It's hard to see what levers they
hold, apart from moral pressure and the denial of consensus,' said one
diplomat.
The government, meanwhile, appears set on a policy of wooing conservative
Kuwaitis, while promising longer-term reforms. As one of a series of recent
inducements to middle-class Kuwaitis, it has offered to cancel all consumer
and housing loans, give free flights to returning Kuwaitis and grant KD500
(Pounds 1,000) to each Kuwaiti who stayed.
However, most observers agree that the government will succeed in quieting
demands for deeper reform only by demonstrating greater efficiency than
hitherto in effecting Kuwait's reconstruction programme.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4070</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Baker denies putting pressure on Israel
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TONY WALKER and HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CAIRO, JERUSALEM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR JAMES BAKER, the US secretary of state, yesterday sought to counter
reports that he was becoming impatient with Israel and was about to exert
stronger pressure to secure its co-operation in his Middle East peace
efforts.
Speaking after talks with President Hosni Mubarak in Cairo, Mr Baker went
out of his way to deny that he was pressing Israel for an immediate answer
to his peace proposals. 'We do not intend to press or obviously to pressure
for an answer. We understand that it takes some time to consider the
suggestions that we made,' he told reporters.
But as the US official continued his tour of Middle East capitals, his third
visit to the region in six weeks, there was little to indicate progress in
his efforts to find common ground between Israel and the Arabs.
In Jerusalem, officials also played down reports of differences with the US,
and Mr David Levy, the foreign minister, said Mr Baker would return to
Israel this week for further talks.
Mr Ehud Olmert, the health minister, said suggestions that the US and Israel
were on the brink of a confrontation were 'inaccurate and harsh'.
Mr Baker last week pressed the Israeli government to accept terms for a
proposed regional peace conference that go beyond those Israel was
originally prepared to accept.
Israeli newspapers reported that the government would reject at least some
of Mr Baker's suggestions. But Israel is loath to bring Mr Baker's mission
to a halt.
It fears losing US backing at the United Nations if the Arab-Israel dispute
was referred back to the Security Council. It is also afraid of jeopardising
much-needed extra aid to help absorb a wave of Soviet Jewish immigrants.
Mr Yitzhak Shamir, Israel's premier, is said to be unhappy with suggestions
that the UN and EC should play some role in the proposed regional conference
and that the gathering itself should have a function beyond acting as a
symbolic 'opening' for negotiations between Israel and the Arabs.
Mr Shamir torpedoed a previous attempt by Mr Baker a year ago to advance
peace efforts, by saying 'no' to talks with representative Palestinians in
Cairo. Israel's refusal to sanction the US-sponsored meeting caused serious
friction with Washington.
Palestinian representation remains a big stumbling block to attempts to
revitalise the peace process. Israel refuses to deal with the 'terrorist'
Palestine Liberation Organisation.
Mr Baker met Jordan's King Hussein in Aqaba on Saturday - the highest-level
meeting between the administration and Jordan since the king swung his
support behind Iraq early in the Gulf war.
Clearly delighted that the US was proposing to engage him in renewed peace
efforts, the king told reporters: 'I believe this is a milestone in
relations between our two countries.'
The US hopes Jordan can help provide 'cover' for the presence of a
Palestinian delegation at any peace conference involving Israel.
On Saturday, Mr Baker confirmed reports that Saudi Arabia and other Gulf
states would not attend a regional peace conference.
Syria, meanwhile, issued a hard-line statement on the eve of Mr Baker's
return to Damascus for further talks. The official newspaper Tishreen said
any efforts that were not based on UN resolutions calling for Israeli
withdrawal from Arab lands and recognition of Palestinian rights would fail.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4071</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / High German demand only bright spot in European car sales
gloom
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN DONE, Motor Industry Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEW CAR sales in western Europe (including eastern Germany) fell by 3.3 per
cent in March, to an estimated 1.32m.
Demand is continuing to surge in Germany, where sales last month jumped by
an estimated 35.5 per cent to about 424,000 (including eastern Germany),
compared with 313,000 in West Germany a year ago.
New car sales in Germany in the first quarter were 44.2 per cent higher than
a year ago, say industry estimates.
Elsewhere demand has plunged, however, and new car sales in the first
quarter in western Europe excluding Germany were an ominous 14.6 per cent
lower than a year ago at 2.54m.
New car registrations in March were lower in 14 of 17 national markets
across western Europe, including, most significantly, four of the five
leading volume markets: Italy, France, the UK and Spain.
While sales in Italy in March were 4.5 per cent lower than a year ago,
demand in the UK plunged by 19.1 per cent, in France by 18.5 per cent and in
Spain by 29.3 per cent.
In the first three months, sales fell in 15 of 17 markets across western
Europe, with increases achieved only in Germany and Greece.
Overall western European new car sales in the first quarter were 2.8 per
cent lower than a year earlier, at 3.62m, but Germany is the sole factor
moderating the decline and accounted for 30 per cent of the total western
European car market in the first quarter.
The diverging fortunes of Germany and the rest of western Europe is leading
to a sharp contrast in the performances of the big six volume car-makers in
Europe.
Volkswagen, General Motors (Opel/Vauxhall) and Ford - the three leading
groups in the German market - have all recorded strong sales increases this
year.
The Peugeot group of France, which includes Citroen, has been hardest hit.
It has slipped from third to fifth place in the western European new car
sales league, falling behind both General Motors and Ford, after suffering
an estimated 14.1 per cent drop in sales in the first quarter. Its market
share has dropped to 11.7 per cent from 13.2 per cent a year ago.
The Volkswagen group, which includes Audi and SEAT, and was the leader of
the western European car market for the past six years, increased its sales
volume by about 8.9 per cent to an estimated 595,000. It boosted its market
share to a record 16.5 per cent, from 14.7 per cent a year ago.
The challenge from the Fiat group, which includes Lancia and Alfa Romeo, has
faded. The Italian car-maker, which has been forced into short-time working
for much of the past eight months at several of its domestic car plants,
suffered a 13.3 per cent fall in new car sales in the first quarter, with
its market share tumbling to 13.3 per cent from 15.4 per cent a year ago.
It is under heavy pressure in the domestic Italian market, where its share
in the first quarter fell to 47.8 per cent from 55.5 per cent a year ago and
58.5 per cent in the first quarter of 1989.
Both GM and Ford succeeded in increasing their sales volumes, helped by
their presence in the German market, and both have made important gains in
European market share.
Both French car-makers lost ground sharply in the first quarter. Renault,
which recently announced an 87 per cent drop in group net profits for 1990,
remains under heavy pressure, with an estimated 8.7 per cent drop in car
sales volume in the first quarter.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
WEST EUROPEAN NEW CAR REGISTRATIONS* January-March 1991
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
                      Volume       Volume       Share (%)    Share (%)
                      (Units)     Change(%)    Jan-Mar 91   Jan-Mar 90
TOTAL MARKET*       3,617,000       -2.8          100.0        100.0
  MANUFACTURERS:
Volkswagen (incl.     595,000       +8.9           16.5         14.7
  Audi &amp; SEAT)
Fiat (incl. Lancia,    496,000      -13.3           13.3         15.4
  Alfa Romeo, Ferrari
  Innocenti, Maserati)
General Motors        455,000       +5.9           12.6         11.6
  (Opel/Vauxhall,
  US** &amp; Saab)
 - Opel/Vauxhall      439,000       +6.9           12.2         11.0
 - Saab***             13,000      -23.3            0.3          0.4
Ford (Europe,         449,000       +5.6           12.4         11.4
  US** &amp; Jaguar)
 - Ford Europe        443,000       +6.1           12.2         11.2
 - Jaguar               4,000      -33.6            0.1          0.2
Peugeot (incl.        422,245      -14.1           11.7         13.2
  Citroen)
Renault*****          357,000       -8.7            9.9         10.5
Mercedes-Benz         121,000       +0.1            3.3          3.2
Nissan                104,000       +6.6            2.8          2.6
Rover****             102,000       -8.4            2.8          3.0
BMW                    97,000       -6.3            2.6          2.8
Toyota                 88,000       +1.9            2.4          2.3
Mazda                  72,000       +1.4            2.0          1.9
Volvo*****             57,000      -20.1            1.6          1.9
Mitsubishi             46,000       -0.2            1.2          1.2
Honda****              39,000       -1.4            1.1          1.1
Total Japanese        401,000       +2.1           11.1         10.5
MARKETS:
Germany*            1,078,000      +44.2           29.8         20.1
Italy                 691,000       -3.1           19.1         19.2
France                515,000      -20.6           14.2         17.4
United Kingdom        457,000      -21.5           12.6         15.7
Spain                 207,000      -22.8            5.7          7.2
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
    * Includes eastern Germany in 1991.
   ** Cars imported from US and sold in western Europe.
  *** GM holds 50 per cent and management control of Saab Automobile.
 **** Honda holds a 20 per cent stake in Rover vehicle operations.
***** Renault and Volvo are linked through minority cross-shareholdings.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source: industry estimates
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4072</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Growing finance scandal pressure on French PM
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IAN DAVIDSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE long-running scandal over the illicit financing of French political
parties, which has been contained in a murky twilight zone between the
judiciary and the state, now begins to look as if it could endanger the
government.
The weekend saw a chorus of demands from opposition leaders for the
resignation of the justice minister and his deputy, and the announcement by
the Magistrates Association of a day of protest on May 16, their fourth such
protest in the past year.
The rising pressure over the financing scandal increases the current
difficulties of the minority government of Prime Minister Michel Rocard,
which has recently had to abandon or delay two parliamentary bills, because
it could see no way of putting together the necessary majority in the
National Assembly.
The scandal is essentially historical. In the past national and local
construction companies were milked on a massive scale by the Socialist party
for contributions: FFr52m (Pounds 5.2m) in 1986, FFr53m in 1987, FFr70m in
1988. The basic facts came to light in 1989, and led that year to a new and
more rigorous party finance law which should be making any such system
impossible.
But the issue now at stake is whether the long-delayed judicial
investigation into the scandal will publicly discredit the Socialist party
leadership. The other political parties also had various illegal methods of
raising their finances. But because the Socialist method was nationally
organised, many of their top politicians have been identified by name as
having been involved.
The intensity of the pressure on the government was yesterday confirmed by
the deputy justice minister, Mr Georges Kiejman, in terms which seemed to
acknowledge that Mr Rocard could be in danger. He dismissed the opposition
demands for his own resignation, but appeared much less dogmatic on Mr
Rocard's tenure of the prime ministership.
'Should this left-wing policy be carried out by a different leader?' he
asked. 'Perhaps we should put a new wrapping round the motor.'
The government's current difficulties coincide with a sharp dip in the
popularity both of President Francois Mitterrand and of Mr Rocard in the
opinion polls. During the Gulf war both of them benefited from an upsurge in
public confidence, but the latest figures indicate this may be over.
A poll by IFOP for the Journal de Dimanche newspaper gives Mr Mitterrand 47
per cent support - down 9 per cent from the previous poll in March. Mr
Rocard gets 40 per cent - 3 per cent lower.
It is now becoming difficult to believe that the investigation into the
finance scandal can be conclusively stifled.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4073</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Right gains in Icelandic election
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE right-wing Independence Party failed at the weekend to win the runaway
victory in Iceland's general election predicted by most opinion polls, but
it did make big gains.
The party secured 38.6 per cent of the vote, compared with only 27.2 per
cent four years ago, and won an extra eight seats to finish with 26 in the
63-member parliament.
But the three parties in the country's current coalition government
performed better than expected, securing 32 seats between them, or one more
than an overall majority. The centrist Progressive party and the Social
Democrats polled 18.9 per cent and 15.5 per cent respectively - close to the
1987 result. The left-wing People's Alliance improved its position with 14.4
per cent.
The Women's Movement suffered a slight setback, polling 8.3 per cent (down
from 10.8 per cent) and losing one seat.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4074</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Norway party picks woman
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NORWAY'S main opposition Conservative party elected a 40-year-old woman
leader at the weekend, in a further advance for the country's already high
female participation in politics, Robert Taylor reports from Stockholm.
Mrs Kaci Kullmann Five is the third woman now heading a Norwegian party,
with Mrs Gro Harlem Brundtland, Labour prime minister, and the recently
elected Centre party leader, Ms Anne Enger Lahnstein. Norway has a larger
proportion of women in political life than any other democracy. Nine of the
19 cabinet members are women, as are 59 of the 165 MPs.
Mrs Five (called Kaci by almost everyone), a mother of two, is a popular
choice for the Conservatives. Intelligent and friendly, she promises to
bring a breath of fresh air to a party that has become demoralised over the
past five years under three elderly male leaders.
Expectation of her election has made an impact on the Conservative position
in opinion polls. Two months ago, the party hit an all-time low of 14.4 per
cent, but a survey by Opinion A/S at the weekend showed the party at 22.5
per cent - second behind Labour.
Mrs Five was trade minister in the right-centre coalition government that
fell last October. Always a champion of Norway joining the European
Community, she gave the issue top priority in her inaugural speech to party
workers. She wants Norway to apply for membership in step with Sweden, which
is expected to apply in June.
An opinion survey yesterday in Aftonposten, Norway's leading newspaper,
indicated 47 per cent favouring the country joining the EC (more than in
earlier polls) and 45 per cent against.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2 Photograph Kaci Kullmann Five, Already lifting the
Conservatives (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4075</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Indians massacre villagers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID HOUSEGO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MALANGAM, KASHMIR VALLEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INDIAN security forces tied up and shot seven men and boys, all members of
the same Kashmiri Moslem family, in this remote village at the weekend, in
what seems to have been a calculated act of brutality to deter villagers
from helping Kashmiri separatists.
Villagers who witnessed the killing say that the seven, aged from about 12
to 35, had their hands tied behind their backs lined up against a wall and
shot at about a yard's range by members of the Border Security Force (BSF),
a paramilitary force used in internal security.
Sharif Din, 45, who had been ploughing in a field below, said that the seven
 -who had already been beaten up - died weeping and protesting their
innocence.
The seven bodies were laid out in the courtyard of the police station at
nearby Bandipur where the BSF - identified as 116 Batallion - had taken
them. Skin had been badly torn by the stony tracks over which they had been
pulled. Two boys still had rope around their feet and another was wearing a
shoe, the pair of which we had seen on the mountain.
The BSF reported to the police that the seven had been killed in
'crossfire'. An eighth man had been killed earlier at Malangam on Saturday.
He was Mirza Khan, an area commander of the little-known Al-Buraq militant
group, for whom the security forces had been searching and who was found
with a weapon. At some point, he had taken shelter in the house of Raja Ali,
whose family was questioned and then shot.
The apparently cold-blooded reprisals by the BSF against villagers they
believed to be shielding militants or weapons is further evidence of
breakdown in discipline among Indian forces in Kashmir.
On Friday, Mr Girish Saxena, governor of Kashmir state, said in an interview
that the security forces had been told to use restraint because every excess
won recruits for the militants. 'We are taking every action to ensure that
any ugly incident is not allowed and that excesses are minimised.'
There are signs of more restraint in Srinigar, the capital, but his orders
seem to have had little effect in rural areas where much of the fighting now
is.
India has not allowed Amnesty International to visit Kashmir to investigate
repeated reports of human rights violations. Three weeks ago, Kashmiri
extremists kidnapped two Swedes in Kashmir in an attempt to force Amnesty or
a UN agency to visit the state, in a move that has been widely condemned
here.
As we entered Malangam village late in the afternoon, hundreds of villagers,
almost all men, were gathered on the hillside to bury the body of Mirza
Khan. The BSF had been unable to remove it because they had come under fire
from other militants. The killings had done more to win sympathy for the
separatist cause than almost anything one could imagine.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4076</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / Shying away from calls for growth: Peter Norman and Stephen
Fidler look ahead to a G7 meeting
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER NORMAN and STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FINANCE ministers and central bank governors of the Group of Seven
leading industrial countries could be heading for their most difficult
meeting in years, when they gather next Sunday in Washington.
During his recent tour of Europe, and at the informal meeting in London
eight days ago of the G7 finance ministers, Mr Nicholas Brady, US treasury
secretary, surprised his partners by calling on them to adopt more clearly
expansionary policies.
The plea, which took the form of a call for lower interest rates, threatens
to exacerbate already fraught relationships between the US and some of its
partners.
On the world economy, Mr Brady argued that the seven - the US, Japan,
Germany, France, Britain, Italy and Canada - should concentrate their
economic policies on fighting slow economic growth rather than inflation.
Referring to the collapse of communist regimes and the end of the cold war,
he said: 'We've had the most significant change in world history in all our
lifetimes and the idea that we're not going to approach that turn in world
history with a positive, optimistic strategy doesn't occur to me as right.'
His belief that the world risked global recession and a credit crunch won
some support at the meeting with fellow finance ministers in London. Mr
Pierre Beregovoy, France's finance minister, came closest to identifying
with Mr Brady's cause, although he also received some backing from Mr Guido
Carli, the veteran finance minister of Italy.
Mr Ryutaro Hashimoto, Japanese finance minister, admitted that Japanese
economic growth had slowed and that slower economic growth was a greater
risk to the Japanese economy than higher inflation. follow a neutral
macro-economic policy for the time being.
The US approach was opposed by Mr Norman Lamont, UK chancellor. British
officials say that the fight against inflation remains the central plank of
economic policy, despite last week's figures showing a record monthly rise
in unemployment. Mr Theo Waigel, German finance minister and Mr Michael
Wilson, his Canadian counterpart, also put the battle against inflation at
the top of their domestic policy agendas.
Their view was that the US administration was falling into an old,
discredited trap of believing that there is a trade-off between growth and
inflation.
Mr Brady's approach was most explicit at a lunch-time meeting with Mr Karl
Otto Pohl, Bundesbank president, and other members of the bank's directorate
a few days before Mr Brady's London visit. There he attempted to persuade
the Bundesbank to lower interest rates with the argument that the world was
threatened by a global recession and credit crunch.
Mr Brady's plea was flatly rejected by the Bundesbank, which sees no sign of
recession in west Germany and no reason to lower its interest rates in the
face of domestic inflationary pressure.
European monetary officials believe that the US move is geared to domestic
politics and part of a White House-inspired campaign to encourage the US
Federal Reserve to ease the monetary reins.
However, there are fears that, if the US persists with its campaign among
the G7, next week's meeting - at the spring gathering of the International
Monetary Fund and the World Bank - will be very difficult.
The G7 meeting will differ in one important respect from that in London  -
the central bank governors will be there. The presence of such
anti-inflation hawks as Mr Pohl and Japan's Mr Yasushi Mieno may tip the
balance against the US initiative in a group that looks almost split down
the middle.
The meetings will also channel continued pressure from the US on Japan to
make its promised Dollars 9bn contribution to the Gulf war costs.
Also on the agenda is a capital increase for the International Finance
Corporation, the World Bank's private sector affiliate. In return for its
support to the bank, the US wants to see more World Bank involvement in the
private sector. It has said that 50 per cent of the lending of the World
Bank group should be 'directed towards' that sector by 1995.
The US envisages this leading eventually to direct lending to the private
sector.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2 Photograph (Omitted). Photograph (Omitted). Photograph Brady,
Beregovoy, Lamont, Subtly divided over expansion (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4077</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Year of the rat
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
China's grain crops this year are once again under threat from locusts and
three to four billion rats, the official China Daily said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4078</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Old nude
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
One of the world's first nude photographs - of a woman lying on a bed
wearing only a string of pearls - is among a collection of 80 expected to
fetch a total of around Pounds 130,000 at auction next month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4079</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / World News In Brief: Church collapses
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The nave of a church collapsed, killing seven people at a classical musical
concert in southwestern France, police said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4080</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / World News In Brief: Iran hostage call
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Iran urged the US and its allies to work with Tehran in a fresh initiative
to secure the release of 12 western hostages in Lebanon and Moslem prisoners
held by Israel.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4081</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / World News In Brief: Poles cheer good beer
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Poland's drinkers have formed their own party to celebrate good beer in a
country better known for vodka. The Polish Party of Friends of Beer aims to
improve conditions for beer-drinking and reduce consumption of hard liquor.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4082</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / World News In Brief: Tamils murder 22
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Tamil separatist guerrillas shot and hacked to death 22 Sinhalese villagers
and an elephant in east Sri Lanka, military officials said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4083</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDVB1AAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910422
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  22 APR 91 / World News In Brief: Terrorist attack
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Security forces in Northern Ireland were searching for a terrorist who blew
off part of his hand in an abortive grenade attack in south Armagh. Severed
fingers were found at the scene of the explosion.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4084</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Correction
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The charge on a Lloyds Bank Classic account overdraft of over Pounds 100 is
Pounds 7 per month, plus interest. There are no further charges, as we
incorrectly stated last week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4085</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Thai talks on patent piracy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NANCY DUNNE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE Thai government will meet US trade officials next week in an undisclosed
third country in the hope of averting trade retaliation for Bangkok's
failure to act against patent and copyright piracy.
The Thais are already facing retaliation on complaints filed by the US
pharmaceutical industry, over lack of patent enforcement, the Recording
Industry Association and the Intellectual Property Alliance. This last
accuses the Thai authorities of ignoring documented evidence of big
video-tape piracy in Bangkok.
However, they seem more anxious to avoid being named on the 'Special 301'
list of top Violators of intellectual property rights, to be published by
the US trade representative next Friday.
Unless their governments make last-minute concessions, Thailand, China,
India and Indonesia are expected to be named for failing to protect patents
or copyrights. They could face sanctions six months hence.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4086</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Iraq admits to chemical warheads for its Scuds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS, UN Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IRAQ has disclosed that it has chemical warheads for its Scud missiles,
although none of them was apparently used during the Gulf war.
In a report to the United Nations, Iraq admits to having more than 50
Scud-type missiles and a large arsenal of chemical weapons  - including Scud
warheads - but claims to have no nuclear arms nor the means to make them.
The report was delivered in response to the Security Council's ceasefire
resolution, which ordered the destruction under UN supervision of all of
Iraq's most dangerous weapons.
Previously, neither western nor Israeli officials knew whether Iraq had
chemical warheads for its Scuds, although it was known to have chemical
bombs and artillery.
Western officials are dissatisfied with Iraq's nuclear accounting, which
also denied the existence of any support and manufacturing facilities for
nuclear weapons. They said last night that the response, including an
assertion that what nuclear materials Iraq possessed were subject to
International Atomic Energy Agency safeguards, was inadequate.
Baghdad acknowledges having 1,145 mustard gas bombs or artillery shells and
280 tonnes of mustard gas as a finished product, as well as no fewer than
9,420 nerve gas warheads, 200 nerve gas bombs and 725 tonnes of nerve gas of
the Sarin and Tabun types as finished or intermediate material.
But the document attests to the success of allied attacks, admitting that 16
production sites, including research and development laboratories, were
destroyed.
The report says Iraq now possesses one Scud missile in the 50-300km range
and 51 al-Husseins (an upgraded Scud type) with 650km range. Thirty chemical
and five conventional warheads are part of the al-Hussein arsenal.
There are four missile launchers and two mobile missile erectors at the
Rashid camp, according to the report, as well as 32 platforms in the western
zone.
An international commission of at least 20 technical experts will supervise
the destruction of the weapons. Its composition, probably under a Swedish
chairman, is expected to be announced next week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4087</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Travel: From Barcelona to London via romps in Baghdad - It
is good to walk in Barcelona these days, thinks Jimmy Burns, after a
three-day visit to the Olympic city
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JIMMY BURNS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT WAS Cervantes who wetted the appetite for Barcelona long before the term
'city break' had been dreamt up by tour operators: the city was 'the seat of
courtesy, the haven of strangers, the refuge of the distressed, the mother
of the valiant, the champion of the wronged, the abode of true friendship,
unique both in beauty and situation.'
I arrived late on January 6, that day when the Catalans share a rare common
bond with the rest of Spain - the feast of the Epiphany. Barcelona airport
was not so much a seat of courtesy as in a bit of a tangle because of work
on a new terminal. We were herded across a building site and along a
makeshift corridor, strip-lighted and smelling of feet. A bigger airport
should have been built years ago.
Nevertheless, the work should be completed well in time for the summer
Olympics that Barcelona is staging next year - or so I was told by Carolina,
the affable 'guide' provided by the main organising board for the games, who
took me up the Montjuic mountain which overlooks the city.
When I had last been in Barcelona in 1976, after Franco's death, my guide
then had talked only of the Catalan civil war dead buried there. Now the
cemetery and the fortress, once an infamous prison, are but blips on the
horizon. Conversation focused instead on the architectural enterprise of the
Olympic 'ring' with its cluster of futuristic sports centres and electric
trees interspersed with the more sedate pavilions and orange groves dating
from the occasion of the 1929 International Exposition.
It touched, too, on one of Barcelona's more controversial characters -
'Cobi,' the official Olympic mascot. 'He is not round and clearly defined as
Mickey Mouse,' said Carolina. 'He is a conceptual representation of a
Pyrennean dog, very avante-garde, very Catalan.'
Down at the Olympic village, I was given a guide more in keeping with the
prospect of leisure and repose. She was called Eva and was Swedish. She
explained that the Barceloneses had spent most of the 20th century with
their backs to the seafront, but were now in the process of rediscovering
the advantages of building homes nearer to it.
Here, too, was a metamorphosis: a promotional video spoke of a vibrant
Barcelona not in the process of expansion but of becoming a more accessible
and comfortable city to live in, and for once the official-speak was not far
off the mark.
I was somewhat apprehensive about a new tower block being made out of
pre-fabricated glass. 'All the materials are imported, the wardrobes are
from the US and the bathrooms are from Sweden,' boasted Eva. And it was
difficult to imagine, through the dust and the earth-moving equipment, just
what a new ring road would do to city life once it was completed.
Yet the promise of the Olympics has meant that one of the Mediterranean's
ugliest industrial suburbs has been bull-dozed and four kilometres of sewage
have been replaced by a near-pristine beach.
Eva had said: 'If you want any further information of any Olympian nature
contact the office.' But I was in the mood for unofficial guides now, and so
took to the streets alone.
The Olympic buildings are the prime example of the most extensive urban
renewal programme to be carried out in Barcelona for more than 100 years.
Blame it on Franco that in the 1960s and 1970s large chunks of the city were
left to crumble or swept aside by ugly high-rises and highways.
Thank the liberated luminaries of the local autonomous government that
Barcelona's urban renewal programme is, in the main, underlined with good
taste and inspiration.
It is good to walk the streets of Barcelona these days. There is a surprise
at the turn of each street corner. As part of the new civic plan, the plazas
are being decorated with a wide variety of major late modernist sculptures.
In London and some American cities, street life has surrendered to the
environmental plunder of advertising, traffic and retail centres. But the
sculptures in the Catalan capital defy the pessimism that art can only
compete with city life in the museum.
The sculptures are too numerous to list and take more than three days to
appreciate, but two in particular deserve a mention. At the very least one
can puzzle for many minutes at the monument to Picasso created by Antonio
Tapies in the Parc de la Ciutadella, a giant still-life of cubist shapes
inside a glass-box which is streaming with water and quivering in reflected
light.
The same can be said for one of the last big works by Joao Miro near the
bull-ring: a 20m-high moon-calf, ponderous and mystical, which probably
strikes a more vital note with the majority of Catalans, and with visiting
tourists, than bull-fighting itself.
However, the sculptures alone were not sufficient to alleviate the stress of
city life I had brought with me from London. Several strolls up and down
Barcelona's boulevards - the Ramblas - and the nearby old quarter were
necessary.
Along the Ramblas and within the maze of alleys which make up the old
quarter I saw poverty-stricken jugglers and whores - some of whom could have
been grandmothers - musicians and flower-sellers, Gothic churches and Roman
ruins; I thought of the brothel on the Carrer d'Avinjo where Picasso is
believed to have lost his virginity, and of the shoe-shiners and their
changed political allegiances which George Orwell wrote about in Homage to
Catalonia.
People now sat on benches rather than threw Molotov cocktails from behind
the barricades, but the shoe-shiners in the magnificent Placa del Rei remain
a good source of local gossip. There were businessmen reading newspapers and
gays wrapped in conversation in old coffee houses; mothers leading children
and intellectual poseurs.
The Ramblas and the old quarter have been incorporated into the civic plan:
as a result, both are safer and cleaner. Police, present but unobtrusive,
stroll around with the same relaxed air as everyone else. They are there to
help tourists - a welcome contrast from my last visit when the police seemed
only too keen to hit you on the head.
What little that remains of the old red-light district, the Barrio Chino, is
rather seedy and just a little threatening with its pimps and drug-dealers.
Generally, however, cobblestones are being swept, facades painted, buildings
renovated. Brothels judged to have been too disease-ridden and decayed to be
salvaged are being torn down and turned into squares with sculptures.
The city's inhabitants seem to want to live on the reputation of being
hard-working, unlike other Spaniards. Barcelona is not quite as frenetic as
Madrid, and probably more conformist and less filled with humour. Meals,
including lunches, nevertheless often turn out to be rather longer than
promised: reassuringly Spanish, in other words.
'This house is an eating-place for the epicure, a glowing hearth for those
who long for the warmth of a home, a gallery for those who seek delights for
the soul, a tavern for those who love the shade of the vine and true essence
of the grape, a Gothic beer-garden for lover of the north, and Andalusian
patio for those of the south; it is a house of healing for those who suffer
from the sickness of our century, a refuge of friendship and harmony for
those who shelter beneath its roof.'
Thus was the founding pledge of the Els Quartre Gats tavern which attracted
the young Picasso in his early years as a painter. They have insulated the
rooms with cork ceiling and installed air-conditioning, but the decor
remains generally unchanged from Picasso's time. Thinking of Picasso, I had
Catalonia's cheapest, tastiest and most nourishing snack there: pa amb
tomaquet: large slices of freshly-baked white bread smeared liberally with
tomato, oil and garlic, accompanied by a plate of smoked ham.
My companions were Sofia and Fernando, two young local professionals who,
nostalgic for Picasso, bemoaned the fact that other tables were taken up by
tourists.
'In Picasso's days the avante garde was frowned upon by society and had to
seek refuge in places like this. Nowadays the avante garde are setting up
their own art galleries and designing the reconversion of old palaces,' said
Fernando, whose own reconverted real estate office lay in the old quarter.
There are many good restaurants, but my favourite was Siete Portes. Once the
home of a 19th century colonist, the restaurant, decorated with low-hanging
wood beams and chintz lampshades, is an institution. Everyone from Lorca to
King Juan Carlos has lunched here, but don't be put off by that.
If present trends continue, there will be more and more Barceloneses moving
back into the old quarter and out to the sea-front where new flats are being
built. For the moment, however, the works of the artist Gaudi remain among
the more permanent landmarks of the city, defining its character in images
of radical artistic endeavour.
In the Parc Guell, Gaudi's contorted mosaics glistened in the brilliant
midday sun, while the fairy-tale turrets of the gate-house and lizard-shaped
fountains added their note of eccentricity. Like the Ramblas, the park
seemed very much recovered by the people: children kicking footballs, old
men sharing card games, lovers losing themselves in the forest of palm trees
and pines.
I returned to London via Baghdad, thanks to Xavier Agullo, a journalist who
writes for one of Barcelona's leading newspapers on cultural matters and
other eccentricities. Agullo looks like a cross between Al Pacino and Robert
de Niro, and with his ankle-deep leather coat and snake collar would fit
into the Bronx. He works at night and sleeps during the day.
Baghdad was a nightclub down near the port, on the edge of the Ramblas. It
was decorated in artificial mosaic and mirrors and had a stand by the
box-office selling giant plastic dildos.
'We find that our clients want something to remember us by,' said the
manager, who insisted that his was the best show of its kind in Europe. The
audience was made up largely of young middle-class couples out for a giggle.
To go to Baghdad has become fashionable.
For two hours we saw all manner of things performed on stage, quite
explicitly and at close-quarters. Some of this was done alone, some in
pairs, some in trios, some even between a member of the audience and one of
the performers. None of them had much to do with love, and it reduced the
act of sex to a repetitive grind.
Much more genuine fun was had at Salsa, a spacious place in a converted
underground garage where some of the wilder and less pretentious Catalans
dance their souls out until late the following morning.
There and in the nightclubs we frequented afterwards I felt submerged in
life, a necessary final fix before returning to London.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XII Photograph Barcelona, a vibrant city where the best thing to
do is to soak up the atmosphere (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4088</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Travel: Purely a cosmetic operation at Copacabana - Tim Burt
at Igazu where the Brazil-Argentina border rumbles and cascades
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By TIM BURT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BORDER between Brazil and Argentina rumbles. The ground shakes and a
cloud of spray rises above the jungle.
The frontier itself moves. It carves a wide path through the olive-green
landscape and carries branches and boulders along with it. Suddenly, it
gathers pace and rushes over a great precipice where rainbows shine through
the haze.
These are the symptoms of Iguazu - the waterfalls separating South America's
largest countries. Border traffic is impossible. There is no way to cross
the mass of water that tumbles over a gorge four times wider than Niagara.
The Rio Iguazu rushes down a series of cliffs which for centuries marked the
physical limit of European exploration. Attempts to colonise the river's
upper reaches were defeated by white water cascading through the forest at a
rate of 1,750 cubic metres a second.
Tourism has changed all that. The 275 steps, crevices and hollows that make
up Las Cataratas have become an important attraction for a region long
considered too remote to merit development.
You no longer need a pack mule to get there or a machete to hack through the
undergrowth. But if you are seeking Paradise Lost prepare to be
disappointed. The 20th century has arrived - mostly by air. Thousands of
people fly each year to Iguazu, where they stay in pricey hotels and amble
along purpose-built walkways beside the falls.
Airline pilots obviously think first impressions count: they offer their
passengers a grandstand view of the site before landing. Skimming over the
tree tops, some aircraft bank so low that tourists on the ground duck
instinctively.
Three airports have now been built to cater for the influx of visitors.
Varig, the Brazilian carrier, flies to one; Aerolneas Argentinas serves
another and LAP of Paraguay lands at Ciudad Stroessner, the nearby town
named after that country's retired dictator.
Most visitors fly from Rio de Janeiro, 730 miles to the north-east, or from
Buenos Aires, more than 600 miles to the south. The flights are managed with
dexterity by Iguazu's air traffic controllers whose radar screens monitor
not only incoming traffic but also the constant hubbub of helicopters
buzzing into the air with pleasure trippers.
But the congested skies cannot detract from the spectacle of strings of tiny
birds flitting through the spray. Tourists who take the walkway to the
Devil's Throat, the largest single-drop waterfall, linger on the viewing
platform to watch swallows struggling to reach their nests through the
curtains of water.
The birds live off rich pickings on the forest floor. The Iguazu national
park serves up bloated caterpillars and spiders the size of your fist. The
caterpillars blossom into giant butterflies as bright as Chinese kites. Some
are luminous yellow and green; others sport air force roundels. They gather
in clouds to drink from the lagoon at the foot of Dos Hermanos, the name
given to a pair of smaller falls.
Swimmers who brave the lagoon can dry off with a brisk walk towards Isla San
Martin, an island at the foot of some of the largest falls. The outcrop
rises 100ft out of the water and is served by an old wooden boat that bumps
across the fast-running current. Some visitors go no further than the shore;
the fittest climb the step-ladder to the summit.
The island, reached from the Argentine riverbank, offers unobstructed views
of the monkeys and toucans playing on the Brazilian side. San Martin itself
hums with life. Every few feet a beetle crunches underfoot. The ugly insects
appear at the bottom of a food chain which includes turkey eagles, coral
snakes, toads, ant-eaters - even jaguars.
Homo sapiens, as usual, sits astride the top of the chain. At Iguazu he is
served by snack bars which pose a threat to the other animals by dispensing
canned drink and burgers in polystyrene packs. The fast-food wrappings
rarely find their way into the rubbish bins painted green by the park
authorities. Old tin cans are left to rust on the ground and the ant-eaters
have learned to pick their way round discarded paper cups.
There are, however, pockets of uncluttered jungle. The pathways to them are
too steep and overgrown for the blue-rinse-and-sneaker brigade. Tour guides
marshal elderly visitors along the widest walkways before returning them
safely to their air-conditioned buses. Other paths are left to adventurers
who do not mind scratching and stumbling through the foliage.
By late afternoon the restaurants are laying their tables; in Puerto Iguazu,
the Argentine town 10 miles away; hotel boilers are working overtime to
shower their hot and bothered guests; and the jungle is just coming to life.
Timid animals make use of the empty walkways as darkness falls in the
rainforest. By this time the last airliner has taken off and the helicopter
pilots are sitting down to eat. The falls, meanwhile, are in full flow. The
humidity increases and the vegetation seems to perspire. It gets very dark.
All travellers hate getting lost, even intrepid ones. Losing your way in the
dark at Iguazu has only one consolation: it is a good way to lose weight -
you shed pounds in sweat. You also lose your nerve.
The tourist maps are unreliable and difficult to read by torchlight. And
missing the last bus back to town can be costly. Either you have to camp out
with the wildlife or crank up your credit card to use the International
Hotel half a mile from the falls.
It takes a cool head to pick the right track when the only reference point
is the deep splash of a nearby waterfall. The prospect of slipping and
sliding over a precipice concentrates the mind wonderfully.
British Airways (London: 081-897-4000) and Varig (071-629-9408) fly to Rio
de Janeiro, with connections to Foz do Iguazu, the Brazilian airport. BA
also flies to Buenos Aires, with similar connections to Puerto Iguazu in
Argentina. Tour operators such as Journey Latin America (081-747 3108)
arrange inclusive tours to the region.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4089</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Travel: Purely a cosmetic operation at Copacabana -
Virtually all Rio's inhabitants seem to have perfect bodies. Nicholas
Woodsworth investigates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS WOODSWORTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR SOME days after I arrived in Rio de Janeiro I wandered about much vexed.
Whether lying on the sand at Ipanema, sipping coconut cocktails at
Copacabana or dancing a midnight samba at the Scala Club, I was confronted
with the same nagging question - how is it that the people of Rio all have
perfect bodies?
It seemed to me unjust. Go to any of the large international tourist hotels
in Rio, sit around the pool, and you will be surrounded by the usual ghastly
mix of grub-white northern flesh: paunchy Britons, saggy Germans, varicosed
Dutchmen, hip-heaving Belgians, thigh-thwacking Americans. No matter how
exotic the background of palm trees and blue water, no matter how skilfully
cut the bathing costume, one can only admit that the more these bodies are
covered, the better theylook.
But walk down to any of Rio's beaches, where the bodies are hardly covered
at all, and you will be struck by a total contrast. On Ipanema, Flamengo,
Botafogo or Copacabana beaches, all the people, rich or poor, black or
white, socialite or slum-dweller, are beautiful.
There are about 15 kilometres of beaches in the city of Rio. They are
approximately 30m wide. On a sunny day (there are few in Rio that aren't)
cariocas, the people of Rio, head en masse for the beach. Among a vast
confusion of towels, parasols, volleyballs, joggers, ice-cream sellers, beer
coolers, musicians, beach bats and delta-wing gliders, there is on average
one prone and skimpily-clad body for every two square metres of sand, or so
it appeared to me.
By my calculation, that makes 750,000 people on the beach on an ordinary
day. The odd thing is that, against all the laws of averages, each and every
one of these bodies is sublimely shaped.
All flesh here is perfect flesh. From forehead to foot it is firm, smooth,
deeply tanned and unmarked by wrinkle, sag or pimple. This being so, there
is a great deal of self-confidence about showing it all off. Each of these
people might have been selected for an underwear advertisement, except that
they are wearing much less than any underwear advert would require.
Men wear bathing suits that would get them arrested elsewhere. The women are
even more striking. If the Brazilian textile industry is in a straitened
condition, it is probably due to them - the bikinis they wear are so lacking
in substance that they are known as fio dental, dental floss. Apart from
three tiny cloth triangles held in strategic frontal positions by cotton
string, there is nothing to them.
While the rest of the world sags ever deeper into an ugly mess of flab and
cellulite, cariocas of all ages continue to wander lithely along the beach,
immune to the effects of gravity or advancing years. Surely there is some
explanation? My scientific curiosity could no longer be held back. I decided
to contact a medical man.
Jose de Gervais is a third-generation member of a distinguished Rio medical
family. A slim and youthful 40, he is a specialist in micro-surgery. These
days, though, his greatest professional pleasure comes from combining
medicine with a love of aesthetics, design and sculpture. He is, in fact,
one of Rio's busiest plastic surgeons.
I met de Gervais and his wife Angela, a psychoanalyst, one evening in their
vast flat overlooking Ipanema. De Gervais had emerged from 10 hours in the
operating room. Nonetheless, such is his passion for his work that over iced
drinks he responded enthusiastically to my doubts and queries about Rio and
its heavenly bodies.
There are, he told me, several factors responsible for Rio's physical state
of grace. Some of them are obvious. First, Brazil is a nation of young
people. More than 70 per cent of the population is under 30 years.
Nor can even the most casual observer fail to notice the effect of local
geography and climate on the way people here live. Rio's balmy tropical
weather, spectacular natural setting, sandy beaches and warm waters all
conspire to create a culture that approaches life in a highly physical
manner. This is a society that lives not by its intellect but for and
through its senses.
Cariocas are a people who pursue pleasure with a determination rarely found
elsewhere. Song, dance, football, carnival and their exuberant sociability
all express a natural sensuality. So does their passion for the beach.
Leaving behind their clothes, this is the one place where cariocas efface
their social and economic identity.
Quite naturally, the vibrancy of this beach culture has given cariocas a
pre-occupation with their bodies. And it is here that a third element, one
of some cunning and duplicity, comes into the picture. If your body begins
to displease you on the beach, all you have to do is change your body.
While Angela poured fresh drinks, Dr de Gervais trained a projector on a
wall. For the next half-hour I looked at slide after slide recording magical
before-and-after transformations: flabby thighs turned firm, tummies made
taut, breasts become bouncy.
Since the 1960s Rio has been the world capital of plastic surgery. More than
300 plastic surgeons make their living there. Business is good. De Gervais
knows 90-year-olds who return regularly every five years for face-lifts. He
has worked on entire families, remaking grandparents, parents, children,
aunts and uncles.
Those cariocas who can afford it, it seems, would as soon have cosmetic
surgery as buy a new dress. 'In Rio,' de Gervais told me, 'we are not afraid
or ashamed of plastic surgery. Everybody believes it can improve their
lives.' In many cases it does. That desirable and sought-after girl from
Ipanema may be everything the song says she is, but chances are she has had
a little help along the way.
I asked de Gervais about the most popular cosmetic operations. Nose jobs, it
appears, are out these days, 'mini-liftings' of the upper face in.
Lyposuction, the removal of localised fat from hips, thighs and upper arms,
is also very popular.
But one part of the female anatomy counts above all else in Rio. 'In
America,' said the doctor, 'there is a fascination with the breast - bigger
is better. Here it is quite different. It is the bottom that matters. If the
breast is small so much the better, one can wear a smaller bikini top. But
if the bottom is small it is very disappointing.'
As he talked, de Gervais leaned out of the window and gazed at the women
strolling along Ipanema. 'I am always too critical,' he said. 'I cannot sit
in a restaurant or at the beach without saying this one needs more cheekbone
or that one needs less hip. In fact, there isn't a woman in the world who
couldn't be improved.'
At this point his wife felt compelled to break in. To my untrained eyes
Angela did not look as if she needed any improvement at all. She said that
the good doctor was always telling her she needed work 'here, here and here'
 -indicating eyebrows, cheeks, jaw-line. 'He keeps insisting, and I keep
refusing.'
The doctor leapt to his own defence. 'But of course] It is only natural.
What I do for other people here I should do also for my wife. Rio, after
all, is not like any other place. Where else in the world is it easier to
operate on one's wife than it is to find a new one?'
Nicholas Woodsworth travelled to Brazil with British Airways, tel:
081-897-4000. In Rio he was the guest of the Rio Sheraton (tel: 274-1122).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII Photograph You need plenty of cheek on Rio's Copacabana
beach (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4090</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Property: House-hunters who chase the market down - Country
homes are attracting plenty of viewers but few hard bids and asking prices
have had to be slashed
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL HANSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
REMEMBER THE case of the vanishing lady, Dorothea Allen, the mistress of
Sutton Brailes Manor in Warwickshire, who died intestate in January 1989,
having systematically destroyed every clue to her background? The media had
a field day producing features on her, which helped Sotheby's sell the
contents of her house for an astonishing Pounds 577,797 - more than twice
their estimate.
But her lovely Cotswold house, near Shipston-on-Stour, has not yet found a
buyer. Last August, the Chipping Campden office of Jackson-Stops &amp; Staff
(tel: 0386-840224) was looking for offers over Pounds 700,000 for the
seven-bedroom 17th-century house in 25 acres of overgrown gardens and
grounds.
More than three dozen people have viewed the property, and several have made
offers, but these have all fallen through. Now the house is being remarketed
at Pounds 550,000 - considerably lower than previous offers, and a poignant
illustration of the way in which sellers have been chasing the market down.
'The Treasury Solicitor's duty is to sell the property for the best price he
can get in the current market,' explains Peter Britton, of Jackson-Stops &amp;
Staff. 'But it will only make what it will make.'
Still, it looks as though the Exchequer will eventually benefit by more than
Pounds 1m from the sale of the house and its contents because Dorothea Allen
never made a will. She was the widow (or, as some think, the sister) of
Robert Allen, who made his fortune out of Spencer Corsets, a public company
in Banbury which was taken over after his death in 1965. If she has any
living relations, they have not yet appeared.
Someone else who has been chasing the market down is John Barratt, the only
son of Eileen Joyce, the concert pianist. At one time he hoped to get Pounds
3m for Newington House, near Wallingford, Oxfordshire. It was uninhabitable
when he bought it in 1987 and he spent six months restoring it while living
with his wife in a Sussex rented cottage.
Last September, having brought the price of Newington House down to Pounds
2.5m, he had an offer of Pounds 2.25m, which he rejected. Now he has
instructed Savills (tel: 071-730-0822) to invite offers of Pounds 1.8m for
the seven-bedroom Grade II* listed 17th-century mansion, which stands in 43
acres beside the River Thame - a tributary of the Thames.
Perhaps the biggest reduction in price over the course of the property
recession is that of King's Beeches, which was priced at Pounds 5m by its
former joint agents and advertised as being at Ascot. But the new agents,
Strutt &amp; Parker (tel: 071-629-7282), admit that it is actually in
Sunningdale.
King's Beeches is now priced at Pounds 1.75m, a 65 per cent reduction. This
is a reflection of several factors, one of which is that in 1988 the
property was being offered for sale at a highly speculative price by a
Middle Eastern client whose bankers have since obtained possession of the
property.
When the house was advertised at Pounds 5m in 1988, the agents said: 'The
buyer must have a large cheque book and great imagination.'
Imagination was required because the house was last occupied more than 20
years ago by the last Maharajah of Jaipur, Sir Sawai Man Singh II (1911-70).
Since then it has become derelict and its 45 acres of gardens and grounds
are overgrown. Even so, it was thought that someone willing to spend a
further Pounds 2m to Pounds 3m on its restoration could create a magnificent
mansion of 18,000 sq feet with room for several staff, an indoor swimming
pool and extensive stables.
The Maharajah was a great polo player. He bought King's Beeches in order to
be near Smith's Lawn at Windsor. He had first brought his polo team to play
in England in 1933, when it established a record by winning all the open
tournaments.
It was on his last visit to England in 1970 that Jai (as he was known to his
friends ) had a bad fall at Smith's Lawn, but he and his wife Ayesha gave
their usual cocktail party at King's Beeches after the Queen's Cup, to which
the Queen and Prince Philip came. He next played polo at Cirencester on June
24, where he suddenly fell from his pony and was dead on arrival at
hospital.
Jai's biographer, Quentin Crewe, says his body was taken to King's Beeches
and laid out in the drawing-room in a sandalwood coffin for his friends to
pay their respects. The next day his body was flown to Jaipur, where his
mile-long funeral procession was watched by at least half a million people.
A year later, Mrs Gandhi amended the Constitution of India, abolishing the
hereditary princes.
In 1975, tax officials raided Jai's palaces to search for the legendary
treasure of the maharajahs. They found millions of pounds worth of gold and
jewels, but wealth tax had not been paid on the gold. Jai's widow, the
Maharani, and his eldest son, Lt Col Bhawani Singh (known as 'Bubbles') who
would have been maharajah if the title had not been abolished, were
arrested. They were never charged: Bubbles was released after 2 1/2 months,
but Ayesha was imprisoned for nearly two years, even though she was ill.
The legendary treasure was never found. If it had been, it would now take a
sizeable part of it to restore King's Beeches. Not only has the property
decayed after being empty for 20 years, but it was invaded by Peace
campaigners during the Gulf War. Now the house is a gaunt shell: its roof
has been stripped, its fireplaces have gone, floors have been ripped up, and
certain parts of the building are now deemed structurally unsound. The house
will probably be demolished.
Not far away, Coworth Park House, Ascot, has just been placed on the market
on behalf of the receivers, Buchler Phillips &amp; Co. This Palladian Mansion,
which stands in 36 acres of parkland, has been run as an international
business centre, and offers of Pounds 5.5m are being sought by the agents,
John D Wood &amp; Co (tel: 071-493-4106).
Although there are 35 properties in London currently for sale at more than
Pounds 5m, the last country property to come on to the market at that sort
of price was Chandlings Manor, in 60 acres at Bagley Wood, near Oxford. The
modest Cotswold house was transformed beyond recognition at an estimated
cost of Pounds 10m, regardless of taste (except for its modern sports
centre, new stables and garages) or planning permission (since granted
retrospectively) by a Middle Eastern gentleman who then died penniless.
His receivers, KPMG Peat Marwick McLintock, put the property on the market
at Pounds 5.5m in December 1988, and it was finally sold for Pounds 5.4m by
Leisure Investments on April 30 last year - the day the company went into
receivership. Security Pacific, the bank that had financed LI's acquisition,
instructed KPMG Peat Marwick McLintock to re-offer the property for sale at
Pounds 3.5m through Savills (tel: 071-730- 0822). Although more than 800
enquiries have since been received, the property is still unsold.
And, in case you are wondering, former chancellor Nigel Lawson has been
unable to sell the Old Rectory at Stoney Stanton in Leicestershire. After
more than six months on the market at Pounds 325,000, his joint agents,
Savills (071-730-0822) and Howkins &amp; Harrison of Atherstone (0827-718021),
say the price is still the same. But then,that is what you would expect a
politician to tell them to say.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII Photograph King's Beeches, in 45 acres at Sunningdale,
Berkshire, has been unoccupied since the death of the Maharaja of Jaipur in
1970. Now derelict, its price has fallen in the past two years from Pounds
5m to Pounds 1.75m (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4091</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Property: Buyer beware - you may have to sell one day
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BRENNAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AS THE Estate Agents (Property Misdescription) Bill wends its way through
Parliament all the old jokes about misleading sales particulars are being
given a re-run.
There is no effective counter-argument to such a piece of legislation, even
though the very title of the Bill is disparaging.
The Institute of Trading Standards Administration (ITSA) has been
campaigning for this change since 1969 when it became clear that the Trades
Description Act failed to cover agency particulars. Who would argue against
the proposition that agents should be obliged to provide factual information
about the properties on their books?
There is, however, one fact that punctures much of the self-congratulatory
discussion surrounding this legislative binding of the 'rogue' agents. The
sales agent's client is the vendor. That statement of the obvious always
provokes a bemused response. Everyone knows that sales agents act for the
people selling the property, so why repeat the point?
Well, although everyone knows whose side the agent is on, it tends to be
forgotten by the majority of buyers within minutes of their first
conversation at an estate agency. It certainly will have moved to the far
back of their minds by the time they have chosen a property and have started
to negotiate on price.
Agents are not neutral. They are the last people to be called on to police
the property sales particulars prepared for their clients because they are
paid, specifically, to present those properties in the best possible light
and to achieve the best possible sale price.
Patently misleading sales particulars are commercially counter-productive.
Only an incompetent agent will try to sell a house or flat which prospective
buyers can see at a glance bears no relation to the glowing description in
the sales particulars or which attempts to disguise faults that even a
cursory survey will reveal.
The institute of trading standards says the legislation would give trading
standards officers teeth to take action against more unscrupulous agents who
might be tempted to deceive house buyers.
The legislation will require agencies to disclose a property's faults. If
they fail to do so they face fines of up to Pounds 2,000 in a magistrates'
court or unlimited fines if the case is taken to the crown court.
The Bill does not deal with housebuilders or developers' sales as such.
Buyers are expected to welcome this overdue control on sales hype.
Indeed, Hugh Dunsmore-Hardy, President of the National Association of Estate
Agents, cheers the legislation.
He says: 'It is the small, undesirable minority who bring the whole of the
industry into disrepute who should be worried, and the NAEA is as keen as
anyone to have them outlawed.'
The real question left unanswered by the enthusiasm for additional legal
controls is just how enthusiastic the newly protected buyers will be when
faced with an agency required to list the negatives about their home when
they come to sell?
Consumer protection cuts both ways and, unfashionable as it is to make the
point, it is probable that it is the lawyers who will be the real
beneficiaries of this partial dilution of caveat emptor.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4092</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Sponsors call the tune: The hard life of amateur choirs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARILYN BENTLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE MUST be a streak of musical masochism in the British character. Why
else would the members of over 850 choral societies gather to sit and be
harangued by sometimes charismatic and often bad-tempered conductors?
Amateur singers work like professionals; many sing like professionals. Their
reward - the intense creative pleasure of making music - is the reward of
amateurs.
In British choral music, the word amateur is misleading. Apart from the
opera companies, and a few smaller groups, Britain has no professional
choruses. Whether it's a Huddersfield Christmas Messiah or Beethoven's Ninth
at the Albert Hall Proms, chances are those harmonies issue from amateur
tonsils. What is more the chorus is the only component which comes free.
Promoting a quality choral concert is a considerable financial undertaking.
Last season, East London Chorus performed Monteverdi's 1610 Vespers, a work
requiring very modest resources compared with the large scale 19th century
repertoire, at St John's, Smith Square. But the balance sheet is sobering:
the six soloists cost Pounds 2,200; the orchestra Pounds 2,600 plus a fixing
fee of Pounds 50; the hall hire was Pounds 600; the conductor's fee Pounds
350;orchestral music parts cost Pounds 225; organ and harpsichord Pounds 300
and publicity Pounds 1,000. A total of Pounds 7,325.
The concert was a sell-out. Even so, the total income was Pounds 3,440 -
less than half the cost of the single performance.
The better-known concert soloists can command Pounds 1,000 to Pounds 1,300 a
performance. For works such as Verdi's Requiem, which demand operatic
voices, a leading soloist can cost up to Pounds 2,250. Orchestras,
similarly, do not come cheap. As with singers, famous names attract
audiences, but they also increase the financial burden on the voluntary
promotors, whose chief resources have traditionally been ticket receipts
from halls of limited capacity, chorus membership fees and public grants.
Professional fees have increased ahead of inflation, while public funding
has diminished. In England, grants from regional arts associations represent
6 to 7 per cent of professional expenses. This year Greater London Arts
announced that it was to withdraw all funding to amateur music groups. The
unpaid professionals of the music establishment are turning increasingly to
the business community for support.
It is not easy to generate sponsorship, particularly in a recession.
Choruses have to be as professional in their marketing as they do in their
music-making.
'We have to indicate that we operate to the same standards as our sponsors,'
says Michael Kibblewhite, conductor of ELC. 'If they're used to glossy
material, that's what we have to have. Packaging is important.'
This commercial realism may conflict with what amateur singers regard as the
raison d'etre of chorus membership - the pleasure of music-making. Most
choral societies have in their constitution some reference to fostering the
public appreciation of choral music. But for Kibblewhite, concert-giving in
the televisual 1990s has to be seen in a wider, less elitist context.
'We're performing organisations. That doesn't just involve the sheer
enjoyment of making music. It's exciting other people, playing to packed
halls, everything you gain from contributing to a complete and successful
performance.' Success, in these terms, means the highest musical standards
matched by presentation and visual appeal - 'which brings us back to costs'.
'For even the smallest concerts of the standard repertoire, such as the
Monteverdi, or the Mozart Requiem, you're going to have to find Pounds 3,000
in sponsorship,' says Kibblewhite. 'We've got to the stage now where if a
concert isn't sponsored, we don't do it.
'In terms of artistic development, it's bad news. As sponsorship becomes
more important, the repertoire spirals in on the old classics.'
A sponsor will look for the most attractive commercial proposition; and this
is more likely to be Messiah than Messiaen. To commercial sponsors, amateur
choruses have one significant attraction: they have a strong community
identity. The ELC may have earned its reputation through west London and
South Bank concerts, but it still retains a performing base in east London.
It is this local identity, in an area little thought of as a centre for the
arts, which attracted one of the largest employers in the area, Tate &amp; Lyle.
'We put in about Pounds 5,000 a year,' says David Tate, director of
corporate affairs. 'We are not major arts sponsors and never will be,
although we were particularly pleased by ELC's professionalism. It's the
community support we wanted. We felt it was a manifestation of our interest
in the area and its social and cultural activities.'
The London Rubber Company joined the ranks of ELC's sponsors last season
under its brand name, Durex. 'We chose ELC because it's local to us,' says
Ian Franks. 'We saw it in terms of a public relations exercise rather than a
marketing move. Durex's target market is the 16-25 year olds - probably not
the same people who would go to ELC concerts.'
But Franks is enthusiastic about the result, which attracted a government
ABSA award for first-time arts sponsorship. 'We were very gratified to
receive the award. With any sponsorship you're looking for media coverage
and we've had more than our share. As a community venture and our first look
at the arts, it was Pounds 2,000 well spent.'
East London Chorus perform Carl Orff's 'Carmina Burana' today and tomorrow
at The Old Town Hall, Stratford East.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4093</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Tessa returns holding firm
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
REMEMBER TESSA? Amid much bally-hoo at the beginning of this year, banks and
building societies launched a new range of products, generally at very
attractive rates of interest.
Competition for new accounts is still holding many Tessas at what may be
artificially high levels, while the steady cut in base rates since February
has not been reflected, except in the deals offered by a few banks.
According to Money Facts, which provides the Weekend FT's 'Best Rates for
your Money' (on page III), only two Tessas offered 15 per cent or better
when the scheme was launched.
By mid-February, in spite of a fall in inflation and indications that base
rates were set to fall, 12 Tessa providers were offering 15 per cent or
better. Now, only three of Money Facts' original sample are that high -
Cambridge, Skipton, and National Counties. Abbey National cut to 14 per cent
last week.
Many providers, particularly among the building societies, seem to have been
influenced more by competition than by the prevailing economics of what they
could afford to offer to savers. They could be using Tessas as 'loss
leaders'.
Few accounts have shed as much as the two percentage points that have come
off base rates this year, showing that building societies believe there is
still new custom to be won.
Societies who started more conservatively, with rates in the middle range -
including Halifax and Cheshunt - have increased their rates over the last
three months to strengthen themselves against the competition.
Banks, on the other hand, do not seem to be trying, and tend to offer around
1.5 per cent less than building societies. For example, Lloyds is now
offering 12 per cent, compared to 14.5 per cent at the end of January - a
decline which has actually been faster than the fall in base rates. Other
banks which have recently cut rates include TSB, down a percentage point to
13 per cent, and Ulster, also down a percentage point to 12.5 per cent.
Plainly Tessas do not behave with the classical simplicity of gilts or
mortgages. John Woods, of Money Facts, said: 'If there is a trend, it is
that banks really do not seem to have been prepared to offer very high rates
to get Tessa business. Building societies are holding their rates until at
least the end of this month, if not longer.'
Perhaps investors need not look too carefully at marginal differences in the
interet rate. If a Tessa offers a low initial investment, and low charges if
you wish to transfer, it may be a safer bet.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4094</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Competition over mortgage rate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HALIFAX Building Society, Britain's largest mortgage lender, cut its
mortgage rate from 13.75 per cent to 12.95 per cent this week, but there is
still enough competition in the market to ensure that it was undercut by
some societies.
Skipton Building Society cut its rate by 0.9 per cent to 12.85 per cent and
the Woolwich made a 0.85 percentage point cut to 12.9 per cent. Existing
Skipton borrowers will have to wait till May 18 for the cut, but borrowers
with Halifax and the Woolwich will benefit from May 1.
However, the two-thirds of Halifax's 1.8m borrowers on the annual review
scheme will continue to pay 14.5 per cent until next year. The 1991-92 rate
was set in February, when base rates were higher.
Halifax offers discounts for larger loans, charging 12.15 per cent
(previously 13.05 per cent) for loans of between Pounds 60,000 and Pounds
99,995, and 11.95 per cent (12.95 per cent) for larger loans. Woolwich
charges 12.15 per cent (13 per cent) for loans above Pounds 60,000.
Halifax is also to offer a customer loyalty bonus of 1 percentage point for
borrowers with a good payment record who move house and stay with the
society. The discount only applies to loans up to 90 per cent of the house's
value.
Both the Halifax and the Woolwich offer first-time buyer discounts - 1.5 per
cent and 1.25 per cent respectively.
The Lloyds, Midland and Barclays Banks all announced cuts yesterday,
bringing down rates by 1.1 per cent to 12.95 per cent as from May 17, from
13.95 to 13.1 per cent as from May 10 and from 13.75 per cent to 12.95 per
cent from June 1, respectively.
Other mortgage changes announced include: Cheshire Building Society is
cutting its rate for existing borrowers by 0.9 per cent to 12.85 per cent as
from May 15. Chelsea Building Society has reduced its mortgage rate by 1 per
cent to 12.5 per cent for new borrowers.
Royal Bank of Scotland has dropped its mortgage rate from 13.85 per cent to
12.95 per cent. The new rate will apply to existing borrowers from May 1 and
to new borrowers immediately. Southdown Building Society has reduced its
rate to 12.75 per cent, with effect from June 1 for existing borrowers and
at once for new borrowers.
Savers take longer to hear of rates changes, but will obviously see
reductions. Halifax has cut its savings rates by up to 1 per cent, although
its tax exempt special savings account rate stays at 14 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4095</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: TR takes a new tack - The Fund
Managers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE LATE 1980s was a very difficult period for Touche Remnant. A number of
its investment trusts came under predatory attack, speculation raged about
the future ownership of the management group and there was a shake-up among
its of senior executives.
Now, under the ownership of Societe Generale, the company is trying to
settle down and establish itself once again as one of Britain's premier fund
management groups.
In March, the group announced that the unit trust, private client and
international businesses were being separately organised and re-branded. The
idea was to take advantage of the international links of Societe Generale
and the new company will be named SGTR (UK). The unit trust arm is also
understood to be about to announce the appointment of a new managing
director.
The unit trust group is only a relatively small element of TR's portfolio,
consisting of only one-ninth of total funds under management at the end of
1990.
Although the open-ended funds only emerged from the unitisation of the old
Cedar Investment Trust, TR has managed a more than respectable investment
performance. Five of the 12 trusts with a three year record are in the top
quartile (highest 25 per cent) in their sector. Over seven years, four out
of seven funds are in the top 25 per cent.
The European Special Situations trust is the largest in the stable, at
around Pounds 57m, having risen to sixth in its sector over three years. Its
shorter term performance is less impressive, placing it 75th out of 119
funds over one year.
Stephen Peak, the manager, says that he was successful with his stock
selection in the early years of the trust. But in spite of some good
geographical asset allocation decisions, (for example, being underweight in
Germany), the fund was hit by a market preference for more mainline stocks
last year.
The General Growth trust is seventh in its sector over seven years and is a
first quartile performer over three years. Job Curtis, manager of the trust,
says it was heavily invested in smaller and medium companies up to 1987, but
then switched into larger companies at what turned out to be the right
moment.
Paul Manduca, TR's chief executive, says that although the group has an
investment policy committee, it still gives a reasonable degree of latitude
to the specialist fund managers. 'An over-controlled fund manager can
sometimes be demoralised' he says.
Investment trusts still form the bulk of the group's funds under management,
although they are much reduced by the impact of the predatory raids of the
late 1980s. The 'most unkindest cut of all' was the disappearance of TR
Industrial and General, the group's flagship trust, which was taken over by
the British Coal pension fund in 1988.
Previously a whole series of trusts, TR Pacific Basin, TR America, TR
Technology and TR Pacific Basin had been subject to bids or reorganisation.
Since the trusts collectively owned the management group, the series of
attacks heightened speculation over TR's future. Failed discussions with
Metropolitan Life about an offer and the departure of some top management
did not help.
Now that the ownership issue is settled, TR's still extensive roster of
investment trusts can be brought back into focus. Here again there are some
good performances.
The Bankers Trust is second in its sector - International General - over
five and 10 years, according to Micropal. TR City of London is first in the
UK income growth sector over three and five years and second over 10 years.
Touche Remnant reports high demand from older private investors for TR City
of London and another income trust, TR High Income, which attracted a lot of
funds through Personal Equity Plans (PEPs). Shares in TR High Income
currently stand at a premium to net assets, a sign of strong investor
demand.
John Korwin-Szymanowski, investment trust analyst at S G Warburg Securities,
says TR's investment trusts side is 'much improved and the group seems to
have fitted in well with Societe Generale's ownership.
Praise for the reshaped TR is not without qualifications. Fund Research, in
a recent report on the group, says the product range, currently under
review, 'lacks balance and in some cases focus or logic'.
But Fund Research concludes that 'TR is a fascinating group, in the midst of
major strategic reorganisation, but with the capital backing, leadership and
motivation to expand; overall, one which appears certain to be able to meet
the challenges of global markets in the years ahead.'
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
                    TOUCHE REMNANT UNIT TRUSTS
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
                    Size (Pounds m)     Launched     3 year performance
                                                     fund        sector
American Growth          7.4              1983      +34.4        +41.0
Euro Spec Sits          56.8              1987      +72.7        +46.4
Far East Opps            7.3              1990        n/a          n/a
General Growth          11.7              1983      +38.1        +26.0
Global Tech             19.4              1984      +76.6        +23.6
Income Growth           15.5              1983      +33.9        +22.1
Income Monthly           5.1              1975       +1.9        +18.7
Japan Growth             8.5              1985       +7.3         +4.3
Managed Equity           3.7              1986      +40.6        +26.0
Overseas Gth             8.0              1983      +21.4        +23.6
Smaller Cos              8.3              1983      -20.5         -9.9
Special Opps            13.6              1982      -22.8         -9.9
Wldwide Spec Sits        2.6              1988      +23.6        +23.6
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
All figures to April 1, offer-to-bid with income reinvested.
Source: Finstat
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV Table (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4096</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Markets: Forward with footsie - London
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Robert Maxwell planned to write the prospectus for his Mirror Group
Newspapers flotation in tabloid English, but the lawyers said no. The idea
has its merits, however:
B*O*R*I*N*G] That's the six-letter outlook for the stock market say top
share pickers:
'IN A RUT' says bearded Scottish tipster Bob Semple of London megabrokers
County NatWest Woodmac.
'DON'T JUST DO SOMETHING, STAND THERE' ing of stumbling research powerhouse
James Capel.
'LETHARGIC' says omniscient FT man-about-the-markets Terry Byland.
In fact, three months into Stormin' Norman Schwartzkopf's soaraway stock
market, apathy abounds. In the past month or so, the market has risen from
2,500 on the FT-SE 100 (on March 14) to close this Friday at 2520.1, down 6
on the week. Averaged over a month, the FT-SE's rise works out at less than
a point a trading session.
Even the most energetic analyst can't get excited about that, though some
try. Roger Palmer, Kleinwort Benson's market guru, believes the FT-SE is on
track for 3,000 by December, which would be a rise of 40 per cent on the
year. Even he, however, thinks the market is likely to pause for breath
first.
Wall Street's passage through the 3,000 mark on the Dow-Jones Industrial
Average, successfully accomplished on Thursday, reinforces the sense that a
phase of marking time is beginning.
Under such circumstances, the market searches for stories with as much
vigour (and sometimes as much regard for accuracy) as any tabloid editor.
'FOREIGN THREAT TO ERNIE TWINS' has been one of the week's running tales,
centering round speculation of a bid for Sir Ernest Harrison's Racal
Electronics. This hypothetical bid - involving any or all of Cable &amp;
Wireless, Germany's Mannesmann, Hutchison clutch of US telephone companies -
would be primarily a way of getting hold of the company's 80 per cent stake
in Racal Telecom, the Vodafone cellular telephone network.
Cable and Wireless has wanted to get its hands on Vodafone in the past, of
course. Mannesmann, which is building a cellular network in Germany, was
reported this week to be looking for a big foreign acquisition (though it
hurriedly added that it had nothing particular in mind and no sense of
urgency). Hutchison Whampoa, like the Baby Bells, has big cellular
ambitions.
In tabloid terms, such circumstantial evidence is enough to justify the
story. And so it proved in the stock market. Since the year's low of 166 in
early January, Racal Electronics' share price has risen in Alpine leaps,
with particularly heavy volume in early April. This week's volume, though
smaller, was still significant, and the share closed the week at 238p, up 8
since the previous Friday.
Other stories, though less juicy, still moved stocks. There were the usual
round of 'BRITISH BOFFINS PATENT WONDER DRUG' stories, closely followed by
an equally familiar tale: 'UK WONDER DRUG UNDER THREAT'.
Fisons and SmithKline Beecham benefited from stories of the first sort,
their shares ending the week at 486p, up 7 and 836p, up 30 respectively.
Wellcome suffered from stories in the second category, but ended the week at
535p, up 8. Glaxo - which closed on Friday at 1077p, down 11 on the week -
got both versions. Some investors were still reacting to a patent threat to
Zantac, Glaxo's best-selling ulcer drug, that had emerged the previous week;
others had moved on and were now in a mood best summarised as 'DOCS: UK
WONDER DRUG STILL TOPS]'.
Some stories emerge, of course, only after the share price has moved. J A
Devenish, the West Country regional brewer, has risen spectacularly from the
150p at which it began the month. It closed on Wednesday at 220p, up 47 per
cent in 17 days. The untold story was obviously 'BEER BID BECKONS', because
on Thursday the pub-owner (and former brewer) Boddington offered to buy the
company in a seven for ten share swap that valued Devenish shares at 233p.
One favourite theme re-emerged: 'MR MONEYBAGS] LORD HANSON ADDS Pounds 500m
TO BID WARCHEST' sums up the market's reaction to a Pounds 500m bond issue
from Hanson. The attractions of 9 1/2 per cent finance were brushed aside by
those traders determined to see the bond issue as a prelude to a bid for any
number of tired old favourites, including Pilkington and Allied-Lyons.
In the background, economic news was casting a shadow. 'SOARING JOBLESS
THREATEN TORY HOPES' was one interpretation the market put on Thursday's
rise in unemployment to over 2m, the biggest monthly rise on record. With
local elections now less than two weeks away, the economic news had
political implications as well.
Just as worrying, perhaps, were figures that showed a 1.6 per cent drop in
manufacturing output between January and February, with a steepening rate of
decline and no sign of a trough. Average earnings in the year to February
showed a rise of 9 1/4 per cent, slightly below January's figures, but not
enough to give much hope on inflation.
These numbers all appeared on Thursday; on Friday ('INTEREST RATE CUTS OVER
FOR NOW - OFFICIAL') the Bank of England indicated through the money market
that it had no intention of easing rates in the near future. Since the
Federal Reserve and the Bundesbank had also apparently reached the same
conclusion, UK equities seemed unlikely to receive help from lower interest
rates any time soon.
That thought - and sterling's uncomfortable position caught between a
strengthening dollar and a weakening D-Mark - left the market to close the
week in a sombre mood. You could put it another way: 'THE FUN'S OVER, SAY
STOCK MARKET GLOOMSTERS'. On reflection, though, perhaps Maxwell's lawyers
were right after all.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Chart (Omitted). Table (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4097</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Your free guide to investment
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The recession persists, yet the climate for long-term investment is
improving . . . The apparent paradox is explained in the spring issue of the
FT Quarterly Review of Personal Finance, published free with both next
Friday's and next Saturday's Financial Times.
Investment for income, home insurance and a survey on investment trusts are
among the features in the third issue of the Review, which analyses the past
quarter and presents valuable statistics in a form not readily available to
the small investor.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4098</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Investors need a PEP talk
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A Gallup survey conducted for Gartmore, the fund management group, last week
showed that ignorance about personal finance is widespread, despite recent
proliferation of products.
It found strong support for more education on personal finance, preferably
in schools or higher education colleges. More than half of the 507 people
polled admitted to having a poor understanding of bonds, investment and unit
trusts, and Personal Equity Plans, although Tessas appear to have caught on
quickly with the public. Only 34 per cent of respondents had a poor
understanding of Tessas, and only 11 per cent were not aware of the scheme,
which is only four months old.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4099</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Annuities find favour
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Falling interest rates and speculation about changes to tax laws in the
pipeline have caused an increase in demand for annuities from life insurance
companies, according to Baronworth Investment Services. The products are of
interest for people who want to increase income during retirement, but the
drawback is that payments normally stop on death.
According to Baronworth, the best annual payments on temporary annuities
lasting for nine years, assuming a down payment of Pounds 10,000, are Pounds
1,900.70 from Carlyle Life, and Pounds 1,890 from Scottish Equitable. On a
Pounds 10,000 immediate annuity, which guarantees to pay you annually until
your death, RNPF Nurses is offering Pounds 1,328.28 a year to people aged
60, and Scottish Equitable Pounds 1,308.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4100</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Oil sector picks up
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Oil stocks have not done well since peace broke out. The share prices of
companies in the oil and gas sector outperformed other All-Share companies
immediately after the Iraqi invasion of Kuwait, but then started a steady
decline. This was reversed last week.
The upturn in the price of crude oil, which led to a marked improvement in
sentiment among brokers' analysts, was mainly responsible. Some of the
revival is technical, as marketmakers had allowed themselves to reduce their
oil holdings, forcing them to push prices up when demand revived. Business
in BP was particularly strong thanks to speculation that the company is
trying to sell a US subsidiary.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4101</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: All-Share lags behind
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Although the FT-SE 100 Index has been hitting new highs, the broader FT-A
All-Share Index has yet to pass the peak of 1238.5 it reached in July 1987.
It has come close in recent weeks, closing at 1232.32 on April 5, but
smaller company shares have still not recovered from the battering they
received in 1989 and 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4102</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Markets: Dow Jones rides the elevator up and down - Wall
Street
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A COUPLE of traders, riding the elevators at Salomon Brothers on Thursday,
had the happy but slightly incredulous look of men who had just won the
jackpot at Las Vegas.
'Sixteen times earnings,' muttered one, referring to the current
price-earnings ratio on the Dow. 'There can't be much more in it'.
Sure enough, having closed above the 3,000 mark for the first time on
Wednesday, the Dow Jones Industrial Average eased back in the following
session and by Friday morning was falling more steeply.
While most pundits can find a rationale for the recent rise, there is a
strong suspicion that the market may not have much further to go in the
immediate future.
The rise is built on an economic recovery and, to judge from the current
reporting round of quarterly corporate earnings, this is only at an
embryonic stage. Plenty of chairman's statements have muttered about
'cautious optimism' and 'some indications' of a pick-up. Few have noted
anything more concrete.
Moreover, there is still a question mark over the Federal Reserve's policy
on interest rates. The steady run of interest rates cuts, delivered between
October and February, has had a 'double whammy' effect. The policy
stimulated the economy while driving down cash returns and encouraging
investors back into the stock market.
Whether the market can expect much more help from this quarter in the
immediate future is a moot point. A week ago, in the wake of some fairly
comforting inflation figures and poor employment data, the markets thought
that further easing of rates was odds-on. Yet, on Monday morning, there were
clear signals that the Fed was not so minded, as it drained money from the
banking system by selling Treasury issues.
There is a growing school of thought that, having missed this window, the
Fed will take no action before the next meeting of the policy-setting Open
Market Committee on May 14. By then, key data concerning the economy's
performance in April will be published.
That said, there seems relatively little reason for the market to tumble
from its highs. Whatever the pace of the US recovery there is increasing
evidence that the recessionary corner has been turned. Moreover, the latest
rally has been broad-based and analysts acknowledge that Thursday's
correction, in itself an inevitable reaction, was modest.
One further unknown is the extent to which acquisition activity may pick up.
For the past six months at least, deal-making has been at a virtual halt and
many merger professionals have turned to restructuring business instead. In
large part, this downturn has echoed the banking debacle, with lenders
unwilling to fund new transactions while they battled to get their capital
ratios into shape.
No-one is keen to predict a speedy resurgence on this score and certainly
this week's spate of US banking results were scarcely a matter for pride.
But, anecdotally at least, some investment bankers report that lenders are
showing greater interest in reviving a modest deal flow. This improvement
seems to reflect interest from relatively healthy overseas banking groups,
but some deal-makers count US names on their lists.
As for the reporting season itself, this has brought a mixed bag of figures
and similarly disparate market reactions. In general, the US bank stocks
were modest gainers last week. Citicorp rose Dollars  3/8 to Dollars 16 3/8
on Tuesday, in spite of reporting first quarter earnings of Dollars 70m,
down from Dollars 231m, after increasing loan-loss reserves by Dollars 200m.
Others, such as Wells Fargo, Manufacturers Hanover and Chemical Bank, also
firmed.
The drug companies, too, unveiled commendable figures. Merck shares rose by
more than Dollars 3 to Dollars 113 mid-week as the group reported a 21 per
cent rise in earnings per share.
In food and drinks, Philip Morris rolled in with a 21.5 per cent earnings
rise, in line with expectations, while Coca-Cola created rather more
reaction with a 13 per cent increase in profits, at the top end of
predictions. More surprisingly, Sears Roebuck, the nation's largest
retailer, joined in the fun, with its shares gaining Dollars 2 1/8 at
Dollars 39 1/2 on Thursday after reporting a virtual doubling of first
quarter profits - thanks in part to asset sales, but with the underlying
business at least showing some improvement.
But for paper groups, publishers and some computer companies life remains
tough. Apple Computer shares fell on Monday on static quarterly profits and
a significant decline in gross margins.
The stream of new issues, meanwhile, keeps coming as companies take
advantage of investors' renewed interest. On Thursday, RJR Nabisco, taken
private via the record-breaking Dollars 25bn leveraged buyout masterminded
by Kolhberg Kravis Roberts, announced that it had completed an offering of
115m new shares - increased from the initial 75m - to net nearly Dollars
1.3bn. Clearly, KKR reckons that raising money is attractive. And that may
be as good comment as any on the current market levels.
 ------------------------------
Monday     2933.17 + 12.38
Tuesday    2986.88 + 53.71
Wednesday  3004.46 + 17.58
Thursday   2999.26 -  5.2
Friday     2965.59 - 33.67
 ------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4103</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / The BBC at bay: Does quality come first, or should the BBC
submit to market forces?
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER DUNKLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WHAT IS to become of the BBC? With its two television channels, five radio
networks, 25,000 staff, and annual budget of Pounds 1.4bn it is arguably the
biggest broadcasting organisation in the world. When the tumult over
satellite television and the franchise auctions for Channel 3 has died away,
the BBC's role in a more diverse and competitive broadcasting environment,
even its very survival, will inevitably return to the centre of discussion.
The re-appointment this week of Marmaduke Hussey as chairman indicates that
pressures for a radical upheaval during the Thatcher years have given way to
a more evolutionary spirit. However, a large and influential body of
opinion, not all of it Tory, continues to question the need for a public
service broadcasting organisation of this size. The most radical objectors
suggest that the need for public service broadcasting is disappearing
altogether. They point to the high quality drama produced by the commercial
sector, such as Central's Inspector Morse and Granada's Casebook Of Sherlock
Holmes, to the arts coverage in London Weekend's South Bank Show and the
impressive work of Channel 4 News and suggest that all but a few odds and
ends (education and religion, perhaps, public access and children's
programmes) can be profitably supplied by commercial broadcasters.
Even the least radical objectors tend to ask 'Why do we need the BBC to
import mindless Australian soap operas such as Neighbours or to run a pop
music channel such as Radio 1?' Since commercial broadcasters are only too
happy to provide that sort of thing, why should viewers pay bigger and
bigger licence fees - up from Pounds 71 to Pounds 77 from April 1 - to the
BBC? After a decade when bodies as disparate as the coal industry and the
civil service have been shedding manpower, and when ITV companies are
cutting staff by as much as 40 per cent it seems odd, even scandalous, to
some that the BBC continues to support a bureaucracy which looks to them
like a leftover from the British Empire.
Sir John Harvey Jones, former chairman of ICI, who gave a vivid
demonstration of his uncompromising views on business efficiency in the BBC2
Troubleshooter series, has described the scheme of director-general Michael
Checkland to save Pounds 75m a year by 1993 by shedding 1,400 jobs as
'rather like sharpening a pencil: nonsense]' Although not everybody accepts
Sir John's assertion that the wage bill can be cut by a third and top
management by a half, most people, even inside the BBC, agree that large
cuts need to be made.
Greg Dyke, managing director of London Weekend, who is regarded as one of
the tougher and more pragmatic management thinkers among ITV's younger
generation, says recent experience in ITV companies suggests that large
savings could be made at the BBC, partly by cutting top management and
improving cost disciplines. 'I charge everyone in our building Pounds 57 a
square foot for where they sit and it concentrates the mind amazingly,' he
said.
But behind these practical considerations lies a philosophical debate about
whether the size and status of the BBC is necessary to guarantee the quality
of British broadcasting as a whole. This debate has been given fresh urgency
by the development of new technologies which could usher in greater
diversity. Because of the possibility of many new channels, some ask whether
it is dangerous to have one fish in the broadcasting pool so much bigger
than all the others. And should it be involved in every part of broadcasting
from the tiniest local radio systems to the World Service, from regional
television to national networks? Some politicians argue that this may
produce arrogance as well as a worrying degree of influence.
However, David Attenborough, former manging director of BBC television,
interviewed recently on Face To Face, argued that although the BBC had to
change, its continued existence was justified by the high quality and
relatively low costs of its programmes.
It has been said that if British commercial television is better than
commercial television elsewhere (as showings at international festivals
suggest) the reason is that Britain's commercial broadcasters have had to
compete with the BBC for audiences and prestige. In the words of Greg Dyke:
'The BBC has always set the standard.'
It is true that the 26-part history of World War Two, The World At War, one
of the greatest documentary series ever made anywhere, was an ITV
production. Would it have been produced, though, but for the
programme-making ethos created in Britain by the BBC, makers of the earlier
documentary series Civilisation, and The Ascent Of Man? It was these, the
first about the arts, presented by Kenneth Clark, the second about the
sciences, presented by Jacob Brownowski, which showed that a serious and
informative television series could attract large audiences, albeit not of
soap opera dimensions. As often as not, when an international jury awards
another prize to a British programme it is this knack of combining the
serious with the popular which they are recognising. Even if British
independent programme makers have mastered the art, it was the BBC - in this
as in so many areas - which showed the way.
Would ITV continue to produce material of world-beating quality if the BBC
were not standing alongside setting the standards with Life On Earth, The
Singing Detective, Alan Bennett's superb monologue dramas Talking Heads or a
string of ground-breaking comedy successes from Till Death Us Do Part, with
its monstrous working class Tory Alf Garnett, to Fawlty Towers? with the
manic Basil and infuriating Sybil? It seems unlikely. Life On Earth stands
at the pinnacle of natural history programme making, put there by the
expertise of the BBC's specialist unit at Bristol, and by the corporation's
willingness and ability to commit huge funds to such programmes. Would the
standard elsewhere be so high without this example? Highly unlikely.
Would a purely commercial business risk the funds necessary to make
something which looked as odd on the drawing board as The Singing Detective,
a story combining biography, film noir pastiche, and 1930s songs, told from
a hospital bed by a man with an appalling skin disease? Most unlikely, yet
some would argue it is the greatest drama serial ever. Would any commercial
broadcaster give slow-starting comedies the months, even years, that the BBC
gives to establish a success? Not at all likely.
This argument may seem to imply that, even if they ceased to do so once
competition was removed, commercial broadcasters could always match anything
produced in the public service sector if they wanted to. But the staunchest
champions of the BBC have long argued that the Corporation is peculiarly
adept in one skill which has always eluded ITV: combining quality and mass
popularity in a single programme. Bill Cotton, who rose from Head of Variety
at the BBC in the 1960s to Managing Director of Television in the early
1980s, has always maintained that this unusual flair can be traced straight
back to the experience gained in the heyday of BBC radio, from a host of
popular high quality series such as The Brains Trust, Children's Hour, Dick
Barton, Special Agent and Hancock's Half Hour.
Many examples support his thesis. ITV's On The Buses and the BBC's Steptoe
And Son were both situation comedies set in working class milieux and both
achieved high ratings. But while the ITV series followed in the thick-ear
tradition of the Carry On films, the BBC series aspired to something far
more ambitious and subtle and, in the view of many admirers, achieved it.
With a format as seemingly limited and hackneyed as the studio quiz the BBC
has proved that there is no requirement for mindlessness, flashing lights,
and dirty innuendo from a comedian/presenter: Mastermind rejects all that
and yet achieves huge ratings. Even a subject as dry and unpromising as
antiques has been turned by the BBC into an extraordinary popular attraction
in Antiques Roadshow.
As for the assertion that we do not need the BBC to bring us Australian soap
operas or Radio 1's pop music, the irony is that these - particularly if you
reckon the costs per capita - are the cheapest known forms of broadcasting.
The Corporation would save only a tiny fraction of its budget by giving them
up, but it would seriously weaken the argument used to persuade politicians
to maintain the licence fee: that the BBC continues to win half the audience
(a share which will, of course, fall as television continues to diversify).
Distressing as it may seem to highbrows, importing Neighbours is almost
certainly the BBC's most cost-effective way of achieving the ratings it
needs to sustain the licence fee which pays for the Bristol Natural History
Unit and the Singing Detective. In any case recent research suggests that
most viewers would willingly pay a higher licence fee.*
From the standpoint of the viewer, chiefly concerned with the quality of
programmes, the advantages of Britain's mixed system, and in particular the
benefits stemming from the BBC, seem pretty clear. Having sustained its
claim on the licence fee with Radio 1 and Neighbours the BBC uses a big
slice of its income to provide the sort of services usually absent from
commercial broadcasting, for example, BBC2, a network which succeeds where
Channel 4 has so far been less than triumphant.
Told to serve minority interests and 'be different' Channel 4 set itself the
target of winning 10 per cent of the audience, about the same as BBC2. It
has finally started doing so, but research figures for a recent week show it
is achieving this with productions such as the entirely conventional
American comedy Roseanne, the American rock 'n' roll movie Hairspray, the
catatonically tedious game show Countdown, the unremarkable soap opera
Brookside, and another American comedy called The Wonder Years: not a single
programme which could be described as 'different', nor one designed to serve
minorities. In the same week the BBC2 top ten was led by Food And Drink, and
included the excellent science series Horizon, Gardens By Design and The
Natural World, precisely the sort of sectional interests, presumably,
envisaged by those who gave Channel 4 its original marching orders. So the
in-house subsidies possible with a public service licence system seem to
achieve more programme diversity.
Even so, do we really want this vast organisation with its supercilious
liberal ideas spreading its tentacles across the country at every level of
broadcasting? Now that the trade unions have been emasculated and local
government brought to heel, would it not be better if the BBC, too, were
whipped into line by the forces of market enterprise along with the rest of
the mass media - ITV, newspapers, magazines and commercial radio? Do we
really want the public service ideas, fairness and balance of this huge
organisation left free of commercial constraints? Is it not time to do away
with the licence fee and press the entire edifice into the Rupert Murdoch
mould?
But even Dyke, who works at the heart of the commercial system, is forced to
admit: 'Of course, if you talk to people anywhere else in the world they
think you're mad to risk damaging the BBC.'
Viewers' Willingness To Pay by Andrew Ehrenberg and Pam Mills, London
Business School.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4104</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Oftel may clarify telecoms policy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGO DIXON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CONFUSION over the future of Britain's telecommunications has forced Oftel,
the industry's watchdog, to consider producing a document to clarify
matters.
Much of last month's white paper outlining government policy was complicated
and, in some cases, imprecise, giving the appearance that it had been rushed
out - some say, in order that the government could proceed with its sale of
more British Telecom shares.
The white paper - by Oftel and Mr Peter Lilley's Department of Trade and
Industry - announced that the BT/Mercury Communications duopoly would be
abolished and the Pounds 10bn-a-year market thrown open to new competitors.
Many important details about how this policy would be implemented were left
for Sir Bryan Carsberg, director general of Oftel, to decide at a later
date.
BT's competitors have been particularly incensed by proposals for how much
they will have to pay for connecting their networks to BT's. Personal
communications networks (PCN), the next generation of mobile communications,
and cable television companies argue that they are going to be charged too
much. The competitors are angry that Oftel is planning to fix
inter-connection rates on the basis of BT's historic costs, a move which
they say will penalise them for the company's past inefficiencies.
They are also opposed to the idea that they should help pay for BT's losses
on renting lines to its customers via a surcharge known as the 'access line
deficit'. Oftel has proposed this surcharge to prevent new competitors
taking the most profitable parts of the market.
But Mr Alan Harper, business strategy director of Unitel, one of the PCN
operators, said BT had the best of both worlds: 'They have 98 per cent of
the customer base and want us to pay for them. If they don't want these
local operations, let them give them to the cable companies or the PCN
operators.'
Mr Harper attacked the fact that inter-connection rates would be determined
in behind-closed-doors talks between Oftel and BT because the watchdog had
decided not to reveal confidential information about the company.
Sir Bryan said Oftel had no comment to make at present on the
inter-connection dispute except that he would consider representations.
Oftel also confirmed that he might bring out a clarification document.
Other issues requiring clarification include whether the international
duopoly has been abolished and whether 'equal access', which would allow
customers to choose between rival long-distance services by dialling
different codes, will be introduced.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22 Photograph Sir Bryan, no comment on inter-connection dispute
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4105</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / The Lex Column: Tate &amp; Lyle
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The only surprise about Tate &amp; Lyle's increased cash offer for Bundaberg
Sugar is its generosity. The 10 per cent increase to ADollars 4.10 per share
is not quite of knock-out proportions, but it shows that for Tate the
strategic gain is more important than further haggling about the price, mild
dilution notwithstanding.
Bundaberg shareholders will doubtless pause before playing too much harder
to get. Although the world sugar cycle might appear to be near a turning
point, the price is still in the doldrums and if anything is heading lower.
Tate has won the argument. It must now win 90 per cent shareholder approval.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4106</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / The Lex Column: Hammerson
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Sydney Mason of Hammerson has a long memory, so his warning that last
year and this will be the worst in his company's history carries weight. But
whereas last year's net asset value suffered a double hit from lower
property values and adverse currency, there is reason to think that exchange
rates will have a positive effect this time. Sterling's weaker trend has
already added back 30p to 40p to net assets. Though the Australian and
Canadian dollars to which Hammerson is particularly exposed may weaken more
again, an asset value of between 800-850p looks possible by the year end.
The main question for investors is whether they want to be in property at
all. This week the sector hit an all-time low relative to the UK market and
is likely to continue to underperform as long as equities generally remain
bright. At least Hammerson has a strong balance sheet. But if it looks
solid, it also looks boring.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4107</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / The Lex Column: BP
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Amid the murky combination of oil and tax, BP may have found a neat way to
offset some of the unrelieved advanced corporation tax (ACT) which plagues
it and a host of other UK companies with predominantly overseas earnings.
Quirky rules on North Sea profits apparently mean non-oil companies are
unable to follow suit. Nevertheless, they will doubtless be grateful for the
reopening of the anti-ACT campaign.
Briefly, by paying a dividend via special shares in its subsidiary Britoil,
BP wants to shift its ACT liabilities to a subsidiary level where they can
be offset against tax losses. Steering the idea through tax and legal
complications so that it can be put to shareholders will be like edging a
supertanker through a minefield. But since BP wrong-footed the government
once by taking over Britoil, its proposal to save Pounds 150m of tax will
have caused some consternation in Whitehall. Possible Inland Revenue
objections aside, the principal weakness seems to lie in the implicit appeal
to shareholders' benevolence. BP cannot legally offer its shareholders an
incentive to connive in a tax dodge, so it cannot make a higher payment as a
result of the scheme. The benefits must therefore be retained by the
company, amounting to a few pence only in earnings per share. But this
offers no incentive to tax-exempt institutions, who can claim back tax
credits on cash dividends. The scheme has an appeal to private investors.
That may not be enough to guarantee its success.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4108</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / The Lex Column: Unit trusts
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A lively debate is developing within the UK unit trust industry which is
arguably as important as it is obscure. The question is whether the
time-honoured method of quoting a spread between bid and offer prices should
be replaced with a single pricing system of the kind long familiar to
investors in the United States and continental Europe. Out would go the
complex listings in the back of this newspaper: three different figures and
hundreds of words explaining why. In would come an alternative more likely
to be understood by those small savers the industry is striving to reach.
The UK's Securities and Investment Board has thrown its weight behind
change. The Unit Trust Association is determined not to be rushed and
earlier this year commissioned consultants Touche Ross to options.
Significantly the conclusions of the study, published with little fanfare
just before Easter, are broadly neutral. The dual system can favour
remaining members at the expense of those departing. Single pricing, however
operated, is almost bound to have the opposite effect.
There is no doubt that dual pricing comes into its own for specialist small
company and emerging market funds which hit liquidity problems. But single
pricing may ultimately be the better bet. Fairness could perhaps be ensured
by altering the charging structure to include a fee for leaving the fund.
Provided this is not used as another excuse for increasing managers'
remuneration, investors ought to be grateful.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4109</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / The Lex Column: Bringing politics into markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
FT-SE Index: 2,520.1 (-18.3)
It ought to have been a triumphal week for the UK equity market. On Tuesday
the FT-SE index went through its all-time intra-day high. On Wednesday Wall
Street - still the dominant influence on the UK market - closed above 3,000
for the first time. There is nevertheless a creeping doubt in the air,
chiefly to do with UK politics and the fact that the unemployment figure has
just topped 2m.
It is received wisdom that Tory standing in the opinion polls rises as the
mortgage rate falls. It is also arguable that if unemployment reaches a
certain absolute level - say, 2.5m - that relationship starts to break down.
It may be within the government's power to get interest rates down to 10 per
cent or so by the autumn. Unemployment will be stickier. Whereas the last
recession bottomed in the third quarter of 1981, unemployment did not peak
until 1985. The jobless total may still be rising when the government's term
runs out next summer - if it has not gone to the country before - whatever
happens to interest rates.
There is a respectable argument which says that ERM membership makes it
unimportant which party is in power. But aside from the fact that the ERM is
better at controlling monetary policy than government spending, the market
is bound to worry that a Labour government would effect a one-off
devaluation on gaining office. Next month's local elections are going to be
a tense time for the investment community.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22 Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4110</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Local group may build HK airport
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN ELLIOTT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A GROUP of Hong Kong's ethnic Chinese property companies is considering
mounting a HKDollars 60bn (Pounds 4.3bn) private-sector bid to build an
international airport in the colony.
The move would circumvent a diplomatic impasse between the UK and China over
the Hong Kong government's own HKDollars 100bn plans.
Mr Gordon Wu, a leading Hong Kong construction entrepreneur who controls
Hopewell Holdings - one of the group discussing the bid - will go to Peking
tomorrow at the invitation of senior Chinese government officials to discuss
the plan. He is expected to meet Mr Lu Ping, Peking's top official with
direct responsibility for Hong Kong affairs, who is at the centre of the
row.
Mr Wu prepared a HKDollars 25bn-HKDollars 30bn private sector plan in 1986
to build an airport with linked port facilities at the Chek Lap Kok site off
Lantau island. This was backed by Mr Li Ka-shing, one of the colony's top
entrepreneurs, who is believed to have been in touch with Mr Wu about the
latest plan. The government turned down the 1986 proposal but chose the same
site for its project.
The move comes when Hong Kong is considering shelving its plans because it
believes China wants an unacceptable control over the project. This could
set a precedent for other areas before China regains sovereignty over Hong
Kong in 1997.
China is concerned about the project's cost and wants to be able to
'examine' all borrowings. Hong Kong regards this as unduly restrictive. Hong
Kong has offered to limit borrowings to HKDollars 10bn and to ensure its
existing HKDollars 73bn fiscal reserves do not drop below HKDollars 25bn by
1997.
The government this week began a contingency plan for expanding the capacity
of the existing single-runway Kai Tak airport if the new plan is shelved.
Kai Tak is severely congested and is expected to reach saturation point in
1993-95. Options include shortening an overnight landing and take-off
curfew, giving preference to wide-bodied aircraft, and improving facilities.
This plan will be considered at an emergency meeting today of the colony's
executive council which is believed to be determined not to give way to
China's demands.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4111</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Interest rate falls aid new house sales: Builder says
recovery represents more than the normal seasonal pick-up
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR, Construction Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SALES of new houses in Britain have improved markedly since interest rates
began to fall in February, according to house builders yesterday.
Mr Nelson Oliver, managing director of Wimpey Homes, Britain's second
largest housebuilder, said its sales had risen by 10 per cent since the
beginning of January compared with the corresponding period last year. Much
of this improvement is thought to have occurred in the past six to eight
weeks.
Mr Ian Courts, managing director of Laing Homes, which built 2,000 homes
last year, said sales in the two weeks before the latest  1/2 percentage
point cut in interest rates, on April 12, had been the best in the past two
years.
Mr Courts said: 'The recovery is steady rather than spectacular but
represents more than the normal seasonal spring pick-up. Sales of retirement
homes, which have been one of the worst affected parts of the market, have
improved in particular.
'Our stock of second-hand homes, acquired as a result of part exchange
deals, reduced by a third last month.'
Since the beginning of February, bank rates have fallen two percentage
points to 12 per cent. In the same period, building society mortgage rates
have fallen from an average of 14.5 per cent to between 12.85 per cent and
12.95 per cent.
Housebuilders say the effect has been to prompt the beginning of a slow thaw
in the housing market rather than a rapid recovery which could fuel price
increases.
Most builders expect they will have to continue to offer some sales
incentives including mortgage subsidies and part exchange deals for a large
part of this year, in spite of the pick-up in sales.
Sir Clifford Chetwood, chairman of Wimpey, warned last month that any
improvement in margins was likely to come too late to make any material
difference this year to housebuilders' profits.
Builders, however, have been encouraged by the rise in the number of
'serious buyers' visiting show houses. Tarmac, Britain's biggest
housebuilder, which constructs between 11,000 and 12,000 homes a year, said:
'There are more genuine buyers around. There is definitely more confidence
and more sales are sticking than previously. A new village in north
Staffordshire started at the beginning of this year has so far sold
everything that has been available.'
Mr Steve Lidgate, deputy manager of Beazer Homes, building about 5,000 homes
a year, says: 'There has been a noticeable pick-up in sales during the last
two or three weeks, dating back to before Easter. This is the first time
this year we have seen reservations rise compared with 12 months ago.'
Mr Richard Mooney, chairman of Taylor Woodrow Homes, said: 'There has been
an increase in visitors to our housing sites, by up to 50 per cent in some
areas, since the start of this year. The level of sales in the last three
weeks has risen by about 25 per cent, although the market still re-mains
very depressed. We still need further reductions in in-terest rates to
restore confidence.'
Bovis Homes said it had just had its best five weeks for reservations since
1988.
Rate competition, Weekend IVChief executives of some building societies
received large pay rises in 1990 - one of the toughest years on record for
the UK mortgage market - and three of them saw their salaries pass the
Pounds 200,000 mark. Page 4
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4112</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / BA's free seats day benefits rivals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CHURCHILL and ANDREW JACK
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRITISH AIRWAYS' free seat bonanza next Tuesday
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
when passengers in the airline's 50,000 seats travel free - is giving a
boost to rival airlines which are attracting paying passengers unable to get
on to BA's flights.
Mr Richard Branson's Virgin Atlantic is one of the main beneficiaries of the
BA promotion: all its Upper Class seats on Tuesday have been sold and it is
over-booked by up to 30 per cent on some flights.
'We're delighted but not surprised,' said Mr Will Whitehorn of Virgin
yesterday. 'This is what happens when you take one entire major carrier out
for the day.'
Swissair said that all its business class seats to Switzerland on Tuesday
were booked. Normally it would be at only 60 per cent of capacity on a
mid-week flight. Swissair has responded to the extra demand by substituting
larger aircraft on some routes as well as allocating more seats for business
travellers.
BA's move has also benefited its new challengers on the lucrative North
American routes. American Airlines said bookings on flights to Miami and
Dallas on April 23 were 'very healthy' and back to the level of before the
Gulf war.
Cathay Pacific said bookings were higher than normal on Tuesday but that
space was still available.
Business travel agents said both business and leisure travellers should be
able to find flights on Tuesday to most destinations covered by British
Airways.
'There might be a few aggrieved BA frequent flyers who resent losing their
normal seats on Tuesday but I think they are very few,' said Mr Nigel
Robinson, managing director of Pickfords Business Travel.
BA is not worried about the temporary boost to bookings with rivals. The
airline's senior management is understood to be jubilant at the worldwide
publicity its promotion has gained, at a cost of Pounds 16m.
ILG meeting, Page 4
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4113</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World Stock Markets (America): Profit-taking predominant in
active trading
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
SHARE prices fell further from Wednesday's record highs as investors seized
the opportunity yesterday morning to realise profits earned during the
recent rally, writes Patrick Harverson in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down 33.67 at 2,965.59,
having spent all morning in negative territory. The broader indices were
also notably weaker, with the Standard &amp; Poor's 500 down 4.26 at 384.20, and
the Nasdaq composite of over the counter stocks down 5.46 at 501.16.
Turnover on the New York SE was 198m shares, and declining shares outpaced
rising shares by almost two to one, evidence of the weak underlying tone.
Analysts were not surprised by yesterday's declines, arguing that the market
was due for a correction following its impressive performance in the first
half of April. The dollar's strength, which hurts overseas earnings of many
US companies (especially blue-chips), also depressed sentiment. Selling
linked to expiration of stock index futures and options contracts added to
downward pressure on prices.
In a banking sector weakened by investors taking profits after recent gains,
American Express was the most heavily traded stock, falling Dollars 1 7/8 to
Dollars 27 5/8 on turnover of 2.6m shares. Late on Thursday the group
reported profits of 55 cents a share for the quarter, in line with analysts'
expectations and up from the big loss incurred a year earlier.
Citicorp was also well traded, easing Dollars  1/4 to Dollars 15 7/8 on
turnover of 2m shares. BankAmerica, another to report a recovery in first
quarter earnings this week, fell back Dollars  3/8 to Dollars 38 1/4 , while
Chase Manhattan dropped Dollars  5/8 to Dollars 19 3/8 .
Kellogg rose Dollars 2 early on but fell back to end unchanged at Dollars 95
1/2 after the company announced profits of Dollars 1.35 a share for its
latest quarter, against the 79 cents a share earned at the same stage in
1990. The figures were above market expectations.
Colgate-Palmolive fell Dollars 2 to Dollars 82 5/8 in spite of reporting
record first quarter sales and earnings. The 12 per cent increase in first
quarter net income to Dollars 91.3m came as no surprise, and like many other
leading stocks Colgate fell back on profit-taking.
Shares in 3M, formerly Minnesota Mining and Manufacturing, eased Dollars 1
to Dollars 87 3/4 in the wake of the company's first decline in quarterly
earnings for seven years. Although 3M said it expected an improvement in the
second half of 1991, it could not guarantee earnings growth over the period.
IGI rose Dollars 1 to Dollars 11 7/8 on the American Stock Exchange on
positive reaction to the meetings for investors held recently in New York by
the biotechnology/healthcare company.
Canada
TORONTO share prices declined on a broad front in moderate trading,
registering the largest one-day decline in about six months. The TSE 300
composite finished the session off 37.96 to 3495.97, down about 14 points
over the week.
Declines were far ahead of gainers, by 355 to 235, and volume of 31,065,000
shares was below the previous day's 35,406,000 shares.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4114</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Letter: Government neglects health service at its own risk
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Dr JP LEE-POTTER.
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Public concern about the National Health Service is as high today as it
has ever been. Joe Rogaly ('The Tory tranquilliser', April 16) is not right
to say that 'worry about the NHS has steadily if gently declined'.
Only this week two polls have shown that health remains a big political
issue. A Mori poll in The Times on April 15 puts the health service in third
place behind the poll tax and unemployment in a list of public concerns. And
a Daily Express poll the following day, surveying voters in three
'barometer' constituencies, says that voters put health at the top of their
list of priorities for the government and that the majority felt the
government had harmed the NHS rather than helped it.
When this is put alongside the evidence that health was a key issue in the
recent Ribble Valley and Eastbourne by-elections, it becomes clear that the
NHS remains an important electoral concern among voters - one which the
government neglects at its peril.
Recent changes to the NHS are doing nothing to solve the problems facing
patients, due to years of chronic underfunding. Creating a new bureaucracy
to build up an internal health market will prove, I fear, to be an expensive
and unnecessary upheaval.
Jeremy P. Lee-Potter,
British Medical Association,
BMA House,
Tavistock Square, WC1
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4115</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Letter: Meters a sound aid to water conservation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr DAA FAGANDINI.
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, It might be worth mentioning, in respect of your editorial ('A setback
for water metering', April 12), that the metering option has been available
in this district of south London for many years. We installed a meter at our
Dulwich home in 1982 at an up-front cost of Pounds 60. The standard
assumption by Thames Water at the time was that a house such as ours -
detached and with four bedrooms, would consume 1 cu metre daily. A poundage
was set accordingly as soon as water became a charge separate from the
rates.
Our family has used 0.66 cu metre daily on average over these years and more
recently, 0.58 cu metre. Although costs of water and sewerage have climbed
remorselessly, we know that we have recovered the meter installation cost
many times over while also contributing to water conservation.
Installation as well as official meter reading costs will have also
increased dramatically to the point of probably justifying the assessments
reported today. But why have the reasons have been so strongly emphasised
when the option to request a metered charge is buried in the fine print?
Even if Mr Karl Otto Pohl, president of the German Bundesbank, does curb our
inflationary tendencies, a meter must be a sound investment, even if not
blindingly obvious in cash flow terms. Why then, has Thames Water et al not
highlighted the domestic meter option? Too many meters might negatively
affect their own cash flow projections and reduced water consumption could
imperil the dream-like capital investment programmes needed to bring real
'Highland Water' into London. True, but neither would be a sound reason for
not encouraging water conservation wherever that is feasible.
DAA Fagandini,
6, Alleyn Park,
Dulwich, SE21
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4116</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / West takes up the burden: The implications of the aid effort
being conducted on behalf of the Kurds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EDWARD MORTIMER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Announcing his decision to send US troops into northern Iraq last Tuesday,
President George Bush insisted that this was a 'purely humanitarian'
intervention. There was no question, he added, of encouraging the creation
of an independent Kurdistan. Nor, said his spokesman Mr Marlin Fitzwater,
would US forces be 'involved as combatants in the civil war or anything in
that sense'. Rather, they would 'move in and out for short periods of time,
hours, to help with camps or moving people around, or food, water, those
kind of things'.
Thus did the US administration struggle to reconcile its response to the
Kurdish tragedy with its previous, constantly reiterated pledges of respect
for Iraqi sovereignty, non-intervention in Iraq's internal affairs, and
determination to 'bring the boys home' rather than risk an open-ended,
Vietnam-style commitment.
President Francois Mitterrand has been more lucid, or perhaps more candid,
about the implications of what the west is doing in Iraq. Congratulating
himself on France's success in obtaining the passage of UN Security Council
Resolution 688 he said last week: 'For the first time, non-interference has
stopped at the point where it was becoming failure to assist a people in
danger.'
Hitherto national governments have behaved as if they were members of a
trade union (called the UN), whose rules required them to take no notice of
each other's behaviour unless one member directly attacked another. Now it
turns out that there is a limit, so far ill defined, beyond which a
government cannot go without forfeiting its right to benefit from that rule.
Ironically enough it is France, in the past one of the strongest upholders
of the notion of national sovereignty, that has taken the lead in
articulating this new doctrine; whereas the US, which in its own
neighbourhood (Grenada, Panama etc) has often been ready to grant itself
exemption from the old rule, has been most reluctant to break it in the
Middle East, and even now is trying to pretend that it has not been broken.
The reason is obvious enough. When dealing with small countries in the
western hemisphere the US is confident that it can keep matters under
control. The Middle East is a different matter. It is so much further away,
culturally as well as geographically, that few US policy-makers believe they
can seriously hope to control events in that region. Those who did so
imagine received a painful lesson in Lebanon in the early 1980s.
The marines went into Beirut in 1982, on what was seen as a short, simple
humanitarian mission: first to supervise the departure of the PLO fighters,
then (after the Sabra-Chatila massacre) to protect Palestinian civilians.
Yet somehow it seemed impossible to do that without restoring peace and
order in the country under the authority of the 'legitimate' government. By
the time they had finished trying to do that they had lost 241 US servicemen
to a suicide bomber, soon after which they ignominiously withdrew, leaving
behind them an even less safe, and much more anti-western, country than they
had found.
The odd thing is that France also took part in that Lebanese fiasco, and
lost 58 paratroopers to another suicide bomber on that same morning in
October 1983. But France is also closer to the Middle East, historically as
well as geographically. For France it is not simply a region you can bomb
and walk away from. It is inhabited by peoples, some of which are in danger.
How many people make 'a people'? That is just one of many questions to which
the new doctrine will require an answer. It does not have one yet. But
'failure to assist a person in danger' is an offence in French law. Mr
Bernard Kouchner, founder of the charity Medecins Sans Frontieres and now
minister for humanitarian affairs, has extended this concept into
international law and persuaded President Mitterrand to adopt it - helped by
the president's wife Danielle, who has publicly befriended oppressed peoples
in general and the Kurds in particular. Mr Kouchner has even spoken of a
'duty to interfere'.
How far will interference go? Western officials admit they do not know.
'This whole business has been incremental,' a British diplomat said
yesterday. 'What looks impossible one week becomes possible the next.'
Clearly it makes no sense for the US to pretend its troops are in Iraq
simply to provide transport and supplies.
The key issue is security. Kurds will not go down into the new camps unless
they feel safe there. They will not feel safe there unless they are
confident that the camps are outside the control of the Iraqi government.
And if they are outside the control of the Iraqi government one can be quite
sure that they will be under the control of the two main Kurdish political
parties - the Kurdistan Democratic Party and the Patriotic Union of
Kurdistan.
So there will be an area of Iraq, populated at least by some hundreds of
thousands of people, in which the writ of the Baghdad government will not
run and the writ of Kurdish political parties will run. It is going to look
very like the embryo of that independent Kurdistan which Mr Bush says he is
determined not to encourage.
It is bitterly ironic, because the Iraqi Kurds were never asking for that.
When they were fighting for a democratic Iraq alongside other Iraqis, and
with some apparent chance of success, the US refused to intervene. Now,
thousands of deaths and over two million refugees later, it is in the
process of carving them out a de facto separate state. It has even drawn
them a frontier, the 36th parallel - an entirely arbitrary line which awards
them the Arab city of Mosul, yet denies them the whole southern Kurdish
region round Sulaimaniya.
No one in any western capital is suggesting that this should be a permanent
solution. It is being improvised, partly in response to western guilt
feelings, about a tragedy that is not only horribly visible on television
but also manifestly a by-product of the western victory in the Gulf war; and
partly in response to urgent pleas and warnings from Turkey, which could not
handle the refugee problem on its own soil and was hinting that it might
intervene militarily on its own if others did not come to its rescue.
Now Iran, which faces an even larger refugee problem and is even less well
equipped to cope with it, is uttering similar pleas and hints. Iran also
points out, quite correctly, that the humanitarian problem of the Shia in
southern Iraq is every bit as bad as that of the Kurds in the north.
The truth is that when you are dealing with a regime like that of Saddam
Hussein the distinction between 'humanitarian' and 'political' becomes
untenable. There is no solution to Iraq's humanitarian problems while that
regime remains in power. Its record is such that, even if it tries to
introduce genuine reforms, no Iraqi will trust it.
The west is in danger of being landed with a permanent Kurdish protectorate,
while the rest of Iraq is being left to Saddam Hussein's mercy. The only
hope is that the presence of western forces in the north will put some
pressure on him to respect the UN's mandate (under Resolution 688) to
protect Iraqi civilians throughout the country, and that the loss of Iraqi
sovereignty will provide an additional motive for the army officers on whom
his power depends to get rid of him.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7 Photograph Kurds surround a US helicopter to get supplies at a
Turkish refugee camp (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4117</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / The main attraction: Birmingham's new convention centre
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL CHEESERIGHT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
This week the UK's second city felt that, for once, it was first. The
plaudits for the purity of sound at the inaugural concert in Birmingham's
new Symphony Hall, part of the brand new and publicly-owned Pounds 160m
International Convention Centre, engendered the feeling that here is a city
on the move, that possibly it might be the international metropolis claimed
by the publicity hype.
The glitter of celebration may turn to gold in the shape of a virile
services sector shaped around such grand civic projects, as the city council
intends. But the transformation will take a long time.
Decades of development have not permitted the escape from what JB Priestley
nearly 60 years ago called 'the sad dingy muddle of factories and
dormitories that have been allowed to pass for cities in this island'. The
city centre, wounded during the Second World War, was torn apart afterwards
and re-built. The result was, as an official history gently puts it, 'for
many people an efficiently functional city centre in which design and
environmental aspects took a lower priority'. The time of obvious city
wealth when Birmingham workers enjoyed earnings higher than the national
average slipped away a generation ago. The 'city of a thousand trades' found
that traditional skills were not enough.
Hence the desire to widen the city economy, to make it less vulnerable to
the erratic swings of manufacturing fortune. This has been local and
regional policy for 20 years, pursued with varying degrees of energy. But
the future has never been left to the private sector alone. To a degree
unusual among British local authorities, the Birmingham City Council has
been aggressive, interventionist.
The Convention Centre and the adjacent Pounds 51m National Indoor Arena,
still under construction, are monuments to such energy. The
Labour-controlled council, led by Sir Richard Knowles, a wily cigar-smoking
veteran of the party's pragmatic, non-ideological tradition, has managed to
uphold a tradition of independence in the face of central government attacks
on the structure of local government.
The council is just behaving as Birmingham councils have for the last 130
years. There is a resolve to fend off control from London while accepting
any benefits London may provide. There has been since Joseph Chamberlain, a
Liberal, was mayor in the 1860s and swung the council, by means of an
efficient political machine, to a policy of economic intervention. Sir
Richard wears Chamberlain's mantle.
The Conservatives grasped the need for a more diversified local economy.
They took the first steps towards the building of both the National
Exhibition Centre when they controlled the council in the 1970s, and the
International Convention Centre in the early 1980s. Labour, which has been
in power now for seven years, followed through. Both share the culture of
municipal independence, a bi-partisan approach to the big development issues
that gives priority to civic loyalty over politics.
This is not to suggest there is no party political bickering in the run-up
to the May 2 local elections. Sir Richard dismisses Reg Hales, the
Conservative leader, as 'a small town politician from Sutton Coldfield'. For
his part, Mr Hales talks of Labour as having 'the priorities of the
madhouse' with a 137 per cent increase in council spending over the last
seven years and a low rate, as revealed in a local poll, of customer
satisfaction.
But Birmingham's independent tradition, and the common ground between its
politicians, did help it to fend off Whitehall during the Thatcher years -
to keep, for example, its full planning powers by refusing a government plan
to establish an urban development corporation.
'We did it by using our brains and not our mouths as is so common in the
Labour party,' says Sir Richard. 'We took a decision in our own pragmatic
way not to defy the government, like some London boroughs and Liverpool, but
to attract industry back to Birmingham, to build on the back of the National
Exhibition Centre'. He cites the building of the International Convention
Centre, the arrival of the Birmingham Royal Ballet and the D'Oyly Carte
Opera.
The National Exhibition Centre, to the south of the city, is the biggest
facility for trade fairs in the UK, and has consistently been in profit
since the early 1980s. In 1989-90, after meeting all its debt charges, it
contributed Pounds 7.5m to the city council's general rate fund.
There are no such hopes for the International Convention Centre: while
eventually it may make an operating profit the city council will be left
with about Pounds 120m of debt to service. Its economic rationale is that it
will attract business to the city. Investment is taking place.
Private-sector proposals would add 2,600 extra beds to the city's hotels -
there are about 30,000 at the moment. And in the wider context of
Birmingham's development, the city council claims that more than Pounds 2bn
of investment is either planned or being spent on offices and other
commercial development.
Privately, Mr Michael Heseltine, the environment secretary, has told
Birmingham leaders that the city council is not a government target for
wing-clipping. Despite the rise in spending and petty scandal, the council
has not been community charge-capped. It is evidently deemed a responsible
body. One reason for this is that it represents the practical rather than
the ideological side of the Labour party; it has the self-confidence, like
Glasgow, to deal with the private sector as a partner in development.
Now the days of the grand civic project are over. There will be no more
developments on the scale of the International Convention Centre. Not, at
any rate, until local government financing rules are changed. Gradually,
central government constraints on local authority borrowing have tightened
to the point that the financial flexibility enjoyed by a succession of
Birmingham leaders has been eliminated. Local politics will be more humdrum
in the future.
This will be welcome to those who have had reservations about the financial
demands of the International Convention Centre. Some Labour councillors
resigned on the issue, believing that the spending priorities in a city of
manifold social problems were misplaced. Community groups have contrasted
the Centre investment with their diminished funding.
In Small Heath, one of Birmingham's most deprived wards, Mrs Janet Titchen,
centre development officer for the Birmingham Community Association, accepts
that the Centre would be 'nice for Birmingham' but observes 'it will never
benefit the people I'm working for'.
'Money is going into building the inner city, but it is not aimed at the
people in it,' she says.
This is the underside of the glitter. The city which in 1885 could blazon
above its new art gallery 'by the gains of industry we promote art' and
which in 1991 triumphantly presents Mr Simon Rattle and the City of
Birmingham Symphony Orchestra with a new home is still hard, uncompromising.
Especially in a recession.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4118</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Letter: Labour needs to clarify nuclear policy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr CHRISTOPHER PATTEN MP.
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, Philip Stephens (Political Notebook, April 18) is not alone in
mistakenly believing that Mr Neil Kinnock, the Labour leader, gave a 'pledge
to keep an independent nuclear deterrent as long as the Soviet Union
maintains a nuclear arsenal' - but that is precisely the commitment which he
has always failed to give.
What he actually said at Tuesday's press conference was that Labour 'has at
no stage . . . made a commitment to get rid of all nuclear weapons for as
long as others have them' - a point reiterated by Mr Gerald Kaufman, shadow
foreign secretary, who added that 'Labour's defence policy remains as set
out in detail' in the policy review statement 'Meet the Challenge, Make
Change'.
Of course Labour has not given a commitment to scrap the deterrent while
others keep nuclear weapons. The point is that Labour persistently refuses
to give any commitment to keep our nuclear weapons as long as other
countries also maintain them.
Labour's policy review statement to which Mr Kaufman referred categorically
states: 'Labour will immediately seek to place all Britain's nuclear
capability - including Polaris, and as much of Trident as has been completed
 -into international nuclear disarmament negotiation . . . Our aim is to
bring about the elimination of that capability.'
Not one word is said about doing so only if the other countries eliminate
their entire nuclear arsenals.
I have challenged Mr Kaufman to clear up this matter once and for all by
stating that a Labour government would keep a British nuclear deterrent for
as long as the Soviet Union or other countries have nuclear weapons. Until
this commitment is given, Labour policy remains one of unilateral nuclear
disarmament.
Christopher Patten.
chairman, Conservative party,
Conservative Central Office,
32 Smith Square,
Westminster,
London SW1
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4119</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / London market's pause for thought: The Stock Exchange is
consolidating its first-quarter gains
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
This week the London stock market appeared to take a breather. As measured
by the FT-SE 100 index it just failed to emulate the record-setting form of
Wall Street's Dow Jones Average, which closed above the 3,000 resistance
level on Wednesday.
In April the UK stock market has been consolidating its sparkling
first-quarter gains. When the Footsie recorded its all-time closing high of
2,545.3 on April 5 it was showing an improvement of some 19 per cent since
the turn of the year.
Stockbrokers have celebrated the strong leap in turnover. In recent weeks
the London market has often been trading 500m or 600m shares daily, whereas
last autumn 400m represented a good day. Brokers sense a sea-change: 'This
is business as usual, whereas the past couple of years have been quite
abnormal,' says Mr Bill Smith, head of UK equity research at Barclays de
Zoete Wedd.
Interestingly, however, the broadest measure of the London equity market,
the FT-Actuaries All-Share Index with currently 666 constituents, has failed
narrowly so far to breach its old high of July 1987. It was within 0.7 per
cent of that peak on Wednesday, but as much as 24 per cent short if you
allow for inflation since 1987.
These inflation-adjusted figures put the share price surge into some
perspective, and they serve to moderate the impression that the stock market
is booming in the middle of the worst recession in a decade. Indeed, the
statistics of the economic setback this week appeared to give investors
pause for thought: the lure of lower interest rates is no longer enough to
overcome the fears of damage to companies.
Moreover the rise in share prices in recent months has attracted a big
flurry of new share issues. On Tuesday, for example, Hanson launched a
Pounds 500m convertible bond issue and there have been several other
sizeable offerings during the week. Already in mid-April the total of rights
issues is approaching the Pounds 3.4bn recorded for the whole of 1990. In
addition there has been a Pounds 1bn-plus wave of placings by companies of
share stakes as they attempt to turn strategic holdings and bid platforms
into cash.
Rising share prices have only a partial domestic explanation. Above all, the
strength of the UK equity market this year has been part of an international
phenomenon, founded upon Wall Street. It has not been the recovery hopes of
British investors that have been paramount, but rather those of American
share buyers.
From a global point of view the UK market in fact turned in only a slightly
above-average performance in the first quarter, on the basis of the
FT-Actuaries World Index series expressed in local currencies. With a 15.4
per cent capital gain up to March 31 the UK was behind France but a little
ahead of the 14.1 per cent of the US and the 13 per cent of Japan.
If you allow for the relative strength of the dollar and the yen, the UK
slips down the league table: in sterling terms Wall Street scored a 26 per
cent gain and Tokyo was up 20 per cent in the three months.
The US is some way ahead of Britain in its economic cycle. Interest rates
have been falling there for much longer, and have fallen much lower. Hopes
of an early economic recovery are therefore more realistic, although it has
to be said that the ratings of US stocks have become ambitious.
In the UK the year opened with British shares fairly cheap by international
standards, but with investors badly worried by the imminent Gulf war and by
the domestic economic problems. At the same time, British investment
institutions were becoming nervous that their high levels of liquidity might
leave them vulnerable should the market turn up. At the end of 1990 pension
fund portfolios were liquid to the extent of 7 or 8 per cent, the highest
level for years. Altogether the long-term institutions had about Pounds 35bn
sitting on the sidelines.
The scene was therefore set for the triggering of an institutional buying
panic. As the allies stormed through the desert, and Wall Street rocketed,
the London stock market followed suit. Share prices rose 11 per cent in
February alone, and successive cuts in sterling interest rates served to add
fuel to the fire.
Moreover, although some of the worst fears about the state of the British
economy have been realised, with output taking a dive, the news from the
company sector has been dreary rather than disastrous. Savage dividend cuts
have been few and far between, and it begins to look as though average
dividend growth may be no worse than 5 per cent for 1991 as a whole,
compared with the zero that the pessimists were anticipating a few months
ago. True, profits will be down, but if investors are minded to think in
terms of recovery they will not be particularly concerned with the level of
earnings per share at the bottom of a cyclical trough.
Private investors have jumped on to the bandwagon. 'A few weeks ago there
was fierce activity,' says Mr David Jones, chief executive of Sharelink, a
leading private client brokerage. 'Our investors were acting in unison with
the market as a whole.' But this private client business has apparently
slackened off recently.
Unit trust sales have also responded strongly to the market's upturn. Net
investment of Pounds 826m in February was bigger than anything that had been
seen in a single month since before the October 1987 crash. But unit trusts
are bought by life insurance companies as well as private investors, so it
is difficult to be sure about the level of direct participation by small
investors.
'It would be a mistake to think there has been a bonanza,' says Mr Tim
Miller, marketing director of M &amp; G. 'It takes a very long time for people
who have been burned by a collapse like that in 1987 to regain their
confidence.' M&amp;G's sales of personal equity plans were down in 1990-91,
despite a late boost from the market's rally, and that seems to be typical
around the industry.
The change of mood in the stock market has extended to the small company
sector, which had such a bad time last year when there was a swing to big,
safe stocks. The Hoare Govett Smaller Companies Index underperformed the
FT-SE 100 by as much as 15 per cent in 1990, and January this year extended
the same trend. In February, however, investors began to move back into this
illiquid sector, and small company stocks suddenly became scarce: they
outperformed the Footsie by 5 per cent or more in February and March.
Meanwhile the leading stocks have begun to mark time, and the equity market
strategists are preparing for a continuing wave of issues which could reach
Pounds 10bn for the year. According to Mr Smith, pension fund liquidity is
back to 5 per cent, which is within its normal range.
Hazards for later in the year could include further profits disappointments
if the economic recovery proves slow to materialise, and possible election
scares. But in general the City experts believe there will be at least one
more leg to the bull market within the next 18 months or so; all the same,
London may continue to look to Wall Street for leadership.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6 Illustration (Omitted). Graph (Omitted). Table (Omitted).
Chart (Omitted). Chart (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4120</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Leading Article: The new consensus
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE COINCIDENCE of the publication of the Labour party's new manifesto with
the elevation of Sir Terence Burns to permanent secretary in the Treasury
and the largest ever monthly increase in UK unemployment says much about the
current consensus in British macroeconomic policy. As the government's chief
economic adviser Sir Terence has done as much as any man to form the views
that the Labour party now accepts and the monthly jump of 113,000 in
unemployment reflects.
The economic policy establishment has, in the Labour party's words, embraced
the aim of 'getting interest and inflation rates down to German and French
levels and keeping them down'. It has also embraced the means, sterling's
participation in the ERM. The UK is, by implication, committed to accepting
whatever level of unemployment is required to push not the headline rate of
inflation, but the underlying rate, down to some 2-3 per cent a year.
It was not always thus. In 1979-81, when the government was trying to follow
targets for broad money, Sir Terence was intellectually beleaguered. In
March 1981, the notorious letter from 364 university economists asserted
inter alia that 'present policies will deepen the depression, erode the
industrial base of our economy and threaten its social and political
stability'.
At the time unemployment was 2m, not very different from today's 2.1m and
the economy was, as now, in deep recession. Yet this time no howls of
complaint come from the universities. In a remarkable reversal of roles,
protests come not from 364 Keynesians, but from six monetarists - including
Sir Alan Walters, Mrs Thatcher's former economic adviser - in another
celebrated letter, that to The Times on February 13 this year.
Should one conclude that British economists do not care about recessions, so
long as they are brought about in the approved way? Did the 364 economists
merely think monetarism intellectually contemptible and the six judge the
ERM despicable, while neither side cares about what is happening to the
economy?
Converging views
One should not be quite so cynical. Views have not only changed, but
converged. Far more British economists would now accept that macroeconomic
policy cannot target real activity. On this, the Treasury has largely won
the debate. For its part, the Treasury - but not all the erstwhile
monetarists - has abandoned its faith in monetary control and embraced once
more that long-standing object of British affection, an
exchange-rate-oriented monetary regime.
The Treasury is, to be sure, always right at the time. But it is not always
right in retrospect. Its attempt to stick to broad money targeting in the
early 1980s led to the deepest recession since the Great Depression. The
Treasury's abandonment of such targeting in favour of the exchange rate has
led, in the end, to what is likely to be the second deepest recession since
the Great Depression.
Stagflationary swamp
One can only hope that this time the Treasury knows what it is doing. If it
does and governments persist, it offers salvation. But first it offers
blood, sweat, toil and tears. With producer price inflation at 6.3 per cent
for the third month in a row, underlying earnings up 9 1/4 per cent over the
year to February, unemployment rising at an annual rate of a million over
the past quarter and manufacturing output down 4.6 per cent between the
latest quarter and the same quarter of a year ago, the UK is deep in the
stagflationary swamp.
The new consensus says this is inescapable. It also says that growth is to
come from microeconomic adjustment. Unfortunately, here there is ground for
pessimism, since the key market is, as always, the UK's most sclerotic, that
for labour.
Notwithstanding all the reforms of the Thatcher era, a rise in unemployment
of almost half a million has so far lowered the underlying rate of inflation
of earnings by a mere percentage point. The price of attaining inflation at
German levels may be rates of unemployment stuck, as in France and Italy, at
10 per cent or still more for years. This is depressing enough. Still more
depressing is the Labour party's suggested response: a minimum wage,
ultimately of two-thirds of the median male hourly rate.
Fortunately, not all the Labour party's ideas are this indefensible. If the
UK is to make a success of its new consensus on economic policy, it does
need some sort of National Economic Assessment. But the best way would, once
more, be the German one: via outside economic advice from well-financed
economic research institutes. Then the twists and turns of Treasury policy
would be subject to the external critique that they patently need, and the
next change in policy might, for once, not be a lurch, but something rather
smoother.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4121</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Dan-Air buys ex-Air Europe jet
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PAUL BETTS, Aerospace Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DAN-AIR, the Gatwick-based carrier owned by Davies &amp; Newman Holdings, has
acquired one of the former Air Europe Boeing 737-400 aircraft to provide
additional capacity for its expanding airline and charter business.
Dan-Air has been one of the main beneficiaries of the collapse of
International Leisure Group and Air Europe.
In a newsletter to shareholders Mr David James, the Davies &amp; Newman
chairman, said that the new management's target was to establish Dan-Air 'as
an independent, stand-alone airline'.
Mr James had earlier indicated that the company was considering the
possibility of either selling or merging Dan-Air with another group. But
Dan-Air now appears increasingly confident that it can develop and expand on
its own.
Mr James said he believed the company could achieve this with its available
resources. But he confirmed the group was considering a new capital funding
to give Dan-Air greater strength for the future. The company is understood
to be seeking about Pounds 30m.
Dan-Air has applied to the Civil Aviation Authority for several new European
routes, including many previously operated by Air Europe. That is part of
its strategy of becoming the leading short-haul European scheduled airline
operator based at Gatwick.
Although the collapse of Air Europe had given Dan-Air the opportunity to
grow by expanding its European route network, Mr James warned that the loss
of Air Europe had revived the argument over how much competition is a help
or hindrance to the health of the aviation industry in general.
Mr James said that while he favoured competition, he was opposed to
'destructive competition which effectively prevents any one company
achieving financial stability'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4122</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Hurd and Waldegrave lead defence of Major
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVOR OWEN, Parliamentary Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR DOUGLAS HURD, foreign secretary, yesterday led an attempt by senior
ministers to shrug off criticism of Mr John Major, the prime minister, from
within the Conservative party and from people associated with Mrs Margaret
Thatcher, his predecessor.
Mr William Waldegrave, health secretary, and Mr Tristan Garel-Jones, EC
affairs minister, joined a concerted attempt to underline the strengths and
electoral appeal of the prime minister.
In a phrase couched in terms to emphasise the improved atmosphere Mr Major
has created in the cabinet room, the foreign secretary highlighted 'the
style of firm, reasonable leadership now established in Downing Street'.
The chorus of praise which Mr Major received from his ministerial colleagues
came as Labour leaders renewed their attack on the continuing 'dithering'
and confusion over the government's plans for replacing the poll tax.
Mr Hurd likened the events which led to the departure of Mrs Thatcher from
Downing Street last November to an earthquake. He compared the criticism of
Mr Major to 'small tremors of after-shock'.
Mr Hurd told a Conservative supper club at Brize Norton, Oxfordshire, that
the tremors had been 'over-recorded' in the press. He insisted that 'I do
not believe they are of the least significance in the minds of the
electorate'.
Mr Hurd scornfully dismissed the attacks made on Mr Major by Mr Patrick
Robertson, the 22-year-old secretary of the Bruges group, an anti-federalist
body, and Sir Alan Walters, former economic adviser to Mrs Thatcher.
The foreign secretary doubted whether anyone would 'seriously believe that
the opinions of either would, or should, weigh even slightly in the balance
of judgment at an election'.
Giving examples of what he called Mr Major's firm and reasonable leadership
he cited sterling's entry into the exchange rate mechanism of the European
Monetary System, the proposal for creating 'safe havens' for the Kurds in
northern Iraq, and the handling of the poll tax.
Meanwhile, Mr Bryan Gould, shadow environment secretary, renewed Labour's
charge that Mr Major lacked flair and decisiveness. Forecasting that the new
local tax to be unveiled next week would be 'a dog's breakfast', he
suggested that Mr Major's inability to exert his authority meant that it was
'the product of a committee without a chair'.
Mr Gould warned that the new local tax would be a 'yuppies' charter' if it
was based on the replacement value rather than the capital value of
property.
It could mean that a single millionaire working in the City and with a
luxury penthouse flat in Mayfair would pay much less than a large
poverty-stricken family struggling to survive in a rundown area.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4123</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAELFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Chemicals jobs boost
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MTM, ONE of the UK's fastest-growing chemical companies, yesterday announced
plans to double investment at its recently opened plant at Teesport,
Cleveland, to Pounds 100m, with the creation of 400 jobs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4124</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Tory attacks new tax
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT'S successor to the community charge was branded a 'Sloane
Rangers Aid Bill' by a Tory MP last night. Mr Derek Conway, MP for
Shrewsbury, said: 'Under the Cabinet's latest proposal, a two-bedroomed flat
in Sloane Square, London. . . will be classed as the same as a two-bedroomed
flat in a terrace in the Midlands or North.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4125</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Coal chief confident
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR NEIL CLARKE, British Coal's chairman, told mining unions yesterday that
improved productivity and cost control meant the company could be confident
about its future. NUM leader Mr Arthur Scargill was less optimistic. He said
up to 30,000 jobs and 35 pits were at risk if contracts to supply
electricity generators were not agreed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4126</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Electricity unions warn of action
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DIANE SUMMERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ELECTRICITY supply unions warned last night that an overtime ban would start
next week if employers failed to increase an 8 per cent pay offer at talks
on Tuesday, writes Diane Summers.
The five unions involved, covering 70,000 power workers, have already
balloted in favour of an all-out strike if negotiations and action short of
a strike fail to win an improved offer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4127</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Some ILG creditors to receive 2p in Pounds
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CHURCHILL, Leisure Industries Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
UNSECURED CREDITORS of ILG Travel, which went into receivership last month,
can expect repayment of only 2p in the pound when the company is wound up.
The company is a subsidiary of the International Leisure Group which is also
in receivership.
The creditors, who range from Spanish hoteliers to jobbing printers, were
told the news at a meeting in London yesterday by KPMG Peat Marwick
McLintock, the administrators.
Mr Tim Hayward, who held the meeting with fellow administrator Mr Bill
Ratford, said: 'The picture is bleak, and it will be a considerable time
before any dividend can be paid.'
Mr Harry Goodman, ILG's chairman at the time of the collapse was not at
yesterday's meeting, and his whereabouts are uncertain.
The administrators, who are still sorting out ILG's finances some six weeks
after the collapse, believe that liabilities could amount to more than
Pounds 400m.
Assets are unlikely to realise more than Pounds 10m, they said.
Yesterday's creditors' meeting was for ILG Travel, the main holiday
subsidiary of the ILG group which traded under names such as Intasun and
Club 18-30.
Air Europe, the charter and scheduled airline service operated by ILG, is
also in receivership, but the administrators are still hoping to find a
buyer for the airline or some of its assets.
They have already sold ILG's interests in its Italian, German and Spanish
airline affiliates.
ILG's holding company, Hudson Place Investments, is also in receivership,
and further creditors' meetings will be held shortly.
Some 1,550 staff in the travel companies and 1,970 airline staff have lost
their jobs since the collapse. A further 250 staff are helping the
administrators.
The administrators have already sold some of the ILG Travel assets,
including the Club 18-30 brand name.
However, under the rules of the Association of British Travel Agents the new
owners cannot yet call their company by this name. Instead they have
launched a holiday company called The Club which will target the same
market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4 Photograph Bleak prospect ahead for creditors, Tim Hayward
(left) and Bill Ratford of KPMG (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4128</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Plea for longer period of formal education
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CALLS for a longer period of formal education, with everyone achieving
A-levels or their vocational equivalent, are made in two reports to be
published next week, writes Andrew Adonis.
Sir Christopher Ball, president of the Association of Colleges of Further
Education, says in a paper for the Royal Society of Arts that the 'vicious
circle' of low investment, low productivity, low skills and poverty of
aspiration will be broken only when all teenagers continue in formal
education or training until at least the age of 18.
He proposes a uniform structure of post-16 qualifications based on modular
courses, with a range of vocational options, to replace A-levels.
The creation of a department of education and training, with a single
council for 14 to 18-year-olds' qualifications to replace the hotch-potch of
curriculum and accreditation institutions, is proposed by Mr Stuart Maclure,
in a report for the Policy Studies Institute.
Learning Pays, Royal Society of Arts, 8 John Adam Street, London WC2N 6EZ;
Missing Links, PSI, 100 Park Village East, London NW1 3SR.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4129</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Comet wins judgment against BSkyB
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COMET, Kingfisher Group's electrical retailer, yesterday won a summary
judgment against British Sky Broadcasting for breach of contract over last
year's merger of BSB and Sky Television.
Mr Justice Phillips found in the High Court that a contract Comet had signed
with British Satellite Broadcasting in March 1990 could be carried out only
if BSB continued to run a satellite television service in competition with
Mr Rupert Murdoch's Sky Television until the beginning of February 1991, the
period covered by the contract.
BSB and Sky merged at the beginning of November 1990.
Mr Justice Phillips said yesterday: 'The inference is overwhelming that BSB
would continue to play their part in the joint venture of promoting the DBS
(direct broadcast from the Marco Polo satellite) system at least until the
end of this period.'
The court awarded Comet an interim payment of Pounds 185,000, with the
remainder of the claim to be assessed at a future hearing. Comet is claiming
about Pounds 10m in damages.
Mr Nigel Whittaker, deputy chairman of Kingfisher, said: 'The verdict
vindicates the strong stance we have taken.' Mr Gary Davey, deputy managing
director of BSkyB - in which Pearson, publisher of the Financial Times has a
significant stake - said the satellite company would appeal against the
judgment.
Under the contract with BSB, Comet said it would order a minimum of 50,000
satellite receivers before February 2 1991 and would schedule a further
50,000 for later delivery, with BSB meeting some of the interest costs. The
plans also included a joint promotional campaign. Comet said it received a
letter on November 6 last year from the newly-merged company instructing it
'to suspend all further sales of BSB reception equipment and installations
and all BSB promotions in store.'
Mr Justice Phillips said the actions taken by BSkyB on November 6 'could not
have been more directly hostile to the contractual adventure'.
The judge said he simply had to decide whether there was an implied
obligation to continue running the service and that it persisted until the
breach of the contract. 'I find that it did,' he said.
Lawyers for BSkyB argued there was no express commitment to keep running a
service, and this could not be implied.
Dixons, the electrical retailer, has also been considering suing BSkyB. The
company will now review its position following the Comet judgment, but it is
thought unlikely to issue writs over its losses on the venture.
All the manufacturers of BSB receiving equipment have issued writs against
BSkyB claiming damages.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4130</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Building society chiefs' pay enters a super-league
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BUILDING society bosses have discovered the world of serious money.
Mr Andrew Longhurst, chief executive of Cheltenham &amp; Gloucester, saw his
earnings jump by 48 per cent in 1990 to Pounds 265,079. That kept him at the
top of the earnings league for building society chief executives, and almost
within spitting distance of investment bankers, who are the financial
world's biggest earners.
The earnings of two other society chief executives moved above Pounds
200,000 last year - one of the toughest on record for the UK mortgage
market.
Mr David O'Brien of National &amp; Provincial was paid Pounds 205,000, having
taken over as chief executive of the society only in July. That was 59 per
cent more than had been paid to his predecessor for the whole of 1989. Mr
Scott Durward of Alliance &amp; Leicester enjoyed a more modest pay increase of
23 per cent to take him into the new super-league.
Big pay rises were also evident further down the scale. Mr Tony FitzSimons
of Bristol and West had a 42 per cent pay rise, taking him to Pounds
161,668, while the earnings of Mr Derek Roberts of Yorkshire jumped by 30
per cent to Pounds 131,000.
The figures are taken from the latest annual reports of the societies. In
all cases, the chief executives are the highest paid directors in their
respective societies - unlike other industries, where star salesmen or
bosses of highly profitable subsidiaries can earn more than the group chief.
The boardrooms of UK building societies, traditionally among the most staid
in the financial sector, are apparently succumbing to this rash of big pay
rises for two reasons.
First, bonus-related pay has increased in building societies in recent
years, accounting for the big pay rises at C&amp;G and Bristol and West. C&amp;G's
profits rose by 35 per cent last year and Bristol and West's by 30 per cent
in a tough year for the industry. Around 60 per cent of Mr Longhurst's
salary was profit-related. His basic salary, C&amp;G says, rose by just 10 per
cent. That compares with rises of 12 per cent or more for 75 per cent of the
society's staff.
Second, executives from outside the industry have joined building society
boards, bringing different pay expectations. The outstanding example is Mr
O'Brien at National &amp; Provincial, who previously ran Rank Xerox's UK
operations. It is not clear how much of his pay related to his services in
the last six months of 1990, and how much was a one-off payment linked with
the move.
By comparison with the new big earners, the pay of some of the mortgage
world's top bosses seems low.
Mr Jim Birrell, for instance, who runs Halifax, the biggest society, earned
Pounds 152,504 in 1989 (Halifax, with a January year-end, has yet to
disclose what he was paid last year). Mr Peter Birch of Abbey National, a
building society until two years ago, received a 1 per cent pay rise to
Pounds 191,806 last year.
Even the new super-earners pale in comparison with Mr Richard Lacy. As chief
executive of National Home Loans, a specialist mortgage company, he was paid
Pounds 425,000 in 1989, before resigning last summer.
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                   BUILDING SOCIETY DIRECTORS' PAY
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
                                          Total pay (Pounds)
Society          Director                1990        1989      % rise
C &amp; Glos         Andrew Longhurst
                                        265,079    178,584       48
Nat &amp; Prov       David O'Brien          205,000    129,000       59
All &amp; Leics      Scott Durward          203,814    165,333       23
Bristl &amp; W       Tony FitzSimons        161,668    113,904       42
Leeds            Mike Blackburn         160,621    138,725       16
Halifax          Jim Birrell                n/a    152,504      n/a
N'nwide          Tim Melville-Ross          n/a    154,000      n/a
Woolwich         Donald Kirkham         149,043    144,933        3
Birm Mid         David McDonald         139,009    121,000       15
Yorkshire        Derek Roberts          131,000    101,000       30
Brad &amp; Bing      Geoffrey Lister            n/a     83,000      n/a
Britannia        Michael Shaw           114,000     96,000       19
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
n/a - not available;
Sources: Society annual reports
 ----------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4131</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Blue Arrow Trial: Purchase said to be a County transaction
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MASON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE buying of Blue Arrow shares by County NatWest Securities in the 1987
rights issue was a transaction by County NatWest, its merchant banking
co-subsidiary, a former CNWS managing director told the Blue Arrow trial
yesterday.
Mr Peter Dale, a prosecution witness, said he thought the purchase of the
Pounds 50m holding, worth 4.5 per cent of Blue Arrow, was a County
transaction throughout, with CNWS holding the shares to be traded out when
appropriate.
Mr David Reed, a former County director and one of the defendants, had said
before the September issue there was a risk that County could be left with a
substantial number of shares, Mr Dale said. 'It was, and a very large number
of these shares ended up with CNWS,' he said. 'The transaction was seen by
me as a County NatWest transaction.'
County NatWest, NatWest Investment Bank, UBS Phillips &amp; Drew Securities and
seven individuals deny conspiring to mislead the markets over the outcome of
the Pounds 837m issue.
Mr Dale said he could not remember how he was first told of the holding
being taken by CNWS. He could not recall being told by Mr Peter Rimell, CNWS
chairman, that they were being forced to take it, he told Mr Alun Jones, QC
for Mr Stephen Clark, a County director and one of the defendants.
The first he knew of another stake held by County and of an indemnity
covering a further holding taken by Phillips &amp; Drew was on December 17, he
told the court.
Earlier, Mr Stephen Raven, then CNWS deputy managing director, said that
after hearing of the stakes held by CNWS and P&amp;D he had no concern over
possible breaches of disclosure rules or the possibility the arrangement
could be seen as a concert party.
His main concern was how CNWS was managing the position, he told Mr Anthony
Hooper, QC for Mr Reed. He became concerned about disclosure only on
December 17, when County publicly announced a 9.5 per cent holding in Blue
Arrow.
Mr Raven said he was excluded from the meeting on September 29 when CNWS
agreed to take the shares. Mr Rimell had later said it was better he did not
know what had happened, Mr Raven said.
He agreed he was paid almost Pounds 1m in less than a year as deputy
managing director. Asked by Mr Hooper to comment on Mr Rimell's assessment
of him as 'ineffectual', Mr Raven replied: 'It was a pretty ineffectual
team.'
The trial continues on Monday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4132</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAECFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Comet wins judgment against BSkyB
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COMET, Kingfisher Group's electrical retailer, yesterday won a summary
judgment against British Sky Broadcasting for breach of contract over last
year's merger of BSB and Sky Television.
Mr Justice Phillips found in the High Court that a contract Comet had signed
with British Satellite Broadcasting in March 1990 could be carried out only
if BSB continued to run a satellite television service in competition with
Mr Rupert Murdoch's Sky Television until the beginning of February 1991, the
period covered by the contract.
BSB and Sky merged at the beginning of November 1990.
Mr Justice Phillips said yesterday: 'The inference is overwhelming that BSB
would continue to play their part in the joint venture of promoting the DBS
(direct broadcast from the Marco Polo satellite) system at least until the
end of this period.'
The court awarded Comet an interim payment of Pounds 185,000, with the
remainder of the claim to be assessed at a future hearing. Comet is claiming
about Pounds 10m in damages.
Mr Nigel Whittaker, deputy chairman of Kingfisher, said: 'The verdict
vindicates the strong stance we have taken.' Mr Gary Davey, deputy managing
director of BSkyB - in which Pearson, publisher of the Financial Times has a
significant stake - said the satellite company would appeal against the
judgment.
Under the contract with BSB, Comet said it would order a minimum of 50,000
satellite receivers before February 2 1991 and would schedule a further
50,000 for later delivery, with BSB meeting some of the interest costs. The
plans also included a joint promotional campaign.
Comet said it received a letter on November 6 last year from the
newly-merged company instructing it 'to suspend all further sales of BSB
reception equipment and installations and all BSB promotions in store.'
Lawyers for BSkyB argued there was no express commitment to keep running a
service, and this could not be implied.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4133</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Shake-up planned over teachers' pay
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW ADONIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT will have powers to change the remit of the proposed
teachers' pay review body each year under the teachers' pay bill published
yesterday.
Ministers could therefore ask the review body to reach a pay settlement
within a specified range, as happened this year under existing methods for
determining pay.
Mr Kenneth Clarke, the education secretary, told the Commons on Wednesday
that the review body would not be cash-limited. However, the education
department yesterday acknowledged that ministers could seek to constrain the
body's financial discretion in future.
Mr David Hart, general secretary of the National Association of Head
Teachers, said: 'I would be very worried indeed if the power of direction
were to have financial consequences'.
The review body will replace the interim advisory committee which has
negotiated teachers' pay for the last four years.
The new body will resemble those in place for assessing the pay of doctors,
nurses, senior civil servants and members of the armed forces, but it will
consider teachers' conditions of service as well.
Of the six teachers' unions, only the National Union of Teachers opposes the
principle of a pay review body.
Mr Clarke has indicated that establishment of the review body is conditional
upon the unions relinquishing their right to strike, but the bill does not
contain a 'no-strike' clause.
The bill allows state schools which have opted out of local authority
control to negotiate their own pay and conditions, but the governing body of
each school must consult its teachers before doing so.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4134</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAEAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Salary review put on education curriculum: The implications
of Clarke's attempt to outlaw strike action
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR KENNETH Clarke has a reputation for pugnacity in politics. He was at his
most belligerent 18 months ago when, as health secretary, he successfully
fended off demands by ambulance workers for an independent pay review body.
This week he became a convert to the cause, for one group of public-sector
workers at least, when as education secretary he announced plans for a pay
review body for teachers.
His decision was made in spite of strong opposition from the National Union
of Teachers, the largest teachers' union, and from many of the local
authorities which foot the teachers' pay bill. It came just a year after the
government announced its intention to restore to teachers the collective
bargaining rights which had been withdrawn four years ago after a series of
industrial disputes. That plan and the accompanying bill have now been
abandoned.
A complex series of factors are behind the volte-face. However, cost-cutting
was not one of them, going by evidence from other pay review bodies.
Mr Chris Trinder, senior fellow at the Public Finance Foundation, an
independent research organisation, calculates that since 1982-83 the
cumulative pay rise of public sector groups covered by pay review bodies has
been 113 per cent, against 99 per cent for public workers not covered.
One reason why unions, including Nupe, pushed for ambulance workers to be
covered by a review was the experience of nurses and midwives after their
review body was set up in 1983. Their pay had kept pace with average
earnings by the end of the decade, and considerably outpaced that for health
service groups not covered by review bodies.
Mr Malcolm Wing, Nupe's national secretary for health, says that the
government's staged implementation of the review body's recommendations
reduced their value during the course of the first year. However, he says
that the review bodies themselves have 'delivered the goods'.
From the government's point of view, public sector workers covered by
reviews have delivered through their industrial relations record. No
review-body workers have staged industrial action over review-body
decisions.
Mr Clarke implied this week that he was expecting teacher unions to abstain
from strikes as a quid pro quo for establishment of a review body, even
though they would not be expected to sign no-strike agreements. He indicated
that he would withdraw the review body if there were strikes.
Mr Doug McAvoy, general secretary of the NUT, says there will be neither
'silent assent (as demanded by Mr Clarke) or voiced assent', and dismisses
Mr Clarke's threat as 'hot air'. The government reasons, with some
justification, that the NUT is unlikely to order a ballot in the near future
over the principle of a review body, and may find it years to protest
against decisions made by an independent review body.
The other five unions concerned would find it even more difficult, having
given the review body a cautious welcome, although their attitude would be
tempered by whatever constraints the government put on the review body.
As well as offering the prospect of an end to industrial disputes in the
teaching profession, the government can claim that it has made a start to
improving teachers' status by giving them pay arrangements similar to those
of doctors, dentists, nurses, the armed forces and high-level public
servants already covered by review bodies. If that also implies increasing
salaries, the government may reason that higher rises for teachers
implemented through an independent review panel would fuel the expectations
of other public sector workers less than if achieved through negotiation.
The bill is expected to become law by the autumn, in time for next year's
pay settlement. Some local-authority employers feel that an agreed
settlement with the teachers would otherwise have been impossible next year
because of the combination of cash restrictions and teachers' expectations.
Other local authorities fear that the government will refuse to pay the full
cost of teachers' pay settlements in future, expecting the balance to come
from other council budgets.
This assumes that school education remains the responsibility of local
authorities - and that is by no means certain. One council negotiator
reasons that if the government's intention was merely to raise the status of
teachers and end industrial disputes it would also have included university
lecturers in the review body's ambit.
His conclusion - and that of many others in local government - is that the
review body could be a prelude to all schools being taken out of local
authority control. After all, if councils did not fund schools there would
be no point in local-authority negotiators deciding pay, as the withdrawn
bill envisaged.
Indications as to whether this formed part of Mr Clarke's thinking may
appear on Tuesday when the government publishes consultation documents on
local government.
History of antagonism
1965: Teachers' Remuneration Act puts teachers' pay on statutory footing.
Burnham Committee set up to negotiate for local authorities. Three-year
negotiated agreement.
1969: Teachers take first national strike action.
1974: Negotiated settlement and agreement to set up all-party inquiry into
teachers' pay, the Houghton Inquiry, which set teachers' salaries at 137 per
cent of average earnings.
1975: Arbitration because of anomalies of Houghton.
1979: Negotiation of pay settlement and referral to Clegg Commission, a
standing committee on pay comparability.
1980: Clegg Commission improved teachers' pay to 123 per cent of average
earnings after it had fallen back to 112 per cent.
1984: Industrial action and arbitration.
1985: Industrial action and negotiation.
1986: Industrial action, arbitration and negotiation.
1987: Burnham Committee replaced by the non-negotiating Interim Advisory
Committee.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4 Photograph On the March, teachers demonstrate in London in
1985 (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4135</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAD9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Electricity sell-off 'an environmental disaster'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JULIET SYCHRAVA
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Labour party plans reforms that would force the electricity industry to
take the environment more seriously, according to a paper published
yesterday by Mr Frank Dobson, shadow energy secretary.
Mr Dobson's paper followed Wednesday's Commons committee report on energy
efficiency, which attacked the government for failing to introduce measures
to conserve energy. The industry's privatisation had been 'an environmental
disaster', Mr Dobson said. It had failed to introduce any measures to clean
up electricity generation, develop renewable energy sources such as wind
power, or encourage energy efficiency.
The government had cut spending on scrubbing equipment for power stations
from the Pounds 2bn it promised in 1989 to Pounds 1.2bn, Mr Dobson said. A
Labour government would install more scrubbing equipment and would invest in
new technologies for burning coal more cleanly and efficiently. It would set
up an agency to promote renewable energy.
The report did not specify the cost of the proposed measures, but said that
the Labour party would introduce a 'cleaner energy levy' to replace the
nuclear levy, which raises more than Pounds 1.15bn every year.
The government had restructured the industry on the principle of maximising
electricity sales without considering the issue of investment in energy
conservation, Mr Dobson said. Labour would require the regional electricity
companies to spend their own money on energy-efficiency measures.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4136</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAD8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Israelis play for time on Baker plan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR JAMES BAKER, the US secretary of state, proposed ways of overcoming
obstacles to an Arab-Israeli peace conference in intensive talks in
Jerusalem yesterday. Israeli leaders, clearly wary of the approach, asked
for time to consider his suggestions.
After winning conditional approval for a regional conference that would
launch bilateral negotiations on two previous Middle East shuttles in the
past six weeks, Mr Baker yesterday began the difficult task of reconciling
important differences between Israel and the Arab side on how the conference
should be structured.
Although both sides declined to give details, it was clear Mr Baker's talks,
first with Mr David Levy, the foreign minister, and later with Mr Yitzhak
Shamir, the prime minister, had been tough. An Israeli spokesman described
them as 'very intense'.
A State Department statement said Mr Baker had put suggestions to Mr Shamir
and Mr Levy on how to bridge the gap between them and the Arab side on a
number of issues. Israel has so far rejected Arab insistence that the
conference should be based on UN resolutions 242 and 338, which call for it
to give up occupied Arab territory, that it should have some umbrella
function in the subsequent bilateral negotiations, and that it should
include a role for the European Community.
Israel also wants the Palestine Liberation Organisation excluded from even
an indirect part in the talks.
Washington has all along favoured a 'land for peace' settlement and is
prepared to give the EC some 'association' with the negotiating process. Mr
Baker is likely to have pressed the Israelis to accept a formula including
some reference to the UN resolutions and to stop recent moves to expand
Jewish settlement in the West Bank and Gaza Strip, which have enraged the
Arab side.
He will meet a Palestinian delegation in Jerusalem today before moving on to
Jordan, Egypt, Syria, Saudi Arabia and Kuwait. He returns next week.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3 Photograph Mr Shamir (right) has a few quiet words with Mr
Baker in Jerusalem yesterday (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4137</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAD7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / DSS man sees need for pensions test case
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ERIC SHORT, Pensions Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A TEST case will be needed before the government can equalise state pension
ages for men and women, Sir Michael Partridge, permanent secretary at the
Department of Social Security, said yesterday.
He told delegates at the annual conference of the National Association of
Pension Funds in Torquay that was the way to resolve ambiguities over the
retrospection aspects of the Barber case heard by the European Court last
year.
Sir Michael's comments dashed hopes of early action by the government. He
said there was no simple way for a government to settle the uncertainties
arising from a particular European Court judgment.
Only the court itself could clarify its decision in the Barber case that
companies had to equalise pensions and other benefits for men and women. He
therefore saw no alternative to a test case. He explained to delegates that
a unit set up in the department to consider the judgment had identified the
requirements for a suitable test case. He was confident that, once such a
test case had been identified, it could be heard quickly by a court.
He indicated that the recent Roscoe v Hick Hargreaves decision by a
Manchester industrial tribunal, in which the effect of the Barber judgment
was made retrospective for people retiring after the date of the European
Court decision, was not a suitable case.
His comments go against recent demands by the pension managers of 18 large
UK corporate bodies for urgent action by the government to equalise state
pension ages, thereby removing the barriers preventing the Barber judgment
from being fully implemented in company schemes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4138</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAD6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Troops 'told to kill protesters'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TROOPS in Iraq's northern province of Dohuk were ordered to surround
anti-government demonstrators, shoot dead 95 per cent of them and
interrogate the rest, according to an Iraqi document made public yesterday
by the Kurdish Democratic Party (KDP).
The document, dated March 6, is a nine-point plan to deal with unrest
apparently issued by the province's head of security. KDP officials would
not say how their guerrillas had obtained it but insisted it was genuine.
The order says all Iraqi officers should report immediately for duty with
their weapons if they hear of demonstrations. 'In the event of opposition
demonstrations, close off all accesses and roads to these groups and control
the positions which overlook their positions.
'After implementing the above and surrounding the enemy elements, armed
force should be used according to central command instructions to kill 95
per cent of them, leaving the remainder for interrogation.'
There was an uprising in Dohuk - along with the rest of Kurdistan and much
of southern Iraq - in early March, after the defeat of the Iraqi army in
Kuwait at the end of February. But the Iraqi government had recaptured many
of the rebellious towns in Kurdistan by the start of this month.
The Iraqi order also tells commanders to return fire against any 'terrorist
elements' trying to protect demonstrators, and mentions a 'technical
department', assumed by opposition groups to be responsible for torture.
The KDP, meanwhile, said yesterday that large numbers of pro-government
Iraqi Arabs had been moved into Kurdistan as part of an escalation of the
regime's attempts to 'Arabise' the area.
'Kurdish homes are being occupied and in many cases looted and destroyed by
these tribesmen,' it claimed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4139</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAD5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Safety work fuels North Sea costs: Deborah Hargreaves says
vital maintenance will depress production
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ENGINEERS are in short supply in Aberdeen as the North Sea oil industry
embarks on one of its most intensive periods of maintenance for many years.
Oil-services companies are stretched by a heavy burden of safety work to
bring installations into line with new government regulations.
As several large North Sea fields approach maturity, the industry is in a
frenzy to discover new oil and gas deposits, and a record number of
exploration wells is likely to be drilled this year.
Some maintenance work was put off last year while oil prices were rising
towards Dollars 40 a barrel during the Gulf crisis, and the biggest
companies now face a backlog of maintenance work on producing rigs. This is
partly to institute safety features recommended after the Piper Alpha
disaster, and partly to renew ageing equipment.
Production platforms are starting to wear out because some of the largest
fields are approaching maturity. Rather than build new rigs, operators are
patching up old ones in an attempt to extend their lives. The cost of
abandoning defunct oil rigs can be high, which means the industry will run
unprofitable platforms for as long as it can.
The Commons energy committee called on companies yesterday to start making
provisions now for abandoning rigs. Companies are forced to look farther
afield for oil and gas discoveries which will be linked into existing large
rigs by pipelines.
Prolonged shutdown periods to cope with maintenance work, made all the more
urgent by the increasing age of North Sea installations, will depress
production in the next three months when the UK will become a net importer
of oil.
The government, in an attempt to maintain the momentum in the North Sea, is
pressing the big companies to use idle oil exploration acreage or give it
up.
Renewed interest in North Sea exploration, brought about by a stronger oil
price over the last couple of years and forecasts of a shortfall in UK
output by the mid-1990s, could see more than 300 exploration wells drilled
this year - beating last year's record 290.
The maintenance burden remains large. North Sea output peaked last month at
close to 2m barrels a day (b/d) - the highest level for nine months. In the
next quarter, the heavy maintenance load will depress production by about
400,000 b/d bringing output to 1.5m b/d in April and around 1.8m b/d in May.
The Brent pipeline, the largest in the North Sea, closed at the beginning of
this month for the installation - which could take up to six weeks - of
emergency shutdown valves.
Chevron will complete work on the Ninian pipeline in mid-May, which was
delayed because of last year's industrial unrest, and this will further
staunch the flow of oil.
Unofficial strike action delayed some of the work offshore last year, and
this could prove a problem again this year following a row between official
and unofficial labour representatives over a proposed pay deal.
Mr Ian Wood, chairman of Wood Group, one of the UK's largest oil services
companies, said he had 1,400 employees working on offshore maintenance
compared with 800 at the end of last year.
Mr Chris Fay, head of exploration and production at Shell, the biggest North
Sea operator, said the top parts of many rigs built in the 1970s were
wearing out.
'I think there was an under-estimation of the severity of the weather,' he
explained.
The recommendations made in the Cullen report on the Piper Alpha explosion,
many of which the government has made law, will take several years for
companies to institute completely.
The additional safety work has led to an increase in North Sea operating
costs of around 10 per cent - or about Pounds 250m - this year, according to
Mr Stephen Halliday, an analyst with County NatWest in Edinburgh.
The most costly feature is providing safe havens for employees in the event
of a disaster - a problem which companies are only just beginning to tackle.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3 Photograph Far horizons, dwindling reserves are stimulating a
search for new oil and gas deposits (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4140</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAD4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Government pressed on rig liability
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT was urged by the Commons energy committee yesterday to assume
legal liability for abandoned North Sea oil platforms.
In a report published yesterday the committee raised the controversial issue
of what oil companies should do with their platforms when the oil has run
out. The subject will become more pressing as several big North Sea oil
fields start to run dry. The committee called on the government to be more
flexible in its approach to the question of abandonment.
The report's recommendations have been welcomed by the oil industry for
clarifying issues concerning the abandonment of North Sea fields. The
government said last year that most North Sea platforms would have to be
removed and broken up when the fields they serviced ran out of oil.
Because of the large costs and dangers in removing such large structures,
the industry has always favoured toppling platforms into the sea and leaving
them.
The guidelines have not yet been tested as North Sea operators are only just
facing the prospect of abandoning empty fields.
The Piper Alpha installation, which had to be abandoned after an explosion
that killed 167 men, was given a special concession to be toppled.
The MPs on the committee called on the government to make clear its general
requirements on abandonment, but said each case should be considered on its
merits. The MPs said the industry would set up a fund to pay for commercial
insurance on platforms if the government accepted liability for abandoned
structures.
The cost of removing an installation from its site can be almost double that
of taking only part of it away and toppling the rest into the sea - the UK
Offshore Operators Association estimates a cost of Pounds 4.4bn for total
removal of all North Sea platforms and Pounds 2.4bn for partial removal.
The structures are immense - significantly larger than Shell's 30-storey
headquarters building in London - and can weigh more than 300,000 tonnes. If
left in situ, they could prove a hazard to shipping and fishermen.
Mr Chris Ryan, an official at the association, said: 'We are now looking to
the government to strengthen its guidance to the industry because, before
the end of the century, we will be forced to abandon several fields.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4141</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAD3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / EC partial membership suggested
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BRUSSELS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE European Community should consider partial membership for countries such
as those in eastern Europe which crave the political security of being in
the EC well in advance of being able to meet the economic test of EC
membership.
This concept of 'affiliate' membership was floated yesterday by Mr Frans
Andriessen, EC external affairs commissioner, in a speech in Brussels framed
mainly with eastern Europeans in mind but which could pertain to current
negotiations to create a European Economic Area (EEA) with members of the
European Free Trade Association (Efta).
He called for 'creative thinking to define arrangements whereby the
Community could offer the benefits of membership, and the accompanying
enhanced stability, without weakening its drive towards further integration
and without subjecting the fragile structure of new market economies to
excessive pressure.'
An 'affiliate' would have 'a seat at the Council of Ministers table on a par
with full members in specified areas', as well as representation in the
European Parliament, Mr Andriessen told Eurochambers, the association of EC
chambers of commerce.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4142</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAD2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Yugoslav PM devalues by 31% and defends reforms
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LAURA SILBER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BELGRADE
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR ANTE Markovic, Yugoslav prime minister, yesterday announced a 30.7 per
cent devaluation of the dinar, amid rising opposition in the republics to
the federal government.
Addressing the federal parliament, he defended his programme of economic and
political reforms, but said the devaluation - the second in four months -
would compensate for an excess in public spending over the past nine months
equivalent to Dollars 5.4bn. The dinar, which will remain tied to the German
D-mark, will be pegged at 13 dinars to DM1. It was 9:1.
Mr Markovic criticised communist Serbia and Montenegro, and the
independence-minded Slovenia and Croatia, four of the six Yugoslav
republics, for blocking his stabilisation programme. He said the programme
was responsible for the growth of exports, a Dollars 2.43bn surplus in the
balance of payments and the increase of hard currency reserves - which are
about Dollars 6bn - and the convertibility of the dinar.
His speech comes amid fears of an unlikely alliance between the governments
of Serbia and Croatia to topple the prime minister. 'The opponents of the
reform process, who have completely different motives, have almost united
and the decisive battle will take place in this building,' he said in his
televised speech.
He said the republics' political battles had 'paralysed a united Yugoslav
market', stopped trade among the republics, the transformation of
socially-owned property to private property and the restructuring of the
banks.
The republics had exceeded planned public spending, raised wages and adopted
laws which violated the federal constitution, and Serbia and Montenegro had
illegally printed and issued banknotes, he said.
The policies were a result of 'labour pressures or political structures
which want to keep power or social peace. . . which increase inflation and
decrease currency reserves,' he said.
He warned: 'It is realistic to expect a return of inflation until conditions
are created for carrying out the whole programme. The country is not in a
position to bear one more attack of hyperinflation.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4143</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAD1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Treuhand deal for Warburg
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SG WARBURG, the UK merchant bank, has been given the job of selling
Interhotel, east Germany's luxury hotel chain, by the Treuhand privatisation
agency.
Mr Piers von Simson, Warburg executive in charge of the operation, says he
is hoping to raise about DM3bn (Pounds 1bn) from the sale of the hotels.
The Treuhand has so far made only limited use of investment banking
expertise, but JP Morgan provided help with the recent sale of east
Germany's regional newspapers and Warburg was also involved in the sale of
the retail chain Centrum to Kaufhof, Hertie and Karstadt, three big west
German groups.
Some east German companies have also hired investment banks to help them
find purchasers. Carl Zeiss Jena, the instruments group, engaged Salomon
Bros.
A Treuhand official said the organisation had originally hoped to sell, or
give, packages of companies to banks, which would then take responsibility
for restructuring and sell them on.
'But the banks have not been interested in taking that sort of risk so we
are using investment banks in a standard way to provide technical
assistance,' said the official.
The 35 Interhotel hotels are among east Germany's prime commercial and
property assets. The sale is certain to attract most of the world's
international hotel groups. Staff in the hotels has already been reduced
from 12,500 to 5,000 and there will be no strings attached regarding future
employment for the purchasers, according to Mr von Simson.
One hotel group could buy the whole chain, but it is more likely to be sold
in four or five packages. Mr von Simson said that, for some international
groups, the east German hotels could be a step into the west German hotel
industry through arranging swaps with west German chains. Potential
purchasers have to make their interest clear this month.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4144</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAD0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Berlin building contracts for France, US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LESLIE COLITT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BERLIN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FRENCH and US companies have won contracts worth more than DM1.4bn (Pounds
470m) to erect commercial and apartment buildings on a prime site in east
Berlin.
The awards, by the Treuhand, the agency responsible for privatising east
German companies, give a psychological lift to foreign companies seeking to
compete in east Germany against a massive west German presence.
The competition attracted 22 international investment groups. The final five
bids were examined by a jury of officials and architects.
Galeries Lafayette of Paris is to build a department store in the
Friedrichstrasse, centre of Berlin before 1945, and the French construction
company Bouygues will erect an adjoining office, shopping and residential
building by Pei, Cobb architects.
Tishman Speyer of New York, tackling its second big project in Germany after
a skyscraper in Frankfurt, will build on the remaining site.
The three companies agreed to raze a half-completed building which sprawls
over the three 18,000-sq metre properties and was begun in 1988 by the East
German Centrum department store chain. They will reimburse the previous
building costs of DM85m.
Construction is not expected to begin before late autumn; completion is set
for 1995.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4145</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Packaging goes green in Germany
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GERMANY yesterday passed a law to require packaging manufacturers and
retailers to take back used bottles, cans, cartons and general packaging
material, writes David Goodhart in Bonn.
Mr Klaus Topfer, environment minister, said that the law, which yesterday
was passed by the Bundesrat (upper house), would reduce Germany's household
rubbish from 30m to 18m tonnes a year.
Packaging manufacturers and retailers will have to mark with a green blob
all products that can be returned. By 1995, this should apply to 80 per cent
of packaging.
The complex law will be introduced in stages between December 1 1991 and
January 1 1993. From April 1 1992, purchasers will have the right to leave
superfluous packaging at the point of sale.
The Bundestag has blocked a bill designed to plug the loopholes in Germany's
export controls which have allowed German manufacturers to play a large role
in arming Third World dictators.
The German postal service will have to provide only DM4bn (Pounds 1.3bn),
rather than the planned DM8bn, up to 1994 to cover German unity costs.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4146</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Way clear for Hungarian property compensation bill
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS DENTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BUDAPEST
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A BILL to give limited compensation for property expropriated by the
Communist regime in Hungary has overcome a crucial legal hurdle, clearing
away damaging uncertainty over Hungary's privatisation programme.
The constitutional court rejected an application to annul the government's
proposals, clearing the way for the bill to be passed by parliament next
week.
The court's decision carries the promise of a conclusion to a long and
bitter debate over conflicting priorities: justice for former owners or the
encouragement of new and foreign investment.
'The general approach will be that the state will sell state property, and
not give it back to original holders,' said Mr Karoly Szabo, deputy director
of the State Property Agency, the privatisation authority. Reparation would
be partial and financial, costing an estimated Ft100bn (Pounds 750m) he said
yesterday.
Redress for farming families, though, is much more generous, reflecting the
conservative government's dependence on the Smallholders' party for its
parliamentary majority.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4147</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / French gas tries to protect its monopoly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GAZ de France, the French state gas distributor, is to appeal to the
government to scrap an amendment to a draft law that would greatly threaten
its monopoly.
The proposal appears to go in the direction of European Commmission efforts
to break up national energy monopolies. Yesterday, it led two Gaz de France
unions to call for a strike next Wednesday.
However, it is a legal accident, the result of poor drafting of a
parliamentary amendment tabled by two Socialist MPs in the first reading of
an obscure law on local administration. Even if the government corrects the
amendment, as seems likely, the mix-up gives a clear sign of the
difficulties likely to face any attempt to deregulate French energy
distribution.
The amendment allows communes, the basic unit of French local government, to
choose how to organise their own gas distribution, if not already being
supplied by Gaz de France. Only 6,000 of France's 36,000 communes are
connected to the utility - a measure of the country's heavy dependence on
nuclear-generated electricity.
The purpose of the amendment was to allow the handful of French cities that
handle their own gas supplies to go on doing so, not to break Gaz de
France's monopoly, explained officials. However, Gaz de France's management
is taking this legal threat seriously, given the eagerness of oil companies,
water distribution groups and local authorities to make inroads.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4148</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Industrial sales down in Poland
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHRISTOPHER BOBINSKI
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WARSAW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INDUSTRIAL sales in Poland are continuing to fall, squeezing state sector
profits as well as budget revenues, figures for the first three months of
the year show, writes Christopher Bobinski in Warsaw.
The figures come as the IMF board is accepting Warsaw's letter of intent
which commits the Poles to maintain tight monetary controls, to try to
reduce the monthly inflation rate to 1 per cent by the end of the year.
Industrial sales fell 4.3 per cent in the first quarter compared with a year
ago. Consumer prices grew by 25 per cent in the first three months of the
year compared with the previous quarter, while incomes rose by 6.7 per cent
in the same period.
In foreign trade, the country had a Dollars 299m (Pounds 167m) first quarter
deficit, reflecting the collapse of sales to the Soviet Union as former
Comecon countries switched to hard currency pricing.
At the same time, the IMF has been told that Poland is determined to stick
to the exchange rate fixed at the beginning of 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4149</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Sao Paulo riots
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTORIA GRIFFITH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAO PAULO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
The Brazilian city of Sao Paulo exploded in riots on Thursday over the
deterioration in public transport which has left thousands without means to
get to work, writes Victoria Griffith in Sao Paulo.
Four thousand people attacked 69 public buses and sacked several shops.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4150</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Norway pipeline
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Norway's cabinet yesterday approved the construction of a third gas pipeline
to Europe. The Europipe, which will cost NKr10.2bn (Pounds 880m), will have
an initial capacity for transporting 13bn cubic metres of gas a year to
Emden in Germany, reports Deborah Hargreaves. The project now has to be
approved by the country's parliament.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4151</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Antarctic plan
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Britain yesterday effectively rejected proposals to turn Antarctica into a
world park. Foreign minister Tristan Garel-Jones said countries proposing
the scheme had not explained how it would be administered.
Officials from countries which have signed the Antarctic Treaty will meet in
Madrid next week to debate the future of the southern wilderness.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4152</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Andreotti wins vote of confidence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HAIG SIMONIAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ROME
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE new Italian government, headed by Mr Giulio Andreotti, yesterday won a
vote of confidence in parliament, despite the small Republican party voting
against, writes Haig Simonian in Rome.
The Republicans, part of the coalition ruling Italy since 1983, had decided
to withdraw from Mr Andreotti's new government after a clash with the
premier over cabinet posts.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4153</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Recession seen as deep and long in Sweden
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT TAYLOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SWEDEN'S recession will continue through next year and the country will have
the worst-performing economy in western Europe, according to a gloomy
forecast published yesterday by the Federation of Swedish Industries.
The report, before Sweden's spring budget next Tuesday, suggests the country
will suffer a second consecutive year with a zero growth rate. It suggests
the fall in gross national product for 1991 will be 1.5 per cent and, for
1992, a further 0.5 per cent. No other western economy is expected to have a
zero growth rate next year or a fall in industrial production.
It also predicts a steep rise in unemployment, from an average 4 per cent
this year to 5 per cent, as well as plummeting industrial investment, a
decline in industrial production and a balance of payments deficit worsening
from SKr44.8bn (Pounds 4.16bn) in 1991 to SKr55.2bn next year, despite an
improved visible trade balance.
The federation represents many of Sweden's private sector employers. It is
taking a more pessimistic view of the immediate outlook than the finance
ministry, blaming structural factors, notably the inability of the
wage-bargaining system to make an effective use of labour resources.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4154</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Liverpool ban lifted
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
League champions Liverpool will be allowed back into European competition
next season, Uefa, European football's governing body, said. English clubs
were banned from Europe in 1985 after 39 people died in rioting at Brussels'
Heysel stadium before the European Cup final between Liverpool and Juventus.
The ban on other English clubs was lifted last year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4155</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Astronaut set for launch
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Britain's first astronaut, Helen Sharman, 27, will blast off into space on
May 18 for the eight-day Anglo-Soviet Juno mission.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4156</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Ten die in air crash
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Ten people were killed and five seriously injured when an Air Tahiti
aircraft crashed into the sea during an emergency landing in French
Polynesia, officials said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4157</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Boating disasters
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
At least 72 people, mostly Nigerians, died when a ship capsized off
Equatorial Guinea. Meanwhile a wooden boat packed with illegal immigrants
from the Dominican Republic capsized off Puerto Rico, killing at least five
people. The death toll in an Indonesian boating disaster rose to 63. Rescue
workers spent two days recovering corpses from an artificial lake in central
Java.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4158</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Husband guilty of rape
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The first man to be found guilty of raping his wife while they still lived
together was jailed for five years by Winchester Crown Court.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4159</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Archbishop enthroned
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A huge congregation in Canterbury Cathedral broke into prolonged applause as
Dr George Carey, a hospital porter's son from a working-class London family,
was enthroned as 103rd Archbishop of Canterbury.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4160</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: RC taxi driver shot
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A Roman Catholic taxi driver was shot and seriously injured in Belfast as
hundreds of mourners attended the funeral of Roman Catholic cabbie John
O'Hara, shot dead by a loyalist gang on Wednesday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4161</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: West End blackout
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
West End shows and cinemas were blacked out when a power cut brought chaos
to parts of central London. London Electricity said the power supply
problem, which began on Thursday, was serious and could continue today.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4162</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Stock and Currency Markets
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
 -----------------------------
STERLING
 -----------------------------
New York:
Dollars 1.7215 (1.7515)
London:
Dollars 1.722 (1.772)
DM 2.99 (same)
FFr 10.0875 (10.1)
SFr 2.5325 (2.555)
Y 238.25 (242.25)
Pounds index 92.2 (93.0)
 -----------------------------
GOLD
 -----------------------------
New York: Comex Jun
Dollars 359.0 (360.2)
London:
Dollars 356.45 (357.6)
 -----------------------------
N SEA OIL (Argus)
 -----------------------------
Brent Jun
Dollars 18.975 (19.125)
 -----------------------------
DOLLAR
 -----------------------------
New York
DM 1.736 (1.705)
FFr 5.852 (5.757)
SFr 1.46785 (1.457)
Y 138.3 (137.7)
London:
DM 1.736 (1.688)
FFr 5.8575 (5.7)
SFr 1.4705 (1.4415)
Y 138.35 (136.7)
Dollars index 66.3 (65.1)
Tokyo close: Y137.9
 -----------------------------
US CLOSING RATES
 -----------------------------
Fed Funds 5 3/4% (6 1/8)
3-mo Treasury Bills:
yield: 5.91% (5.86)
Long Bond:
95 13/16 (96 17/32)
yield: 8.247% (8.17)
 -----------------------------
STOCK INDICES
 -----------------------------
FT-SE 100:
2,520.1 (-18.3)
FT Ordinary:
1,980.1 (-16.3)
FT-A All-Share:
1,220.16 (-0.7%)
FT-A World Index:
145.09 (-1.9%)
New York
DJ Ind. Av.
2,965.59 (-33.67)
S&amp;P Comp
384.2(-4.26)
Tokyo: Nikkei
26,541.97 (-256.93)
 -----------------------------
LONDON MONEY
 -----------------------------
3-month interbank:
closing 11 23/32% (11 1/2)
Liffe long gilt future:
Jun 91 29/32 (94 3/4)
 -----------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4163</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Allies and Iraq discuss refugees
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MURRAY BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ANKARA
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
US AND allied commanders yesterday crossed into northern Iraq and held a
50-minute meeting with Baghdad officials, seeking assurances that Iraq would
not interfere in the setting up of havens for the thousands of Kurdish
refugees camped in the Turkish mountains.
Lt Gen John Shalikashvili, the US general commanding the force entrusted
with establishing the havens in the north of Iraq, said on returning from
the Harbur customs post to the Turkish side of the border: 'As is always the
case with these initial meetings some issues remain to be worked and will be
worked in due time.'
He warned Iraqi officers in the town of Zakho, with a population of
5,000-10,000 to stay out of the way and allow the construction of camps.
Gen Shalikashvili said the havens plan would go ahead. He gave no details of
the talks beyond describing 'a very frank exchange of views which gave me
the opportunity to make the points I wanted to make'. He did not indicate
whether more contacts with the Iraqis were planned.
Air Vice Marshall Dick Johns, leader of the British reconnaissance party,
along with French, Italian and Canadian military officials, was also present
at the talks with about six Iraqi officials, held near an Iraqi border post.
The talks were the highest level contact between the allies and the Baghdad
regime since the ceasefire agreement in February.
They came ahead of the arrival over the weekend of contingents of US, UK and
French troops, who will be entrusted with securing the refugee safe havens,
before eventually handing them over to the United Nations.
Already there are almost 6,000 US military personnel in Turkey including
2,000 marines. An advance party of British marines from the 3rd Commando
based in Plymouth is expected to fly into Diyarbakir at the weekend. They
will then go to Silopi, the allies' forward base for the safe haven
operation.
More than 200 French military survey experts are due to arrive today. The
combined allied force is expected to number about 16,000 troops.
'We are prepared to move in and start the effort erecting infrastructure for
the first camp,' Gen Shalikashvili said before meeting the Iraqis.
Italy is to send 500 troops to help build a camp for 60,000 Kurdish refugees
in northern Iraq. In the Netherlands the Dutch cabinet approved plans to
send up to 1,000 military personnel to defend havens for the Kurdish
refugees.
In Baghdad this week Iraqi and UN representatives agreed terms for the
setting up of relief stations in north Iraq and it remains to be seen how
well the UN plan will complement the allied relief plan.
However, yesterday's meeting is seen as an early sign that Baghdad may
co-operate in allied relief work it had previously denounced as interference
in its internal affairs.
In the US the White House welcomed the Iraq-UN agreement and said it did not
see the plan as a rebuff to President George Bush.
The plan 'appears to provide a basis for the UN to take over the operation
we will establish', said Mr Marlin Fitzwater, the presidential spokesman.
The UN and the allied camps were essentially the same, he said.
Allied officials stress their military relief operation is temporary. Mrs
Lynda Chalker, the UK overseas development minister, said the allies would
probably be 'in business here not weeks but several months'.
Mrs Chalker, visiting the camps this week, emphasised the need to hand over
the operation to the UN. 'The urgency of putting UN personnel on the ground
is critical,' she said.
In the camps, aid officials say the allies will still have to win the
confidence of the refugees before they will make the long trek back.
The longer the delay, the more the camps in Turkey will be consolidated and
the less likely the refugees are to want to return to north Iraq, aid
officials say.
Continued on Page 22
Iraq admission, Page 3
West takes up burden, Page 7
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4164</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Dollar rises sharply on recovery hopes: Weakness of pound
and D-Mark helps to strengthen US currency
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON, KATHARINE CAMPBELL and DAVID MARSH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK, FRANKFURT, BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GROWING confidence in the outlook for the US economy and stable domestic
interest rates sent the dollar sharply higher against the world's main
currencies yesterday.
Sterling, already weakened by Thursday's bad UK unemployment and
manufacturing output figures, lost 5 cents to Dollars 1.722 in London and
slipped further in New York to Dollars 1.7215.
The rise in the dollar, which helped to depress share prices on Wall Street,
was partly a reflection of a lower D-Mark. The US currency climbed more than
3 1/2 pfennigs in London to DM1.736, a level it maintained in New York, as
the foreign exchange markets continued to express concern about the effect
of unification on the German economy.
Currency dealers in New York said that international investors remained
hungry for the dollar, which has already appreciated sharply this year,
because they believed the US economy was on the brink of recovery from
recession.
Although economists are divided on how fast the economy will pull out of its
dive, there is a widespread belief on international markets that the worst
of the recession is over.
The dollar is also in demand because investors do not expect any further
cuts in US interest rates. Last week the Federal Reserve, the US central
bank, decided not to ease monetary policy in the wake of government figures
showing the rate of producer and consumer price inflation slowing.
Following that decision, some of the international money that fled the US
during the steady round of interest rate cuts between late 1990 and February
this year has returned, pushing up the dollar in the process.
The absence of central bank intervention yesterday to halt the dollar's rise
added to suspicion in the markets that the US authorities were happy to see
the dollar strengthen. Although other central banks do not like too strong a
dollar - because it puts up the price of imports and feeds inflation into
their economies - the Fed can afford to let the dollar climb because it
helps to keep the lid on US inflation.
Demand for the US currency in New York was further boosted by technical
factors, with dealers and corporate investors moving to cover short
positions in the dollar before the weekend.
The dollar firmed against the D-Mark in spite of a clear reaffirmation by
the Bundesbank, Germany's central bank, that monetary policy would be kept
tight in the face of concern over mounting inflationary pressures.
Mr Karl Otto Pohl, Bundesbank president, told an economists' society in
Frankfurt that 'the environment for price stability has recently
deteriorated considerably', with the inference that another interest rate
rise could not be excluded. The Bundesbank last raised official rates at the
end of January.
The German central bank has also clearly become concerned at recent weakness
in the D-Mark as a further potential contributor to higher prices.
Mr Helmut Schlesinger, deputy president, in a television interview described
the German central bank as unhappy with developments in the dollar-D-Mark
exchange rate, although he added that the current situation was not serious
enough to provoke the Bundesbank to act.
Mr Pohl said the sharp contraction in the country's trade surplus
represented a desirable non-inflationary way of accommodating the spurt in
consumer demand arising from German unification. However, the process could
not continue indefinitely without negative effects for the currency and its
anchor role in the European Monetary System.
US officials have repeatedly made clear they would like to see the
Bundesbank ease its restrictive stance but yesterday's remarks from
Bundesbank officials forcefully ruled out the possibility.
Mr Pohl's remarks were clearly for domestic consumption at a crucial moment
in the current wage round. Referring to a 'destabilising' wage policy, he
hinted that inflationary settlements could trigger higher interest rates.
On Wall Street the dollar's strength added to downward pressure on share
prices, with investors selling US multinational stocks because of the
dilutive impact the rising dollar has on their overseas earnings.
Profit-taking in the wake of the market's recent rally, and selling linked
the expiration of stock index futures and options contracts, added to the
downward pressure on US equity prices.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down 33.67 at 2,965.59.
 -----------------------------
Pause for thought Page 6
Money Markets Page 11
London Stocks Page 13
World Stocks Page 19
Lex Page 22
 -----------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1 Graph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4165</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / The man who makes his emotions dance: Controversial
choreographer Sir Kenneth MacMillan
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLEMENT CRISP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SIR KENNETH MacMillan, principal choreographer of the Royal Ballet, has been
controversial ever since he staged his first professional ballet at Sadler's
Wells Theatre as a young dancer in 1955. He has since become one of the most
important forces in the dance of our time. He represents the second
generation of creativity at the Royal Ballet, after the founding figures,
Dame Ninette de Valois and Sir Frederick Ashton; like them he was director
of the Royal Ballet, from 1970 to 1977.
His beliefs about the potential of dance to explore the human condition, his
determination that his work must reflect not the fantasies of 19th century
swan-upping but the emotional crises known to men and women today, have
sometimes made audiences uneasy. Ironically, his full-length ballets Romeo
and Juliet; Manon; Mayerling, are among Covent Garden's greatest draws and
have achieved the status of repertory classics, while his short works are
eagerly acquired by companies worldwide. He remains, as always, a very
private man whose chief concern is still with finding new possibilities for
movement.
'I never sat down and thought about what ballet should do in the theatre,
but early in my career I knew that what I wanted to put on stage had to have
more reality than much of what I was seeing in the 1940s and 50s. That might
seem strange when one considers what an artificial medium ballet is, with
its women on point and its formal language - the whole aesthetic of ballet
is not about reality - but I was at odds with everyone who wanted ballet to
continue to be 'traditional'.
'I was influenced by other aspects of the theatre and I recall an article by
John Osborne - whom I admired very much - in which he spoke of ballet as
being effete. Little of what I was seeing then had any contact with a real
world of feeling and human behaviour. Ballet looked like window-dressing. I
wanted to make ballets in which an audience would become caught up with the
fate of the characters I showed them. The only way to get the sort of
expressivity I aimed for was to know how the characters felt and find a
means of showing that.
'I wanted dance to express something largely outside its experience. I had
to find a way to stretch the language - otherwise I should just produce
sterile academic dance. Even so, the language had to remain very precise. In
some of the work I have done which I like best, the movement came swiftly -
in the solo I recently made for Anthony Dowell as the tragic, ineffectual
husband in Winter Dreams, and in the 'grief' duet in Isadora when Duncan and
Paris Singer hear of the death of Isadora's children.'
This is one of the rawest and most heart-tearing pieces of choreography that
MacMillan has made. In it he pushed dance to serve feelings that only one
choreographer - Antony Tudor - had shown before.
'The big difference between Tudor and me is that he always sought to conceal
emotion, while I want to get it all out in movement. Tudor's heroines
agonise desperately inside and try not to reveal their suffering. It is very
English - you mustn't show emotion, and I think my ballets embarrass people
because I let emotion out.
'My childhood was very emotionally upsetting. My emotions were stored away
and the idea of releasing them, of finding ways of exploring other people's
emotions, came out in my work. I chose a strange medium in which to reveal
feelings. But since I didn't have a good academic education, I couldn't
become a writer. When I saw Look Back in Anger, it was a great eye-opener
and an influence, because John Osborne had found a way to express his
emotions and his frustrations. This was important to me. Emotion could be
released, and though it took a longer time for me to achieve this in dance -
the language is more intractable, I suppose - it gave me a vital
inspiration.'
Was there implicit in all this a conflict with an establishment?
'I think my entire career has been a fight against the Establishment and its
view of ballet. I feel that I had a lot of trouble with the Opera House
establishment because of an almost pre-war view there of what ballet was
about.'
A prime example came in 1965 when Covent Garden would not allow MacMillan to
stage Mahler's Song of the Earth. It was MacMillan's friend John Cranko who
offered him the chance to mount the ballet in Stuttgart. And when it was
recognised as an important work, the Royal Ballet duly acquired it.
MacMillan has not made concessions: audiences have had to accept his view of
things.
'But even so, my ballets can still offend the public. Valley of Shadows,
which showed a concentration camp, did not get many performances. It cut
across people's strong received ideas about what dance should do. Audiences
are upset, not always by the subject matter, but by the way I treat it '
And yet they would not be offended if such matters were shown by a modern
company?
'It is like trying to preach to people who can only believe in what they
think ballet should be. Prejudice is hard to break down.'
When MacMillan staged his full-length ballet about Isadora Duncan,
Earth-Mother of modern dance, it was as if he had lost patience with an
ultra-traditional view of ballet, and had broken the mirrors on the dance
studio wall that reflect the dancers' sweating and self-obsessed bodies so
as to show the world of theatre outside.
'I don't think that I consciously set out to do that, but when I look back
it does seem as if I were impatient with ballet. Perceptions had to be
broadened. Isadora was a very 'theatrical' piece in that I used things the
audience didn't expect: speech; the splitting of the role of Isadora between
a dancer and an actress. If you work in the theatre, you have to be a
magician, and as well as illuminating your subject, you have to excite and
mystify and make the audience wonder.'
Nowadays MacMillan's big-scale ballets are staples of the repertory.
Has the fighter against the crusted and the reactionary become a Grand Old
Man?
'It's strange, but latterly I have felt that I am more accepted by the
public. Of course, there's a danger in the immense popularity of the
three-act ballet. Increasingly audiences want to see full-length works, and
turn away from triple bills. The curious thing is that only here in Britain
and in Russia is there that tradition of extended creativity, of
choreographers making evening-long ballet. I'm a product of that system and
I love making big works. Since my illness (a heart attack three years ago) I
find it difficult to maintain my stamina to create a full-evening ballet,
though I still believe in them.'
About ballet-making, he is frank.
'A creative artist is driven by his gifts. Now that I am married and have a
grown-up daughter, things are different. But as a young man I never thought
of anything except the ballet I was creating or the next ballet I had to do.
The tension was horrible, yet I had to get it out of my system each time.
Now, working in an Opera House with a large company, I have to produce big
works that will keep the company dancing. But there are moments when I feel
I need to make a small-scale piece, which is difficult within the context of
the Opera House.'
'Although I'd thought about making a ballet from Three Sisters, I wasn't
aware, when I made the original pas de deux for Darcey Bussell and Irek
Mukhamedov, of what I had created. When I saw it, I realised that this was
the farewell between Masha and Vershinin from Three Sisters, and I had to go
on and make Winter Dreams.
'The subconscious is strange in my ballet-making: as I watched one section
of Winter Dreams, I found myself becoming nervous because I did not
understand if what I had created was right. I was surprised by what I saw.
The subconscious takes over, and it is never really satisfied. It acts as a
censor, and I become my own critic about the form of what I am making. It is
very mysterious.
'I also realise now that I am no better and no worse than the music I use.
This may sound patronising to my composers, but it is true. My regret with
my last full-length ballet, The Prince of the Pagodas, is that the Britten
estate would not sanction any cuts. With sensitive editing - and the
trustees ought to realise that I would not desecrate a major score - I could
have made a tauter ballet.
'But I have to do what I have to do, and I hope the public will like it. If
I ever stopped to consider what people wanted, or what I thought they'd
like, I'd never do a thing.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4166</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Despatches: All leaders Great and Dear
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN RIDDING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A KHAKI-CLAD woman whirls around the roof of the auditorium hanging by one
arm from a Buck Rodgers vintage space scooter.
At the top of her spiralling climb she lets fall a red and white banner.
'Let's model our society on the Juche ideal,' it reads. The gathered
congregation breaks into applause, in time with the military band at the
side of the stage.
Welcome to a night at the theatre, Pyongyang style. Entertainment plays a
supporting role to propaganda. The deification of Kim Il Sung, North Korea's
'Great leader', adoration of his son and heir Kim Jong Il, and the promotion
of 'Juche', the elder Kim's political creed, take centre stage.
As in all totalitarian states, art and entertainment in North Korea are a
serious business. Just how serious is etched on to the strained face of one
male acrobat as he drops vertically from a 30 ft beam to unfurl the slogan
'A match for a hundred' - a tribute to the military prowess of his navy
colleagues.
The dancers, acrobats, musicians and comedians are trained to levels of
technical perfection. Discipline, commitment and ceremony are some of the
few things that North Korea does well. But precisely because showbusiness is
so serious, an evening of entertainment at the Kyoe Kukjang Theatre
Pyongyang is unusually revealing of the society in which it is performed.
Many of the messages are obvious, and deliberately so. A slapstick comedy
duo ridicule South Korea's army in a sketch about the Team Spirit military
exercises which are held every year with US forces stationed in South Korea
and which Pyongyang cites as one of the principal obstacles to easing
tensions on the divided peninsula.
In the sketch, South Korean soldiers are portrayed as foolish puppets,
manipulated by sinister Americans. By contrast, the South Korean peasant who
is angered by the debris of a crashed US jet is depicted as a decent, honest
type.
The message is clear. Ordinary South Koreans are just like their
hard-working socialist brethren in the north. They are separated only by US
imperialists and their puppet government in Seoul.
Equally clear from the evening's programme is the importance of the cult of
personality to the North Korean regime. Stalin, Mao and Ceausescu would have
blushed at the adoration showered on the leaders Great and Dear.
There was a dance, not just in honour of the Dear Leader, but in honour of
the Kimjongilia - a flower developed by a Japanese horticulturalist and
named after the younger Kim. Seven beautiful North Korean women produced the
most privileged of plants from behind white veils. A
The role of the military in North Korean society was also evident. The show
opened to the silhouette of a soldier, standing on one arm, absolutely
still, and clutching a rifle with his free hand. In the background, the sun
rises over the peak of Mount Paektu, birthplace of Tangun, Korea's mythical
founder.
Other acts show backdrops of Mig fighter jets lined up and ready to repel
the imminent US invasion. Smiling pilots raise their arms as they climb into
the cockpits.
But while most of the messages were clear to even the least perceptive
members of the audience, the more important signals were, perhaps, more
subtle.
Like Kremlin-watching of old, it was what was missing from the evening's
line-up as much as what was featured that was of interest. In this case,
whereas the younger Kim was lauded by virtually every juggler, singer and
dancer, his father was conspicuous by his absence.
What this doesn't mean, and could never mean, is that the 'Great Leader' has
become a non-person, shortly to be edited from the history of his Juche
revolution. What it does mean, is that efforts are being made to promote his
son as the legitimate heir and the first hereditary successor to a communist
regime.
Of particular importance in this respect is that the acclaim for the Dear
Leader hailed from a military troupe. It is the military which will likely
prove the kingmaker or breaker after the 79-year-old Kim Il Sung moves down
to heaven, and which has been regarded as a potential source of opposition
to his first-born.
The fact that the army, navy and airforce are publicly applauding Kim Jong
Il's virtues, no less than the fact that he is now referred to, like his
father, as commander in chief, could mean the succession process is moving
steadily forward. On the other hand, it may equally signal that his position
needs buttressing.
Such thoughts are unlikely to be flitting through the minds of the
captivated cadres in the circus theatre. They cheer the acts and clap in
time to the regimental music.
It seems that everything in North Korea's tightly controlled society is done
in time. But for the stagnating country itself, time seems to be standing
still.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX Photograph Graven idol, Kim Il Sung's personality cult
touches all (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4167</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / The angry young men who look back in yearning: The problems
of a generation deprived of causes to write for, fight for and die for
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DOMINIC LAWSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   I READ in the letters pages of the Times
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
still the nearest thing to establishment graffiti - that Mr John Osborne is
having great difficulty in putting on his latest play which, as I understand
it, would be an up-to-date version of his 1950s triumph, Look Back In Anger.
One of the themes of that play was the absence of Causes for young men to
write, fight and die for. This made them very angry. The fascists had been
seen off, and the Vietnam war hadn't started. There was no great campaign in
which a young man could sublimate his more aggressive sexual energies, with
the result that Osborne's angry young man became verbally, if not
physically, brutal to his adoring girlfriend.
When one considers the great increase in reported crime of sexual assault,
particularly among young married couples, it is clear that Mr Osborne has
not lost his sense of timing and perception; and it is a pity that he is
finding it such a struggle to persuade an actor to take the leading role in
his new play.
Both on the left and on the right, the great causes to die for appear to
have collapsed. The death of totalitarianism in eastern Europe has left a
great void in our consciences. While it is unfortunately the case that the
people of eastern Europe are still damp, poor and unhappy, they are damp,
poor and unhappy about material things, such as housing and food, and this
is strangely unsympathetic.
Now that they can vote for whom they want to keep them damp, poor and
unhappy, they are no more heroic than a Liverpool couple who have been kept
waiting rather too long for a bigger council flat.
The left, too, has suffered a terrible loss of moral direction. Its
political anger has always been aimed at the United States. I have never
understood the deep loathing that many intellectuals have for America and
all its works, but it is an undoubted phenomenon and one which acts as a
bond throughout the wine-bars of Europe.
In the 1980s, Nicaragua was the great focus for this visceral anger but the
poor dears have not yet recovered from the unfortunately democratic
demolition of the Sandinistas and have suffered even more anguish as the
former Sandinista leaders have turned their great minds to exploiting
capitalism rather than opposing it: one has even made a great success of
running a private airline. If Graham Greene had not been so old, one might
have speculated that he died of a broken heart.
And, alas, the Americans' campaign to oust Iraq from Kuwait has not lived up
to expectations. They have resolutely refused to install a puppet regime
either in Kuwait or in Iraq, as if they had never read any articles by John
Pilger. And now, unforgiveably, the Americans are trying to help the Kurds.
Where is the Machiavellianism in that? Where is the conspiracy? The Kurds
control no oil; they are a destabilising force in Turkey, America's great
hope for the eastern defence of Nato; they have no large American diaspora
to be reckoned with in the future Presidential election.
How can a young man grow into adulthood and maturity if he is being denied
the right to despise American cynicism and moral corruption?
The worst of it is that the Kurds would have been a perfect Cause -
powerless, pointless and primitive. They would have been the best hope of
those who wish to work out their own adolescent self-loathing on a people
who are pathetically grateful for any kind of support at all.
But even that Cause has been appropriated by the grown-ups. The young have
every right to be angry. Go to it, Mr Osborne.
Dominic Lawson is the editor of the Spectator.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4168</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Hawks and Handsaws: A sporting chance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL THOMPSON-NOEL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ON THURSDAY I was chatting to the sports minister in his crimson-flocked
office near St Pancras. I am afraid I didn't catch his name but I am sure it
was the sports minister because of his demeanour and apparel.
His vestments and accessories included: a purple cricket cap, a golf club
blazer, a tie emblazoned with duck-shooting scenes, a stop-watch, three
different whistles, a green swimming towel and a starter's pistol which he
fired in the air now and then, much to my distress.
With him was his political secretary, a fresh-faced youth with a gymnast's
build whom I took, initially, to be a member of the Bruges group but who
proved, subsequently, to be a sensitive soul with special skills in archery,
canoeing, equestrianism and handball.
'Jolly decent of you to have traipsed over here,' said the sports minister
briskly, stirring his coffee and firing his starter's pistol.
'Thing is, my department would like to employ your services as a consultant
to help steer us through the minefield of a British bid to stage the Olympic
Games in 2000.
'As you know, Britain's national Olympic committee meets in London next
Wednesday to discuss whether Manchester or London should bid for the 2000
Games. This is a major opportunity for us all. Good for infrastructure. Get
the country moving. Rally round the flag. But the problems are legion and
mega. Clapped-out infrastructure. Low national morale. Savage political and
regional in-fighting. London or Manchester? Have we got the stadiums? Have
we got the money? Can't afford a cock-up.
'It is because of these imponderables that we have turned to you, Michael.
We'll pay you Pounds 300 per day from now until 2000, plus generous
expenses, so long as you keep us out of trouble and strive with every sinew
to help us stage the most successful Games since Nero visited Olympia and
clean-swept the golds. Now, then, down to basics. How many Olympics have you
attended?'
'Four,' I said. 'Mexico. Montreal. Los Angeles. Seoul.'
'Will you be jetting to Barcelona for next year's Games?'
'Not on your life,' I said. 'Trying to write vivaciously about 28 Olympic
sports, as well as the drugs and politics, takes years off your life. It's
someone else's turn.'
'Good,' said the sports minister. 'That means you can concentrate your
energies on a UK bid for the millennial Games. So which is it to be - London
or Manchester?'
'London,' I said. 'Manchester had its turn when bidding for the 1996
Olympics, but lost out to Atlanta. Anyway, I've never been to Manchester. It
sounds quite dire. Also provincial. No-one's going to want to go to
Manchester in the year 2000.'
'So London it is. What's London's biggest problem?'
'You are,' I said, 'or rather, the government. If London is to stand an
earthly it has got to want the Games badly, has got to do its homework,
prepare a watertight bid - and market it confidently. London's main rivals
are likely to be Paris, Berlin, Sydney and Peking. They won't muck around.
The stakes will be enormous.
'As my friends at Coopers &amp; Lybrand Deloitte said last December after
carrying out a preliminary study of London's challenge: 'Realising a London
Olympics will be far from easy but not impossible. London could win but it
requires a level of unity and co-operation which has not been seen in recent
years.''
'My sentiments entirely,' said the sports minister. He turned to his
political secretary. 'Julian, get me Downing Street. I'll talk to the prime
minister.'
'No can do,' said Julian. 'I tried earlier, but they're all in a dither  -
wavering and wobbling all over the place. John Major is choosing a colour
scheme for his new kitchen but is dithering between citron and vanilla.'
'All right,' said the sports minister. 'Michael, how much money will we
need?'
I said: 'Without getting technical, rather a lot of it. One of the keys to
London's bid will be whether it can promise a surplus on the Games of
approximately Dollars 200m in 1991 dollars which it is prepared to hand over
to the International Olympic Committee. The IOC will want its pound of
flesh.
'On the other hand, there will be plenty of benefits. Talking ballpark,
London will have to spend about Dollars 1bn in present-day money but ought
to engineer a gross income of about Dollars 1.2bn - serious money.'
'Julian,' said the minister, 'get me Norman Lamont. It is essential that the
Treasury backs us every inch of the way.'
'No can do,' said Julian amiably. 'They are going through their books today
and are wavering rather badly. With an election in October there is a lot
they must fudge. They're not answering calls.'
'Michael,' said the minister, 'in which part of London should we stage the
Games?'
I said: 'Forget Wembley stadium. That would be awful. Hold them in Docklands
and the East Thames corridor. Major development is afoot there already, and
you could use the river to link competition sites. But you will have to get
a move on with the planning consents.'
'Julian, get me Michael Heseltine at the environment department.'
'No can do,' said the secretary. 'Even Heseltine is wobbling dreadfully
today. The department has ripped out its switchboard and changed all its fax
numbers. Neither can I get transport, nor any department. They've all gone
to ground.'
The sports minister straightened his cricket cap, blew all his whistles and
fired his starter's gun.
'That leaves us three,' he said. 'It's us against the world. Michael, here
is a Coutts cheque for Pounds 300. Tomorrow, Julian will give you another
one. He will keep that up until 2000. London will stage the Games. Nero
would be proud of us.'
Keith Wheatley and Peter Berlin: Page XI.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XX
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4169</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Arts: Geneva laps up Strauss
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW CLARK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT WOULD be wrong to assume that because Richard Strauss wrote some of his
finest late works in western Switzerland, his music has a special place
here. This season at Geneva's Grand Theatre has nevertheless brought a rich
crop of Strauss performances, including an unforgettable 'Four Last Songs'
from Julia Varady, Daphne with Lucia Popp and now Intermezzo with Inga
Nielsen as Christine. The Suisse Romande Orchestra, like most of its French
counterparts, seems to relish playing the late Romantic German repertoire,
and far from being put off by a quick succession of rare Strauss operas, the
Geneva public has lapped it up.
Performing Daphne in concert solved all the opera's problems: no visual
distractions, no clumsy attempts to make theatrical sense of its awkward
material - the drama seemed perfectly self-contained in the music, briskly
conducted by Christian Thielemann and sung by a first-rate cast. Intermezzo,
on the other hand, falls easily onto the stage and actually needs it. The
dialogue alone paints a shrew, but Christine has to be more than that. Like
most marriages, what goes unsaid in the Storch household - an unsuppressed
tear, a long embrace, a fond glance - says as much if not more than the
everyday banalities of domestic conversation.
Inga Nielsen made much of these unspoken moments, but her Christine showed
only intermittent flashes of the rounded, human personality on which the
opera depends for a successful performance. She boasts a perfectly tuned
swallow-like voice, which soars easily and evenly, without an ugly or
misplaced note. But none of her lines was delivered with much feeling for
words or emotion.
What we were left with was a woman in her prime, who would make the perfect
shrew 15 years later: moody, snobbish, self-absorbed, impulsive, insecure
the moment her husband neglects or ignores her - but just a trifle bland.
Her only redeeming features were an occasional show of tenderness and a
shapely figure (seen to advantage in Silvia Strahammer's elegant, unshowy
period costumes). But that was not enough.
Oskar Hillebrandt's Storch, in contrast, was a three-dimensional
personality. The character, like his dull grey suit, was sincere and lived
in, and the voice sounded crisp and weighty, with all his lines vigorously
pointed. There was first-rate support from Herbert Lippert's large and lazy
Baron Lummer, from Ulrike Steinsky's spirited Anna and from Storch's smoky
quartet of cronies, led by Ernst Gutstein and Dietmar Grimm.
Kurt Wilhelm's production, originally staged for the Munich Strauss cycle in
1988 and since seen in Bologna, has kept its fluency and freshness. The
decor - a cross between a colourful pop-up book and a set of Bavarian Alpine
picture-postcards - copes admirably with the swiftly-changing settings for
each scene, though the Storch household itself could do with more domestic
clutter. Wilhelm sketches in some telling vignettes without ever breaking
the bounds of good taste and judgment. The music, conducted by Jeffrey Tate,
never sounded sluggish, sentimental or inconsequential, but the orchestral
playing suffered from thin, wiry string tone and occasional lapses of
ensemble.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII Photograph Oskar Hillebrandt and Inga Nielsen in Straus's
'Intermezzo' (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4170</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALADAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Arts: This is serious bilge . . .
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ALASTAIR MACAULAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN CASE some of you have not somehow already heard, John Adams's The Death
of Klinghoffer is the new opera about the 1985 hi-jacking of Achille Lauro
by Palestinian terrorists. Its Brussels premiere on March 19 was reviewed
here by Max Loppert, and now it has begun its tour of the globe. It went on
to Lyon and in due course will visit Brooklyn, Los Angeles and San
Francisco. An opera that might have been dedicated to, and at some points
conceived by, Vanessa Redgrave, it is the kind of serious and important
bilge that everyone should see once.
Everyone involved has their better passages. The composer Adams's most
stirring writing is in his choruses and in some orchestration. The director
Peter Sellars's use of huge live video-screens, showing a singer blown-up as
if on TV documentary (shades of Twyla Tharp's Bad News) is striking. Some of
the librettist Alice Goodman's efforts both at vernacular talk and at
lyrical reflection are more successful than others.
But none of this alters the central emptiness and theatrical ineptitude of
this show. Most of Adams's word-setting is drear; even when you can
sometimes make out words and sentences, you lose the drift of paragraphs.
The use of amplification and synthesiser makes us feel we are no longer at a
live performance. Though Goodman's libretto may be influenced by the Bach
passions and certain opera, she is above such petty matters as laying out a
what-happens-next narrative or developing dramatic tension between
characters. And the hand-jive semaphores that Sellars gives his solo
singers, as in his Magic Flute, have neither dynamic sense nor theatrical
dimension.
In this context it is always a relief to see Mark Morris's choreography,
which alone seems to enjoy such basic aspects of theatre as
characterisation, space, rhythmic variety, gestural force. &gt; He is the
greatest choreographer to be working in opera since Frederick Ashton, but
here he is shackled, and his talent obscured.  Morris's most obvious problem
is the monotony of much of Adams's music. But, at a deeper level, the whole
show - even though Morris has long been involved in the planning of it, with
his Monnaie Dance Group - is anti-Morris: by which I mean it is opposed to
what Morris's best work exemplifies.
Time and again, Morris's choreography has shown that his constant theme is
human diversity. In Dido and Aeneas he was both Dido and Sorceress and the
same dancers played, with brilliant differentiation but not a single change
of costume or make-up, courtiers and witches. The point - no-one could miss
it - is to show just how startlingly various each human being can be. 'I am
large, I contain multitudes' could be his motto.
Klinghoffer, by contrast, is about human uniformity; and makes glib swipes
at the West in so doing. &gt; The Prologue is in three parts: chorus of exiled
Palestinians; American family discussing the news; chorus of exiled Jews.
See? Those exiles - they're all the same.
The un-American sentiments of Klinghoffer are, of course, the work of
American artists. The opera tell you nothing about the Middle East but
plenty about white middle-class liberal American guilt. &gt; It displays much
the same thinking as Sellars's Los Angeles Festival did last summer: 'The
American century is over, Eurocentric culture is dead, let's celebrate 'the
other.'' In context of the events of the last nine months in the Middle
East, it is all the easier to see Klinghoffer for what it is: hollow,
pretentious, effete and phoney.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4171</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAC9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Arts: Nat's hard bop
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By GARRY BOOTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NAT ADDERLEY is rarely mentioned without reference to his older brother,
altoist Cannonball. When jazz was getting cool on the West Coast, they were
a part of the East Coast force that stayed with the tougher bop sound: thus
hard bop or post bop. Since Cannonball's death in 1975, cornettist Nat has
kept the faith as well the old line-up of alto, piano, bass and drums. We
should be glad, because at a time when a great deal of diverse music is
grouped under the jazz banner, it is useful to be reminded of how a tough
quintet armed with classic material sounds.
This hard but flexible style flows easily from the Adderley cornet and
altoist Vincent Herring, with his own furious soloing, is the perfect foil.
It's not terribly fashionable but the combination is a hard one to beat in
the swinging stakes.
Neither Adderley nor Herring would have quite such spring and vitality
without the unerring time and accents of drummer Jimmy Cobb and seemingly
haphazard bass strumming of Walter Booker. They appeared to be strange
bedfellows at the Jazz Cafe on Monday: implacable Jimmy Cobb, coiffed and
tidy, has a determined, unexcitable technique which concentrates on the
hi-hat. Booker, a large shambolic man, plucks, strums, bows and gropes his
instrument with abandon. They work together wonderfully. Add in the
insistent piano accompaniment of young Rob Bargad for the perfect
cornet/alto solo launch pad in standards like 'Autumn Leaves' and
'Loverman'.
Adderley is an entertaining performer who likes (and writes) strong
melodies: his style fits somewhere between Lee Morgan and Miles Davis. He
enjoys a tale - it's hard to imagine someone from the ascetic German ECM
stable, say, bragging unashamedly about problems with the Internal Revenue
Service: 'This is my favourite song. I adore it. The royalties have been
tremendous.' He was talking about Work Song, a hooky jazz hit which has been
borrowed by everyone from Nina Simone to Conway Twitty. Nat sold 10,000
copies, his brother 250,000 and Herb Alpert two and a half million. 'I'm
still trying to figure out what I did wrong with it,' says Adderley. Nothing
so far as I can see.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4172</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAC8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Arts: Sinfonietta goes Soviet
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW CLEMENTS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GENNADY Rozhdestvensky is in London to conduct Boris Godunov at Covent
Garden, but his stay has also given him the opportunity to work for the
first time with the London Sinfonietta. It was an intriguing combination,
and one that seemed to have flourished; the Sinfonietta played at their best
for him at the Queen Elizabeth Hall, while Rozhdestvensky injected his
familiar urgency into the performances. Their concert on Wednesday was part
of the South Bank's 'Russian Spring': a programme of four works by living
Soviets that included a first performance and a British premiere as well a
revival of Elena Firsova's thin Chamber Concerto No. 4 from 1989 and an
almost new Concerto for piano four hands by Shnitke.
The brand new piece, Dmitry Smirnov's Jacob's Ladder, was the first
commission from the Michael Vyner Trust, set up to commemorate the
Sinfonietta's much missed artistic director. One might wished, though, for a
more impressive score to set alongside the many great achievements that
Vyner himself commissioned for the orchestra. Smirnov's simplistic brand of
pictorialism - this, like a number of his recent works, was inspired by
William Blake - contains the occasional striking idea but otherwise seems
strictly two-dimensional, a cartoon-like sequence without any of the
surrealism or surprise such a description might imply.
Shnitke's Concerto, written for his wife Irina and Viktoria Postnikova, who
played it together here, was first heard at the Huddersfield Festival last
year. It is a strong, single-movement piece, sombre and introspective; the
keyboard writing is intricate and nervily wrought, and only in the closing
stages is the orchestra allowed to do anything more than comment and
punctuate. There is the familiar kind of Shnitke obsessiveness when the
soloists and then the other instruments seize upon a repeated-note figure
and hammer it into the ground, but otherwise the music seems mysteriously
beautiful and remote.
Shnitke's contemporary, Boris Tishchenko, born in 1939, is scarcely known
here at all; the British premiere of his Third Symphony made a hefty,
50-minute, opening to the programme. It was written in 1966, a year after
Tishchenko completed his studies with Shostakovich, and the ellipses and
bare textures (scored for just single winds and strings) owe much to his
teacher's late style. The lessons were well learnt: the work is compelling
in the skein of pungent, angular themes that make up its first part, and
raptly sustained in the lingering, slowly ebbing contemplation of a single
melody that makes up the second. It was ravishingly played by the
Sinfonietta; 20 years ago Tishchenko was a distinctive, substantial voice of
whom we ought to have heard much more.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4173</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAC7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Arts: Cabalistic secrets - Jackie Wullschlager reviews
'Dibouk]' in Brussels
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JACKIE WULLSCHLAGER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DYBBUK, a malevolent spirit in Jewish folklore, came alive with a
vengeance for the opening of the play named in his honour, Dibouk], when a
vicious smog descended on the auditorium of the Brussels National Theatre.
We coughed and spluttered and strained our eyes until the curtain rose on a
smoke-filled synagogue whose stagey mist had gone further than intended.
Candles flicker, rabbis sway and pray, Talmudic students, side-locked and
skull-capped, bend double over wooden benches and recite as if mesmerised.
In the haze, the outline of each figure is kept fuzzy, like an old
photograph, suggesting a mysterious past about to fade from view. Ghosts,
spirits, cabalistic secrets: seldom does theatre transport you so instantly
to a foreign world as Moshe Leiser and Patrice Caurier's production of this
Jewish folk classic.
Solomon An-Ski, a founder of the Yiddish theatre, wrote The Dybbuk in 1916,
set it in a Polish-Lithuanian village and filled it with images which are
astonishingly close to those of early Chagall: a bride (Evelyne Didi) flying
across the stage, here held aloft by a group of beggars with whom she dances
on her wedding day; the towering figure of the law-giver in black hat and
gown; the romantic violinist; the haunted old man who wanders into the
'shtetl' with a legend on his lips. And as in a Chagall picture, the
supernatural slides easily into the everyday, accepted fatalistically by
An-Ski's chorus of chanters and story-tellers. It makes vivid, exotic drama,
unlike anything in the mainstream European tradition.
An-Ski's tale concerns Hanan, a poor Hassidic student who falls in love with
Leah, daughter of a rich merchant, and dies when she is promised to someone
else. But on her wedding day his soul enters her body and, speaking in his
voice, she rejects her fiance and remains possessed by the 'dybbuk' until a
rabbi discovers a strange and legitimate union between the living and the
dead.
There are some piercingly dramatic moments: Hanan literally dancing himself
to death at the party to celebrate Leah's engagement; the wedding guests
held in motionless horror when Leah screams out under the bridal canopy;
goose-pimpled bridegroom Johan Heestermans failing to smash the customary
glass and reeling in terror as he finds himself on the verge of marrying one
possessed. But most of all, this is theatre of sustained raw emotion and
continuous high-pitched moods. Gestures turn into dances, a meeting becomes
a jig on top of a table. Palms of hands are projected outwards to implore,
defend, insist, damn. Young men whirl and twirl like dervishes and maraude
across the stage in a celebratory conga shrieking 'Mazel Tov' ('good luck').
Music underlines the action; beggars look in on the wedding feast while an
accordion-player out in the cold plays in counterpoint to the violinist
celebrating within. It works as authentic eloquence rather than mere
theatricality, probably because it comes directly out of the Hassidic
traditions of frenzied dancing, singing and praying.
In this context, the more type-cast the role, the better the performance:
Szymon Zaleski as raggedy, feverish Hanan who finds the Talmud 'cold and
dry' but the Cabala 'the way to the heavens'; Jean-Luc Buquet as Heno'h, the
concerned friend who watches in horror as he devours the forbidden lore;
Bernhard Ballet's rich merchant Sender, a Shylock safe and cosy on home
territory. And treat of the evening: the Russian actor Serguei Yourski
playing the larger-than-life old rabbi Azriel, offering wisdom from beyond
the grave like a benign, still-human Commendatore.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII Photograph Igor Ticzka and Roland de Pauw in Moshe Leiser
and Patrice Caurier's production (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4174</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAC6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Arts: Dances with demons - Jonathan Burrows' new ballet,
'Stoics'
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLEMENT CRISP
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
JONATHAN BURROWS and Lynne Bristow stand, leaning slightly backwards, both
wearing trousers and sensible shoes, Burrows in shirt and tie, Miss Bristow
in an anonymous top. Suddenly, prompted by one of Mendelssohn's Songs
without Words, they lash themselves into activity. They stamp, flail their
limbs, involve themselves in what can best be called auto-karate as legs fly
up, arms chop the air. We are watching the start of Burrows' completed
Stoics, and as this maddened, difficult, sharply original dance hits us, we
are held. Burrows' is a language we don't understand, which in fact we do
understand - a Serbo-Croat film without subtitles, whose meaning is clear.
Stoics has been growing over the past year or so in performances at The
Place and elsewhere. What I take now to be the completed work is a series of
incidents for Burrows, Bristow, Deborah Jones, Natalie McCann and Luke
Heydon, all from the Royal Ballet, who involve themselves - intensely,
magnificently - in this world of anguish, impotence, and feelings that bang
and roar and shake their frames, with mad dead-pan humour in a blissful
deconstruction of the Blue Danube. Everything is pared to a minimum - no
set; discreet costume; varied music for piano and harmonium - and everything
is fascinating and, I'd venture, as good as any new dance in the country in
its integrity and imaginative scope. If there are influences on Burrows'
work they range from Kenneth MacMillan at his most uncompromising, and
William Forsythe, to folk-dance (Burrows has, from his very earliest
creations, fed from this source) and the psychic and physical distress of
the people disturbed and frustrated.
In partnership with Lynne Bristow, Burrows seems to explore the mysterious
dependencies and wounds, the long-grown fibres, of a marriage. There is such
sympathy - despite the bruising imagery of the dance - and such acceptance
of each other, that it is as if we are witnessing the story of a marriage (a
theme explored in Burrows' earlier cloudy morning, rainy, mild). In
body-wrenching dances set to Matteo Fargion's two-piano music, Burrows
fights with his own demons, his actual struggle for expression - I am
constantly haunted by the image of autism in his work - a mirror of the
creative process. Lynne Bristow becomes a dead weight to be pulled and
lugged by Burrows and Heydon; Heydon has a home-spun solo that is a morris
dance which loses control of itself; a trio shows Burrows and Natalie McCann
like parents to a retarded or disabled child (Lynne Bristow), caring,
exasperated, loving, manipulating this recalcitrant being.
My interpretations may not be those Burrows would welcome, but there is,
behind all this ferocity and poltergeist energy, a sense of compassion and a
sharp eye for the anguish of life. Burrows is shaping a language which
speaks to the heart and mind. And with the Blue Danube he shows a tremendous
sense of humour as four trolls leap and fall and rampage, with Deborah Jones
gloriously unmoved in expression, like a martyr ignoring her tormentors.
This Burrows season is ended at The Place. A chance to catch the group on
any subsequent tour is not to be missed. Stoics lasts 50 minutes, and says a
great deal about movement. The dancers are magnificent in speed, daring,
purpose. Jonathan Burrows is a true creator.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4175</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAC5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Arts: Church episode - Radio
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BA YOUNG
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ENTHRONEMENT of the new Archbishop of Canterbury has been more of a news
item than that ceremony usually is, with rumours of pop music and so on -
'like a Cup Final,' said the Rev Leslie Griffiths in Thought for the Day.
Interest in the ceremony and the man at its centre was deeper, I suspect,
than it was in the nature of the Anglican Church itself, which Dr Carey now
heads. Radio 3 has scheduled three programmes in which Dr David Edwards,
Provost of Southwark, examines the influence of The Anglican Communion
around the world.
The first of these, on Wednesday, was a descriptive feature, with relatively
little theological moment. Dr Edwards first examined the church in Kenya. We
heard parts of services in Turkana and in Kakamega; in each of them there
was an element of tribal use. Yet in Turkana and Kakamega, adherence to the
Anglican communion is strong and increasing. African tradition is
incorporated in Kenyan Anglicanism, though not where it is clearly wrong,
like killing twin children at birth. Wrong? 'By our standards' must be the
criterion; Dr Edwards might have found time for this point. Is the church
involved in politics? The death of the Bishop of Eldoret in a motor smash
may not have been accidental.
Then to the Anglican communion in America, the Episcopal Church in the US,
or ECUSA. Whereas the Kenya church tends to be strict, ECUSA is liberal. It
has women priests, bishops even, and will 'marry' gay couples, though the
Episcopal Synod of America (also Anglican) is against all this. The new
Archbishop clearly has a widely varied communion before him.
'Moscow] Moscow]' cries Irina in Chekhov's Three Sisters, but no one tells
us anything about Moscow except that it has two universities. (Chekhov's
life, by the way, is in the good serial now being repeated on Radio 4 on
Wednesdays, Literature is my Mistress, Medicine my Wife.) Radio 3 and 4 make
up for Chekhov's reserve, but in differing ways. Michael Ignatieff, on Radio
4's Grand Tour last week, was as keen as Irina, but with actual knowledge.
He likes the hot-water pipes in the Metro stations, the sexy fur-swathed
girls in the streets, the 'achingly beautiful' 18th-century buildings, the
splendid GUM, a kind of state Sainsbury's. He dined in the Praga restaurant,
where the top floors are for nomenklatura. The whores thronging the hotels
are 'in the service of the state', for they bring in the hard currency.
Ignatieff sees it with the loving eyes of his Russian father.
Christopher Hope's two programmes on Radio 3, on Wednesday and Friday, gave
an alternative view. One constantly felt appraised. The Intourist driver was
still learning his job from tapes. The hotels were like detention-centres;
the floor-lady's greeting was 'Good evening, would you like to sell
something?' Voices came through the ventilation-shaft, including the voices
of a Muslim choir holding a service. At the Praga it was almost impossible
to book a table; when one seemed to be booked, it was reserved for the wrong
day. All customers had to wait for a cancellation to leave room. At the
Skaska, out of town, there was 'no need to book', but after an hour's wait
the place had suddenly become full. I expect Michael Ignatieff had better
contacts.
Radio 4's Classic Serial on Saturdays is a real classic this time, George
Eliot's The Mill on the Floss, made into five hour-long instalments by
Michelene Wandor. If you like the novel, you will like the serial as long as
it goes on like last Sunday's instalment. The Tulliver ensemble were as
enjoyably quarrelsome as Eliot made them. Maggie (Hilary Martin, truly
tiresome) has let Tom's rabbits starve to death, and has just announced that
she will run away and join the gipsies. Tom (Richard Pearce) is a genuinely
good-tempered little boy. We meet all those sisters and their foibles, and
Mr Tulliver (Terry Molloy) has his financial concerns with Mrs Glegg and Mr
Moss. Philip Martin is the director, using lots of suitable Mendelssohn
music. Take it from here.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4176</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAC4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Arts: Henry VIII, five hundred years on
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD NEWBURY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ANNIVERSARY of the birth of Henry VIII 500 years ago offers a valuable
opportunity for scholarship and reassessment: happily the National Maritime
Museum at Greenwich has taken the initiative, and is to hold a major Henry
VIII exhibition between May 1 and August 31.
Henry VIII was born in Placentia Palace, which stood by the Thames on the
land now occupied by the Royal Naval Hospital, next to the Maritime Museum.
It was the stage for many momentous events, including the births of his
daughters, the future Queens Mary and Elizabeth, his marriages to Catherine
of Aragon and Anne of Cleves, and later the death of his son Edward VI. The
first section of the exhibition will show contemporary drawings of the
palace by the Dutch artist Wyngaerde.
Three well documented events at Greenwich are the primary focus of the
exhibition: the jousts of July 1517, the reception of the French ambassadors
on May 5 1527 and the presentation of New Year's gifts to the King on
January 1 1538. Relevant manuscripts, paintings and artefacts are to be
combined with elements of reconstruction to evoke these events. It will be
an impressive display, and include a number of Holbein's portraits.
Whilst the exhibition is wisely rooted in time and place, it has ambitions
to explore the wider cultural, political and religious context. Indeed, most
aspects of the reign are only intelligible in a European perspective. Such
an approach will at last sweep away the folklore concerning Henry's appetite
for wives and the wickedness of the dissolution of the monasteries.
The popular perception of Henry VIII's reign has long needed a corrective
dose of modern scholarship, and Dr David Starkey, the historian who has
masterminded this exhibition, is well qualified for the task. His book,
Henry VIII, has helped correct the notion that Henry ruled with despotic
capriciousness. Instead, it emerges that the struggle within Henry's court
between representatives of the old and the new religion, and between the
influence of the old nobility and the bright 'new men', meant that the king
was frequently and decisively manipulated by rival factions.
At the centre of the exhibition is a reconstruction of the temporary
banqueting house, originally designed by Nicolas Kratzer, the Astronomer
Royal, and decorated by Holbein, for the reception of the French ambassadors
at Greenwich in May 1527. This lavish event highlights an important theme of
Henry's foreign policy. In terms of population and wealth England was ranked
fourth in Europe, but Henry wished to cut a figure on the European stage: to
win back, against the rising tide of French power, territories across the
Channel, and to revive the chivalric adventures of the English kings.
Although hindered by lack of money, he was greatly assisted by Wolsey's
genius and, against all the odds, saw himself as the arbiter of European
politics. This plan actually worked, first with the Treaty of London in
1518, in which Wolsey concluded a European treaty; next came the Field of
the Cloth of Gold in 1520, an extravaganza outside Paris in which all
parties promised undying mutual amity. Wars and betrayals followed, but this
was hardly the point: England had achieved disproportionate prestige through
ostentation.
The diplomatic reception at Greenwich in May 1527 was the occasion of a
peace treaty with France, but it was cast as a grandiose design for Europe
formulated by the middling power of England. In the event it was just a
treaty with France, but the gorgeous pageantry and the sumptuous exchange of
manuscripts and jewellery (all to be exhibited) are an indication that
ostentation and grand design bring political rewards.
The fertilisation of English culture by continental, especially French,
influences is another major theme of the exhibition. Many of Henry's
projects were intended to rival those of Francois I; for example the massive
palace of Nonsuch (demolished in the 18th century) was built in reply to
Francois' chateau at Chambord. Although the artistic influence of the
renaissance still lay largely in the future, the spirit of magnificence had
caught the English imagination.
The final section of the exhibition is perhaps the most far-reaching. Henry
was indeed 'the father of the British navy', establishing dockyards in the
Thames and on the south coast. The foundation of the British navy and the
broad acceptance of Anglicanism ensured that, in Dr Starkey's words, 'the
16th century was the last age before our own when England was simply a
European power.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4177</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAC3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Arts: The greening of artists - The pros and cons of charity
auctions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTONY THORNCROFT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ROLL UP, roll up for the great charity art auction. Buy a masterpiece by a
contemporary artist at a knock down price while helping a good cause. Well,
that's the theory and the practice will be tested in the next couple of
weeks, with the Green Contemporary Art Sale taking place at Phillips next
Thursday with the aim of raising around Pounds 200,000 for the Green Fund, a
charity which finances environmental research, and Amnesty International
benefiting on April 30 from an auction at Bonhams.
You can recognise the tender hearted artists by the frequency with which
their names feature in the catalogues - Maggi Hambling, Elizabeth Frink,
Susan Hiller, Sir Hugh Casson can usually be relied upon to give something
and appear in both sales, as do Paula Rego, Tom Philips and Richard Long.
Some artists always refuse, in particular big names like Francis Bacon and
Lucian Freud whose work would bring in serious money. In the main artists
rally round, offering some small sketch, or a drawing, or a print, or a
scrap from the studio, or even producing an etching which can be handed out
every time the begging call comes. The dread spectre of 'auction art' is
starting to stalk the land.
Charity auctions became big business in 1987 when director Nick Serota left
the Whitechapel Gallery well funded by raising over Pounds 1.3m from a
charity auction. He was able to call in favours from all the artists he had
backed over the years, and the prices raised were sensational - records of
Pounds 300,000 for Anselm Kiefer; Pounds 155,000 for Howard Hodgkin; Pounds
32,000 for Sean Scully.
Nothing since has matched this, although Lighthouse, the AIDS charity,
raised Pounds 460,000, thanks to an important Hockney. Auction houses will
still give their services (in the hope of meeting potential customers);
artists are still generous; 'personalities' will still attend - and seldom
bid; but the slump in the art market and the outright opposition of some
dealers has made the work of the organisers much more difficult.
In the main dealers hate charity auctions. They fear that the work of their
artists will sell for less than the market price and undermine their
livelihood. They also see sales escape them. Gilbert &amp; George had to
threaten their dealer Anthony D'Offay with desertion to gain his
acquiescence to give work to AIDS charities. You can understand the feelings
of dealers like Nigel Greenwood when a large gouache by the popular Scottish
artist Adrian Wiszniekwski appears at the Green Sale with a Pounds 14,500
estimate when it would otherwise hang on his gallery walls. Often dealers
feel impelled to attend the charity auction and bid up their artists to
reasonable, or even exotic, heights.
Artists have learned to exploit charity auctions. Some give their work
freely, for the cause, or the hope of being spotted by rich patrons. But
increasingly they split any successful bid with the charity, usually on a
fifty-fifty basis. Since they often get no better deal from their galleries
they are not out of profit and have done some good.
The problem with charity art auctions is that no one is quite sure of their
status. Much of the art given is not of the highest quality and bidding can
be pathetic: Sotheby's most recent auction, for the Worcester Cathedral
Appeal, did not take off. But good stuff can also pass cheaply.
This month's auctions are better than average, especially the Green Sale
which includes an original design by Richard Long, of 97 turf bricks shaped
into a circle; a Christo collage and works by Sean Scully and Glyn Williams.
It could be that a charity auction will restore confidence to the battered
market in contemporary art.
London's 6th International Contemporary Art Fair is open for business this
weekend at Olympia. It is not very international - hardly anything from the
US, France, Italy and Germany, the power houses of modern art; nor
particularly contemporary, with dealers like Peter Nahum showing work which
was hardly fresh 50 or more years ago.
This is because at a time of recession in the art market the organisers
could not be too choosy. Stands were going cheap and there is a warm welcome
for art colleges and charities, small magazines and unrepresented artists,
and for dealers from Brazil and Yugoslavia, Alicante and Tel Aviv.
It actually makes for a jollier spread than usual: not over poweringly large
and very eclectic. The pretension has largely evaporated with the boom and
there are hundreds of modestly priced works on offer which would interest
conservative collectors looking for a tasteful nude, or a flower painting,
or a decorative landscape.
Many of the big London dealers are absent, but Bernard Jacobson holds the
line with works by Spencer, Bomberg, Hitchens and Ben Nicholson (including a
Pounds 650,000 'museum' piece), surrounded by other dealers, like David
Messum, who have reacted to the depression by going down market with lesser
known contemporary artists.
At the opening party 2000 closet art lovers admired each other rather than
the art and red spots were rare, but the RAAB Galley was selling Ken Currie
and Waddington disposed of a Patrick Heron. With so much that is commonplace
on show the more challenging work of the youthful avant-garde made a greater
impact than in the past - especially the squashed daffodils by Anya
Gallaccio, the rolls of piping stacked in a corner by Marie-Jane Opie, and
the light boxes of Catherine Yass, all London Young Artists.
Trade is still very slow, although at least passers-by sometimes stop to ask
the price these days. There must be great bargains at Olympia this weekend.
Five years ago the Contemporary Art Society acquired there a work by the
youthful John Kirby for Pounds 650. This week Angela Flowers sold a recent
Kirby for over Pounds 30,000. Given the current plight of debt ridden
dealers this should be a Fair for buyers rather than browsers.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4178</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAC2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Arts: Drawn to Van Dyck - Homan Potterton is fascinated by
an unexpected group of sketches
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HOMAN POTTERTON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE FLAGS outside the Pierpont Morgan Library, New York announce an
exhibition of Van Dyck drawings and inside, occupying pride of place in the
lobby, is a showcase containing a small bound volume. The burgundy
crushed-velvet covers are laid open and there, on one of the hundred or so
leaves that make up the book, is an awkward drawing of a picture by Raphael.
This is the so-called 'Antwerp Sketchbook'.
Although it is the first item in the exhibition, the book is a
much-discussed work that is not necessarily by Van Dyck. It was brought to
light in 1959 by Professor Michael Jaffe, at Chatsworth, where it had been,
together with Van Dyck's 'Italian Sketchbook', since about 1900. It is an
odd little tome containing recipes for mixing painting materials, childish
arithmetic, drawings - some quite amateur - that are mainly copied from old
prints, and a transcription of a lost pocket-book that belonged to Rubens.
If it is by Van Dyck, it would have been assembled when he was about 16.
When Jaffe first published it, the Van Dyck attribution was immediately
refuted by the foremost authority on the artist's drawings, Horst Vey; but
since then different scholars have come to regard it as the artist's work.
The Morgan exhibition catalogue is inconclusive on the subject: 'puzzling',
it says, while pointing out that 'its inclusion presents an opportunity to
examine it alongside drawings that are indisputedly by Van Dyck'. This is a
bit of 'scholarly' nonsense. As the book is firmly secured beneath its
perspex dome, the chances that anyone will be able to examine more than the
single drawing which is shown are fairly remote.
Taking into account such practical considerations, the British Museum, which
owns Van Dyck's 'Italian Sketchbook', was quite right to refuse to lend it
to the exhibition. 'Too fragile' was its response when the loan was
requested. More to the point, why send 122 pages of drawings across the
Atlantic when no more than two of them are going to be seen?
The 'Italian Sketchbook', the authorship of which is above dispute, is a
pictorial record of the artist's travels in Italy between 1621-27 and it is
a fascinating document: very few Van Dyck drawings from those years survive.
There are five in the exhibition, including a very fine compositional study
for the altarpiece with St Rosalie in Palermo and an unusual sheet with a
cottage on fire sketched in wash on the back of another more finished
drawing.
Many of the works in the exhibition, in fact almost half the entire show of
91 items, are from the artist's early years in Antwerp, between 1617-21,
when he associated with the studio of Rubens. These drawings are studies, in
many cases groups of studies, for several of his most important pictures:
'The Brazen Serpent' and 'The Mystic Marriage of St Catherine', both in the
Prado; 'The Carrying of the Cross' in the Dominican church in Antwerp; and
'The Taking of Christ', a subject which he worked and re-worked in as many
as three different paintings. The sheets document an evolutionary process as
the young Van Dyck attempted to resolve his compositions while still
experimenting with various styles in painting. From one study to another a
figure is moved, a grouping tightened, or a gesture changed: several of the
drawings are finished modelli on which a grid of ruled lines has been
superimposed to facilitate the transfer of the design to canvas. In some
drawings the composition is broadly suggested with blocks of wash. Others
are composed of scratchy pen lines. Bolder studies are actually drawn with
wash while the more finished works may be executed in chalk strengthened
with pen and ink and dashes of body colour. Single figure studies are in
black chalk.
Fascinating though these early compositional drawings are, they are not Van
Dyck's most outstanding achievement and they are greatly surpassed in
quality by the superb portrait drawings included in the exhibition. This is
as one would expect from an artist whose portraits have, justifiably, always
been more prized than his subject pictures. Eleven of these drawings, black
chalk studies of famous contemporaries, were engraved as a series and
published between 1636-41 as The Iconography. Apart from the elegance of the
lines used to depict costumes and gestures and the skilful compositional
variations that the artist achieved within the narrow confines of a
head-and-shoulders study, The Iconography drawings are brilliant studies in
expression: disdain, worry, geniality, kindliness and wisdom are
marvellously conveyed.
Other drawings, free black chalk studies for later portraits - some with
white highlights - are also particularly fine. Several are related to the
artist's most famous compositions: a full-length figure of Henrietta Maria
in rustling silk with the dwarf Jeffrey Hudson as just a suggestion by her
side; a horse and rider, conveyed by a few spare lines, is unmistakeably a
composition sketch for 'Charles I on horseback with Monsieur de Saint
Antoine'; and a sheet with two studies of a seated greyhound is instantly
recognisable as related to the portrait of James Stuart, fourth Duke of
Lennox.
It comes as no surprise that Van Dyck could draw like this. One would expect
that he, the most elegant of painters, would be a refined draughtsman. The
surprises in the exhibition are provided by other drawings, an altogether
unexpected group of landscape sketches and plant studies that date from the
1630s. Two of these, almost like etchings in their precision, depict the
town of Rye: one is actually dated August 27, 1633, in the artist's own
writing and probably records his passing through the town on his way to
crossing the Channel. Among the other drawings in this group one is a formal
plant study with an inscription in Flemish, possibly by Van Dyck, that
identifies the various species; but the most arresting of all are three
unfinished watercolours with trees in a landscape that must have been
painted out of doors. As such, they are forerunners of the great English
watercolours of more than a century later.
Although several landscape paintings by Van Dyck are recorded in the
inventories of early collections, none is known today. But the existence of
these exquisite watercolours makes one wonder, had the artist survived
beyond the age of 42, might not landscape rather than subject painting have
been - next to portraiture - his greatest forte? Something else to puzzle
about.
The exhibition, which ends tomorrow, moves to the Kimbell Museum, Fort
Worth, Texas, from June 1 - August 11.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVII Picture A black chalk, pen, brown ink and brown and grey
wash study for 'The Mystic Marriage of Saint Catherine' (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4179</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAC1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Books: More Bergman than Byron
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM ST CLAIR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BYRON: A NOVEL by Sigrid Combuchen Heinemann Pounds 14.99, 518 pages
ON 15 June 1938 the tomb of Lord Byron at Hucknall in Nottinghamshire was
opened and photographed. Home Office permission to enter the vault had been
obtained by the local Member of Parliament on the pretence that a point of
mediaeval archaeology was being investigated. The Byron family also gave
their sanction - the then lord expressing his hope that a great family
treasure would be discovered and returned to him. In a book full of cant and
self-justification published in the following year, the Rev Canon Barber
reported that nothing unexpected was found. One of the other curiosity
seekers, it emerged later, noted that the poet's sexual organ showed quite
abnormal development, although whether the witness had wide enough
experience to make such an assessment is open to question.
The incident is the starting point for an ambitious novel, Byron, A Novel
written by the Swedish author Sigrid Combuchen, and now published in
English. Ms Combuchen imagines a group of Byron enthusiasts each preparing a
biographical study of some aspect of Byron's life for the 150th anniversary
celebrations. Among the themes chosen are the poet's relationship with his
half-sister Augusta, his first visit to Greece, his life as an exile in
Italy, and the final days at Missolonghi when his doctors killed him off.
The opening of the tomb is a pleasing metaphor for their attempt to
resurrect the truth about the dead man, although it does not itself feature
directly in the story.
The structure of the novel is highly episodic, jumping between 1938 and
Byron's own time. The chapters take the form of passages of narrative
interspersed with imagined contemporary documents into which the author has
woven genuine historical material. There is little or no story line, and the
episodes selected are not in chronological order. The allusive style assumes
that the reader already knows a good deal about Byron and his friends, but
the author makes no claims to literal accuracy. She imagines, for example, a
conversation between Mary Shelley and Claire Clairmont at Byron's funeral,
although Claire was in Moscow at the time.
Some of the inventions work well. Ms Combuchen has caught the characteristic
mixture of deference and liberalism which marks the diary of Byron's friend
Hobhouse. She enjoys bold phrasing. The miners' houses in Nottinghamshire
are never ending, ugly, like a queue of refugees. A diamond is yellow as
urine. But, possibly as a result of the translation, some passages are so
poetic as to be scarcely understandable, and can anyone imagine Byron
thundering at Augusta 'I am your sibling' ?
The author's imagination is more visual than literary. She offers frequent
descriptions of the scenery and portentous storms are plentiful. A favourite
device is to shift the focus from the people to their dogs and cats,
creating atmosphere rather than character. The hero emerges as all gloom and
mist, more Bergman than Byron. There is little of the charm and the fun, the
keen sense of irony and the delight in the ridiculous, which produced the
greatest comic epic ever written, and which shines through the merest of the
letters of the real man.
The novel has been awarded several literary prizes in Sweden. It is now
translated for nine European countries with the help of a grant from the
European Commission. I admire the author's knowledge, her skill, and her
courage in attempting something different. I fear, however, that her book is
more likely to be commended than enjoyed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4180</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAC0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Books: High jinks at the Gargoyle - A gossipy book about the
club's owner and founder, David Tennant
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANTHONY CURTIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
DAVID TENNANT AND THE GARGOYLE YEARS by Michael Luke Weidenfeld &amp; Nicolson
Pounds 20, 211 pages
MEARD STREET is one of those insignificant little streets hidden in the maze
of Soho. If you approach it from Shaftesbury Avenue up Dean Street it is the
one on your left after Old Compton Street. It was here, from 1925 to 1982,
that the Gargoyle Club - a kind of English counterpart to the smart bohemian
cafes of pre-war Montparnasse - stood firm. The Gargoyle was founded, owned
and run by the Hon. David Tennant. He relinquished control in 1979. It
lingered on for a few sad years, becoming a disco hosted by David Ogilvy
before it shut up shop.
From the start the Gargoyle was a hit with the artistically gifted, the
well-connected, and all their groupies. It had not one but at least three
heydays. The first was throughout the 1920s and 1930s, its poshest period.
The members would all wear evening-dress and the principal rooms were
adorned with two of Matisse's finest paintings, 'The Red Studio' (now in the
Museum of Modern Art in New York) and 'The Studio, Quai St. Michel' (now in
the Phillips Collection in Washington DC).
It was through Matisse that the Gargoyle acquired what anyone who visited it
at any time remembers about it, the design of the ballroom-restaurant.
Tennant explained to Matisse that he planned to give that principal room a
coffered Moorish ceiling painted in 22-carat gold-leaf. Matisse said he knew
of an 18th century chateau whose contents, then being sold, included some
tall looking-glasses which could be cut into thousands of small-squares and
set into the walls. The effect was, as Matisse had calculated, eclatant.
More like a Klimt than a Matisse in the event, but stunning.
The second heyday was during the Second World War. Like the nearby Windmill
Theatre, the Gargoyle never closed. Its survival, in pristine form (in spite
of a Nazi bomb or two nearby) meant that the club could serve as a chic
up-market refuge for war-weary members. Those still working in London or on
leave were able to step back into a world where the pre-war dream could
still be recovered for an oblivious few hours.
As the title to this readable, gossipy book suggests, Michael Luke weaves
the story of Tennant's private life around the chronicle of the club. When
it began, he was married to the actress Hermione Baddeley, a star of
intimate revue, whose vital presence in the Gargoyle after the show was as
regular as his. Tennant's own dream was shattered by the war. He found life
in the officers' mess boring and suburban after the high-jinks of the
Gargoyle. He only discovered his true wartime niche when he became a cook in
the Small Vessels Pool of the Merchant Navy.
After the war the Club entered upon its third heyday with an influx of new
members from the art-world, Lucian Freud (once described as the Agony in the
Gargoyle), Francis Bacon, Colquhoun &amp; MacBryde. A regular nightly floor-show
was a marital row conducted across the dance-floor by the actor Robert
Newton and his wife Natalie.
The club was where the Fitzrovians went to continue drinking after closing
time: not J. Maclaren-Ross - his territory was strictly circumscribed by the
Wheatsheaf in Rathbone Place - but other writers, Dylan Thomas, Ivan Moffat,
George Barker, Elizabeth Smart, would make their unsteady way across Oxford
Street to Meard. Smart defined the Club's peculiar appeal for her and many
others: 'There were all those passions: people falling in love with each
other and somebody's wife was there with somebody else and things of that
kind getting out of hand which made it lovely. There was nobody sitting
there just munching.'
Luke reminds us that David Tennant's mother (born Pamela Wyndham) was one of
the luminaries of the Souls, the high-minded Edwardian coterie. Some of its
spirit he finds transmitted to the Gargoyle, which however, he rightly
insists, was not an elite. Anyone with a contribution to make to the
perpetual party could join the Gargoyle. It was a place where people talked,
danced, drank excessively, behaved badly and no one minded, least of all the
proprietor.
An exhibition of paintings 'The Artists of David Tennant's Gargoyle Club
1925-1952' opens at the Michael Parkin Gallery, Motcomb Street, London, on
April 24 and runs until May 10.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI Photograph Tennant on holiday with his second wife, Virginia
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4181</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Books: Crime
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM WEAVER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A LITTLE Gentle Sleuthing by Betty Rowlands (Hodder &amp; Stoughton, Pounds
11.95. 269 pages) is a first novel by a clearly gifted and knowledgeable
writer. The book is not without its flaws - a few too many red herrings -
but it is never less than engaging and readable.
Familiar situation: city woman, on her own takes a country cottage to lead a
new and quiet life. Well, you can imagine how quiet that life proves to be.
The rural sitting is generously and effectively described, and there is a
good assortment of minor characters.
Make a note of the name: Betty Rowlands.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4182</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Books: Little matters of life and death
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARY HOPE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BEGINNING TO END by Stanley Middleton Hutchinson Pounds 12.99, 233 pages
THE QUEEN OF THE TAMBOURINE by Jane Gardam Sinclair-Stevenson Pounds 13.95,
227 pages
THE MIDDLETON formula is as gruff and abrupt as ever: Clark, a young teacher
arrives at one of those schools where excellence still prevails, in a
greyish Midland town. On the way to his digs he helps Stapleton, a sick old
man, who invites him to his home. Stapleton is a retired solicitor, whose
well stocked mind is a curmudgeonly match for Clark: they trade and identify
literary references.
Stapleton's daughter, Jenny, is quietly assertive, self-possessed,
emotionally untouchable; she introduces Clark into a circle of provincial
acquaintances who weave a tempting dance around him. In the background there
is a puzzling, unexplained suicide. Pearson, one of the circle, an
unfulfilled teacher, dies in a stupid drunken accident. Stapleton dies.
Clark rejects a former girlfriend because of her individual character; at
the end of the book he is set, tentatively, to marry Jenny.
Middleton's narrative modesty and lack of adventure mask one of the most
authoritative voices writing today. Nothing very exciting ever happens in
his novels: but then nothing very exciting ever happens in most peoples'
lives. The real drama, as he has always shown, is the way in which people
struggle to realise their own emotional and moral truth and to deal with
others with the same rigour. In addition there is the little matter of death
to cope with. For Middleton, compromise is death, either spiritual,
emotional or natural: the premature deaths in this novel are of men who have
not fulfilled their own expectations: 'people talk of some private sense of
not coming up to the mark'.
Education is not just a setting that Middleton (the ex- schoolmaster)
handles best: it is the whole matter of the book. Life is education, and the
liberal conferences, quotations and assessing tropes are all there to hammer
home the message. All this may sound desiccated, tedious, pompous, but
reading Middleton is not like that at all. Apart from his meticulous
exactitude of setting - the provincial paraphernalia are cherished rather
than scorned in the Cooper/Braine/Amis mode - the conversations have the
oblique cadences of reality, a lightning allusiveness which teases out the
complexities of human converse, spoken and unspoken. And at the core of the
book, there is a reference to the Red Cross Knight of Spenser's Faerie
Queene, 'a hero who was not constantly victorious, who himself needs
rescuing, who is put to training in a hard school': the reference to Clark's
initiation into the moral universe is obvious. Middleton's novels are also
hard schools, and, for that reason, profoundly rewarding.
Jane Gardam's new book is painful, fluent and witty, an account of a
mid-life crisis which provides the opportunity to dissect a suburban, middle
class life which must be familiar to many readers. Eliza Peabody is
beautiful, religious, rich, witty, childless, temporarily husbandless - and
fifty. She writes a series of letters to a neighbour who has abandoned her
family and taken off to the East: disapproval turns to envy. Eliza's letters
are a witty commentary on her own condition, and a searching examination of
the lives trapped beneath comfortable Wimbledon exteriors: a brave woman
writer with erring husband, a mother wrapped up in her children's exam
results, a chaotic curate's family, a nouveau riche film couple. But there
is trickery: Eliza's situation is gently revealed to be more complex as her
state of mind begins to worry the neighbours. Hints are dropped; an
eccentric, independent spinster admonishes 'Face what you know. Grow up.'
The unravelling of Eliza's history is a masterly piece of literary and
psychological trompe l'oeil: her projections are slowly disentangled until,
at the end, a very different picture emerges. The only constant is her clear
vision of a certain life: 'I suppose I was only observing in you what was to
be seen less dramatically in many women of our age . . . boredom and
knowledge. The rich, middle class, educated Englishwoman, tired at last by
the rigours of mid-stream life, looking in the glass in the morning and
seeing the face of a middle-aged woman look back. And unable to greet her.'
This is a skilful tour de force, almost a psychological thriller, buoyantly
told and uncomfortably hard hitting beneath the stylistic intention.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4183</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Books: No such thing as a hero
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN AMIDON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE REDUNDANCY OF COURAGE by Timothy Mo Chatto &amp; Windus Pounds 13.99, 408
pages
IN THESE days of a 'New World Order', it is perhaps as good a time as any to
spare a thought for the woebegone people of East Timor. Located at the end
of the Indonesian archipelago, this small island was brutally annexed 15
years ago by its giant neighbour, just seven days after winning independence
from Portugal. Since then, Indonesia has ruled the purloined island with a
singular ruthlessness - some 200,000 Timorese are reported to have perished.
The West has hardly raised a word of complaint, keen not to alienate
Indonesia's obliging dictator, Suharto. For some, the new order is little
more than the same old song.
The Redundancy of Courage, Timothy Mo's fourth novel, is his attempt to
humanise this catastrophe, to flesh out the moral quandaries inherent in all
such tragedies. Although he has fictionalised the situation by calling the
victors the malais and the vanquished the Danuese, there is little doubt
that Mo's novel is based closely on East Timor, right down to the colourful
berets sported by the conqueror's murderous forces. In it, Mo tells the
story of Adolph Ng, a homosexual Chinese hotelier who is drawn reluctantly
into the conflict. In the days after the malais invasion, Ng literally
accommodates the enemy when his posh resort is used as HQ for an enemy
commander. When Danuese guerrillas raid the hotel, Ng is forced to join
them.
For four years he wanders the hills of Danu with the rag-tag army under the
leadership of the charismatic Osvaldo Oliveira and his dour, pious brother,
Martinho. Ng transforms from an effete nuisance into the guerrilla's leading
sapper, devising booby traps that create havoc among the malais.
Despite the giddiness of these military successes, Ng grows disillusioned
with the rebel cause, particularly after Martinho defects to the enemy and
Osvaldo orchestrates a brutal atrocity against native prisoners. The
hotelier-turned-guerilla is eventually taken captive, saving his skin by
becoming houseboy to the bored wife of a malai colonel. In the end he wins
his freedom with an act of betrayal against the rebels he once fought
beside, ending up wandering various Western cities, having learned the hard
lesson that 'resistance was futile and bravery superfluous', a lesson
tempered only by the thought that there will always be a new generation of
Danuese to carry on the battle.
Despite a wealth of detail, authenticity of character and nobility of
impulse, The Redundancy of Courage never really achieves its necessary
power. It is simply too diffuse to grip the reader, with overly detailed
descriptions of military hardware, meandering pace and Ng's flat narration
combining to bog the story down. Mo also has trouble bringing home the
novel's message, which seems to be that, although courage may be redundant
in facing down certain intractable forces of domination, it does sow the
seeds for future generations to overcome repression and injustice. 'There's
no such thing as a hero,' Ng finally realises, 'only ordinary people asked
extraordinary things in terrible circumstances - and delivering.'
It is a perfectly sound point, though Ng's eleventh hour recognition of it
seems strangely muted, tacked on to this pessimistic story rather than
implicit in it. Precious little that happens to our unpleasant narrator - so
cynical, so bent on saving his own skin - prepares either him or us for this
epiphany. His valedictory sentiments ring hollow, making the novel not quite
as lucid or powerful as its urgent subject requires.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XVI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4184</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / How to Spend It: Bath - A civilised place to take your
pleasures / Lucia van der Post browses, shops, eats and samples the glory
that was Rome in an English city
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LUCIA VAN DER POST
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS hard to imagine a better city than Bath for a weekend jaunt. It seems
just the right size for a city - offering enough bustle to make one feel
interesting things are happening but not so much as to jangle the nerves.
It is large enough to offer civilised pleasures such as fine food, art,
theatre and galleries, yet it is small enough for even the idle visitor to
encompass most of it on foot.
In these tough times, with hotels hustling for custom, there are special
'leisure break' terms to be had but, long before the marketing departments
dreamed up the phrase, Queen Victoria, Admiral Nelson, Charles Dickens, Jane
Austen and William Wordsworth, knew it was a better place than most to
visit.
Its architecture and its beautiful yellow stone combine to lend the city a
particularly mellow air - where are town planners such as John Wood the
elder and John Wood the younger today? - so go and have a good look at it.
Marvel (or marvel again) at the Royal Crescent, the Roman remains, drink in
Mr Pickwick's pub and track down the home of Chaucer's Wyf of Bath. After an
hour or two of taking in the sights a curious thing begins to happen - the
happy visitor begins to notice that le shopping, whether of the real or the
window variety, begins to seem like the agreeable past-time it used to be
and not the hassle it usually is.
Appetite and enthusiasm is regained. It all begins to seem like fun again.
This is partly because of the nature of the shops, for Bath is rich in
one-off speciality shops, places like Walcot Reclamation and Papyrus, Walcot
Woollies and Ironart, all of which seem to be run by people who care in a
personal and attentive way. It is also related to the scale of the buildings
and the streets. Many of the most welcoming parts have been turned into
pedestrian areas so that wandering around never seems too daunting and
nothing much is out of reach.
Whether you start from the outer edge (as we did with a group of antique
shops in London Road) and work your way in or head for the centre (around
the Roman Baths and the Abbey) and work your way out makes little
difference. Wherever you turn there are streets and alleyways to be explored
and shops that seem to offer much more than the standard chainstorefare that
is all most city centres can boast.
Walcot Street is not to be missed. It does not have the classical beauty of
some of the most famous streets and crescents but it has to be the main
haunt for all those who love to rummage and browse. Camden Books is one of
those secondhand bookshops that you could lose yourself in for days.
Ironart of Bath, at no 61, specialises in ornamental ironwork and, although
the range is limited - mainly seats and benches for gardens or
conservatories - it is exceedingly elegant.
Illuminated Objects, at 78, is the place to visit if you have despaired of
finding the lighting of your dreams - a mix of old and new, there are new
glitzy chandeliers and delicate glass ones from the time of Napoleon. There
are desk lamps and torcheres, table lamps and sconces.
Walcot Reclamation, at 108, is where you go for a grand marble fire
surround, or a pair of giant stone lions, or a stained glass window rescued
from a decaying country mansion.
A vast yard is filled with reclaimed pieces snatched from every part of
house and garden from the destructive hands of the so-called restorers and
the modernisers. Not too difficult to rummage around as garden furnishings,
doors, windows, fireplaces etc are well-labelled and separately stored.
Antiques:
The problem here is one of choice - you could spend weeks browsing in the
shops, arcades and surrounding areas if your feet and purse could stand it.
If you love nothing more than ferreting round in antique shops you might
like to note that from May 16 to 18 the Bath and Badford-on-Avon Antique
Dealers Association will be holding its second Decorative and Antiques Fair
at The Pavilion, North Parade Road. It is open from 11am to 8pm on May 16
and 17 and on May 18 from 11am to 6pm. It is a marvellous opportunity to see
a wide range of antiques under one roof gathered from dealers in the
surrounding areas as well as from the city.
Here, though, are a few suggestions of where to start in Bath itself:
There is a market every Wednesday at Guinea Lane where you can root around
for old jewellery, silver, shawls and quilts. Every Saturday stallholders
fill the old cattle market with their wares, offering everything from junky
old costume jewellery to nearly-new sweaters and bits of pine. The Great
Western Antique Centre in Bartlett Street is open every day except Sunday
and there are specialists in almost everything from pine furniture, silver,
pictures and jewellery to old linens and ceramics.
Pennard House Antiques, 3/4 Piccadilly, London Road has a good selection of
French provincial fruitwood furniture. In the same building are Robin &amp; Jan
Coleman's antiques where you can find more decorative pieces. Pennard House
will put together round tables to order from old bases and tops made from
local elm or pine.
Anthony Emm, York Street, is where the serious buyer with serious bucks
should head. Here you will find museum quality furniture at competitive
prices.
Collectable Costume, at 6 Bladud Buildings, is for all those who love old
costumes, textiles, linen and lace. There are beautiful plain white quilted
18th century bedspreads - made from cotton as tough as any you find today -
lace-edged bedspreads and tablecloths, embroidered pillowslips all at
reasonably friendly prices. It is also the place that film-makers head for
in search of authentic period clothing. And, if you have a grand fancy-dress
party coming up, Collectable Costume could provide you with the right
outfit.
Penny Philip, 5 London Street, specialises in antique textiles ranging from
toile de jouy to bedlinens or fine pieces of tapestry.
D. &amp; B. Dickinson in New Bond Street, is the place for antique silver of
every kind.
Those looking for something a little more contemporary should aim for Milsom
Street where the beautiful once privately-owned houses house some of the
smartest shops as well as Jolly's, the department store.
Shire's Yard is a sensitively done new development, filled with chic shops.
In all the streets and alleyways around the cathedral there are lots of tiny
shops selling everything from special fudge to contemporary ceramics and
jewellery which shopaholics should enjoy exploring on their own.
Papyrus, in Broad Street, is tiny but filled with paper as beguiling as
anything that comes out of Florence. Lovely writing paper as well as files
and cards, boxes and other delights.
Caroline Smiley, 9 Green Street, sells sumptuous baskets and urns filled
with her own dried flowers. Bright blue delphiniums, hydrangeas and lavender
were there in abundance - she'll do arrangements in your own container to
order and in from time to time she also runs courses on dried flower
arranging for those longing to make their own.
Global Village, 4/5 Green Street - do not be put off by the name - is an
eclectic mix of enchanting things for the house. Here a tribal rug from
Afghanistan, there a wrought-iron chair, here a lawn green bench for the
garden, there a lantern-shaped lamp. All goods are clearly chosen by a very
clever eye and seemed fairly priced.
Rowlands of Bath, Green Street, is where the pukka country set obtain their
kit - shooting stockings, cord knickerbockers, loden coats and waxed cotton
jackets.
What to see:
You will need more than a weekend to see everything that is worth seeing - a
good excuse to go back - but here are just a few suggestions:
You shouldn't miss the Roman Baths (why else, after all, is the city there
at all?), the Pump Room, the Abbey and Sally Lunns' House (the oldest house
in Bath but take my advice, unless you're reed thin, give the famous bun a
miss - not worth the calories.) Then there is the theatre. There are
pre-London productions as well as touring companies but you usually need to
book ahead (tel: 0225-448844).
No serious walker could miss Pulteney's Bridge, designed by Robert Adam in
1770 and named after William Pulteney, 1st Earl of Bath.
The Museum of Costume, housed in the Assembly Rooms, is one of the largest
of its kind while the Museum of English Naive Art is a 'must' for all fans
of folk art. The American Museum at Claverton Manor is as good as a visit to
Washington. The official guide to the city is well worth the 75p it costs
and gives addresses, opening times, two excellent 'walks' and lots more
besides.
Where to Stay
The Bath Spa Hotel, Sydney Road, Bath, Avon BA2 6JF (Tel. 0225-444424) has
the great advantage of having the air of a country house hotel while
actually being within easy walking distance of the town.
Acquired by Trusthouse Forte when they took over Anchor Hotels it has
emerged after a Pounds 22m, 3 1/2 year face-lift, with all the hallmarks
essential to membership of the country house hotel set - the four-poster
beds, the swagged chintz, the antiques and flowers dotted about, the bowls
of fruit and lush dressing-gowns, the tennis court and leisure centre, the
starry chef straight from Hong Kong's Mandarin Hotel.
It is very comfortable, the food is very good and if you take a leisure
Break (ie any two consecutive nights over the weekend) you pay just Pounds
99 per person per night for the room, table d'hote dinner, breakfast and VAT
instead of Pounds 150 per night for the room only (but no breakfast, dinner
etc).
If you want to be really out in the country (as opposed to just feeling as
if you were) then Lucknam Park Hotel at Colerne, Wiltshire, (tel:
0225-448276) would be hard to beat. Set in just under 300 acres, it is a
beautiful Palladian house, serenaded by beech trees with four-poster beds,
swagged chintz . . .
Where to eat:
Lots of wine bars and small restaurants for light lunches and snacks during
the day. At night you will probably want something a little more
celebratory. Popjoy's, next door to the theatre, in Beau Nash's old house,
Sawclose (0225-460494), brings an agreeable sense of occasion to the
business of dining out (Popjoy's, I'm sure you'd like to know, celebrates
Beau Nash's much-discussed romance with a certain Juliana Popjoy). Theatre
buffs can eat either before or after the show.
The rooms are rather grandly proportioned, with fires in the grates and, as
for the food, that is pretty good, with an interesting, carefully-prepared
menu that makes the Pounds 22.50 table d'hote seem fair. If you like to eat
grand hotel style, with all the attendant comfort, grandeur, space and
service, then the Bath Spa Hotel and The Dower House Restaurant at the Royal
Crescent Hotel offer interesting menus - at a price. If you like something a
little more intime, try Garlands, 7 Edgar Buildings, George Street,
(0225-442283) which specialises in fish and is slightly less expensive.
Guides and tours
Guide Friday, which has its head office in Stratford-on-Avon (0225-444102),
runs excellent tours of Bath. But, if you hate groups of any kind, you could
see if Caroline PJ de Estradas is free - she did a splendid job for us and
seems to know everything there is about Bath and the surrounding area. She
charges Pounds 65 for a half-day hour - 24 South Avenue Oldfield Park, Bath
BA2 3PY. (0225-421465). There is a bus that runs around the city and you can
buy a ticket which allows you to get on or off at any point.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XV Photograph Up above the Roman baths (Omitted). Photograph A
noble bust from Walcot Reclamation (Omitted). Photograph Caroline Smiley in
a bower of dried flowers (Omitted). Photograph Antique linens, snowy and
collectable at Collectable Costume (Omitted). Photograph Antique chandelier
from Illuminated Objects (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4185</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Food: Lisbon: where the fishwives rule '. . . As bad a
tongue, if it be set on, as any oyster-wife at Billingsgate . . .' -
Although strongly influenced by Spain, Portugal has a cuisine of its own.
Weekend FT food and wine writers sample its traditions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS WOODSWORTH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHAKESPEARE may have had it right. From Billingsgate fish market to ports
and docksides on the far side of the world, fishwives can be creation's
crudest, most foul-mouthed creatures. But the dramatist and I differ in our
basic approach to the women who stand behind fishy-smelling market stalls.
As a lover of good language, he had little sympathy for them. As a lover of
good fish, I do.
I doubt if Shakespeare ever made the short walk down the Thames from the
Globe theatre to Billingsgate fish market at an hour and season when
fishwives are apt to be at their crudest, foul-mouthed worst. Not long ago I
left a comfortable bed to wander the Lisbon waterfront at just such a moment
 -three o'clock on a cold winter's morning. I can report that compared to
the tempers most of us would develop while messing about with slippery, iced
fish on a rain-swept morning, the mood displayed by these much-maligned
women remains a model of reason.
Whatever the Bard's opinion of fishwifery, it is an honourable profession.
The Portuguese, I found out, do not denigrate their fishwives as we do ours;
they value them highly. But then neither do the Portuguese abuse fish as we
on this scepter'd isle do. Not for Lisboans batter-coated fish fingers,
mushy peas and soggy chips - they do with fish, I discovered, what
Shakespeare does with words.
For some reason there are few Lisbon fishwives over the height of five feet
two inches. They are tiny, wrinkled, baggy women with kerchief-covered hair
and little disposition for fashion; they wear heavy skirts below ragged
pullovers or anoraks, tie plastic aprons around non-existent waists, and
display raw, red knees and hands that look freshly skinned. Nonetheless, on
the wharves of the Tagus River beside Lisbon's main market, the Mercado da
Ribeira, they are undisputed queens.
Later on in the day this market will see more than 1,000 men and women at
work piling crates of oranges and lettuce, making pyramids of big yellow
squashes, and carrying great sacks of carrots balanced on their heads -
fresh fish, meat, poultry and vegetables are all sold in vast quantities
here. But at 3 am this is the private realm of the fishwife, the purveyor of
some of the most sought after foods in the country.
Down at the water, where strong winds whip the waves of the Tagus estuary
into a dirty brown froth, fish arrive by boat and lorry from ports up and
down the Portuguese coast - from Nazare, Peniche and Avero to the north of
Lisbon, from the Algarve, Sesimbra and Setubal to the south. Packed in ice
in shallow crates, the catch - some of it still wriggling - is rattled on
trollies over rain-splashed cobbled streets to the dock's main auction hall.
It may be hard to detect, but there is some order among the scores of women
milling about here in the glare of white-tiled surfaces and bright
florescent lighting. Shouting, cajoling, mocking, and gesticulating, they go
about their business with all the lusty energy and forcefulness they and
their sisters everywhere are famous for.
Some pile crates of fish high on to weigh-scales, others drag them along the
floor with metal hooks, while still others make vigorous inspection of their
contents. Chapped hands stroke the dark striped bodies of sea bass. Noses
pinched with cold sniff at the gills of red mullet. Practised eyes measure
the length of long, flat scabbard fish coiled into their crates like so many
lengths of silvery fire hose. Nylon string sacks of clams and mussels; crabs
with claws stopped open with wooden pegs; chocolate-dark lobsters that will
soon be flaming red; all come in for intimate perusal and evaluation.
The night's vital moments come when individual lots of fish are put up for
auction. Here, as in much of the rest of continental Europe, bidding for
fish is made on descending, rather than rising, prices. The successful
bidder is she who makes the first bid as the auctioneer progressively lowers
the price for the item on offer. As a system it is as fair as the one we
know, but it does introduce a greater element of tension; instead of having
multiple chances to bid for a lot, the potential buyer has only one.
That the women are bidding for turbots and conger eels rather than Turners
and Constables does not make the auction any less interesting for those
involved. As in any other domain of public activity in Portugal, connections
and personal prestige count for a good deal at the fish market. Many of the
fishwives, as an alternative to selling their auction purchases directly to
market customers, act as buying agents for Lisbon's hotels and seafood
restaurants. Here the politics of fish buying can be bloodthirsty and
unforgiving. As every Lisbon restaurateur knows, having a fishwife of power
and influence fighting on your side can make or break you.
Curiously, Portugal's most popular fish can be found at the market but is
not on sale at the fish auction. The cod or bacalhau so beloved of the
Portuguese is not bought fresh but heavily salted and dried as stiff as a
board. Requiring up to three days of soaking before use, it forms the basis
of more than 300 dishes, making inspired use of such simple ingredients as
potatoes, onions, eggs and olives. Not so long ago the humble food of poor
Portuguese living inland and unable to obtain cheap, protein-rich fish any
other way, bacalhau has today taken on prestige status and is found on the
most elaborate of menus.
Once the waters of Newfoundland's Grand Banks teemed with cod and for six
months every year were home to a large Portuguese fishing fleet. Today,
however, the Banks are overfished and the fleet is depleted. Much of
Portugal's cod is purchased from Norway. Of the country's 11,000 working
boats fully two thirds are powered by oar or sail, and only about 100 are
deep-sea vessels. Steeply rising cod prices have now put bacalhau out of
reach of the people whom it originally benefitted.
Fish nonetheless remains a staple of most Portuguese people. But few popular
dishes, no matter how modest, bear any resemblance to the horrors that issue
from that most English of institutions, the fish and chip shop.
Fisherman themselves boil up huge kettles of fish soup on the beach using
sea water, onions, garlic, tomatoes and part of the day's catch. All over
the country, fresh, fat sardines are cooked out in the streets by village
women using small grills made of baked earth; accompanied by a glass of
refreshing vinho verde, they make a delicious summer meal. Even that most
frugal of poor man's dinners, acorda de mariscos, is a delight; requiring
nothing more than the addition of an egg, fresh coriander and the water in
which shrimps have been boiled, it transforms yesterday's stale loaf into a
fragrant bread stew.
After my early morning exertions at the fish market, I felt I had earned
something more than bread stew. I took a local train out to Cascais where
the Tagus meets the open sea. No longer just a quaint little fishing
village, Cascais is home to some of the most elegant fish and seafood
restaurants in Portugal.
Here you can listen to Atlantic rollers pounding the beach, and watch
high-prowed, brightly-coloured wooden fishing boats bobbing on an even more
brightly-coloured sea. More importantly, you can do all this and at the same
time sit at a restaurant table and choose from among the best and freshest
fish in the world.
I went to a restaurant named after its owner, Joao Padeiro, a man celebrated
as a minor god in Cascais for the quality of his fish. After a bowl of Senor
Padeiro's shellfish soup and a plate of his reknowned fried sole, I, too,
celebrated all manner of minor gods. Not least among them was that array of
little ladies who begin their day rather early at the Mercado da Ribeira.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV Photograph Catch of the day, Portuguese fishermen bring home
the spoils (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4186</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Wine: Smart enough for dinner - Appetisers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS LANDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IT IS a sign of the oh-so-changed times that Sogrape, the company that once
made such a success of supplying us with oceans of sweet pink Mateus Rose,
is now exporting some of Portugal's arsenal of exciting indigenous grapes,
in fermented and bottled form. It and others are at long last able to supply
wines with exotic flavours but made to modern, world-class standards of
cleanliness and drinkability within a normal lifetime.
Maria Gomes may sound like a comfortingly good cook but is in fact the
peachy yet crisp grape variety from which Sogrape's white Bairrada 1989
Quinta de Pedralvites is made.
With a label discreetly smart enough for the dinner table, it is Pounds 5.79
at Oddbins and would go swimmingly with rich, creamy pates. JR.
Guy Bossard is best known for his organic Muscadet but his Cabernet
Franc-based red Vin de Pays des Marches de Bretagne, also produced without
recourse to the agri-chemical industry, is one of the most charmingly fruity
reds I have tasted in a long while. This is no heavyweight and should be
drunk over the next few months but the importers' price of Pounds 47.40 per
dozen bottles seems a snip - though it will go up the week after next.
Contact organic wine specialists Vinceremos of Ossett, West Yorkshire on
0924-276393 for a versatile red that should beguile served at a wide range
of temperatures with or without food. London stockists include Peppercorn's
Natural Food Market of 2 Heath Street, NW3 and Alara Wholefoods of 58
Marchmont Street, WC1. JR.
Two London wine fairs open to the public: one is at wine merchants Bibendum
in Regent's Park Road, NW1 and takes place today from 10am until 8pm. It
features Neal's Yard cheeses and Charles Carey oils as well as expert wine
advice and tastings including Taittinger champagne. Entry is free. At The
Great Australasian Wine Tasting at The Old Horticultural Hall, Vincent
Square, SW1 on Saturday May 11, the entry fee costs Pounds 10. Tickets to
what claims to be 'the largest range of Oz and NZ wines ever assembled for
one tasting in the UK' are available from The Australian Wine Centre, 50
Strand, WC2 or on 071-925-0751. JR.
The Andre Simon Memorial Fund was established in 1972 to perpetuate the name
of the man who did so much for gastronomy in this country. Every year awards
are made to the authors of books on food and drink. This year's awards were
announced on Wednesday at the Fishmonger's Hall, London, and the food award
winner was Jill Norman for The Complete Book of Spices (Dorling Kindersley,
Pounds 14.99). Jill is a contributor to the Weekend FT's Food and Wine page.
The award for the best wine book was won by Burton Anderson for The Wine
Atlas of Italy (Mitchell Beazley Pounds 25).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4187</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Wine: The search for authenticity
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICHOLAS LANDER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FOR THE 20,000 Portuguese who live in the UK, recommending a good Portuguese
restaurant in this country is becoming more difficult. According to Joao
Henriques, who works at the Portuguese Government Trade Office, in New Bond
Street, last year saw the closure of the two best Portuguese restaurants in
London, Ports in Beauchamp Place and Fogareiro in north London. All that
remains are Aquarios, open evenings only at 62 Porchester Road, (tel:
071-221-7188) and Caravela, the sole survivor of what was once a triumvirate
of Portuguese restaurants in Beauchamp Place.
A lunch at Caravela (071-581-2366) seemed to highlight why Portuguese
restaurants have failed to appeal. The staff could not have been more
accommodating and the food did improve with a tangy creme caramel and
excellent coffee. The rest of my meal, however, and the contents of the
menu, showed little imagination; caldo verde, the cabbage-based soup,
bachalau cooked four different ways and one or two different ways with
chicken and pork.
However, one enclave of Portuguese gastronomy does survive in the Golborne
Road, London W10 in the form of the Lisboa Delicatessen at No 54
(081-969-1052) and opposite, at No 57, the Lisboa Patisserie (081-968-5242).
The delicatessen offers all the ingredients for an authentic Portuguese meal
at home. Salt cod at Pounds 3.35 per lb; different types of sausage from
Pounds 2.80 to Pounds 4.50 per lb; a salty Portuguese goats cheese, and the
popular Queija de Serra at 3.75 per lb. More eye-catching and lively is the
patisserie. Portuguese come and go, talking and smoking under a poster of
their homeland. Prices for the cakes, which include Portuguese delicacies
pastel de Nata, pastel de Coco and Bolas Berlin, are very reasonable.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4188</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Cookery: Helpings for the hearty
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIPPA DAVENPORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PORTUGAL is not the place to go to if you are trying to lose weight. The
Portuguese have large hearts and large appetites to match. They like to tuck
in twice daily to fulsome meals, and tea and cake shops beckon in between.
The influences of nouvelle cuisine, if they exist, were not evident during
my brief visit. I met only homely comfort food, plainly cooked and simply
presented, much of it good. Chaps who have never really grown out of nursery
food will love it, and of course you can move straight on to sticky Elvas
plums and glasses of port when there is no nanny to chivvy you about eating
up everything - although I doubt that many will want to leave out the creamy
cinnamon and lemon-scented rice pudding.
The Portuguese make excellent soups (most meals begin with soup) and
first-class bread. I particularly liked the heavy maize-meal loaves, white
of crust and golden crumbed.
Maize was one of the vegetables brought back from the New World, along with
tomatoes, peppers and potatoes. All these are vital to Portuguese cooking
now, as are the spices seafaring traders returned with from the East, but
the vegetables we were served most often were roots and cabbage.
I bet the Portuguese word for garden is cabbage patch. They have a variety
of cabbage that is all their own, couve gallega. It ought to be a national
emblem, like the Welsh leek, so ubiquitous is it. When finely shredded it is
central to caldo verde, probably the nation's favourite soup, and it is
often mixed with potatoes or moistened bread to make a version of migos,
another hugely popular dish, this one a sort of Portuguese
bubble-and-squeak.
Two of my most vivid images of Portugal concern cabbage. First the sight of
them growing. Every other house seems to boast a single tall row of them.
Standing sentinel by the gate, on long leggy stalks with their large
loose-leafed heads undulating in the breeze, they appear to wave you on your
way.
I saw them a second time in the market, vast squeaky green piles of them
being stuffed into manually operated slicing machines. The machines looked a
bit like my old fashioned meat mincer but were as large as the grinders in a
coffee merchant's. The cabbage emerged as fine as grass cuttings, was packed
into bags and snapped up by shoppers as fast as it was prepared.
Kale is probably our nearest equivalent to Portuguese cabbage, spring greens
can be substituted at a pinch, and I dare say a Whitehall secret service
letter shredder would slice them suitably finely, though you can of course
chop them by hand.
The other convenience veg I found in the market and have not seen elsewhere
was massa de pimentao. This looks disconcertingly like tomato ketchup, but
is in fact a flavoursome paste of skinned and pureed red peppers seasoned
with a little garlic and salt and drizzled with oil so that it will keep for
a couple of days.
Turnip tops, harvested before the root ball is formed, are another favourite
vegetable, while fresh green coriander leaves are the best-loved herb.
Fruit stalls were piled with citrus of all sorts, grapes, figs (including
the best dried figs I have ever tasted), quince and pomegranates.
Driving east from Lisbon towards the border with Spain, through the regions
of Ribatejo and Alto Alentejo, the fertile countryside grows increasingly
lovely. Cork oak and olive groves flourish, eucalyptus shade the road and
quinces fruit grow in the hedgerows. The whitewashed villages are Persil
clean and postcard pretty. Signs of highly mechanised agriculture are few.
We stopped at a farm where I saw my first pomegranate tree. Indulging my
whim, the good natured owner allowed me to climb the tree to pick the fruit,
which I did and promptly fell to the ground. That was ignominious enough.
What was worse was the discovery that I had brought a couple of branches
crashing down with me, crushed under the weight of my Portuguese acquired en
bon point. The taste of that ultra-fresh fruit was exquisite.
The contrast between countryside and capital was marked. I did not stay long
enough in Lisbon to explore it so maybe I did not give myself the chance to
be charmed. But one night was long enough to be appalled by the noise and
the traffic, and long enough to be impressed by the police. I mean a
restaurant of that name, O Policia (tel: Lisbon 76.35.05). This is no
sophisticated city slicker of a place but an unpretentious establishment.
The decor is uninspired but the service is friendly and efficient and the
food was the best I ate in Portugal.
Appetisers included a fine example of presunto ham, neither too dry nor
salty, a creamy ewe's milk cheese, and miniature salt cod fishcakes.
However, the best dish by far, outstanding by any standards, was a richly
savoury casserole that is a speciality of the Alentejo region.
The idea of combining surf with turf has never really appealed to me before,
though I confess I am not averse to steak and kidney pudding with a few
oysters slipped under the crust just before serving, but the Portuguese
marriage of pork with clams as achieved by the kitchen at O Policia was full
of excitingly subtle flavour. Here is my attempt at making this splendid
dish, based on the recipe given by Edite Vieira in The Taste of Portugal
(Robinson Publishing):
PORK WITH CLAMS Serves 4-6 - depending on whether appetites are Portuguese
or modest British.
Loin or leg of pork weighing 2 lb after the rind and bones have been
removed; 2 lb Venus clams; 1 large onion; 3 garlic cloves; 1 tablespoon
sweet paprika; a bay leaf and 2-3 sprigs of parsley; 8 fl oz dry white wine;
2-3 teaspoons wine vinegar; 1 oz lard; 2 tablespoons or so olive oil; 1
tablespoon maize meal or oatmeal.
Chop then crush the garlic to a paste with the paprika and a teaspoon each
of salt and olive oil. Cut the pork into large bite-size chunks. Toss it in
the paste to coat it. Pour on the wine and vinegar. Cover and leave to
marinate overnight.
Drain and dry the pork, reserving the marinade. Let the lard and a couple of
tablespoons of olive oil sizzle in a flameproof casserole or heavy-based
stewpot. Add the meat, colour it all over and remove it.
Chop the onion and fry it gently for five minutes. Return the pork, pour on
the marinade, add the bay leaf and parsley. Cover and cook over a gentle
flame until the meat is perfectly tender. Use a simmer-mat, turn the meat
occasionally and add a splash more liquid if necessary.
While the meat cooks, prepare the shellfish. Fresh clams lack the barnacles
and beards of mussels but they tend to trap a lot of sand in their shells.
To rid them of this, put them into a bucket of cold water, add salt and a
little maize or oatmeal and leave for half an hour. With luck they will open
and feed, disgorging sand in the process. Repeat using fresh salt water and
meal.
Discard any clams that do not close their shells when tapped. Put the rest
into a pan with a few spoonfuls of clean water. Cover and cook for a few
minutes, shaking the pan occasionally, until the clams open.
Throw away any clams that do not open. Add the rest, still in their shells,
to the pork and pour on the juices from the clam pan, straining them through
a muslin-lined sieve. Cook for a few minutes more and check seasoning before
serving with plenty of good bread, preferably Portuguese cornbread, or
boiled or steamed potatoes.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIV Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4189</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Travel: Cut-price US holidays
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CHURCHILL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
FLORIDA is still experiencing a downturn in bookings but the good news is
that this has led to a spate of special offers. UK holidaymakers still
appear reluctant to commit themselves to long-haul American travel so soon
after the end of Gulf War hostilities.
Leading tour operator Cosmos is cutting the prices of all its Florida
holidays this summer: best deal is a 14-night fly-drive holiday to Orlando
at a cost of Pounds 299 per person, based on four people travelling, which
represents a saving of Pounds 100 against the brochure price. Other Orlando
holidays, including accommodation, between May and mid-July have also been
reduced.
Cosmos's price cuts have been caused partly by its need to stimulate
bookings following its decision to pick up much of the capacity which the
failed International Leisure Group had already secured in Florida. It is
also offering flights to Florida from Cardiff, south Wales, for the first
time.
Jetsave, which specialises in US holidays, is cutting prices to Orlando
between May and mid-July (just before the school holidays start). Return
flights to Orlando have been reduced by Pounds 100 to Pounds 279 per person.
Early birds visiting travel agents next week can book a British Airways
Poundstretcher holiday to Orlando for Pounds 375 - saving about Pounds 185
per person on the brochure price - if booked before 10am through most travel
agents.
Orlando is the single most popular long-haul destination for Britons -
nearly 1m went there last year - mainly because of the attraction of Walt
Disney World.
Closer to home, Euro Disney, outside Paris, is due to open on April 12 next
year. Disney has started selling special commemorative passes to the new
theme park at Pounds 20 for adults and Pounds 15 for children aged between
three and nine from its new store in Regent Street, London.
When the Royal Scotsman pulls out of Edinburgh's Waverley station at the end
of the month it will forsake its usual journey around the Scottish Highlands
and travel south for the first time.
The train, aimed at providing tourists with a luxury look at Britain - there
are mainly continental visitors following the dearth of US tourists to
Britain this year - is touring as far as Bath on public and private track.
Enthusiasts may baulk only at the price: Pounds 2,900 per person for the
six-day journey, although all costs are included. Further details:
071-730-9600.
While many country house hotels are feeling the chill of the recession, some
are responding to the downturn in trade with new initiatives. Historic House
hotels are three country houses which have banded together to offer short
breaks not only in up-market surroundings - they all date from the 18th
century - but also close to other stately homes or castles. Middlethorpe
Hall in York, Bodysgallen Hall in north Wales, and Hartwell House near
Aylesbury, Buckinghamshire, are offering a two-day stay at Pounds 188 per
person in one of these hotels as well as a visit to a nearby historic house.
Further details: 081-747-4003.
Children are being courted by cruise companies seeking to increase
Mediterranean bookings after the Gulf war. P&amp;O Cruises is offering free
places to children under 12 who join their parents on Canberra's 13-night
Mediterranean cruise next month. Fares for adults start at Pounds 895.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XIII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4190</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Sport: The dinosaur is not extinct - yet / English soccer's
bid for the World Cup
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER BERLIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE ARCHAIC English soccer administration is like a brontosaurus. Now, the
pea-sized brain in the head has decided to make an evolutionary lunge toward
the 21st century. The pea-sized brain in the tail, however, is quite happy
staying in the 19th century.
The Football Association is the oldest soccer federation in the world. It
has overall responsibility for almost all soccer in England from the
lowliest park league up. At the apex sits the Football League, the oldest
professional league, made up of 92 clubs. Between them they run soccer as
they have for more than 100 years. The financial demands and opportunities
of the modern game have almost ripped the League apart twice in the last
five years. Now the two bodies are fighting for control of the top
professional division.
The FA runs the England team which revived dreams of national glory during
the World Cup in Italy last summer The World Cup inspired the FA and the
League in other ways. The competition was played in a collection of
glamorous modern stadiums, built or rebuilt with Italian government money.
It attracted corporate sponsors in swarms, drew a worldwide television
audience of billions and made a profit of Pounds 70m. The two English
organisations agreed to make a bid to host the 1998 competition and they are
still struggling to keep in step in spite of their recent falling-out.
There are six other would-be hosts for the '98 competition: France,
Switzerland, Brazil, India, Portugal and Morocco. Fifa, world soccer's
governing body, demands that the host country has at least eight and
preferably 12 stadiums with a seating capacity of 30,000 each, plus suitable
infrastructure.
The hosts to a modern World Cup need to be able to accommodate, transport
and police a huge influx of players, officials, media and fans. They need a
television system which can broadcast all games. The host also needs a
government which will underwrite the competition and a large population of
domestic fans who will pay to see the games.
Portugal and Switzerland are too small. Morocco and India might command the
support of African and Asian nations, but will probably fail Fifa's tests.
The Brazilians are bidding out of turn: two consecutive World Cup's in the
Americas would be against custom. That leaves England and France as the two
front-runners. They are closely matched.
England, however, will struggle to meet some of the conditions. Apart from
Wembley stadium there are no soccer grounds in England with 30,000 seats. In
theory, all league grounds will have to be all-seater by 1994 in line with
the Taylor report on safety in soccer grounds.
In practice, little seems to be happening. Kirton says that clubs are
conducting feasibility studies and waiting for the first instalment of the
Pounds 100m over five years that the government has promised.
Applying the FA's rule of thumb that two standing spots converts into one
seat, only six or seven grounds would be able to seat 30,000 and four of
them are tightly bunched in Liverpool and Manchester.
If the English bid is to offer the necessary geographical spread of
stadiums, someone is going to have to find a lot of cash. Clubs such as
debt-ridden Newcastle United, in the north east, cannot afford the work
themselves.
In Italy government money built the stadiums. But in England local
government rarely regards football clubs as a source of pride and, until
last autumn, the central government had shown a marked hostility to both
public funding and to soccer. The arrival of a self-confessed Chelsea fan in
Number 10 Downing Street has helped change that.
The transformation of English soccer's image during the three weeks of the
World Cup last summer also helped. At the start England was the nation of
soccer hooligans; by the end it was the winner of the fair play trophy.
Kirton and the FA dismiss the question of hooliganism. He says: 'Hooliganism
is no worse here than in any other European country. When Fifa is looking
for expert advice on hooliganism it comes to us.'
Since last summer the relationship between the FA and the League has grown
strained. Just when the FA wanted to build on the England team's success the
League voted to increase the size of its first division by two teams. This
would mean four more matches a year; more revenue for the clubs but more
work for the overstretched players.
The FA's has responded with a piece of bureaucratic jujitsu, turning the
greed of the League's members against it. Clubs in an independent premier
division would no longer have to share revenue with clubs in the lower
divisions. They could exploit unified marketing and a monopoly supply of top
quality soccer for television and the type of sponsors which would dovetail
handily with the FA's World Cup plans.
Clubs would have money to invest in players and stadiums. In return the FA
would gain power over the top teams and force them to put the needs of the
England team first.
The League argues that the large number of professional clubs is a source of
English soccer's popular support and of many of its best players. Of the 13
players who appeared in England's international against Ireland only one,
Tony Adams, started his league career with one of the big five.
English soccer must change and if the FA can reign in the greed of biggest
clubs its 'Superleague' might well be the base for a thriving England team
and a realistic World Cup bid. But its readiness to sacrifice the smaller
teams to the carnivorous tendencies of the big clubs is a bad start. The FA
could be next on the menu.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4191</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Motoring: Three stars, one winner
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STUART MARSHALL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BUSINESSMAN'S express was a handy phrase coined when one could drive as fast
as one liked on motorways. Those days have gone, except on Germany's
autobahnen, yet the term persists and manufacturers keep introducing them.
A businessman's express is a saloon car that will transport four people and
luggage in comfort and relative silence at speeds of up to 155 mph (250 kmh)
 -almost twice the 130 kmh (81 mph) French limit.
The three latest are the Vauxhall Lotus Carlton (alias Opel Lotus Omega),
Mercedes-Benz 500E and Ford Scorpio 24v. All are luxuriously trimmed and
much more powerful versions of everyday executive cars.
They get their extra muscle in different ways. The Carlton's 3.6 litre
in-line six is twin turbocharged and intercooled to develop 377 horsepower
against the 204 bhp of the General Motors engine on which it is based.
Mercedes-Benz's solution is the simplest - perhaps the best. A standard 32
valve, 5-litre, 326 horsepower V8 as used in the 500SL is shoehorned under
the bonnet of a 300E saloon. There are no turbochargers or intercoolers,
just an intelligent engine management system to minimise fuel consumption
and exhaust emissions and stop the most leaden footed driver exceeding 155
mph (250 kmh).
Ford, too, eschews turbocharging for its Scorpio 24v. With Cosworth
Engineering it set out to extract as much power from an off-the-shelf 2.9
litre V6 as was compatible with reliability, refinement and driveability.
All three have catalytic converters, use unleaded petrol and meet the
strictest anti-pollution regulations. They have stiffer suspensions, uprated
anti-lock brakes and wider wheels. Vauxhall and Ford have limited slip
differentials, the Mercedes-Benz 500E a full-blown electronic traction
control system.
Mercedes-Benz 500E and Scorpio 24v buyers can only have 4-speed automatic
transmission. The Lotus Carlton has a 6-speed manual box with no automatic
option and bizarre overall gearing. In sixth, 1,000 rpm equals 43 mph (69
kmh). This may make for tranquil cruising but first gear is so high, and the
clutch so heavy, that anyone but a weightlifter would find traffic driving
miserable.
I will not repeat my comments about the Carlton after I drove it last
autumn. its aerodynamic aids make it look as aggressive as a helicopter
gunship. It is the last car most businessmen would want to drive in a city
centre or motorway tailback. In spite of that, 180 orders have been taken.
The 500E is a different car. It is for sophisticated buyers with deep
pockets (or understanding finance directors) who do most of their driving on
the Continent. It is a limited edition assembled by Porsche and only
available with left hand steering.
There is little to show it is not a normal Mercedes 300 except for slightly
lowered suspension and bulging wheel arches to accommodate fat, ultra low
profile tyres. Even though it is good for 155 mph (250 kmh), it is innocent
of the air dams and boot lid spoilers other makers feel are obligatory on
quick (and quite a few not very quick) cars.
The Ford Scorpio 24v, too, gives no outward sign of its extra power (195 bhp
compared with the standard engine's 150 bhp). Though an Inter City 125
express rather than a French TGV among cars, it is good for 140 mph (225
kmh). All one can see are the most discreet of bootlid badges and squat,
short-sidewalled tyres.
By far the best of the three is the 500E. This is as it should be. At Pounds
57,220 with cloth seats it is more than twice the price of a Scorpio (Pounds
27,893 with optional leather), Pounds 8,175 dearer than the hide trimmed
Lotus Carlton (Pounds 49,045). Whether inching along in traffic, cruising
silently on the motorway or devouring miles on cross-country roads, the 500E
was the perfect driving companion. It accelerated like an executive jet and
gave a sense of overwhelming power, always under perfect control.
If the Scorpio 24v did not reach the same heights it was agreeably
responsive and snappy, with an excellent driving position and sharp turn-in
on corners. Being quite high geared it was mechanically relaxed on motorways
though I found the transmission disconcertingly eager to downshift into
third at 80 mph (129 kmh) on slight gradients.
Both Mercedes-Benz 500E and Ford Scorpio illustrate the perils of cosmetic
tyre fitments. The manufacturers seem to think business drivers will feel
cheated if their performance-boosted cars do not have such ultra-wide tyres.
The 500E's squat, 55 series Dunlop D40s give a huge amount of grip, instant
steering response and a surprisingly good ride. Tyre noise is muted, too.
But the downside is what they call 'tramlining'. The wide footprints make
the tyres try to follow tiny imperfections on the road surface. Even on
apparently smooth motorways you can never sit back and let the car follow
its nose.
This lack of straight-line stability is about the 500E's only fault. In
every other respect it is a superlative machine. It is no longer fashionable
to say so, but a large engine and automatic transmission in a chassis
designed for high speed driving are the makings of a really fine car.
The Scorpio's stiff suspension and even fatter 50 series Pirelli P700 tyres
give a driver handling and cornering capability he can not responsibly
exploit off a circuit. There is nothing wrong with the suspension's basic
shock absorbency. But he (I can not imagine any businesswoman being
attracted to such a car) has to put up with an unacceptable level of noise
on all but the smoothest roads.
Even worse is the impossibility of making the Scorpio keep a straight line
on a motorway. I cannot think of any high-performing executive-class car
more fidgety and inclined to tramline. A less aggressive and slimmer tyre
might make the car look less macho. But it would, I am certain, be nicer to
drive.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI Photograph Refined performer, Mercedes-Benz 500E, a
medium-sized car with a big engine (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4192</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Sport: London plans PR marathon - The capital's plans for
the Olympic Games
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEITH WHEATLEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEXT Wednesday a decision will be taken which could turn every Londoner into
a marathon participant. That day the British Olympic Association decides
whether to adopt London as its candidate city for the Olympic Games in 2000.
If the answer is yes, a gruelling propaganda campaign against rivals such as
Peking and Berlin will grind on for nearly three years. Around Pounds 8m,
Pounds 1 per inhabitant, will be spent simply to convince the 92 grandees of
the International Olympic Committee that London deserves its favour.
Leading proponents such as athlete-turned-politician Seb Coe argue that to
host the Olympics would put Britain back on the international sporting map
in a way that individual gold medals - such as his own - never could. Others
agree. 'There's an awful negative complacency and lethargy about
international sport in Britain,' says Kate Hoey MP, who is likely to become
sports minister if the Labour Party takes office.
Figureheads such as Coe, Hoey and Richard Sumray (chairman of the London
Council for Sport and Recreation) share youth and enthusiasm. There is an
unspoken view that for too long British bids to host the Olympics have been
the preserve of portly, sober men in grey suits - powerful either
municipally or commercially. Denis Howell, spearhead of Birmingham's bid for
the 1992 Games, must have been the apotheosis - or nadir - of this process.
'People who are involved in sport don't like losing and we've been beaten
badly in the cases of Birmingham and Manchester', says Hoey. 'Because I'm
new to the process I'm keen to get tough and get on with it.' Hoey acted as
honest broker in January to bring two warring factions within the London bid
together.
Coe is still the name most people associate with London's campaign. Barely
had Manchester been eliminated - with five votes - in the IOC vote for the
1996 Games in Tokyo last September than Coe announced London's candidature.
David Teasdale, his business partner, says backroom planning had been under
way for months. 'We kept it secret for fear of hurting Manchester's
chances,' says Teasdale, formerly Britain's top civil servant in sports
administration.
The secrecy meant there had been no liaison with a rival London group,
largely public-body based, and the months of public wrangling before the
shotgun marriage did not enhance Coe's reputation as a diplomat.
Coe, a member of two Olympic commissions, is uniquely well-connected within
the Olympic movement. Yet his celebrity could be a minus. In the monster-ego
world of the IOC members, dealings with anyone except the head of the bid
city are regarded as a little second-rate. During the three years of the
Manchester bid its chairman, Bob Scott, was said by friends to have aged 10
years because of the seven-day-a-week meeting-and-greeting.
Scott - a far more ebullient and clubbable man than Coe could ever be - is
far from certain how easy it is for the central personality to delegate his
papal aura. 'If you are an IOC member you desire to be courted by the boss
from the minute you arrive in his city and you are offended if it doesn't
happen,' he says. During Manchester's candidature nearly 65 IOC members
visited the city. 'The more famous the boss is, the more of a problem it
becomes.'
The big question hanging over a British bid is whether the Olympics is
winnable. 'We have a clear analytical view that you could never win with a
provincial city,' says Teasdale.
Anyone with the slightest knowledge of how the IOC behaves would tend to
agree. London is a glamorous place to spend the best part of a month in
mid-summer. In an organisation where snobbery and a sense of place are
endemic, the chance to attend receptions at Buckingham Palace or the House
of Lords would sway votes.
'I believe and always have done that London is the key to any chance of
Britain holding the Games,' says Sir Brian Woolfson, head of Wembley
Stadium. 'For the rest of the country it would be an Away-day Olympics.'
Would London be ready to pay the full price of attracting votes from IOC
members?In Tokyo the Princess Royal blew the gaff about the gifts - she
refrained from using the dreaded word bribes - passed to IOC members from
candidate cities. It caused a storm, for a few months, and the committee
decided to investigate financial malpractices by a minority of its members
on visits to candidate cities.
Charging twice for airline tickets, expecting to be compensated for
jewellery 'stolen' from hotel bedrooms, and bringing multiple 'guests' are
just a few of the more common ramps practised by IOC members during the last
bidding round. There seems little reason to believe that London would not be
expected to join in. However, Princess Anne, wearing the hat of the BOA
president, has said 'no goodies'.
Sumray, contemplating a dilemma that seldom arose when he chaired Camden
council's social services committee says: 'Atlanta won on its merits and so
shall we.' Accountants Coopers &amp; Lybrand produced a report assessing
London's chances and why a city wins the Olympics. It said: 'Atlanta . . .
was far and away the most creditable package and offered the best Games . .
. Professionalism and profits count for more with the IOC than sentiment and
history in current bids for the Games.'
Of the two realistic sites in London for facilities and Olympic Village both
have problems. Wembley has resonance, history, and - as Woolfson points out
 -could be made into a state-of-the-art stadium for infinitely less than the
cost of a new building.
'There is no economic case for building a new 80,000-seat stadium in Greater
London,' he says. 'It would be totally impossible for any commercial
operator to do such a thing and I don't see the government having any great
enthusiasm to run such a project at a huge loss year after year.'
However, the declared route for the London Olympics bid is the final
undeveloped stretch of Docklands, to the east of the Isle of Dogs. An
Olympic Village would add 30,000 beds at an estimated cost of Pounds 450m
(three times London's present annual expenditure on new accommodation). An
athletics stadium is planned for Silvertown.
Coe, Teasdale and their fellow directors say that they are in talks with
developers such as Mowlem and Olympia &amp; York, and have the London Dockland
Development Corporation as an interim partner during the feasibility stage.
Yet without central government underwriting, it all looks terribly
uncertain. Manchester discovered to its cost that the IOC were not
particularly keen on travelling to look at a derelict site next to the ship
canal to be told that this was going to be a wonderful stadium and shown the
model.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI Photograph Docklands dream, the Olympic flag flutters over
Seoul. Will it fly in London? (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4193</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Motoring: The lager louts of the press - As they say in
Europe
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES MORGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE BRITISH are often seen as the lager louts of the international press
corps. At this week's inauguration of the European Bank for Reconstruction
and Development that sentiment gained further currency among officials who
felt the new bank was roughly handled by the UK media.
There was a certain lack of respect for idealistic ambition and a philistine
inclination to sneer at the elegant ideological constructs of better
educated races. In fact the official newspaper of the conference, Conference
News, even managed to get itself banned for sneering at Jacques Attali, the
president of EBRD.
In France things are different. Le Monde headlined its editorial 'A Bank for
Europe.' It pointed out that the idea was French and that it had been put
together in a mere 18 months. Providing certain conditions were met, 'The
bank will play an extremely positive role as a 'catalyser' of funds.'
But the British are not alone. In the leading Italian business paper, Il
Sole 24 Ore, Alessandro Merli wrote that the EBRD, 'Was born of the Gallic
imagination, typically inclined to grandiose projects, of Jacques Attali,
the intellectual and former adviser to President Mitterrand, and now head of
the bank.' In the face of the hype, John Major, the British prime minister,
'had made a few simple observations. The west could not instill by its own
will reform in the east.' And the Bank had to put 60 per cent of its money
into private enterprise 'which is small and could suffocate in the fresh air
of competition.'
Signor Merli used a light touch of the rapier. His German opposite number,
Klaus Engelen of Handeslblatt, adopted an altogether rougher approach. He
quoted Georg Krupp, a Deutsche Bank director, who said: 'The East Europe
Bank must itself first find out what it is to do.' Engelen continued: 'So it
is with all unwanted children. Once it is there, it has to be accepted and
cared for.'
The Germans have never quite got over the Anglo-French carve-up which
ensured a Frenchman ran the bank in London. They always wanted Onno Ruding,
the solid Dutch finance minister, to be in charge.
But the French have won another victory - in Czechoslovakia at least. There
the EBRD is known by its French initials, BERD, and its arrival was
acclaimed by the intellectual Prague daily Lidove Noviny under the heading
'Attali - Man with a Vision.'
'It is the first pan-European institution where all the countries of the
continent will sit as equal,' the paper said.
But in Slovakia things are a little different. There the papers argue that
free markets are all very well for the Czechs but not the Slovaks, who
depended heavily on arms exports under the Communists. So it is that the
Slovak Communist Party can enjoy a modest level of popularity as its
newspaper, unoriginally called Pravda, is able to satirise the new system in
some rather funny cartoons.
There is a general search for an alternative to capitalism that isn't
socialist. In Zagreb last week I picked up a copy of Nedeljna Dalmacija, the
kind of newspaper one never sees outside its local region. In it a Tihomil
Radja suggested that Croatia's problems could be solved by a return to a
system 'that hasn't been known for 50 years - mortgages.' Croatia's foreign
debt of Dollars 2.9bn could be paid off by mortgaging Croatia. And money
would pour in for it would be based 'on the soundest asset of all -
property.' This model also fulfilled a particular need for the part of the
world - allowing a highly decentralised economy. There seem to be a few
problems; for example it is not possible for foreigners to own property in
Yugoslavia. This might discourage potential mortgage holders, so I fear the
EBRD will have a hard job getting its message across in some client
countries.
The relationship between Hamburg's heavyweight, Die Zeit, and 'Tory Party
General Secretary Chris Patten' continues to blossom with another half page
on the 'Architect of Renewal.' Patten has recently shown himself a devotee
of the social market economy as practised by the ruling Christian Democrats
in Bonn.
The Germans are always glad to find a foreigner whose interest in them lies
outside the period from 1933 to 1945, but Patten may not be entirely
grateful for this interest. His admirer, Jurgen Kronig writes: 'The contrast
with his predecessor Kenneth Baker could not be sharper: Baker operated
rather greasily, preferring to play on the keyboard of demagogy which really
pleased only the faithful.'
Which brings me naturally to the answer to the competition of three weeks
ago Nobody won. Le Monde had noted the unwitting contribution the new
British government had made to European Unity. What was it? It was the
increase in VAT to 17.5 per cent which meant that Britain was no longer
among the low VAT countries.
This ensures that the vision of Nigel Lawson, the former UK chancellor, of
Community tax harmonisation through competition, has been blown apart.
Lawson saw Britain's low VAT-regime as a model for others and feared
Brussels would impose higher rates, given half a chance.
James Morgan is Economics Correspondent of the BBC World Service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page XI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4194</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / A Duckburg hall-of-famer: The birthday of a comic book
artist of genius
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN WESTBROOKE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ONE OF the greatest 20th century writers for children was 90 last month, and
nobody even knows his name. His work appeared in a medium seldom taken
seriously, and the only signature to appear on it was that of another man -
Walt Disney - but for a quarter of a century Carl Barks wrote and drew tales
of Donald Duck and his Uncle Scrooge McDuck, the wittiest of all comic
books.
Anonymous he may have been, but children who read Walt Disney's Comics and
Stories from 1942 on were soon able to tell his style from that of the other
unsigned contributors. When his name finally became known to outsiders after
his retirement, fans who compared notes (I was one) found that many of them
had known him by the same description: the good artist.
In his company we explored the Andes for Inca treasure, the Caribbean for
buried pirate loot (it turned out to be a potato), the labyrinth for the
minotaur, Colchis for the golden fleece, the South Seas for the Flying
Dutchman.
The man whose visions took us so far abroad had a workaday background
similar to Disney's own. He was a Midwest farm-boy who tried various manual
jobs before deciding that drawing was an easier way to make a living and
joining the Disney Studios as an in-betweener (the ones who draw the dull
bits) on Donald Duck cartoons.
Disney's original star, Mickey Mouse, was a rural scapegrace, smart and
sassy; but his success brought him respectability and Disney needed a new
rapscallion character to take on his antisocial characteristics. Donald,
introduced in the early 1930s, earned the job, soon surpassing Mickey's
popularity. He acquired, on permanent loan from his sister Dumbella, three
nephews, Huey, Dewey and Louie, and with them went through various short,
hot-tempered, slapstick battles. A full-length film, Pirate's Gold, was
planned but never completed. Barks and a colleague adapted it into a comic
book, which you can now buy for Dollars 1,000 or so.
In 1942 Barks quit and began instead to work for Western Publishing, which
produced 32-page Disney comic books under licence. Soon he was writing, and
drawing, a 10-page story every month - at eight frames, and Dollars 12.50, a
page. Donald was shown at war with his nephews, his neighbours, and his own
vainglorious bungling; and Barks became adept at providing more gags,
funnier and better drawn, than other comic books.
Gradually, he learned to tone down the slapstick violence he inherited from
the films, to polish his story-telling skills (providing, for instance, a
little punchline at the end of each page), and to write dialogue: the film
Donald managed only incomprehensible angry squawks, but on paper he had to
talk.
Barks tucked a stream of sight gags away in the backgrounds to his stories,
and he extended the duck family: vapid girlfriend Daisy, Grandma Duck,
super-lucky Gladstone Gander, inventor Gyro Gearloose. He also provided
Donald with his Uncle Scrooge, mean, grouchy and acquisitive.
He had already started featuring Donald in longer adventure stories of 30
pages or so and Scrooge, with his wealth and his greed, initially proved an
excellent narrative device; but with a little judicious softening of his
personality he became popular in his own right and in 1952 started to appear
in his own comic book.
As a study of wealth, Scrooge McDuck has few rivals in American fiction. The
'skinflintillionaire' duck keeps three cubic acres of money in his money
bin, a vast, cubic, safe-like building on a hill overlooking Duckburg, a
potent symbol - if you like that sort of thing  - of the way money looms
over American life. Inside, in one of Barks's happiest inventions, he
wallows in it: 'I like to dive in it like a porpoise, burrow through it like
a gopher, and toss it up and let it hit me on the head.'
Barks never actually thought of himself as writing for children, just for
himself. Like Beatrix Potter, he saw no reason to avoid long words. The
result is some quirky language that sticks in my mind after 30 years.
'Gladstone may be a dope six days of the week, but this is Monday,' reads
one helpful marginal comment. 'We'll have the old fashioned ceremony, where
the bride does handsprings and the groom is carried in on a tray,' orders a
Persian king planning his daughter's wedding.
His plots were as inventive as his dialogue. Underground, the ducks
encounter the Terries and Fermies, globular creatures who create earthquakes
for fun. In the Andes, they visit the town of Plain Awful, where everything,
even hens' eggs, is square and everyone talks with an Alabama accent.
In the Himalayas, they find a land called Tralla La, the inhabitants of
which have never known money, or greed. Unfortunately, Scrooge brings a few
bottle tops which, by reason of their scarcity, soon become currency and
corrupt the entire country; many a reader must have been introduced to the
laws of supply and demand by this tart, funny fable.
And to the romance of history and myth, of far-off times and lands too.
Barks never travelled and took some of his most arresting images from back
copies of the National Geographic: Himalayan valleys, Central American
jungles, dirty weather on the Labrador coast.
Throughout it all he kept his cast's personalities lively and consistent:
brave, practical kids; single-minded, stingy Scrooge; and Donald, a little
bit courageous, a little bit lazy, a little bit competent, the epitome no
longer of a barnyard animal but of a suburban man with dreams of adventure.
Even Barks's greatest fans acknowledge that his later stories were sometimes
curmudgeonly and weary. He knew it, and retired in 1967.
But about the same time, public recognition of Carl Barks, and of the
quality of his work, started to grow. Prices of original editions soared,
and hardback reprints were published; magazines dedicated to discussion of
his oeuvre appeared; a full biography has appeared in print.
All that for a man who drew comics? Yes, and worth it too; nothing's too
much for the work of the Good Artist.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII Picture Uncle Scrooge McDuck, a timeless character
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4195</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Gardening: A landscape fit for heroes - The Grecian way of
natural planting
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBIN LANE FOX
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN MY GARDEN, perhaps in yours, too, some battered bushes of yellow-green
spurge are uncoiling their heads of flower. They hated the harsh February;
two varieties died in the frost; my surviving pick of the month is Euphorbia
martini, a recent hybrid which may have escaped you.
The garden would probably look better withut the rest of them: they have
become straggly, like debris washed up by a fierce winter tide on the shores
of spring. They look even worse to my eye after the past week.
Since last Saturday, I have seen spurges everywhere, cascading on hillsides,
clinging to the ground plans of ruined temples and growing with gusto only
four or five yards from a Greek taverna's traditional style of WC. It has
all provoked new thoughts. The English style of gardening is becoming
settled and complacent, but the line between gardens and wild flowers is the
one which can best provoke it to new variations. I have been testing it in
Greece, where all nature is a garden in springtime, so long as it has
escaped the Greeks themselves.
In our fashionable meadow gardens, our first thoughts are of English wild
flowers which 'conservation' has rescued from farmers. We are obsessed with
our own vanishing acreage, but the flowers in our flower beds are other
countries' wild flowers too: why not let them out into the grass and leave
them to fight with it, as they do in their own tough homes?
In Greece, spurges do not lurk on paved terraces or look angular in early
summer borders. They compete with rocks, grass, gates and newly-blasted
roads. Green-yellow Euphorbia venusta looks twice the plant in an unknown
jungle of emerging poppies, vetch and yellow chrysanthemum daisies.
If you wonder whether it is hardy, try irises in grass instead. We all
segregate these plants, but I have just seen yards of white iris competing
with white meadow-daisies, grass and a tangle of soapwort and dead nettles.
Nobody weeds them or splits them. They are so good because they are out of
the reach of gardeners and Greeks.
So, by now, is most of Greece's wisteria. In Greece, nobody prunes it twice
yearly, bothers with sulphate of potash and does all the vertiginous things
which we advise you to try at weekends. The wisteria grows and flowers with
amazing abandon, up old trees, the half-finished skeletons of concrete
apartments and wherever there is room to leap from a cafe's pergola to the
poles of a public pylon or hoarding.
Admittedly, the summer in Greece is much hotter and wisterias like to be
baked, but where are those shy-flowering seedlings with poor colours against
which we are all warned? I cannot believe that Greek gardeners only buy
named, grafted stock from reputable nurseries, yet their wisterias flower
vastly better than ours.
Ancient Greece was lucky to have no trees of eucaplyptus but when a tatty
old eucalyptus is smothered in violet-blue wistaria, you can see that there
have been gains as well as losses. The wisteria, too, was not a classical
native, but it is in Greece, not Britain that you see it everywhere up
trees, as we try to use our rambling roses.
There is also the matter of the poppies in the fields. English gardeners are
now supposed to romanticise them and replant the scarlet meadows which we
have lost, but the plain fact is that our red British poppy is not the best.
French Impressionist artists may have immortalised it in paint, but the
Impressionists did not go to Greece, either. If they had, they would have
gone wild for the poppies of dark crimson beneath the grey-green of the
olive trees.
My guide to Greek flora insists that the two colours are the same plant, the
Corn Poppy or Papaver rhoeas which we all buy from seed: it admits, however,
that it is 'a very variable plant with the East Mediterranean forms
appearing much darker coloured than the British.'
Botanists' groupings are often useless for gardeners: if these poppies are
the same, why can we not have poppy-seed from the olive-groves below Delphi
where it glows like dark wine in the vibrant undergrowth of spring?
From seed, our British poppies are a Remembrance Sunday scarlet, at best.
The nearest to the Greek colour is the black-spotted Flanders Poppy or
Papaver commutatum. Few seedsmen stock it (Thompson and Morgan of Ipswich is
an exception) but if you sew it this month in open ground, it will flower
excellently in July.
It is also true that in Britain, we do not have the same class of ruin. I am
inclined to think that the Greeks have the secret of successful gardening.
For the best campanulas, you need a hillside like Mycenae where the stones
of the lost Mycenaean palaces are full of spreading blue varieties, where
yellow-flowered omosma frutescens grows on the Cyclopean walls and there are
enough forms of yellow verbascum, salvera, silenie and well behaved pink
convulvus to keep gardeners happy if they do not like beehive tombs.
In Britain we can grow most of these plants, but we cannot grow them so
well. I am inclined to blame mythical heroes. King Arthur was no Agamemnon
and nobody is sure where Camelot was sited, le alone whether it is good for
wild geraniums. At Mycenae the myths assure us that the site is rich in
royal blood. Dried blood is excellent for alpines, but dried blood from a
dynasty seems to be even better.
If you know an elderly hero, be sure to bury him under your verbascums,
otherwise you could try burying modern mythology: the tapes of our
television soaps.
Naturally you are advised to shred them first . . .
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4196</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / A fellowship of gentle giants: Nigel Spivey rubs shoulders
with Britain's best hammer throwers - Hobby-horses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIGEL SPIVEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE VILLAGE of Grendon in Northamptonshire must be near enough the
geographical heart of England. Castle Ashby, once well-known for its
collection of Classical antiquities, is nearby. Otherwise, there is little
reason why Grendon should be cherished by anyone apart from its inhabitants.
But the village has special importance to a fraternity of athletes, a
fraternity both small and sizeable in its constitution: for Grendon is where
the Hammer Circle of Great Britain stages its annual reunion.
The descent of 30 or more hammer throwers on to a village such as Grendon
can hardly go unnoticed. For two nights of the year, regulars at the pub
find their way to the bar obstructed by a mountain-range of bulky shoulders.
Some hammer-throwers stand less than 6 ft 3 in and weigh less than 16 stones
 -but not many.
Their reunion takes place towards the end of the throwing season, in late
September. The men are winding down and ready to relax with a series of
handicapped competitions and challenges - such as throwing the 25 lb railway
coupling device - together with talks from national coaches, video-shows of
international meetings, and general hob-nobbing. Fathers bring their
promising sons. Everyone is generously victualled, with sandwiches
circulating between abundant breakfasts, lunches and suppers. The talk is
shop, of course: weightlifting callouses are compared, new training
techniques vaunted. And two names keep peppering all conversations: Sedykh
and Litvinov.
Your average hammer-thrower may quiz the name of Gorbachev, or Yevtushenko:
but about Yuri Sedykh and Sergei Litvinov he will be very well informed. He
can tell you precisely when it was that Sedykh pushed the world record for
hammer-throwing beyond 87 metres; and he can probably tell you what Litvinov
(Sedykh's arch-rival from the Ukraine) has for breakfast.
One Irish international attracts reverence when he displays to his peers a
hammer handle engraved with the initials YS - a gift from the record-breaker
himself. There is a strong vein of Slavophilia at this Grendon reunion: and
glasnost will really have happened when the Russians get there in person,
like gods invited to the fellowship of a communion table.
There have been some doughty Japanese hammer-throwers, and for a while a
West German captured the world record; but Slavs have dominated the event
over the last two decades, obscuring its Celtic origins. A genealogy of
great hammer-throwers would include Henry VIII - who is pictured with the
sort of wooden sledgehammer still thrown at Highland Games in Scotland. But
the Olympic event is quite different from the display of brute strength
entailed by the Celtic (or Gaelic) tradition.
The Olympic hammer is a 16 lb metal orb attached to a thin wire, with a
handle. It is thrown from the confines of a caged concrete circle, and
mastery of the now standard four turns within this circle takes years of
practice. The centrifugal forces generated by the likes of Sedykh and
Litvinov are scientifically extraordinary - members of the Hammer Circle are
subjected to tests from physiologists fascinated by their kinetic
capacities.
This is what gives the hammer-throwing brotherhood such unusual cohesion.
You can be still ironing out the wrinkles in your technique at the age of
40. And there is another important bonding element: the sense of persecution
from the hammer-thrower's worst opponent, a finicky groundsman. As spawners
of divots, and sometimes destroyers of cages, hammer-throwers earn few
friends. There is a bronze statue of a hammer-thrower in London, but I know
of no other tribute. This is a poor show.
It was the late Ron Pickering, the television commentator, who coined the
phrase 'eighteen-stone ballerinas' to describe Olympic hammer-throwers.
Pickering tirelessly encouraged young people to channel their energy,
frustration and anger into athletics, and despite their size, whatever
aggression within the fellows who gather in the Hammer Circle is reserved to
expend upon a metal ball. They are the gentlest giants you could meet.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4197</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Gardening: All in the mire over peat - Arthur Hellyer calls
for cold facts on an environmental controversy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ARTHUR HELLYER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE IS nothing like a conservation issue to arouse the interest and stir
the consciences of gardeners and there is no doubt that the present one on
the use of peat in gardens has taken root and is becoming ever more baffling
by the day.
Within a week I have attended a day-long seminar on the subject organised
jointly by the Horticultural Development Council, the National Farmers Union
and the Horticultural Trades Association and have also received a letter
telling me that an independent study of peatlands, carried out by the Centre
of Agricultural Strategy at Reading University, shows that there is no
evidence to support the claims of environmentalists that less than 10,000
hectares of relatively intact raised mire remain in Britain.
'Raised mire,' let me explain, is the technical name for the kind of peat
bog from which the best grade sphagnum peat is obtained and this is the kind
of peat around which most of the argument rages.
Somewhere along the road a good deal of ill feeling has been generated
between the most active promoters of the anti-peat crusade and the peat
producers and I am glad that the government has become involved since
hopefully it will bring cooler judgments and more sense into the argument.
It is high time that the gardening public ceased to be bamboozled and it is
especially important that we are given reliable information about the
quantity and distribution of peat in Britain that has some genuine
significance. If it is peat that supports some of the country's eco-systems
what should be done?
I will only say that in the Republic of Ireland, where the peat industry is
highly developed, the peat producers appear to have got together with
environmentalists and concluded that the best way to satisfy both is first
to agree on what are the key environmental areas and then to engage the
producers to conserve them.
One thing that seems to be little understood is that environments are nearly
always changing. If, for some special reason, one wishes to keep them
exactly as they are, steps must be taken to ensure this. I understand that
some English peat producers already carry out such conservation measures and
that others would be glad to do so. That alone, if accepted, might well
settle matters for a good many years - by which time the particular kind of
sphagnum moss peat, which we find so indispensable for seed and potting
composts, could well have been superseded by something else.
Traditionally gardeners grew pot plants in a mixture of good loam - the top
layer of a fertile meadow cut and stacked for at least a year - well-rotted
leaf mould from either an oak or a beech wood and washed river sand. Today
this, with the exception of the sand, would certainly be regarded as
environmentally unfriendly.
In the 1930s gardeners at the John Innes Horticultural Institution were
searching for seed and potting composts that could be more accurately
formulated and perform more reliably. Among the materials they examined were
some forms of peat. Peat forming in sphagnum moss bogs proved far better
than anything else. Highly absorbent, porous and virtually sterile it
contained so little plant food that it could be ignored. What was required
for any particular plant could be added, and that was that. This peat was
also moderately acid; not so much so as to harm anything nor so little that
it would be unsuitable for some plants.
John Innes composts were invented for private purposes but soon attained
near universal use. They finally declined because of shortage of loam of
adequate quality and the arrival of pure peat composts. The new composts
were much lighter and more suitable for container plants in garden centres
and through these were rapidly introduced to gardeners. They have been
developed for 40 years and more in Britain, the US and elsewhere. We know
all about them and how to use them. There is no obvious substitute that has
all the advantages, none that we know so much about and all manner of
substitutes some of which sound positively dangerous.
Let us take it quietly, get our facts right and then, if it really does seem
necessary to do so, start experimenting with alternatives. It could take 10
years to find a really satisfactory substitute for the particular peat we
use but there is an awful lot of peat around of many different kinds.
Peat-cutting in Ireland: conservationists fear for the traditional landscape
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VII
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4198</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Minding Your Own Business: Always remember the human factor
 -Computing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CARTER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE THEORETICAL benefits of putting your sales and purchase ledgers on to
computer are great. All the number-crunching is done automatically and with
total accuracy. Statements can be printed at the touch of a button. You can
produce an up-to-date printout of a supplier's or customer's account at any
time.
Cash is the lifeblood of any business and many small businesses are badly
short of it. The cash position must be monitored weekly, even daily, so as
not to exceed your overdraft limit. The trio of cashbook, sales ledger and
purchase ledger work together in giving you control of the daily flow of
cash into and out of the business. The cashbook tells you how much you have
in the bank. The purchase ledger tells you how much is due to go out to your
supplier, and when. The sales ledger tells you how much is due in from your
customers and when.
But in practice these benefits may not fully be realised. The introduction
of a computer can show up cruelly the lack of financial skills in a small
business. Businesses buy a computer to do their accounts, then hand it over
to the office junior to run. Sadly this breaks a fundamental rule - the
person who does the accounts needs to understand accounting.
As time passes, errors will creep into any record-keeping system. Invoices
are omitted or put on twice. A cheque for Pounds 115.20 is copied wrongly
into the books as Pounds 112.50. Invoices are posted to the wrong customer
account. These errors must constantly be searched for, detected and weeded
out.
Over the years the accounting profession has devised ways of 'reconciling'
one account book with another in order to eliminate errors. At the end of
each month the bookkeeper goes through this series of reconciliations. If
the totals of two books disagree it signals an error. He works his way back
through all the month's postings until ultimately he finds the source of the
error. Then he reverses it out, enters the transaction correctly and
recalculates the totals. When the totals of the various books finally agree
it signals that errors have been eliminated. Only now are the account books
proven accurate; only now can the bookkeeper start to write up the accounts
for next month.
With a computer the same end of month reconciliations must be done. In some
ways computerised accounts are more exacting than manual. Suppose you have a
customer who is also a supplier. He owes you Pounds 1,000 but you owe him
Pounds 600, so he sends you a cheque for Pounds 400. The account postings
for this are quite complicated. With a manual system you can record the
Pounds 400 receipt in the cashbook, scrawl a note beside it explaining what
happened, and let the accountant sort it out at year-end. But a computer is
rigid and inflexible and you do not have this let-out. You have to get those
account postings on to the computer properly, and you have to get them on
NOW.
So before buying an accounts package you must take a hard look at yourself
and the way you keep your current financial records. Do you employ an
experienced bookkeeper - either part-time or full-time? If not, how
financially literate are you and your staff? (As a rough test, is there
anyone on board who understands the difference between a sales ledger and a
sales daybook?)
What is the state of your current manual system? Are you running a cashbook?
Is it up to date? Is it reconciled to the bank statement each month? Do you
run sales and purchase daybooks? Are they up to date? Do you run sales or
purchase ledgers? Is the purchase ledger reconciled each month to supplier
statements? Do you run control accounts reconciling the ledgers to the
daybook and cash book?
The more often you answer 'No' to these questions, the more of a mess your
books are likely to be in. You will have to get someone in to clean them up
before you can even start to run them on a computer. But even this is not
enough. Part of my own education as a consultant was to sort out a company's
manual books, post them on to the computer, train the staff in operating it
 -and then watch helplessly over the next six months as the computer system
slowly drifted back into a mess similar to that before it arrived.
It is pointless to buy accounting packages to run on your computer if your
staff cannot do the end-of-month reconciliations.
An unreconciled ledger will run to seed and the figures will become
untrustworthy. People then lose confidence in the computer and start blaming
it for being 'wrong'. But what else can you expect if the person running the
accounts does not understand accounting? Bookkeeping is a precise, skilled
and intensely practical craft. So before you buy an accounts package make
sure you have an experienced bookkeeper in place to run it properly, and buy
the package (Pegasus, Sage, or whatever) which he knows and wants to use.
David Carter is a consultant in information systems for small companies.
Tel: 0727-55996.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4199</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Minding Your Own Business: Maze maker struggles to find the
thread - A company trying to plot a way through hard times
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NICK GARNETT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
ON THE WALL in Adrian Fisher's office hangs one of those perplexing drawings
by the Dutch artist Escher of staircases winding into four-dimensional dead
ends. It is an apt decoration for the man whose company claims to be the
biggest designer of mazes in Britain.
Since setting up in the early 1980s, Minotaur Designs has accounted for 22
of the 100 or so mazes that dot Britain. The intricate sinuosity of its
paths and hedgerows has been the biggest spur in more than doubling the
number of Britain's labyrinths, making it the most maze-conscious country
outside Japan.
The British Tourist Board has designated 1991 the Year of the Maze, so
business for Minotaur should be blooming.
'It is hardly doing that,' says Fisher. 'It has been quite thin recently.
People have ideas but they don't have the money.' So thin, in fact, that the
company has made a mental sideshift in its work on enigmatic twists and
turns. Redesigning bus route maps now accounts for almost a third of its
Pounds 130,000 yearly turnover.
Fisher, who is 39, is a former administrator with ITT who had made a hobby
out of maze history. He was offered his first contract to design a labyrinth
after writing a letter on the subject to The Times in 1980. By 1983 Minotaur
Designs, which resides in the top floor of a house in Harpenden,
Hertfordshire, was set up.
'I borrowed Pounds 12,000 on a loan guarantee scheme. That was not clever,'
says Fisher. 'It would have been better to stick it on the mortgage because
it really hits cash flow when you most need it.'
Some of the money went on a computer, used for book keeping though not maze
design. Minotaur's meandering teasers are drawn by pen on paper. 'It was
very tough during the first two years. Income was half of what it was at ITT
and I had no experience of marketing and selling.'
The company spends a good deal of time and money on promotion - though not
direct advertising - attracting customers which include stately homes open
to the public, private houses and local authorities. One of its goals is to
maintain the tradition of the fantastic variety in labyrinths which are an
ancient form of both amusement and religious expression. The oldest mazes
include a rock carving dated 1700 BC in Sardinia and a 13th century pavement
at Chartres Cathedral. Britain's oldest hedge maze is at Hampton Court and
the most complex, with tricky U-turns, is at Longleat House, Wiltshire.
A third of all mazes designed by Minotaur are made of hedges. These include
an Alice in Wonderland labyrinth in Dorset which portrays the Mad Hatter and
other creatures from the story and a yew hedge maze at Leeds Castle
incorporating a grotto. Non-hedge labyrinths include a brick path at Parham
Park, West Sussex and a unicorn and lion brick pavement in the town centre
of Worksop. One of the biggest is a maze of 80 wall mirrors with visual
deceptions and central fountain at Somerset's Wookey Hole.
Fisher ('I hate jigsaws') says there are 12 categories of maze. These
include unicursal - with a single path and no junctions - and processional -
with a quick exit - to very complex three-dimensional ones with bridges and
underpasses. Many of the 200 mazes built during the Japanese maze craze that
took hold in the mid-1980s are large wooden structures on several levels.
The Japanese, overcome by boredom, have since dug up 70 of these.
'We are in even less than a niche market, more of a crevice market,' says
Fisher. 'Maze is minimalist art. The business of creating mazes is to ensure
they fit into the landscape, that they are great fun for children and that
they have hidden meanings.'
The Marlborough maze at Blenheim Palace encompasses a design inspired by the
stone carvings of Grinling Gibbons. The Saxon maze at Herb Farm, Sonning
Common, is in the shape of four mythical Saxon sea creatures. The Gardeners'
labyrinth at Capel Manor, Enfield, traces the steps of early plant
gatherers.
The total cost of building one of these whimsical conundrums ranges from
Pounds 10,000 to Pounds 100,000 and up. Of this, Minotaur's fees for design
and overall project management will be about a quarter. Fisher charges a
daily rate of Pounds 450. Employing a landscape specialist, Lesley Beck, as
well as another maze designer, Randoll Coate, Minotaur uses a variety of
artisans on contract. The mechanics of putting together a maze, the main
contractor for which might be a landscape design company rather than
Minotaur, can pose difficulties. One or two subcontractors have done a bunk
without completing the work satisfactorily.
'We now encourage clients to shortlist local contractors,' says Fisher. Some
clients get carried away and start meddling. 'We had one case where they
poured concrete for a maze in the wrong place and having designed the
labyrinth we had to subsequently change the entry and exit point. That is
very annoying.'
Fisher has recently had a book published on the art and mythology of the
maze and is writing a British maze guide. This together with the Year of the
Maze should have generated a lot of business. It is unfortunate that this
effort, which cost about Pounds 30,000 in time and money, was made when high
interest rates began puncturing people's pockets. Fisher says Minotaur
received just Pounds 4,500 in sponsorship during this period.
'Interest rates are devastating. If we had had this Year of the Maze
campaign two years ago I think we would have probably had 20 landscape
commissions during this year. As it is, we have had very, very little. There
is less money and less business about.'
Minotaur is looking for some large maze contracts of around Pounds 200,000
and, at the other end of the business, it is marketing a Pounds 3,000
portable maze made of plastic pieces. Fisher believes though that the
designing of bus route maps and related work such as sign systems for
airports could become increasingly lucrative. It is ironic that a company
designing puzzles in which people might get lost is now seeking to help them
find their way.
Minotaur Designs. 7 Holly Bush Lane, Harpenden, Herts AL5 4AL. Tel:
0582-461880.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page VI Photograph The Italianate maze at Capel Manor gardens,
Enfield, north London, designed by Adrian Fisher and still growing
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4200</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: The case for gilts - The chances of
future gains for investors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NEXT Wednesday, the Bank of England will hold its first gilts auction in
nearly three years. The auction is for Pounds 1.2bn of 10 per cent
Conversion stock due 1996 and is part of a much wider programme of gilts
issuance - as the budget deficit forces the government to return to
borrowing.
What does this mean for the private investor? Should he be buying gilts?
Most financial advisers caution against investing in gilts now, but some
think there are still considerable gains to be made in foreign fixed
interest markets.
The gilts market performed well at the end of 1990 and the beginning of this
year as successive cuts in the base rate meant a rise in gilts prices,
providing capital gains for investors. However, financial advisers are more
cautious about the prospects for this market - partly because the supply of
gilts is going to increase over the next couple of years, and partly because
they feel that the gilts market is already discounting the prospect of any
future cuts in interest rates.
According to some estimates, the Bank of England may have to issue up to
Pounds 1bn of gilts a month to meet the Public Sector Borrowing Requirement.
So there is some concern in the gilts market that this flood of new paper
will be rather hard to digest, with the result that gilts prices could be
depressed.
Not everyone subscribes to this view. John Kendall, economist at Baring
Sterling Bonds, points out that it will be some time before the volume of
new issues results in the gilts market reaching its previous peak.
While Simon Corbett, investor adviser at James Capel, is unenthusiastic
about the forthcoming auction of five-year gilts, he points out that clients
who want to receive a regular fixed income should consider gilts of a longer
maturity with coupons of 9 or 10 per cent.
These could provide a good opportunity to lock into a high interest rate,
especially as by this time next year interest rates may have fallen much
further, particularly if inflation has fallen greatly.
However, at the moment some of the highest yielding bonds are those issued
by foreign governments. Government bond markets in the US, Canada, New
Zealand, Australia, Spain and Italy have all performed strongly in recent
months as bond yields have fallen. But which markets are expected to show a
strong return in the coming months?
According to James Leslie of Guinness Flight Global Asset Management, which
runs a couple of global bond funds, Spain, Australia and New Zealand still
provide good opportunities for investors. Interest rates in these countries
have been high in order to keep inflation at bay, but are expected to come
down soon.
'During 1990, interest rates round the world were driven to high levels as
governments sought to stifle inflation resulting from the heady growth of
the 1980s. As a result, the conditions for a sustained decline in both the
level of global inflation and interest rates and a significant advance in
international bond markets are now in place,' says Howard Flight of Guinness
Flight.
Steven Major, a bond analyst with UBS Phillips &amp; Drew, is particularly
bullish about the Spanish and Portuguese bond markets. The Spanish market
has been opened up to foreign investors and withholding tax regulations on
Spanish bonds have been relaxed.
Spain outperformed other bond markets in local currency terms last month and
was one of the top performing markets in the first quarter. Although yields
on Spanish bonds have fallen from 15 per cent to 12 per cent since January,
they could fall still further.
The Portuguese bond market is comparatively small, but Steven Major says
that yields of between 18 and 19 per cent are expected on the new Public
Investment Fund (FIP) government bond which is due to be launched soon.
The problem for the individual investor is that it is not easy to invest in
these small foreign markets, particularly if you only want to place a few
thousand pounds in bonds. The simplest way is to invest in foreign bonds is
through a managed fund, which provides a range of investments.
Several managers run global bond funds including Mercury Asset Management,
Guinness Flight, Commercial Union and Fidelity. But investors should be
aware that fixed interest investments are not entirely risk-free. Bond
prices can fall, and with foreign bonds, exchange rates create an additional
risk.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V Photograph Chasing a bull market, Spain's performance has been
impressive (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4201</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Joint trustees
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MY MOTHER died in 1971 and left her estate consisting of shares and property
to me, with my father having a life interest. When my father died the trust
come to an end and everything came to me. My wife and I were trustees, and
everything was registered in our joint names so we did nothing about
transferring anything to my name, thinking it best if everything was held
jointly. Now we have separate taxation and it is more important that
everything is in joint names, is it wise to leave it as it is or should we
execute some document to establish joint ownership, bearing in mind that on
the company register it notes 'as trustees'?
It would be wise to record that you are treating the beneficial interest as
vested in both you and your wife. You can do this by a declaration of trust
made by both you and your wife, reciting that you have held the various
assets (listed in a schedule) on trust for your father for life with
remainder to you, that your father died and that there has been no assent of
the property to you, and declaring that you wish to make a gift to your wife
of half your beneficial interest in the property and that you and your wife
shall henceforth hold the property on trust for the two of you in equal
shares.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4202</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Lost in the wash
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
I HAVE recently sold 'units' in two offshore bond funds. Both are managed so
as to qualify as distributor funds. The contract notes show that the sale
proceeds include a certain amount of accrued income. I have been under the
impression that these funds are not covered by the anti-washing, accrued
income, legislation. Am I wrong or is there some other reason for these
details being given?
The accrued income is likely to be taxable as income under part II of
Schedule 28 to the Income and Corporation Taxes Act 1988 (Disposals
involving an equalisation element) These rules originate from schedule 20 to
the Finance Act 1984 and are older than the accrued income scheme (which
originated in the 1985 Finance Act.)
You should find the text of the Income and Corporation Taxes Act 1988 (as
amended up to last year) in a local reference library, in, for example, the
British Tax Encyclopedia.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4203</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Briefcase, Q&amp;A: Fare's unfair on the way to Faro
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
LAST YEAR I booked a flight to Faro with TAP Air Portugal. Business forced
me to delay departure but not the return. I did not receive any compensation
for the ticket and was charged a further Pounds 150. This year I booked
again with TAP and the dates were confirmed. To my annoyance and
astonishment, I was told that our flights could not take place on those
dates and they would have to be changed. Can it be fair that an airline can
switch without compensation but when an individual requests a switch he
loses all the money he has paid? Our travel agent suggested that to
compensate us we be upgraded. This was refused.
No, it is not fair, and you can claim compensation if you are not able to
book with some other carrier for the dates you require (in which case you
could require a refund on the tickets which you booked). It may be difficult
to establish a financial loss - other than the cost of telephoning to
re-book accommodation, if you were given sufficient warning of the change in
dates.
No legal responsibility can be accepted by the Financial Times for the
answers given in these columns. All inquiries will be answered by post as
soon as possible.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4204</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Corporate PEPS receive a boost
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CORPORATE PEPS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
personal equity plans which invest in the shares of only one company - were
boosted by the Budget.
Chancellor Norman Lamont allowed up to Pounds 3,000 to be invested in a
single company PEP on top of the Pounds 6,000 allowance for other PEPs. This
means that from January 1 you can put Pounds 9,000 into one company, free of
capital gains and income tax, provided you are prepared to open two separate
plans.
The Budget change is likely to lead to a swift increase in the number of
corporate PEPs on offer, as they can conveniently be used for companies'
profit-sharing or employee share-ownership schemes. According to Richard
Cockman, of CC&amp;P, which currently leads the market in managing company PEPs,
around 1,200 companies are likely to open plans, although many will not,
initially at least, be available to the general public.
Details of the new scheme are still being worked out by the Inland Revenue,
but it is likely that each plan will have to be authorised by the company
concerned - avoiding the possibility of several rival ICI PEPs - and that
existing plan managers will have to re-register as corporate PEP managers.
Meanwhile, single company PEPs are already with us, and are the single
fastest growing sector of the industry, according to Chase De Vere. They are
particularly popular with those who have a longstanding holding in a blue
chip company.
Bradford &amp; Bingley Building Society, which runs the plans for ICI and BP,
reports that since the BP plan's launch in February, 8,000 plans, worth more
than Pounds 30m, have been opened. More than 1,000 investors are interested
in ICI.
All the current plan managers report that many other blue chip companies are
working on PEPs at the moment, while other big players, such as Fidelity,
are considering entering the market. You are likely to have a wide choice
well before the January 1 start for the schemes.
Usually company PEPs have lower charges than other plans, but the inherent
extra risk of holding shares in one company - even a multinational - is
considerable and should be thought through before you invest.
Most advisers now agree that PEPs are best used as a tax-privileged pocket
for part of your portfolio, rather than as a free-standing investment. They
should also be regarded as long-term investments.
If you have a holding which you wish to transfer to a PEP, note that you
will have to sell your shares and then buy them back to transfer them into a
PEP. Some companies - including Abbey National, GRE and Lonrho - offer deals
to cut transfer costs, which you should ask about when opening the plan.
The accompanying table shows all the corporate PEPs now available to the
public. A lot will depend on your view of whether the companies concerned
are good investments, but also pay attention to the start-up fee, annual
charges (sometimes expressed as a percentage of the total value of the
holding), exit charges, and fees for individual deals within the PEP (which
are unlikely to amount to much if you only wish to hold one company).
Bradford &amp; Bingley tel: 0274-555555; CC&amp;P 071-242-8998, Chase de Vere
071-404-5766.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V Table (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4205</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Directors' Transactions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANGUS MACDONALD, Directus Ltd.
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NORMALLY our list is made up of transactions with a value greater than
Pounds 10,000, or occasionally Pounds 20,000. This week the cut-off level
has been increased to Pounds 100,000 because of the volume and size of
director sales. This unusually heavy volume must be put down in part to the
end of the reporting season with directors once more free to deal. More
likely is that directors are capitalising on the sharp increases in share
prices, in the belief that the high levels are unsustainable.
The insurance broking sector continues to see heavy and sustained director
selling, with directors of Steel Burrill Jones, Domestic and General and
Bradstock raising almost Pounds 3.5m during this week alone. All three
stocks are within a whisker of their all-time highs.
More surprising are the sales in TIP Europe, the trailer leasing company.
The announcement of sharply reduced interim results was accompanied by the
chief executive Anthony Reiger and another director selling a significant
amount of stock at 61p, down two thirds from the high seen last year.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
DIRECTORS' SHARE TRANSACTIONS IN THEIR OWN COMPANIES (LISTED &amp; USM)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
                                                          No of
Company                       Shares        Value     directors
SALES
Admiral                      460,000        1,081          2
Barclays                     100,000          462          2*
BM Group                      34,000          119          3
Bradstock                    626,270          939          4
BTR                          200,000          820          1
Capita Group                 323,300          679          2
Debenham T &amp; C                93,500          106          2
Domestic &amp; Gen Grp           324,000        1,652          3
First Leisure Corp           202,154          491          1
Fisons                       560,000        2,750          4*
Hampsons Industries        2,945,000        1,266          5
Hepworth                     125,190          438          2*
Ibstock Johnson              100,000          115          1
Inchcape                     661,000        2,228          5*
Kingfisher                   407,584        1,940          1
Legal &amp; General Grp           44,300          206          2*
Life Sciences Intl           629,891          775          5*
Lloyds Abbey Life             36,000          154          1
Logica                       100,000          236          1
MAI                          250,000          295          1*
NMC Group                   1,500,00        1,065          1
Pearson                       24,000          181          1*
Racal Electronics             45,790          106          4*
Reckitt &amp; Coleman             52,390          797          3*
Shell Trans &amp; Tradg           50,000          242          1*
Smiths Industries            103,380          279          3*
Steel Burrill Jones          291,700          884          6
T &amp; S Stores                 914,750        1,793          1
T I P Europe                 230,000          140          2
Tibbett &amp; Britten            500,000        1,950          6
Wilson (Connolly)            750,000        1,477          1
Wyevale Garden Ctre           90,480          162          2
PURCHASES
Southn Business Grp          100,000          102          1
Suter                        100,000          127          1
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Value expressed in Pounds 000s.  Companies must notify the Stock
Exchange within 5 working days of a share transaction by a director.
This list contains all transactions, including the exercise of options
(*) if 100% subsequently sold, with a value over Pounds 10,000.
Information released by the Stock Exchange 8-12 April 1991.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
Source:  Directus Ltd, Edinburgh
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4206</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALACAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: MI cuts cold calls
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MI GROUP, the life assurance group, plans to phase out cold calling
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
unsolicited selling by telephone - by the end of the year, according to
Simon Ingram, chief executive.
Reports that cold calling had already been abandoned were incorrect, as
staff at the Financial Times, who are still approached by MI salesmen, can
vouch.
But Ingram, who took over from the colourful but controversial Trevor
Deaves, says that prospecting by cold calling is not efficient, annoys
potential customers and gives the company a bad image.
Ingram, who had previously been head of the sales force, said that although
MI staff were paid on a commission-only basis, they were not rewarded if the
policy was not maintained for at least two years. This, he said, helped
ensure that clients were not sold inappropriate policies.
MI is hoping to put the cold calling controversy behind it. The key question
an investor should ask about any life company concerns its investment
performance.
Here the company still has plenty of work to do. Many of MI's funds have not
been in existence for long; the Managed fund, for example, was only started
in December 1988 and Finstat figures show that its performance places it
139th out of 183 funds over the two years to April 1.
Of the seven MI funds with ten-year records, all have below average
performance records and four are in the fourth quartile (bottom 25 per
cent). Of the 10 funds with seven-year records, eight have below-average
performance records and three are in the fourth quartile.
Over five years, the record is slightly better. Half are above average and
half below; and there is even a top-quartile performer, the Gilt-Edged Fund.
But it is not a record to inspire investors by any stretch of the
imagination.
MI clients can, also, however link products to a range of funds offered by
outside managers such as Fidelity, Framlington, Gartmore, Henderson and
Perpetual.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page V
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4207</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAB9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Political gifts should go to a vote
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA ELLIS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COMPANIES IN which you hold shares may be about to give money to
politicians. When general elections draw close, industry tends to step up
its donations to political parties, and shareholders' funds foot the bill.
However, it could be more than a year before you, as shareholders,learn the
full extent of the generosity the directors have lavished on politicians on
your behalf.
Companies - unlike trade unions - need not ask for shareholders' approval
for political contributions. Shareholders cannot contract out of political
giving. The Companies Act requires directors to report all donations of over
Pounds 200 made for political purposes. But the law can be read as exempting
gifts to organisations such as British United Industrialists which make
donations to political parties.
A report by Pensions Investment Research Consultants (PIRC) says
shareholders have the right to determine political donations and should
exercise it. Authors Stuart Bell and Anne Simpson say companies can make
political donations, but directors must justify the donations as in the
company's interest or risk a charge of acting ultra vires.
PIRC found that 38 of the FT-SE 100 companies made donations to the
Conservative party in 1989-90, contributing a total of Pounds 1.25m - 37 per
cent of its recorded contributions. No other party received donations.
Only one of the 38 had sought shareholder approval. BET, which gave Pounds
20,000 to the Tories in the year ended March 31, 1990, passed resolutions to
make political donations in 1986 and 1989 on a show of hands. Rank did so in
1985.
Marks &amp; Spencer took a vote in 1986, saying the directors believed it 'right
to support organisations committed to policies that will promote and
maintain the economic climate.' Shareholders responded with 263m votes in
favour, 50m against and 313m abstentions. In contrast, when NFC balloted
shareholders, the majority against political payments was 87 per cent.
PIRC identified Taylor Woodrow as the largest corporate donor with a gift of
Pounds 150,320 to the Conservative party and Pounds 20,000 to British United
Industrialists in 1989. Last year, the company slashed its contribution to
Tory coffers to Pounds 24,000.
Taylor Woodrow put the matter of political contributions to a vote at its
1968 AGM, in a resolution endorsing the right of the directors to give
donations to 'anybody whose activities in their judgment are conducive to
the protection of the assets of the company.'
At the 1986 AGM, Taylor Woodrow shareholders voted to amend the company's
articles of association to give the directors broader powers to make
donations. A show-of-hands vote at the 1988 AGM unanimously agreed to
continue the policy.
PIRC recommends that you ask companies in which you hold shares to seek
specific approval for political donations at each annual general meeting.
Directors should state why they consider the gift to be in the interests of
the company and its shareholders.
'Companies may argue that making political contributions is a logical
extension of the directors' powers to act in the company's interests,' said
the report. 'Funding a political party is not a central part of a company's
business.
Any contribution is a reduction in shareholder funds. 'If companies refuse
(to ask for approval), shareholders should propose their own resolutions to
this effect,' says PIRC.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4208</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAB8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: The Mirror enigma - The flotation of a
famous newspaper
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLARE PEARSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IF YOU were going to dream up a company likely to revive the offer for sale
market, long somnolent outside of privatisations, you would probably not
pick Mirror Group Newspapers, part of Robert Maxwell's business empire.
Maxwell will keep slightly more than 50 per cent of MGN shares. His
reputation for unpredictability and secrecy sits oddly with a flotation
aimed at the public.
The company is coming to the market later this month via a part-public offer
and is conducting a full-trimmings marketing campaign. Television
advertisements will feature Mirror cartoon character Andy Capp and columnist
Anne Robinson but readers will not be be favoured over other share
applicants,
It all seems a lot of fuss for a share sale expected to raise at most Pounds
250m, with only about Pounds 80m targeted at private investors. The balance
will be spread thinly between institutions in the UK North America and
continental Europe.
The company has interests in forest products and commercial printing in
North America but its main activity is newspaper publishing, including the
Daily and Sunday Mirror, The People, the Daily Record and the Sunday Mail,
as well as racing and free papers.
From the pathfinder prospectus, which was published this week, it emerges
that these titles are valued at Pounds 625m. This document also demonstrates
the remarkable transformation in their profitability effected under
Maxwell's stewardship.
Pre-tax profits have increased from virtually nothing when Maxwell bought
the company from Reed International in 1984. Last year they rose from Pounds
31.9m to Pounds 53.3m. Operating margins increased from 15.8 to 19.8 per
cent.
The company has been reaping the benefits of Pounds 500m of investment. It
has been at the forefront of colour technology and of clever techniques
which appeal to advertisers, such as inserting and regionalisation.
No-one expects growth in profitability to continue at similar rates. But,
MGN advisers argue, the company has emerged as a firmly-based and
cash-generative business underpinned by a stable readership base, which is
important for tabloids because circulation accounts for a large proportion
of revenue.
Even so, observers believe the pricing of the shares, due to be announced on
April 30, will have to take account of the nervousness, widespread among
institutional investors, over MGN's chairman and majority shareholder.
So look carefully for comments on how the market reacts to the pricing
before deciding whether to apply.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4209</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAB7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Poll tax bills on 'empty' homes -
Casebook
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN AUTHERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
POLL TAX may be due for abolition but it continues to cause problems for
those who have to pay it. Several problems of interpretation have emerged
concerning the charge levied on homes left unoccupied by the owner for a
matter of months.
The strict rule is that the standard community charge is payable on any
second home other than a charge-payer's sole or main residence. The standard
charge is levied by the authority where the property is, rather than where
the payer lives, and will normally be twice the personal community charge
for that area.
However, the imposition of the charge is more subtle than many people
realise. The Community Charge Registration Officer (CCRO), an official of
the council which levies the charge, has broad powers of discretion to
decide whether a house is an individual's 'sole or main residence'.
The rule of thumb suggested by the Department of the Environment is that if
you live somewhere for more than six months in the year, it should be
counted as your main residence.
This suggests that the reader who let his holiday home for 11 weeks will
have to pay standard community charge on it for the full year. The only
exception would be if the people who stayed there were using it, at the
time, as their main residence. In that case, they would pay community charge
on the property for the period they lived there, and the owners would pay
standard community charge for the rest of the year.
Similar problems afflict expatriates who let their houses. One FT reader was
abroad for the five months following the introduction of poll tax, during
which time the tenant of his house paid the tax. When the reader returned he
was charged for the full year because it had been his sole or main residence
for 12 months, even though he had only been present for five.
The CCRO was acting within his discretion and following the six-month rule
of thumb. The charge is on the person, not the property, according to the
DoE. The fact that the tenant had been paying poll tax for five months did
not affect the owners' liability if, in the CCRO's opinion, he had access to
it as his prime residence throughout the period.
A number of lessons arise from this:
The CCRO has wider and more subtle powers than many people realise. You have
a right of appeal, which should be made to the CCRO at the town hall which
issued the poll tax bill.
Remember the six-month rule. You are likely to pay the charge for a full
year if you lived in a property you owned for more than six months of the
year.
If you are letting a property to someone who will be using it as their sole
or main residence, you might tell them that they should register for the
charge. Otherwise they will cost you extra money. The DoE will expect the
owner to pay the poll tax, unless a tenant has registered the house or flat
as his sole or main residence.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4210</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAB6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: The Week Ahead
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ICI's first quarter pre-tax profits, reported on Thursday, will be far below
the Pounds 414m the chemical giant made in the first quarter of 1990. But
with the petrochemical margins rising temporarily in the first three months
of this year, the profits are unlikely to be as low as the Pounds 84m
recorded in the final quarter of 1990. The outcome is likely to be somewhere
in the Pounds 140m - Pounds 180m region.
Ratners Group, the jewellery chain which has been plagued by doubters since
it bought Kay Jewelers in the US, is due to report its annual results on
Monday.
The flamboyant Gerald Ratner is likely to provide a vibrant defence of the
company's long-term strategy in expanding in the US in spite of announcing a
slight fall in pre-tax profits from Pounds 121m to Pounds 115m. But
unusually for Ratner, his comments will probably concentrate more on the
sober measures the company is taking to control costs than on the latest
jewellery craze.
A clutch of fashion retailers are also likely to show the effects of
difficult trading. On Wednesday, Laura Ashley, the fashion and furnishings
company, will report annual losses of up to Pounds 8m as it struggles to
combat its difficulties in its US operations.
Meanwhile fellow retailer, Etam, will produce only meagre profits of Pounds
6m although it is thought the company may have seen some more encouraging
trading this year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page IV
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4211</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAB5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: It pays to be Scottish
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLARE PEARSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CUSTOMERS OF Scottish Power and Hydro Electric should be smiling this week
following the announcement of the shareholder incentives for the flotation
of the two Scottish electricity companies.
Advisers have put together a package for customers which is closely modelled
on the generous deal available when the English and Welsh regional
electricity companies (Recs) were sold last autumn.
Other UK investors have not been forgotten. But they stand to get only a
relatively measly 1-for-20 share bonus if they hold shares bought in the
offer until June 30 1994.
By contrast, customers of Scottish Power and Hydro Electric can opt for
money off their electricity bills in respect of holdings in their own
company as well as a share bonus in the other.
Customers can choose whether to plump for a package comprising shares in
both companies or just buy shares in their own, while other investors will
be able only to buy the package. Details of the incentives are as follows:
Non-customers: the 1-for-20 share bonus, up to a maximum of 150 shares.
Customers who apply for shares only in their own company: The choice of
either Pounds 18 worth of electricity vouchers for every 100 shares
allocated, up to a maximum of Pounds 270 worth of vouchers, OR a 1-for-10
share bonus, up to a maximum of 300 bonus shares.
Customers who apply for the package: the choice of vouchers or bonus shares
in their own company and, on their allocation in the other company, a
1-for-20 share bonus up to the non-customer maximum.
As in the Recs' sale, customers who opt for vouchers will also benefit from
getting their first one before Christmas - ahead of having to pay the second
instalment on their shares, due in May 1992. Since it looks as if the record
date for the dividend is likely to fall before then too, that gives local
investors the prospect of an attractive first-year return.
Minimum investment levels were also announced this week, and these too
reflect the government's determination to attract as much local investment
as possible.
For customers buying shares in only their local company, the minimum first
payment has been set at a modest Pounds 100. But those customers applying
for the package will have to pay Pounds 300, the same as non-customers.
Payment for the shares will be in three instalments. The fully-paid share
price will be revealed next month, but the fully-paid minimums are being
indicated at Pounds 250 and Pounds 750.
Remember that you will only become eligible for incentives if you register
with the Electricity Share Information Office (tel: 041-414-1414).
As far as customers are concerned, registration guarantees preferential
allocations in the event of oversubscription - and if the current level of
interest is maintained, that will be very important.
Registrations have already reached 2m, which means that the flotation is
level-pegging with last November's Recs' sale, in which allocations were
scaled down greatly. Non-customers who register are not being guaranteed
preferential treatment although they may get some priority over other
members of the public.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III Table (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4212</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAB4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Volumes that speak value - A different
method of share price analysis
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'MORE BUYERS than sellers' is the standard response of one veteran FT
reporter when anyone asks him why a particular share price has risen.
It is spoken in jest, but it is also a truism. The balance of supply and
demand determines prices. So studying the volume of trade in a company's
shares is often just as important as noting the short term price movement.
In the US, share trading has been studied in this way for quite a long time
and has been granted the portentous title of 'volume analysis'.
Why not simply look at whether a price moves up or down? One main reason is
that market makers, faced either with a shortage or surplus of stock on
their own books, have a tendency to mark prices higher or lower accordingly.
Such a movement is unlikely to be sustained because it is not a product of
'real' demand from actual customers, institutional or private.
Similarly it is not much use looking at volume in isolation. Common sense
tells us that every share that is bought is also sold and vice versa. But if
an increase in volume results in a higher price that is a bullish sign,
since buyers have been forced to raise their bids to persuade existing
holders to sell. Similarly, an increase in volume accompanied by a fall in
price is bearish.
Charles Wyatt, of research group Volume Analysis, uses a measure called
cumulative volume to study market trends. The weekly volume figure is added,
if accompanied by a rise in price, but subtracted if accompanied by a fall.
The cumulative volume (cum vol) line will roughly track the share price.
However, if the volume line starts to move ahead, that could be a sign of
strong demand and a forthcoming surge in price.
The top graph shows the GEC price between October and February. In early
January, the cum vol reached a low, but then started to climb ahead of the
share price. That increase preceded a jump in GEC's shares, which rose from
184p to 235p in February.
The bottom graph shows that Hawker Siddeley's share price has steadily risen
this year, helped by rumours of a bid. But the cum vol line has placidly
tracked the share price. Wyatt argues that this shows no sign of the
increased activity that would normally predate a bid.
In a recent article in Investor magazine, Wyatt cited the combination of
rising prices and higher trading volumes that preceded the bids for Ranks
Hovis McDougall in 1988 and for BAT Industries in 1989.
These higher volumes need not necessarily be a sign of insider dealing,
although that does occur. Just as often, the increased trading volume is a
sign that the would-be predator is building up a stake.
Small investors can easily be stocks on bid rumours. Watching the volume
figures can thus prove a useful, although by no means infallible, check. If
there has been little volume, talk of a bid is more likely to be based on
rumour than fact.
The largest shares will naturally enjoy the largest volumes. What counts is
unusually high volume levels. Jerry Evans, an analyst for County NatWest
WoodMac, cites two significant measures.
One is the percentage of a group's shares that have been traded. For
example, the most actively traded share by this measure in the trading week
April 8 to 12 was Frogmore Estates, which was subject to a bid from Southend
Properties and saw 10.3 per cent of its share capital change hands.
The other measure is the value of shares traded. On this measure, the most
active stock in the same period was Pearson, owner of the Financial Times,
due to the placement of Dutch group Elsevier's 8.8 per cent stake.
The interpretations applied to volume analysis can bring it close to
chartism, the study of patterns in share price movements. As an example,
Wyatt cites two key 'rules'.
The first is that 'a sudden increase of volume in a stock is bullish when it
follows a significant downward trend in share price.' The pattern to look
for, he says, is a trickle down in price on steady volume, followed by a
sudden increase in volume with a static price. That can be a sign of the
reappearance of buyers.
The second rule is really the obverse of the first. The pattern is a drift
upward in price on steady volume, followed by a significant increase in
volume but a static price. That, Wyatt argues, is a bearish sign, since it
shows that sellers are on the prowl again.
The important thing for the small investor is not to get too carried away,
but to look at volume as an adjunct to more fundamental analysis. Profits
and dividends are factors investors should never ignore.
Volume analysis is not confined to single shares. Jerry Evans regularly
looks at share trading volume across the whole market. When the FT-SE 100
Index fell, during last year, from 2,150 to 2,000, there was relatively low
volume. This was a sign, he says, that the market was becoming undervalued,
as there was no real selling pressure. However, he argues that the recent
rise in the market is sustainable because it has been accompanied by heavier
volumes.
So how can the private investor track volume movements in shares? The answer
is, only with some difficulty. The FT prints trading volumes in major stocks
every day on its markets page.
However, these figures, which come from SEAQ, lump together customer and
intra-market business and often contain inaccuracies. At least they indicate
the trend and can be used as a guide to changes in volume levels. We also
publish the total customer trades for the market; a rough guide is that over
Pounds 1bn is a heavy day and below Pounds 900m is light.
From now on, Finance and the Family will be looking at major stocks on a
monthly basis and highlighting those where volume patterns are significant.
Readers will thus have a chance to keep up with what is becoming an
increasing popular way of analysing the stock market.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page III Graph (Omitted). Graph (Omitted). Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4213</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAB3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Markets: Analysts call for a return to fundamentals - The
Bottom Line
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
INTEREST RATES have eased, the markets are looking healthier than they have
in a long time, and there is a definite mood of optimism in the air.
But in the aftermath of last year's string of corporate failures fund
managers and analysts alike are raising the call for a more sober assessment
of companies' prospects and the value of their shares than has been
fashionable in the last decade. Fundamental analysis, we are told, is back
in style, even for smaller companies.
The new trend is being heralded by Credit Lyonnais Laing with a study that
looks at smaller companies in the context of their cash flow and debt risk -
two areas that have been largely hidden or ignored by the market in the
heady years of the last decade when all that really mattered was a company's
ability to paint a rosy picture of unlimited growth.
The lesson of the 1980s - as the Accounting Standards Board's recent draft
rules for the reform of company accounts recognises - is that it has clearly
been too easy for UK companies to hide the real state of their finances
behind a jungle of statistics that has eluded not only investors and
analysts but, presumably, professional accountants as well.
'A lot of companies have been able to get around the fact that they are not
generating cash by making acquisitions. With companies that went bad in the
recession, the crack was already there and the recession only brought it out
into the open,' says Sarah Wrigglesworth, smaller companies analyst at
Credit Lyonnais Laing.
Hence the importance of moving from the past bias towards a company's
price/earnings multiple to paying more attention to its cash generative
ability. 'Earnings can be fiddled with,' says Wrigglesworth. Cash flow
cannot.
The ability to generate cash flow is also more critical in a recession when
it is not so easy to borrow from the banks. Companies will need to be able
to finance themselves through organic growth.
This is particularly true for smaller companies, which tend to suffer first
from any economic downturn and credit squeeze and benefit last from any
improvement in borrowing conditions.
Smaller companies' gearing is also twice that of larger companies, while
their interest cover is half that of the larger companies, according to CLL.
The CLL report, which will be published early next week, looks at 39
companies in terms of their funds flow and debt position, highlighting where
each company's finances look constrained and where there is room for
flexibility.
CLL's research has found that the average smaller company trades on an 8
times cash flow multiple against a market average of a 13 times earnings
multiple.
So which are the companies that are financially sound by CLL's analysis,
either because they are sufficiently cash generative or have been successful
at raising funds?
One company that has been successfully generating cash in line with profits
is Rolfe and Nolan, which sells software licenses for the back office
management of futures and options trading.
Rolfe &amp; Nolan has been very cash generative, with trading cash flow rising
from Pounds 110,000 in February, 1987 to Pounds 797,000 last year. Clients
pay an upfront fee, costs are very low and the group is paid by customers
before they have to pay costs.
At the other extreme is Pentos, the bookseller. The group has seen sales
grow strongly but this has been accompanied by a high level of capital
expenditure, which has absorbed cash.
At the same time growing sales has meant a rising stock level which has
increased working capital. Trading cash flow has fallen from a recent peak
of Pounds 10.3m in December 1988 to Pounds 7.6m last year and is expected to
fall further to Pounds 4.8m by the end of this year. Gearing at about 35 per
cent and interest cover at near five times is, nonetheless, still
comfortable.
 ----------------------------------
       SMALL COS INDICES
 ----------------------------------
                           % chg
                           on wk
CSCI      1017.4            +1.0
HGSC*     1245.66           +0.8
As of Apr 18. * Capital gains version
 ----------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II Chart (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4214</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAB2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Markets: Why banks profit at your expense - Serious Money
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN, Personal Finance Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KEEP A close eye on your bank and building society.
Each is likely to take every opportunity over the next few months to widen
its margins at your expense - to increase the charges you pay and to reduce
the interest rates you earn.
The changes are a reaction to an era when financial institutions were eager
to win the public's business - and were prepared to compete hard for the
privilege. The challenge from building societies forced banks, for example,
to pay interest on current accounts. The margin between mortgage rates and
base rates was narrowed - to the benefit of borrowers.
Now these changes are being reversed. The rate payable on interest-bearing
current accounts has fallen to derisory levels. Lenders have used the recent
falls in base rates as a chance to widen their margins - when base rates
were 15 per cent, the typical mortgage rate was 15.4 per cent, a spread of
0.4 of a percentage point. Now that base rates are 12 per cent, the going
rate for loans of under Pounds 60,000 is somewhere around 12.85 to 12.95 per
cent, almost double the earlier spread.
Halifax, which cut its rate to 12.95 per cent this week, pointed out that
borrowers had been protected by artificially low margins from the effect of
high interest rates. Now that rates were falling, societies are merely
returning the spread to previously prevailing levels.
However, overdraft rates have in many cases increased over the past year, in
spite of the fall in base rates. Annual rates are as high as 39 per cent on
some accounts, if you run up an unauthorised debt.
The cause for all this is the squeeze on the profits of the financial
sector. Banks, in particular, have only just recovered from the problems
they caused themselves by over-lending to the Third World in the late 1970s
and early 1980s. Now after a long period of high interest rates, coupled
with a slowdown in economic growth, they are facing a sharp rise in bad
debts affecting both their corporate and their personal customers.
Bank profits have fallen, and although their managements are making some
attempt to cut costs (not before time if you consider the level of City
salaries), they are also making every attempt to increase their revenues.
Some building societies too are feeling the pressure. Note that after base
rate cuts, some announce a cut in mortgage rates for new borrowers (which
will cost them little, given the lack of activity in the housing market) but
make existing borrowers wait weeks or months before they benefit.
Private customers have moved from being courted to being exploited, and they
will have to look a lot harder for the best deal.
In the 1980s, part of the rationale behind the intensive competition in the
personal finance area was the idea of cross-selling. Individuals attracted
by a particularly competitive rate on one product could then be sold more
profitable services such as life and travel insurance.
Now, with profits under pressure, individual products are having to pay
their own way. A good example is credit cards, where in the past, users who
paid off their bill promptly, paid nothing at all. Many cards now charge an
annual fee.
Banks and building societies can normally rely on customer inertia to
prevent them from losing too many accounts when they make these changes. It
involves a lot of bother to change cheque books, credit cards, standing
orders and the like. But the discerning saver will need to monitor his
accounts carefully.
We have already seen a number of building societies change their accounts -
introducing new tiers of savings accounts with more attractive rates than
the old. There is nothing wrong in that, except that in most cases they have
not written to savers to notify them. Although the changes are advertised in
branches, many, including the old and disabled, rarely visit their branch.
They will probably not notice the change for some time and will lose out
accordingly.
In the current climate, savers and borrowers need to read the small print
very carefully. It is tempting to throw away communications from your bank,
especially as so much is junk mail aimed at selling you new products. But
sometimes banks will slip information on changes in fees and charges into
otherwise harmless-looking publicity blurb.
And if your bank or building society does start to offer a poor product, be
prepared to change your account. There are now, for example, a number of
institutions offering high interest cheque accounts. Some require
substantial balances; but some do not.
Every Saturday, the Weekend FT publishes a table called 'The Best Rates for
Your Money' which highlights the most attractive rates on offer across a
number of investments, including Tessas and guaranteed income bonds.
But you still need to be careful not to be 'suckered in' by a particularly
attractive rate, only to find that a few months later, the bank or society
ceases its marketing drive and loses its competitive edge. This is
particularly true of inflexible products such as Tessas or mortgages where
it can be costly to move from one institution to another.
The moral is: Don't trust 'em an inch.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4215</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAB1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Finance &amp; The Family: Kleinwort focuses on trusts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Kleinwort Benson has established a separate organisation to manage its
stable of investment trusts. Ben Siddons, managing director of Kleinwort
Benson Investment Trust Management (KBITM) said the aim was to develop the
trusts and to enhance the perception of the group as IT managers.
KBITM has Pounds 800m under management and the largest trust, Merchants,
which was established in 1889, has assets of more than Pounds 250m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page II
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4216</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAB0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / The Long View: Keeping the chairman under control
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARRY RILEY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SHELL, BP, Sainsbury and Courtaulds, among many other large and successful
companies, have got it wrong, but the Institutional Shareholders' Committee
has got it right. Such, at least, was the implicit claim this week by the
ISC when it produced its statement of best practice on the role and duties
of company directors.
Good corporate governance is fundamental to the health of any modern
economy, and because institutional shareholders nowadays own something like
60 per cent of the shares in British listed companies they have the right -
indeed, the duty - to make known their views on how companies should be run.
However, fund managers seem to be taking a disappointingly narrow line. They
are almost completely ignoring the challenge of practices elsewhere in the
world, even in the rest of the European Community. Instead, they are
protecting their cherished right to buy and sell shares in companies without
entering into any form of longer-term commitment.
Any absentee landlord needs some sort of local agent to collect his rents
and make sure the tenants are not burning the furniture. This appears to
explain the peculiar preoccupation of the institutions with the role of
non-executive directors, and more particularly with the focus on their
independence, defined as freedom 'from bias, involvement or partiality'. But
if he is not involved, what is the non-exec doing on the board at all?
Outside directors are common enough in other jurisdictions, but normally are
clearly representative of major shareholders, bankers, customers, suppliers
or other interest groups; in Germany, where two-tier boards are the rule,
the workforce is represented too.
Along with this emphasis on independent directors goes a preoccupation with
non-executive chairmen: the roles of chairman and chief executive should be
split, as a way of controlling excessive power.
However, according to an analysis by the investor relations consultants Dewe
Rogerson, only 18 out of the 100 constituent companies of the FT-SE Index
embody this split formula in a pure form, with a non-executive chairman.
About half of these companies are banks and insurance groups, which
historically have favoured the predominantly non-executive board of
directors. You cannot say, however, that this form of governance has been
obviously successful from the shareholders' point of view. The City of
London has provided plenty of part-time jobs through the old boy network.
But over several decades the share prices of clearing banks, merchant banks
and general insurance companies have seriously underperformed the stock
market as a whole (and these sectors are currently awash in bad debts and
underwriting losses).
It seems a very strange time to be suggesting that this formula should be
more widely applied across British industry. Indeed, banks like NatWest have
streamlined their boards (although Midland's experiment with a combined
chairman and chief executive turned out to be disappointing). Moreover
Lonrho, not a company where the corporate governance has exactly been to
institutional investors' tastes over the years, has long adopted the
recommended split role formula; this suggests that structures alone will not
go far towards solving problems of excessive power concentration.
Another 42 out of the 100 Footsie companies also divide the top
responsibilities, although in a less clear way, so that the chairman is a
full-time executive but also has a chief executive officer. This leaves
another 40-odd companies where the executive chairman rules unchallenged: in
such cases, says the ISC, there is a particular need for a heavy
representation of independent non-executive directors.
These paragons need to be wise, strong and experienced, and yet must not
expect any substantial reward, certainly not any participation in share
option schemes or pension plans. There must be no compensation for loss of
office, says the ISC, even though being occasionally awkward and unpopular
may be a requirement for a good non-exec. Few such marvellous individuals
exist, yet the institutions have felt obliged to invent them because they
need some body of representatives to act as surrogate institutional
shareholders on the board. Many of the functions of independent
non-executives could be carried out by shareholders themselves through
resolutions and votes at annual and extraordinary meetings, but the modern
institutional shareholder has no time or taste for such responsibilities.
As far as I can see, the only way in which the ISC's formula could be made
to work would be through the setting up of sub-institutions which could
recruit, train and perhaps also motivate the non-executive directors. In
this way the delegation of shareholder control might be formalised. But how
could all shareholders be required to share the burden?
It is a muddle, and the reason why investment institutions are reluctant to
suggest clear structural solutions such as two-tier boards or the formal
recognition in statute law of non-executive directors and their
responsibilities is that other interest groups would demand representation
too, including the feared trade unions: the Bullock Report of the late 1970s
has never been forgotten.
However, British companies probably have to move in the direction of closer
informal links with partners, customers and suppliers, and the attitudes of
institutional shareholders are presently standing in the way of this. The
best companies have strong leadership, and look for long-term commitment
from all their stakeholders, including workers, suppliers and financiers. A
high level of involvement on all sides will tend to prevent excessive
concentrations of power: that is how it works in Japan, for example, and
when things go wrong various sources of help are available.
The here today, gone tomorrow shareholder does not easily fit into this
structure, and it is not obvious that the independent director can
satisfactorily plug the gap.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page I Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4217</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World Stock Markets (Asia Pacific): Investors turn back to
second-liners
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By EMIKO TERAZONO
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Tokyo
INVESTORS turned back to second-liners yesterday, as share prices on the big
board fell on index-linked selling by investment trusts prompted by the
weaker yen and higher bond yields, writes Emiko Terazono in Tokyo.
The Nikkei average lost 256.93 to 26,541.97, 0.2 per cent lower on the week,
after a high of 27,042.90 and a low of 26,699.67. Volume fell to 360m
shares, as institutional investors focused on the second section, which rose
21.01 to 3,404.88. The over-the-counter section added 50.94 to 3,086.02.
Losers led advances by 695 to 302, with 150 issues unchanged. The Topix
index of all first section stocks fell 13.48 to 1,998.07 and in London, the
ISE/Nikkei 50 index fell 2.85 to 1,506.49.
Investors were discouraged by the lack of monetary easing by the central
bank, following Thursday's release of March money supply figures which
showed growth of 4.9 per cent, the smallest rise on record.
Interest rate-sensitive issues retreated, with Nippon Steel and Mitsubishi
Heavy Industries down Y2 to Y480 and Y783 respectively. Financials were also
lower with Bank of Tokyo declining Y60 to Y1,320 and Nomura Securities
falling Y40 to Y2,170.
Mitsubishi Electric fell Y8 to Y793 on oversupply concerns. The company
plans to issue D-Mark and dollar denominated warrant bonds in the near
future.
Mitsubishi Rayon, a synthetic fibre maker, added Y5 to Y538 on reports that
an affiliate had developed a high-powered industrial water purifying system.
Japan Steel Works, a cast steel maker, rose Y15 to Y700 on strong earnings
projections. The company expects a 20 per cent rise in pre-tax profits for
the current year, thanks to development projects in suburban Tokyo.
Small and medium capital issues backed by strong earnings projections gained
ground. Keyence, the measuring control equipment manufacturer, added Y800 to
Y16,600, and Sega Enterprises, the game maker, rose Y500 to Y12,200.
Traders noted that speculative issues were gaining popularity. Nihon
Nohyaku, an agrochemical maker, rose Y290 to Y2,250 and Tokimec, a hydraulic
equipment maker, rose Y10 to Y1,060 on speculative buying.
In Osaka, the OSE average fell 176.29 to 29,899.69 on volume of 33.7m
shares. Nintendo, the video game maker, which had been sold recently on
margin position concerns, recovered Y200 to Y17,000.
Roundup
THE PACIFIC Rim attended to domestic issues yesterday.
AUSTRALIA was boosted by solid gains in bank shares on hopes of lower
interest rates. The All Ordinaries index closed 7.4 higher at 1,520.4, its
sixth successive rise and up 4.4 per cent on the week. Turnover eased to
ADollars 278m from ADollars 320m.
In the banking sector, Westpac rose 19 cents to ADollars 4.47 and ANZ rose
10 cents to ADollars 3.76.
BHP rose 10 cents to ADollars 11.80 in spite of news that March domestic
steel sales were well down from a year earlier.
Comalco fell 13 cents to ADollars 3.92 after its chairman warned that 1991
operating profit could be much lower.
Bundaberg Sugar added 2 cents to ADollars 3.90 after Tate &amp; Lyle of Britain
lifted its bid to ADollars 4.10 from ADollars 3.70.
NEW ZEALAND retreated on profit-taking. The Barclays index closed 12.66
lower at 1,467.71, up 4.6 per cent on the week. Turnover, which was boosted
to NZDollars 146.2m on Thursday by Brierley Investments's sale of a stake in
Magnum Corp, fell to NZDollars 63.3m.
Brierley was steady at NZDollars 1.10 on volume of 12.4m shares. The company
sold another 10.6m in Magnum after Thursday's disposal of 40m shares. The
two sales, representing 17 per cent of Magnum's stock, were made at
NZDollars 2.64 a share. Magnum fell 3 cents to NZDollars 2.70.
Fletcher Challenge dropped 3 cents to NZDollars 3.91 on volume of 2.9m
shares after the chief executive warned of a 10 per cent drop in earnings in
the year ending June 30.
MANILA closed lower, following an order from the Philippine Supreme Court
stopping San Miguel Corp holding elections for its board members. The
composite index recovered from a mid-morning low of 1,065.01 but still close
19.86 lower at 1,071.50, hardly changed on the week.
The Supreme Court has ordered San Miguel not to hold its election until the
court has decided who has the right to the votes of 20 per cent of the share
capital, equivalent to three seats on the 15-member board. The owner of the
shares had close links with Mr Ferdinand Marcos, the late former president.
San Miguel closed down 1.50 pesos at 58 pesos.
HONG KONG was worried by the fate of the new airport. The Hang Seng index
slipped 31.86 to 3,667.40, down 2 per cent on the week. Turnover fell to
HKDollars 1.22bn from HKDollars 1.29bn.
TAIWAN's weighted index fell more than 20 points in the first 15 minutes but
ended 49.15 higher at 5,739.26, up 2.7 per cent on the week. Turnover rose
to TDollars 79.52bn from TDollars 78.87bn. SINGAPORE's Straits Times
industrial index climbed 4.24 to 1,530.09, up 3.3 per cent on the week.
Turnover slipped to SDollars 229.8m from SDollars 247.7m. KUALA LUMPUR's
composite index lost 0.06 to 595.50 but was 3.2 per cent up on the week.
Turnover fell to 59m shares from 65.8m. SEOUL's composite index closed at
628.33, up 2.44 on the day but 1.7 per cent down on the week. Turnover rose
to Won83.5bn from Won78.4bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4218</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World Stock Markets (Europe): Hachette, Michelin fall after
1990 results
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Markets Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BOURSES made a subdued end to a week which had its exciting moments, writes
Our Markets Staff.
PARIS followed the bond market lower on receding hopes of a cut in interest
rates. The CAC-40 index fell 24.62 to 1,791.12, down 1.7 per cent on the
week, in volume estimated at FFR1.8bn.
Hachette, the publishing group, was the day's biggest loser, falling
FFr11.20 or 5.23 per cent to FFr203.10 in volume of 43,600 shares. Dealers
said the share was under selling pressure following the publication of 1990
results this week.
Also on the way down was Michelin, the tyre manufacturer, which lost FFr3.30
or 3.7 per cent to FFr86 with 229,350 shares traded as investors focused on
its balance sheet problems. But Peugeot rose again, up FFr7 to FFr553 with
147,600 shares traded, on continued relief that the chairman's statements
were more positive than usual.
Alcatel was weaker for the second day, losing FFr11 to FFr578 with a heavy
380,980 shares traded. Dealers spoke of a large sell order from London.
FRANKFURT took profits, nervous ahead of tomorrow's elections in the
Rhineland-Palatinate, Chancellor Helmut Kohl's home state. However, as the
dollar closed at a new high for the year against the D-Mark, companies
especially dependent on US sales withstood the general decline.
After a fall of 6.95 to 677.60 in the FAZ index at midsession, the DAX
closed 14.39 lower at 1,599.37. Rises on the week were 0.8 and 1.0 per cent
respectively and volume yesterday tailed off to DM5.5bn, down from DM7bn.
Among the dollar stocks, chemcials were relatively strong and, in motors,
BMW rose DM6.50 to DM570.50, up DM20 over three days in response to buy
notes from a numnber of London broking houses. Among the many fallers,
Mannesmann's DM9 drop to DM286 followed a sell recommendation by James
Capel, on lower first quarter sales and problems in Brazil.
However, last night the D-Mark had fallen below Y80 to Yen79.70. At this
level, Japanese shareholders in German equities are expected to get worried
about the Yen value of their holdings and, perhaps, to hedge their bets.
ZURICH saw a curious juxtaposition. On Thursday Sandoz said it would open
its registered shares to foreigners and got the standard response, with the
registered up and the bearers down. Yesterday however, it was one-way
movement at the end with the registered up SFr550 to SFr11,575, the bearers
by SFr450 to SFr11,800, and the participation certificates by SFr40 to
SFr2,200.
Ms Sarah Lavers, head of research at Schroder Securities, said that, by
Thursday evening, the premium on the bearers had fallen below the 5 to 6 per
cent generally expected for the privilege of anonymity on the part of the
holder. She had recommended a purchase of the bearers. Meanwhile, the SBC
general index rose 2.0 to 621.4, fractionally down on the week.
MILAN was again lifted by the insurance sector. The Comit index rose 3.94 to
602.64, weakness. up 1.4 per cent on the week. Generali, in heavy volume, at
one point reached L38,750 though it was officially set L560 higher at
L38,500. Mediobanca, the merchant bank which has a stake of up to 8 per
cent, closed L650 up at L16,630. Other insurers, including Alleanza, Toro
and Ras, all continued to gain. Toro was L190 up at L27,340.
AMSTERDAM was dominated by the expiry of April series options. The CBS
tendency index, which hit two 1991 highs this week, fell 0.8 to 96.0, 0.2
per cent lower on the week.
BRUSSELS heard rumours that Societe Generale de Belgique would sell its
stake in the chemical concern Gechem, pushing Gechem shares up BFr36 or 4.8
per cent to BFr786. The Bel-20 index was down 0.58 to 1,210.83, up 0.4 per
cent on the week.
MADRID focused on the construction sector. Focsa closed Pta160 higher at
Pta14,910 on rumours that a merger with Valderrivas is in the offing. The
general index fell 1.48 to 282.43, up 0.5 per cent on the week in volume of
Pta12bn after Pta13.6bn.
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
FT-SE Eurotrack 100 - Apr 19
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
                    FT-SE EUROTRACK 100 - APR 19
                           Hourly changes
 Open     10 am    11 am    Noon     1 pm     2 pm      3 pm     Close
1120.81  1120.48  1123.66  1124.70  1124.03  1123.97  1121.82   1122.00
            Day's High   1125.74     Day's Low   1120.15
          Apr 18     Apr 17     Apr 16     Apr 15     Apr 12
          1124.98   1126.20    1113.65    1125.46    1116.71
Base value 1000 (26/10/90)
 ---------------------------------------------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4219</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World Stock Markets: Consensus forecasts in conflict with
strategy - Earnings, and precedent
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARTIN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
IN TERMS of forecast earnings, most of the world's big equity markets are
clearly overvalued, according to the IBES team at the New York broker Jones
Lynch and Ryan.
IBES spends its time gathering consensus earnings forecasts from brokers'
analysts around the world. Its latest caulculations, as at the end of March,
reflect the bull market that followed the start of fighting in the Gulf war.
Setting earnings estimates for the next 12 months against current equity
prices and interest rates, IBES calculates that the Canadian, German,
Italian, UK and US stock markets are as high as at any time in the past
three years. The Japanese market is not quite so steeply priced, says IBES,
but of the seven biggest industrial countries, only the French market still
seems to offer good value.
Not everyone shares the view that the world's stock markets are mostly
marching together into dangerous territory. Still, even the most
enthusiastic bull might be given a moment's pause by the IBES prospective
price earnings ratios. The prospective world p/e is now 13 (excluding
Japan); Germany and Italy are at 15, Canada at 14 1/2 , the US at 14 and
Japan, with its historically high-growth expectations, at 39. Only the UK
and France - at 11 1/2 and 10 respectively - are more reasonably priced. Two
months ago, 12 of the 26 countries IBES follows had single-digit p/es, with
four below 8. Now, only five have p/es in single figures, with only New
Zealand still below 8 (at 7).
Those who are still bullish have their own set of numbers to point to. Mr
Joe Rooney, European strategist at James Capel, is recommending an
overweight position in continental European equities - based in part on
analysis of how bull markets have developed in the past two decades.
Comparing the first three months of any rally with the next 12 months, Mr
Rooney concludes that, for most big continental markets, the gains in the
second period far outstrip the gains in the first. In Germany, for example,
the average gain in the first three months of a bull market has been 14 per
cent; the average gains in the next 12 months has been 28 per cent. In
France, the numbers are 17 per cent and 27 per cent respectively.
That leads Mr Rooney to the conclusion that though the gains in the first
three months of the current rally have been stronger than average  - 21 per
cent in the German DAX index, for example, and 25 per cent in France's
CAC-40 - there is still some way to go for continental markets overall.
Indeed, one notable pessimist has changed his tune in recent weeks, on the
German market at least. Morgan Stanley's European strategist David Roche -
who was afraid at one point in the rally that his unrelievedly gloomy views
might force him to be one of the first post-perestroika defectors to the
Soviet Union - has started recommending German shares for the first time in
months.
His argument is that the bad news on the costs of east German reconstruction
is now in the price; and that Germany is likely to be the only country
where, over the next few years, the share of national income devoted to
profits grows as the share devoted to wages shrinks.
Put more baldly, his view of the German market can be summed up in three
words: 'laggards catch up' - and the DAX is still, at present prices,
lagging nearly 19 per cent behind its peak a year ago and 9 per cent behind
the FT-SE Eurotrack 100's performance since the rally started in
mid-January.
In some eyes, of course, that is exactly where it deserves to be. Mr Julian
Target, European strategist at Baring Securities in London, says 'a new
Wirtschaftwunder just isn't going to happen in eastern Germany'.
One reason: after the Second World War there was no home market in Germany
and a cheap D-Mark - so the obvious outlet for entrepreneurial energies was
the export of manufactures. Today, there is a huge domestic market and a
dear D-Mark, so it makes more sense for entrepreneurs to go into the
services sector.
'Germany is turning into an Anglo-Saxon style consumption-led economy,' says
Mr Target; and that is bearish for the big publicly quoted manufacturing
stocks. He recommends the Austrian market as an alternative for those
seeking Germanic virtues in their investments.
In the background to all the European markets has been the strong rise on
Wall Street, reflected symbolically this week in the Dow-Jones Industrial
Average's passage through the 3,000 mark for the first time.
On most measures, Wall Street is now more exposed than other major markets,
with US bonds looking markedly better value than equities. Yet, as Mr Peter
Lyon of Smith New Court in London points out, in the US as elsewhere the
signs that normally accompany a market top - rapid economic growth, for
example, or a sharp rise in commodity prices - are not present.
'If the global economy goes on decelerating', he says, 'this contradiction
could be resolved by better bond markets rather than weaker equities'.
Though the scope for lower bond yields is less in the US than elsewhere, he
still believes that long-term dollar interest rates have further to fall.
If the US market is now about to pause, the worldwide bull market may
splinter. Instead of marching up together, global equity markets may soon be
following their own paths - raising the rewards of picking markets, but
adding to the risks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4220</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World Stock Markets: South Africa
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
GOLD shares fell on weaker bullion prices, but most other sectors were
steady. The all-gold index fell 40 to 1,041 but the industrial index rose 6
to a new high of 3,476. The all-share index slipped 9 to 2,995. Vaal Reefs
fell R10 to R176.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4221</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / London Stock Exchange: Equities give ground in nervous trade
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
WARNINGS that several central banks may not favour further cuts in interest
rates depressed UK equities yesterday and focused investors' attentions on
the domestic political scene. A clear signal from the Bank of England that
UK base rates are staying at 12 per cent at present was seen as an
unpromising backcloth for the local elections to be held early next month.
Trading volume was unexciting but the market traded a downward, albeit
erratic course throughout the session, and was not helped at the close by an
early fall of 18 Dow points in the new Wall Street session.
At the close, the FT-SE Index was down 18.3 at 2,520.1, just above the day's
low. After opening lower following New York's failure to hold on to the Dow
3,000 mark overnight, shares rallied and then fell away again in London.
Seaq trading volume fell to only 465.8m shares yesterday, compared with
798.1m in the previous session. Trading levels in the equity market have
been more significantly more volatile since the market moved into the new UK
financial year earlier this month.
This week, the opening leg of the two week equity trading account, has seen
London lose six Footsie points as domestic factors hindered its response to
Wall Street's attempts to settle above the Dow 3,000 figure.
Yesterday's setback in the London market appeared to be a delayed reaction
to the possible political implications of this week's list of UK economic
data, notably the sharp rise in unemployment to above 2m in March, a
development which re-wakened speculation over the Government's prospects in
the impending local elections as well as over the likely timing of the next
general election for parliament. Some equity strategists believe that the UK
stock market has not yet taken the political outlook into its estimates of
market performance over the remainder of this year.
The slow pace of UK bank lending in March, announced yesterday, was seen as
underlining concern over recessionary pressure. But the session was
overshadowed by the fall in sterling against the dollar, as well as on the
sterling exchange rate index. The Bank of England's signal to the London
money markets, together with warnings against interest rate optimism from
the German Bundesbank and from US sources, left the London looking
distinctly unhappy.
Hopes that economic recovery is 'just round the corner,' may prove
premature, commented Mr Ian Harnett, chief economist at Strauss Turnbull.
However, the government bond market held fairly steady, ending the session
with minor gains at the long end of the range. Cater Allen withdrew from
making markets in UK government bonds.
Retail trading volumes in equities began to recover at the end of the week
after falling during the end-tax year period. However, volume remains below
March levels.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4222</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / London Stock Exchange: Equity futures and options Trading
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The share index futures market was depressed yesterday by uncertainty over
the timing of the next reduction in UK interest rates and the deepening
recession.
A decline on Wall Street added to the weaker tone and created a background
for investors to take profits after the recent strong rise.
The June FT-SE 100 index traded in a range of 2,536 to 2,565 before
eventually settling at 2,544, a fall of 24 points on the day. June's premium
to the cash index finished at 25 points, compared with brokers' 31-point
fair value estimate, which is an estimate of future dividend payments and
the cost of finance.
Elsewhere in the derivative markets, the bond issue by Hanson earlier in the
week continued to stimulate interest in stock options. The August 240 calls
remained a popular series.
The slide in Asda shares triggered turnover in July 110 calls as worries
grew about possible profit downgrades next week when the company meets
analysts.
Rolls-Royce was actively traded and as one of the most liquid stock options
continued to attract attention. The June 200 calls were the most actively
traded series.
The Amstrad June 70 puts featured as a broker downgraded its profit
estimates and the shares weakened.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4223</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Appointments: Changes at Booker subsidiary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Adrian J. Busby (pictured) has been appointed managing director of
PULLMAN FOODS, part of Booker's food distribution division. He will remain
managing director of Booker Wholesale Foods. Mr Nigel Eynon becomes
personnel director, remaining personnel director of Booker Wholesale Foods.
Mr Maitland Ford becomes national accounts director. He was sales and
marketing director. Mr Ford also joins the board of Booker Fitch Food
Services as a non-executive director, while Mr Stan Noble, BFFS multiple
accounts and contracts director, becomes a non-executive director of
Pullman. Mr Fred Barnes, southern regional director, becomes operations
director. Mr Kevin Llewelyn-Evans becomes finance director - he was
financial controller, Booker food distribution division. Mr Allen Watts,
buying director, adds responsibility for marketing. Mr Martin Dickinson
joins Pullman as sales director from Premier Brands.
*****
The European operation of THE RALPH M. PARSONS COMPANY, of Pasadena,
California, has apppointed Mr Michael F. Knapp as managing director, based
in London. He was manager, engineering group, at the US headquarters, and
replaces Mr Brian J. Watt who returns to the US.
*****
UBS SECURITIES INC has appointed Mr Sambo Lewis as managing director, US
equity product, in London. He was director of US equity effort at First
Boston.
*****
FISHBURN HEDGES BOYS WILLIAMS, corporate communications, has appointed Mr
Chris North as producton and creative services director; Ms Susie Tait as
account director; and Mr Marc Moninski as head of research and planning.
*****
LESNIK MEDALYER WOOTLIFF, public relations, has appointed Mr Michael
Medalyer and Mr Jonathan Wootliff as joint managing directors.
*****
BRITISH INTERNATIONAL FREIGHT ASSOCIATION has appointed Miss Patricia
Rawlings, MEP for Essex south west, as its next president. The first woman
to hold the post, she succeeds Sir Ian Denholm in May.
*****
TOKAI INTERNATIONAL, capital markets arm of Tokai Bank, has appointed to its
swaps and arbitrage team Dr Prashun Popat (from Chase Manhattan Bank); Dr
Aron Landy (from Paribas); Mr Samir El-Hibri (Salomon Brothers); and Mr
Philippe Cassabois (from Chemical Bank). They will be based in London.
*****
Ms Rita M. Zanon has been appointed a director of THE ADDISON TOOL COMPANY,
part of B. Elliott.
*****
McGRIGOR DONALD, a Scottish law firm, has appointed Mr Robert Gibbons as
director of finance. He was financial controller with Drivers Jonas. Ms
Carole Thomson has been promoted to director of administration.
*****
Ms Susan McKenna is to head NABARRO NATHANSON's office at Doncaster from May
1, succeeding Mr Iain Travers.
*****
ASHURST MORRIS CRISP has appointed as partners Mr Simon Cookson (property);
Mr Charles Geffen and Mr Ian Webb (company); and Ms Elizabeth Morris
(litigation).
*****
IDG COMMUNICATIONS has appointed Mr Simon Thompson as editorial director. He
was a publishing director at IPC.
Mr Hugh G. Hauck (pictured) has been appointed director of international
operations at KT-SWASEY, Telford. He will be responsible for subsidiaries in
Germany and Sweden, and for co-ordination throughout Europe and the Middle
East. The company is a subsidiary of Cross &amp; Trecker Corporation, Michigan.
*****
SIMMONS &amp; SIMMONS has appointed six partners from May 1: Ms Anna Kennedy
(commercial litigation); Mr Tony Woodgate and Ms Clare Potter (commercial
and trade); Mr Jonathan Melrose and Mr Stephen Coleclough (taxation); and Ms
Jane Newman (company/commercial).
*****
Ms Gill Edwards is to set up a marketing consultancy. She was managing
director of NSP subsidiary The Product Index.
*****
FUELINK, Derby, NFC's fuel management specialist, has appointed Mr Chris
Munro as director and general manager. He joined the group in 1981.
*****
Mr John Bowcock, chief executive of Sir Alexander Gibb &amp; Partners, has been
elected chairman of the BRITISH DAM SOCIETY.
*****
THE INDEPENDENT HEALTHCARE ASSOCIATION, has appointed Mr WJ Alexander as a
board director. He is an executive director of Cresta Holdings.
*****
Mr Richard Hunting (pictured), deputy chairman, becomes chairman of HUNTING
from May 24, when Mr Clive Hunting retires but continues on the board.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13 Photograph (Omitted). Photograph (Omitted). Photograph
(Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4224</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Commodities and Agriculture: Zinc squeeze fades as stocks
soar - Week in the markets
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BLACKWELL
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SHENANIGANS in the zinc market appeared to have fizzled out by the end
of the week - but not before turning attention once more on how the London
Metal Exchange should act when faced with a squeeze.
On Monday the extent of the technical squeeze became apparent as the
backwardation, or premium paid for cash zinc over metal for delivery in
three months, soared to Dollars 217 a tonne, compared with Dollars 115 on
Friday last week.
On Tuesday the backwardation reached Dollars 240, and traders said that
during the late afternoon Dollars 60 a tonne was being paid to 'borrow' (buy
cash and sell forward) zinc just for one day. They were quick to point out
that during a similarly tight market in December 1989 the LME executive
imposed a limit of Dollars 20 a tonne on the daily backwardation.
Fundamentally there is an abundance of zinc, as can be seen from the surge
of stocks into LME warehouses this week - a rise of 14,675 tonnes on Monday
and 19,650 tonnes on Thursday to reach a total of 102,775 tonnes, the
highest level since November 1983.
Metallgesellschaft, the German group whose clients controlled most of the
zinc available for delivery in April, denied that it was trying to squeeze
the market. Some of its associates had turned to the LME to cover sales
contracts which they might have had difficulty filling because of other
problems, the group explained. It cited the poor performance of Cominco's
lead-zinc refinery in Canada, shipments from MIM delayed by floods in
Australia, the prospective closure of the Berzelius refinery in Germany for
a refit, and an expected shortfall in production at the Rheinzink smelter.
The LME executive had known for some time that a technical squeeze was
developing. But rather than acting officially, traders and analysts
suggested that the LME was using diplomatic pressure to maintain an orderly
market.
An official from Metallgesellschaft said on Monday that its customers had
all agreed to ensure that the market remained liquid. But he also hoped that
market users short of zinc had good reasons for their positions. 'Our
clients are zinc miners, smelters, refiners and dealers and I have no
sympathy for anyone who deliberately sells zinc they do not own to push the
price down just because a trend line on a chart crosses a particular point.'
By Thursday the bubble had burst, and the backwardation was right down to
Dollars 53.50 a tonne. Market talk suggested that a deal had been done by
Metallgesellschaft and the main investment fund victim of the squeeze, said
to be the Californian-based Mint Fund, 50-per-cent-owned by ED &amp; F. Man, the
London trade house.
Yesterday cash zinc closed at Dollars 1,201.50 a tonne, down Dollars 121 on
the week, with the backwardation stood at Dollars 32 a tonne.
The episode could prove damaging to the LME's image, especially as the LME
price is now the benchmark for world trade in zinc. Analysts and traders
also fear that prices will now be driven to unnecessarily low levels.
Mr Angus MacMillan, analyst with Billiton-Enthoven, expects a test of
Dollars 1,150 soon, asserting that 'supply disruptions are built into the
price.'
On the bullion market gold has retreated below Dollars 360 a fine ounce,
closing yesterday at Dollars 356.45, a fall of Dollars 4.30 on the week. The
price has been dragged down to the bottom of its current Dollars 355-Dollars
370 range by losses in silver, coupled with the strength of the dollar,
suggest Mr Andy Smith, precious metals analyst with Union Bank of
Switzerland.
Sugar prices have continued to retreat. The London Daily Price for raws was
Dollars 207 a tonne yesterday, down Dollars 17.60 on the week and the lowest
level since December 1987.
Several new bearish factors emerged this week, not least among them the
latest report on the market from Czarnikow, the London trade house, which
revised upwards its production forecasts for both China and Thailand.
Earlier in the season it was feared that Thai production would fall below
the 3.5m tonnes of last year, but Czarnikow now thinks the country's output
could be just under 4m tonnes. The report also reckons that Chinese output
will not fall far short of domestic consumption at 7.2m tonnes.
India said this week that it was raising its export limit for sugar this
season by a further 100,000 tonnes to 525,000 tonnes. In addition, there is
market talk that a five-year deal between Australia and the Soviet Union for
1.5m tonnes could be in jeopardy.
 --------------------------------
    LME WAREHOUSE STOCKS
 --------------------------------
   (As at Thursday's close)
        tonnes
Aluminium   +17425 to 364,425
Copper        +375 to 224,525
Lead         +1000 to  71,225
Nickel        -324 to   5,886
Zinc        +19650 to 102,775
Tin           -325 to  17,230
 --------------------------------
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4225</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / London Stock Exchange: Water stocks upset
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE WATER sector, particularly the Water Package and the smaller,
lesser-traded stocks, had a rough passage after the London Stock Exchange
confirmed yesterday that trading in the Package will cease at the close of
trading on July 12.
Institutions were said to have been aggressive sellers of the Package on the
basis that they did not want to be left holding large lines of stock in the
smaller water stocks which are difficult to trade in the market. Specialists
said that around 21 per cent of the shares in the ten water companies -
around 460m shares - are still held in the form of the Water Package Units,
They suggested that big funds would sell more Package units and reinvest in
the easily-traded Footsie water stocks: Anglian, North West, Severn Trent
and Thames. But it was also pointed out that the funds may not reinvest all
the proceeds in the water stocks, where the final call of 70p a share falls
due in July.
The Water Package dropped 110 to Pounds 3010. The sharpest declines in the
individual stocks came from Wessex, down 17 to 367p, and Northumbrian, 14
lower at 322p. Thames, the largest of the waters by market capitalisation,
slipped 8 to 306p, while North West, the second-largest, fell 9 to 296p,
Severn-Trent, third largest, 11 to 287p and Anglian 10 to 296p.
Whitbread wanted
Whitbread was the second best performer in the FT-SE 100 index after two
securities houses threw their weight behind the stock.
Both Smith New Court and Nomura had met the company in the previous two
days. Mr Derek Brock at Nomura said that although beer volumes were down on
the previous year, profit margins were growing. The stock had been oversold,
he said, adding that 'it was a good recovery play being heavily into the
consumer end of the sector.'
Mr Mike McCarthy at Smith said he was confident that the company was 'very
well placed' to meet the Monopolies and Mergers Commission directives on
reducing the number of public houses it controls.
Attention had also been drawn to the stock because of its direct and
indirect holdings in a number of second line brewers, especially Boddington,
which bid for Devenish on Thursday. Whitbread rose 8 to 494p.
P&amp;O leasing deal
P &amp; O rose after it announced that it had arranged a leasing deal on 34
ships with a market value of Pounds 400m. At one stage the shares were up 31
at 629p as dealers initially believed it would lead to a significant
reduction in gearing.
But as it became clear that the deal was merely a reshuffling of its debt
rather than a refinancing package the shares fell and by the close they were
up just 5 at 603p.
'The market still liked it because they got a good deal. It also shows they
have financial flair and have muscle in its dealings with the banks,' one
transport specialist said. Analyst believed it may make a rights issue less
likely.
Ever-volatile ADT, the Bermuda-based conglomerate climbed 4 1/2 to 89p on
hopes of progress in its legal dispute with its 29 per cent stakeholder
Laidlaw, the Canadian transport and waste disposal group.
A small profits upgrading from BZW helped Hanson buck the market's downward
trend. The shares added a penny at 226p, after 228p.
Merchant banks stole the limelight in the financial sector. Hambros closed a
further 4 cheaper at 275p with dealers now convinced that the placing of
Banco Bilbao Vizcaya's 5.6 per cent stake in the company would take place
soon. Vizcaya's representative on the Hambros board resigned this week. Last
week Baltica, the Danish group, sold its 14 per cent holding in Hambros.
S G Warburg maintained its recent good progress, closing 4 better at 453p, a
week's rise of 20. It was boosted by success in gaining the lead brokership
for the sale of the Government's remaining British Telecom holding. Analysts
pointed to the strong performance of the stock which has put the bank's
market capitalisation in sight of the Pounds 1bn-mark, the level at which
the shares would become a serious contender for inclusion in the Footsie
100.
Suggestions that a large securities house had downgraded both Land
Securities and Great Portland Estates left the shares 6 down at 536p and 3
lower at 228p respectively.
Annual profits of Pounds 70.7m, against Pounds 75.3m the previous year, from
Hammerson were at the lower end of the range of analysts' expectations. The
shares duly underperformed the market with a fall of 9 to 615p. The company
will be briefing brokers individually next week.
Smith New Court was responsible for clipping 2 1/2 off Amstrad which settled
at 74 1/2 p on keen turnover of 6.2m. Smith lowered its current and next
year profit forecasts by Pounds 5m each - to Pounds 35m and Pounds 50m - and
said Amstrad was suffering along with the likes of computer manufacturers
IBM, Apple and Compaq. Amstrad's satellite dish sales in Germany have
suffered and the company is facing a difficult second half, said Smith,
which emphasised that its view was its own and not that of Amstrad.
A visit by Kleinwort Benson to Cellnet, owned 60-40 by British Telecom and
Securicor/Security Services, left the broker impressed. 'They've put in a
lot of hard work and the results are coming through with Cellnet's market
share rising,' said Mr James Dodd. He said the cellular market 'has
bottomed.' Securicor 'A' rose 8 to 563p and Security Services 18 to 457p. BT
eased 2 1/2 to 361 1/2 p.
Saatchi and Saatchi eased  1/2 to 19 3/4 p after it confirmed that its
Pounds 55m rights issue had been 89.5 per cent taken up. Most of the rump of
the issue had been placed the night before, and another 20.1m was recorded
on the overnight ticker at 19 1/4 p.
Annual results from advertising agency Geers Gross left the shares 3 1/2
lower at 34 1/2 p. The company made Pounds 747,000, a 5.8 per cent
improvement over the previous year's number.
The proposed disposal by United Newspapers of its Scottish regional
newspapers helped the shares continue their recent good performance with a
gain of 3 to 379p.
Johnston Press the Edinburgh-based company which publishes 56 newspapers
across the UK, advanced after a positive trading statement at the company's
annual meeting. The shares added 11 at 214p.
Trading volume in the fully paid version of Bass swelled to 15m as the
residue of the company's rights issue was placed at an average of 938.1p a
share. The rights price was Pounds 8. After the market closed, the company
said that the issue had been 89.6 per cent taken up by institutions. The
remaining 7 1/2 m shares were placed by Cazenove and Panmure Gordon as Bass
slipped 9 to 969p.
Asda fell 6 to 121p as 11m traded on speculation that bad news may be
announced when the company meets institutions and brokers next week. Asda
was under pressure this week after a broker forecast lower profits in
1992/93. The suggestion yesterday was that forecasts for the current year
might be cut after next week's meetings.
NEW HIGHS AND LOWS FOR 1991
NEW HIGHS (195).
BRITISH FUNDS (4) Treas. 8pc 1991, Treas. 3pc 1992, Treas. 2pc IL 1992, Do.
1994, INT. BANK &amp; O'SEAS GOVT. STLG. ISSUES (1) Utd. Mexican States 16 1/2
pc 2008, AMERICANS (25) Abbott Labs., Amdahl, Bankers NY, CPC, California
Energy, Chase Manhattan, Citicorp, Colgate-Palm., Dana, Ford, Gen. Elect.,
Greyhound Dial, Hasbro, Honeywell, Ingersoll-Rand, Lowe's, Manuf. Hanover,
Merrill Lynch, Morgan (JP), Morris (Ph), Pall, Republic NY, Sears Roebuck,
Sun Co., Texaco, CANADIANS (7) Bk. of Montreal, Bk. of Nova Scotia, Brascan,
Central Capital, Derlan, Hudson's Bay, Inco, BANKS (6) ANZ, Espirito Santo,
Mitsui Tst. &amp; Bk., Natl. Australian, Secure Tst., Westpac, BREWERS (2)
Fuller STA, Seagram, BUILDINGS (7) Amco, Blockleys, Breedon, Conder, EBC,
Roskel, Ward, CHEMICALS (3) Caird 7pc Prf. 2009, Engelhard, Yorkshire,
STORES (6) Cantors A, Coles Myer, Fine Art, Helene, Ritz Design, Scholl,
ELECTRICALS (12) Acal, Domino Printing, Forward Tech., Hewlett-Packard,
Kewill Sys., Learmonth &amp; Burchett, Magnetic Matls., Misys, Motorola, Peek,
Pifco, Do. A, ENGINEERING (3) ASW, Johnson &amp; Firth, Victaulic, FOODS (5)
Brake Bros., Low (Wm), Nichols (Vimto), Nurdin Peacock, Sutherland,
INDUSTRIALS (33) AAF Invs., Am. Business Sys., BH Props., BTR Nylex, Baxter
Inc., Bluebird Toys, Bowater, Boxmore, Brierley Invs., CSR, China Light,
Dauphin, Elga, Fletcher Chlnge., Huntleigh Tech., ML Labs., MY, Nobo, Novo
Nordisk B, Pentland, Portmeirion Potts., Powell Duffryn, Russell (A),
Securicor A, Security Servs., SmithKline Bchm A, Do. Equity Units, Stora B
Free, Swallowfield, Walker Greenbank, Whatman, Wills, Young (H), INSURANCE
(8) Alex. &amp; Alex., Aon, Britannic, FBD, Lincoln Natl., Marsh &amp; Mclennan,
Travelers, Utd. Friendly B, LEISURE (12) Boosey &amp; Hawkes, Border TV,
Campari, Capital Radio, Central ITV, Ex-Lands, First Leis., Invicta Sound,
Radio Clyde, Scot. TV, Ulster TV, Wembley, MOTORS (4) Appleyard, Dagenham,
General Mtrs., Mid-States, NEWSPAPERS (4) EW Fact, Johnston Press, News
Corp., Thomson Corp., PAPERS (3) Gold Greenlees, Lawson Mardon, Stat-Plus,
PROPERTY (5) Daejan, Lend Lease, Marylebone Ests., Shaftesbury, Sinclair
Goldsmith, SHOES (1) FII, SOUTH AFRICANS (1) OK Bazaars, TEXTILES (7)
Dawsongroup, Gaskell, Lamont, Leeds, Lyles (S), Yorklyde, Youghal, TRANSPORT
(3) CSX, Hays, Mayne Nickless, TRUSTS (23) Aberforth Smllr. Co's, Acorn,
Derby, Fidelity Japan, GT Chile Fd. Units, Genesis Malaysia Maju, Genesis
Chile Ptg., Grahams Rintoul Stppd. Prf., Intrum Justitia, Invesco MIM 9pc
'95-2000, Korea Europe, Latin Amer., Lon. Amer. Venture, Malaysia Cap.
Select, Malaysian Emrg., Mexico Fd., Moorgate, Scot. &amp; Merc. A, Scot. Cities
A, Siam Fd. (Cayman), Singapore SESDAQ, Sth. East Asian Wrrnts., Thai Euro
Ptg., OILS (6) Exxon, Gulfstream Res. Canada, Mobil, Occidental Pet., Texaco
8pc Cnv., Woodside, PLANTATIONS (1) Highlands, MINES (10) Anglo Amer. Coal,
Anglovaal, Beatrix, De Beers Linked Units, Impala Plat., Normandy Res.,
Northham Platinum, Pasminco, Rustenburg, Western Areas.
NEW LOWS (25).
BRITISH FUNDS (1) Treas. 9pc 2008, BREWERS (1) Merrydown Wine, STORES (2)
Gent (SR), Usher (F), ELECTRICALS (3) Denistron, Sema, TGI, INDUSTRIALS (8)
Assoc. Farmers, Brompton, Courtney Pope, Hartons, Do. 7pc Prf., Scot.
Heritable, Spear (JW), Worthington (AJ), NEWSPAPERS (1) Gardner (DC),
PROPERTY (3) Barlows, Cussins, Wates City of Lon., TRUSTS (1) Afex, OILS (2)
Cairn Energy, Sovereign, PLANTATIONS (1) Rowe Evans, MINES (2) Blyvoor,
Harmony.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 13
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4226</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Money Markets: Bank lends at 12%
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
INTEREST RATES had a slightly softer tone in London yesterday, after news of
much lower than expected M4 lending by UK banks and building societies in
March.
Lending rose by only Pounds 700m, compared with a rise of Pounds 5.9bn in
February, but any thoughts that this might encourage an early cut in bank
base rates were countered by the Bank of England when it lent funds to the
money market at 12 per cent, to underline the present rate structure.
Three-month sterling interbank eased to 11 25/32 -11 21/32 from 11 13/16 -11
per cent and 12-month money fell to 11 3/8 -11 1/4 from 11 7/16 -11 5/16 per
cent.
The M4 lending figures led to a firming of short sterling futures on Liffe.
June delivery opened slightly lower at 88.67 but touched a peak of 88.76,
before closing at 88.71 compared with 88.68 previously.
On the London cash market the Bank of England initially forecast a
day-to-day credit shortage of Pounds 600m, but revised this to Pounds 650m
in the afternoon. Total help of Pounds 582m was provided.
Before lunch the authorities bought Pounds 2m bank bills outright in band 2
at 11 13/16 per cent. In the afternoon the central bank did not buy any more
bills, but invited the discount houses to use their borrowing facilities. A
total of Pounds 580m was lent to the houses for seven days at 12 per cent.
Bills maturing in official hands, repayment of late assistance and a take-up
of Treasury bills drained Pounds 917m, with a rise in the note circulation
absorbing Pounds 490m and bank balances below target Pounds 15m. These
outweighed exchequer transactions adding Pounds 820m to liquidity.
At the weekly Treasury bill tender the average rate of discount on 91-day
bills fell to 11.1806 from 11.2351 per cent and the average on 182-day bills
declined to 10.7229 from 10.7254 per cent.
The Pounds 500m 91-day bills on offer attracted bids of Pounds 2.593bn and
the Pounds 200m of 182-day bills received bids of Pounds 942m.
The highest accepted rate on 91-day bills was 11.1907 per cent, equal to a
price of Pounds 97.210 and bids at that level were allotted around 61 per
cent of the amount applied for.
The top accepted price on 182-day bills was 10.7494 per cent, equal to a
price of Pounds 94.640. Bids at that level received about 3 per cent of the
amount applied for.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4227</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Foreign Exchanges: Dollar hits 16-month high
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DOLLAR renewed its upward surge yesterday after going through a period
of consolidation since Easter. The rise started in mid-February and appeared
to have resumed yesterday as the currency hit its highest level for about 16
months against the D-Mark.
This took it to a trading peak of DM1.7380 in reaction to a US press report
that a Federal Open Market Committee meeting on March 26 agreed unanimously
that interest rates may have been pushed low enough to end the recession.
It was also agreed that there will be no further cuts before the next FOMC
meeting on May 14, unless there is surprisingly bad news about the economy,
according to the report.
This led to demand for the dollar in the Far East, with the trend continuing
when Europe and New York came into the market. The D-Mark was particularly
vulnerable as a result of problems caused by German unification and
political unrest in the Soviet Union. Attention turned back to these
economic and political factors following the failure of the Bundesbank to
raise official interest rates at Thursday's council meeting.
Comments by German central bank officials had little impact. Mr Karl Otto
Pohl, Bundesbank president, said that German monetary policy will remain
tight and that a relatively high level of interest rates has to be accepted.
Mr Helmut Schlesinger, deputy president of the Bundesbank, told German
television that the central bank is not satisfied with the D-Mark's value
against the dollar, but added that last week's higher rate at a securities
repurchase agreement tender was technical and not a signal of changed
monetary policy.
At the London close the dollar had climbed to DM1.7360 from DM1.6880; to
Y138.35 from Y136.70; to SFr1.4705 from SFr1.4415; and to FFr5.8575 from
FFr5.7000. Its index rose to 66.3 from 65.1.
The D-Mark also weakened against the Japanese yen, falling below an import
support level of Y80.00, to Y79.70 from Y81.00 in London.
Sterling fell 5 cents to Dollars 1.7220 and was slightly weaker against
several of its partners in the ERM, but was steady against the D-Mark.
Figures from the European Commission kept the pound in second strongest
place in the ERM.
Sterling closed unchanged at DM2.9900 but fell to FFr10.0875 from
FFr10.1000; to SFr2.5325 from SFr2.5550; and to Y238.25 from Y242.25. Its
index lost 0.8 to 92.2.
Rumours that sterling and the Spanish peseta may soon join the narrow 2.25
per cent band in the ERM drew replies of 'no comment' from the Bank of Spain
and the UK Treasury.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4228</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World Commodities Prices: Spices
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
The market for nutmegs/mace remains depressed, despite many rumours of the
re-establishment of the Nutmeg Association, reports Man-producten. Prices
have hit new lows in guilders and D-marks. Small demand for nearby delivery.
Some demand for very late deliveries - 1993 and 1994 - but no sellers like
to sell short at these lows. Shipment ss Dollars 1,450; bwp Dollars 850;
abcd Dollars 2,450; mace Dollars 2,250, all cif. Cassia: both origin and
Europe/Us are unchanged. Cloves: commores unchanged at FF10, very attractive
if converted into dollars - Dollars 1,650 cif - whereas Madagascar at
Dollars 1,800 cif, both on same shipment basis.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4229</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / International Company News: Caterpillar loss of Dollars 32m
in line with forecasts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CATERPILLAR, the world's biggest manufacturer of earth-moving equipment,
yesterday unveiled a first-quarter net loss of Dollars 32m, or 32 cents a
share, compared with net income of Dollars 99m, or 97 cents, in the first
three months of last year.
Sales fell 9 per cent in the quarter to Dollars 2.68bn from Dollars 2.94bn.
Earlier this month the Peoria, Illinois-based company had warned that weak
market conditions would push it into the red in the first quarter, and the
results were in line with these expectations.
Caterpillar's first-quarter results also reflect a one-time pre-tax charge
of Dollars 21m related to the consolidation of its building construction
products division in North America.
The company's operating profit slumped to Dollars 16m in the first three
months of 1991 from Dollars 148m. Weakness in US construction activity
depressed Caterpillar's US sales by 20 per cent in the 1991 quarter to
Dollars 1.08bn.
The company attributed the erosion of sales and revenues to a 13 per cent
decline in physical sales volume, reflecting the recession in the US and
other industrialised countries and the sharp deterioration of the Brazilian
economy. However, lower volume was partly offset by a 3 per cent increase in
realised prices, thanks to favourable dollar translations and price
increases.
The company also benefited from an Dollars 18m increase in revenues from
financial subsidiaries.
A striking feature of the results for the first quarter was the drop in
other income to Dollars 7m from Dollars 53m. The deterioration was blamed on
exchange losses on European currencies in the first quarter compared with
gains a year earlier.
Caterpillar's outlook for the rest of 1991 appears difficult, even if the US
economy improves significantly, since construction tends to lag behind any
improvement in the rest of the economy.
Mr Eli Lustgarten, an analyst at PaineWebber in New York, has not changed
his earnings estimate of Dollars 1-a-share in 1991 for Caterpillar, 'but
that will be a challenge,' he said. In 1990, Caterpillar had net income per
share of Dollars 2.07.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4230</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / International Company News: Regulators take control of
Standard Trustco
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT GIBBENS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MONTREAL
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FEDERAL regulators have taken control of troubled Standard Trustco, closing
its 37 trust and mortgage offices across Canada until further notice.
Plans by Montreal's Laurentian Bank to take over the branches and part of
the trust business, and subsequent court action by 25 institutional
creditors to put Standard Trustco into bankruptcy, are in abeyance.
Mr Michael Wilson, finance minister, said the move was necessary to
'maintain confidence in Canada's financial institutions' although Standard
Trustco is the ninth largest trust company in Canada.
The company and the Ontario government expressed astonishment at the move to
have a receiver appointed, saying the Laurentian deal was a good solution to
Standard Trustco's problems.
The company holds about CDollars 1.5bn (USDollars 1.29bn) in deposits but
has a Dollars 350m non-performing property loan portfolio. Most of the
deposits are covered by Canada Deposit Insurance Corp, up to Dollars 60,000
per depositor.
Federal officials said the closures were intended to prevent a run by more
than 100,000 Standard Trustco depositors. They will try to maintain the
healthy parts of the business.
In Montreal, Laurentian said it was still interested in negotiating with
whoever ends up running Standard Trustco.
Canada Packers, 56 per cent held by Britain's Hillsdown Holdings, is
expected to sell its loss-making Western meat-slaughter business by the end
of next week and its edible oils division soon afterwards.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4231</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / International Company News: Sears, Roebuck surges by 91% in
first quarter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BARBARA DURR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   CHICAGO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SEARS, Roebuck, the largest US retailer, reported a first-quarter net income
of Dollars 202.7m, or 59 cents per share, up 91 per cent, or 31 cents per
share, on a year ago.
Without a deferred tax charge of Dollars 38.5m, taken in the first quarter,
net income was Dollars 241.2m, or 70 cents a share.
Revenues, which also include the company's insurance, property and financial
services units, rose 2.2 per cent to Dollars 12.88bn.
The company's core Merchandise Group narrowed its loss to Dollars 14.1m from
Dollars 37.4m. The improvement came more from cost cutting than from
increased sales. Retail sales declined 3.1 per cent to Dollars 6.62bn.
Mr Edward Brennan, chairman, said the improved results were the 'early
effects of our cost reduction programmes
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4232</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / International Company News: Colgate-Palmolive posts 12%
advance
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
COLGATE-Palmolive, the second-biggest US household products manufacturer,
yesterday posted a 12 per cent improvement in first-quarter net income to
Dollars 91.3m, or Dollars 1.30 a share, on sales which rose 12 per cent to
Dollars 1.5bn.
A year earlier, Colgate recorded first quarter net income of Dollars 81.2m,
or Dollars 1.16 a share, on sales of Dollars 1.3bn.
Mr Reuben Mark, chairman and chief executive, said Colgate US and Hill's Pet
Products, Colgate's two big US businesses, posted double digit earning
increases.
Adjusting earnings per share for a two-for-one stock split with a record
date of April 25, 1991, profits in the latest quarter were 65 cents, against
58 cents in 1990. The company's earnings before interest and taxes grew 17
per cent to Dollars 160.7m in the 1991 quarter.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4233</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / International Company News: Swedes agree Alfa-Laval merger
deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN BURTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   STOCKHOLM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
SWEDEN'S Competition Ombudsman yesterday approved Tetra Pak's SKr16.25bn
(Dollars 2.68bn) purchase of Alfa-Laval, which is also being investigated on
anti-competition grounds by the European Commission.
The decision came after Tetra Pak, the Swiss liquid packaging concern,
promised that Alfa-Laval, the Swedish dairy and food processing equipment
company, will operate independently in its marketing.
Where Tetra Pak and Alfa-Laval can supply similar services and machinery,
they must offer separate bids at the request of the customer.
Tetra Pak also agreed it should not make sales conditional on orders for
Alfa-Laval or vice versa.
It pledged existing products should not be changed so competitors to Tetra
Pak and Alfa-Laval would have difficulty in connecting equipment to the
systems produced by them.
In the case of dairies, for example, Alfa-Laval often supplies the equipment
for milk processing, while Tetra Pak supplies the equipment for packaging.
But the two companies told the Competition Ombudsman they would work with
competitors if a dairy chooses another processing or packaging company.
Mr Gunnar Hermansson, Competition Ombudsman, said it was unclear, however,
whether the EC would accept similar commitments from Tetra Pak in return for
approving the deal.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4234</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / International Company News: Degussa discloses 50% pre-tax
fall half-way
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KATHARINE CAMPBELL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DEGUSSA, the German chemicals, metals, and pharmaceuticals group, yesterday
revealed that pre-tax profits fell by half in the first six months of the
fiscal year which ends September 1991.
Mr Gert Becker, chief executive, told the annual meeting he believed
earnings had 'bottomed out' and the result for the full year would be
'roughly a third below' the previous twelve months. In 1989-90 pre-tax
profits stood at DM318m (Dollars 190m).
Mr Becker attributed the poor performance to the same negative factors that
weighed on the company in the previous year, including the weak dollar,
recessionary trends in important export markets, and the collapse in eastern
European business. He added that internal restructuring in the metals
division was an extra cost this year.
Turnover in the first six months of fiscal 1990-91 reached DM6.5bn, an 8 per
cent decline, which the company blamed principally on weak precious metal
prices.
Total sales in all areas excluding precious metals trading were 2 per cent
lower.
Earnings from Asta Pharma and the dental division had improved, he said, in
contrast with the rest of the business, including the chemicals operation
where profits dropped 'considerably'.
Mr Becker did not comment as to whether Degussa would maintain last year's
dividend of DM11.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4235</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / International Company News: Credit Lyonnais overtakes BNP
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By WILLIAM DAWKINS
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   PARIS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
CREDIT Lyonnais, the French state-owned bank, yesterday reported an 18.5 per
cent rise in last year's net group profits. Credit Lyonnnais has now
overtaken Banque Nationale de Paris (BNP), also state-owned, as France's
second largest bank in terms of profit.
Group net profits at Credit Lyonnais rose to FFr3.7bn (Dollars 660m) from
FFr3.13bn, a contrast to the halving in BNP's net earnings to FFr1.6bn,
announced a day previously.
Mr Jean-Yves Haberer, the chairman, said the results were gratifying but it
was impossible to forecast the outlook for 1991, which was already proving
to be an 'atypical year'.
Mr Haberer confirmed that 'nearly all the conditions are ready' for Credit
Lyonnais' long-awaited share exchange accord with Commerzbank of Germany,
which he hoped to conclude this year. Total group loans outstanding rose by
20.5 per cent to FFr692bn, while customers' deposits advanced by 25 per cent
to FFr580bn.
Provisions rose slightly, by 3 per cent to FFr6.5bn, within which an extra
FFr593m of provisions for country loans lifted the bank's coverage of
exposure to country risks to 60 per cent.
It had to lift provisions for bad customer loans by 91 per cent to FFr4.1bn,
reflecting the general economic squeeze on borrowers.
There was also a FFr842m provision for writedowns on the value of Credit
Lyonnais' securities portfolio, 10 times the figure set aside the previous
year.
Group operating income rose by 15 per cent to FFr11.66bn, reflecting
'excellent' results from the French leasing businesses, significantly higher
earnings from life insurance and Clinvest - the investment banking division
 -and the first contribution from Altus Finance, the treasury bank acquired
from Thomson-CSF at the end of 1989.
Foreign subsidiaries' contribution rose by 67 per cent to account for 31 per
cent of net profit.
This continues the previous year's trend, with the exception of Brazil and
Argentina, which had to make large provisions.
London-based Credit Lyonnais Capital Markets - formerly Alexanders Laing and
Cruikshank - halved its losses last year and was heading towards
profitability, said Mr Haberer.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10 Photograph Haberer, outlook uncertain (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4236</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / International Company News: Krupp Stahl to pay dividend
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
KRUPP Stahl, the publicly- quoted steel subsidiary of Fried Krupp, will pay
a dividend this year for the first time since the start of the 1974 'steel
crisis'.
The dividend, expected to be DM5 a share, follows a return from ordinary
business of DM378m (Dollars 226m) in 1990 against DM563m in 1989.
Most will be used to build reserves, with DM70m going to repay part of the
government's restructuring loans made in the 1970s and 1980s. Post-tax
profit for Krupp Stahl AG was DM57m, slightly up. Shares are owned 70 per
cent by Fried Krupp , 25 per cent by the Iranian government, and there are
8,000 small shareholders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4237</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / International Company News: Kellogg trades strongly
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PROFITS strength shown by Kellogg, the world's largest manufacturer of
ready-to-eat cereals, in the final quarter of 1990 continued into the first
three months of the current year.
Kellogg said yesterday it made profits of Dollars 163.1m in the first
quarter, up by almost 70 per cent from the same period a year earlier. Sales
were 17.6 per cent higher, at Dollars 1.42bn, while earnings per share rose
from 79 cents to Dollars 1.35. This was well towards the top end of
analysts' expectations.
The company attributed the performance partly to the continued strength of
its international business - the element of the business which has been
viewed as fuelling recent growth.
In particular, analysts have suggested there may be scope for margin
improvement on the overseas business. Foreign cereal sales already account
for more than half Kellogg's tonnage.
However, Mr William LaMothe, chairman, also suggested the group was seeing
an improvement in the domestic market.
This has been a weaker area during the past few years, as competitors have
encroached. Mr LaMothe conceded that conditions were still 'extremely
competitive'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4238</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / International Company News: Comalco says it faces halved
earnings
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
COMALCO, the Australian aluminium producer, said yesterday that profits
could be halved this year because of falling world prices.
Mr John Ralph, chairman, said earnings would depend on the outlook for
metals prices, the strength of the Australian dollar, and economic
conditions in Australia and the US.
'If things stay as they are, and we would hope that they don't . . . then we
could easily see profits being halved,' he said after the group's annual
meeting.
Comalco earlier reported net profits of ADollars 177.6m (USDollars 137m) for
the year to December 31, compared with ADollars 308m for the previous year.
The group is 67 per cent owned by CRA, the Australian mining group, which is
49 per cent owned by RTZ of the UK.
Mr Ralph said aluminium prices had fallen considerably over the past few
months and were expected to fall further before recovering. The group has
also been badly hit by a fall in demand from the US, caused by the slowing
economy.
Comalco is considering constructing a 1m tonnes per year refinery at Weipa
in north Queensland in a joint venture with Alcan, the Canadian aluminium
producer. However, this and plans to expand smelters in Australia and New
Zealand depend on the slowdown in the leading economies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4239</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / International Company News: Fletcher Challenge issues profit
warning
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TORONTO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NEW ZEALAND'S Fletcher Challenge has warned that earnings for the present
fiscal year will be about 10 per cent lower than 1990, partly due to losses
suffered by its Canadian forest products business.
Fletcher, New Zealand's biggest company, reported a 9.4 per cent rise in net
earnings for the half-year to last December. But 72 per cent-owned Fletcher
Challenge Canada slid to a CDollars 10.7m (USDollars 9.22m) loss (18 cents a
share) in the first three months of 1991, from earnings of CDollars 15.7m
(26 cents a share) a year earlier.
Mr Hugh Fletcher, chief executive officer, said the Canadian results were a
reflection of 'difficult' trading conditions in many of the group's
businesses.
Fletcher owns 100 per cent of another large western Canadian forest products
company, Crown Forest. Crown does not disclose details of its financial
performance, but all North American forestry companies have taken a hard
knock from over-capacity in the pulp and newsprint sectors, and a slump in
lumber demand as a result of the weak housing market.
Fletcher Canada blamed a slide in pulp prices of almost USDollars 200 a
tonne in the past year, coupled with soft markets for newsprint and
lightweight coated papers, for much of the first-quarter loss. It said a
further curtailment of newsprint production will probably be necessary to
cope with over-supplied markets.
The company recently said it was looking for an equity partner for its
Crofton mill in British Columbia, one of the world's biggest pulp and paper
complexes. It also plans to dispose of some of its wood manufacturing
businesses as part of efforts to raise capital to modernise other
facilities.
Mr Ian Donald, Fletcher Challenge Canada's chief executive, complained that
stricter environmental regulations, 'some arbitrarily imposed without
sufficient scientific proof that they are necessary,' have greatly raised
operating and capital costs.
Noranda Forest, whose interests include a controlling stake in MacMillan
Bloedel of Vancouver, plunged into the red in the first quarter with a loss
of CDollars 38m (USDollars 32m) (41 cents a share), against net earnings of
CDollars 6m (1 cent) a year earlier. Sales dropped by 14 per cent to
CDollars 1.03bn. Noranda does not expect to be profitable in the second
quarter, despite signs of revival in North American housing.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4240</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Economic Diary
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
TODAY: International conference in Stockholm on global security. The
Federation of Economic Organisations (Keidanren) send a mission to South
Africa to study investment conditions.
TOMORROW: United Kingdom 1991 Census day. Amalgamated Engineering Union
conference in Eastbourne.
MONDAY: CBI/FT survey of distributive trades (March). Retail sales (March -
provisional). Start of two-day Financial Times conferences on 'European
securities markets in the 90s' and 'Managing financial risks' in London.
Start of two-day meeting of the European Community agriculture council in
Luxembourg. Mr FW de Klerk, South African president, starts two-day visit to
Britain. US and Japanese officials will meet in Washington for construction
talks, less than two weeks before the deadline for the US to determine if
sanctions should be imposed on Japan for closing its market.
TUESDAY: Finished steel consumption and stock changes (fourth quarter
final). Balance of payments current account and overseas trade figures
(March). US durable goods (March). Institute of Directors annual convention
at Royal Albert Hall. Mr Asil Nadir to appear at Bow Street magistrates
court.
WEDNESDAY: Index of production and construction for Wales (fourth quarter).
New construction orders (February-provisional). Conference in Prague on
future of the European security system, organised by Mr Jiri Dienstbier,
Czechoslovak foreign minister, and Mr Manfred Woerner, Nato secretary
general.
THURSDAY: Building societies monthly figures (April). Energy trends
(February). US import and export prices for March. International Monetary
Fund holds meeting in Washington.
FRIDAY: Engineering sales and orders at current and constant prices
(February). Quarterly house purchase finance statistics (first quarter). US
gross national product for first quarter (preliminary); corporate profits in
the fourth quarter (revised). Anglo-Irish inter-governmental conference
meets in London.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 9
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4241</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Century recommends Fuchs offer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CENTURY OILS, the UK lub-ricants group, has dropped its objections to the
hostile 145p-a-share bid from Fuchs, and recommended it to shareholders.
The Century board said it still believed the offer from the German
family-owned lubricants company failed to place a proper value on Century,
but recognised that it had proved attractive.
After the market closed yesterday Fuchs raised its holding in Century to
49.9 per cent, from 43 per cent at the start of the day.
Century also recommended the offer of 116p per preference share and said it
would be talking to Fuchs about an orderly transition for the business.
Century had promised a management reshuffle in its efforts to see off the
Pounds 46.2m cash bid.
Mr Charles Mitchell, chairman and managing director, said in a letter to
shareholders that the group had been planning to split his role since last
year and a new managing director would be appointed as soon as possible.
Mr Manfred Fuchs, chairman of the German group, said he had been reluctant
to launch a hostile bid after years of friendly contact with Century but
that repeated efforts for a merger had been rejected.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4242</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALABAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Second store in Spain for M and S
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN ELLIOTT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Marks and Spencer is to open its second store in Spain in the city of
Seville. It will replace an existing three-storey Simago store which has
been sold to M and S for the equivalent of Dollars 20m (Pounds 11.52m) by
Dairy Farm Espana, a wholly owned subsidiary of Dairy Farm International,
the food retailing and manufacturing arm of Hong Kong's Jardine Matheson
group, writes John Elliott.
Dairy Farm bought the loss-making Simago chain last May for Dollars 126m
cash and set up Dairy Farm Espana. The Seville sale marks the start of a
rationalisation programme of surplus stores and property. The company said
yesterday that the Dollars 20m price was in line with a property valuation
last May.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4243</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAA9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Moran forecasts little change
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
For the year to June 30 1991 Moran Holdings, the tea producer, freight
forwarder and property developer, expects to make an operating profit in
line with the previous year, and at least hold the dividend at 1p.
In his interim report Mr Colin Gordon-Smith, chairman, said the Indian tea
company will show a reduced profit. Climatic conditions meant a loss in crop
of some 480,000 kg, and the enhanced level of prices achieved in India had
been insufficient to compensate.
Trans Global was operating at good levels and should contribute usefully to
profits. Since the half-year the business travel companies were sold.
The joint property development in Manchester continued to operate
satisfactorily with sales at an encouraging level.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4244</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAA8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: ATA Selection fails to pay final dividend
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
ATA Selection, the recruitment agency and financial services group, did not
make the recovery expected during 1990.
As a result pre-tax profit has fallen from Pounds 846,000 to Pounds 41,000.
The final dividend is omitted leaving the year's payment at 1p (2.5p).
The directors recall that at the time of the rights issue they expected some
recovery in profit and forecast maintaining the final dividend at 1.5p.
Earnings were only 0.16p (4.36p).
Conditions remained difficult in the first quarter of this year,
particularly in recruitment which continued to trade at a loss. The
financial services side was making profits.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4245</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAA7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Southern Water sells stakes to SAUR
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLARE PEARSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Southern Water has sold its minority shareholdings in three local statutory
water companies to SAUR Water Services, the French group which already owns
the majority of their voting capital, writes Clare Pearson.
Mr Martyn Webster, Southern finance director, said the Pounds 10.7m disposal
would give rise to a Pounds 7m exceptional profit in the current year.
He said Southern had built up a close relationship with SAUR, so achieving
the company's original aim when it bought the stakes in the Eastbourne,
Mid-Sussex and West Kent statutory companies between 1987 and 1989.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4246</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAA6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Microvitec speaks for 21% of Logitek
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHIYO NAKAMOTO
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Microvitec, the USM-quoted computer peripherals manufacturer, intensified
its pressure on Logitek, the computer services company for which it has
launched a hostile bid, by announcing that, at the first closing date, it
controls 20.7 per cent of its target, writes Michiyo Nakamoto.
Microvitec said that it was 'greatly encouraged' by the level of
acceptances, exceptionally high for this stage of a bid. It has extended the
1-for-1 share offer until April 25. The offer values the company at Pounds
3.3m.
Logitek said, however, that 'this low level of acceptances demonstrates that
the vast majority of shareholders agree that Microvitec's offer is
misconceived and inadequate.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4247</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAA5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: British Empire Secs asset value improves
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
At March 31, net asset value of British Empire Securities and General Trust
had improved to 59.4p, from 52.53p six months' earlier.
The value at March 31 1990 was 60.9p.
In the six months ended March 31 gross income fell to Pounds 1.74m (Pounds
1.9m) and net revenue to Pounds 544,000 (Pounds 618,000). Earnings per share
were 0.41p (0.46p) and the interim dividend is again 0.25p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4248</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAA4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Losses at Eadie grow to Pounds 0.5m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Losses at Eadie Holdings, the USM-quoted company with interests in
specialist engineering and textile machinery, continued to accrue through
the second six months and for the full 1990 year totalled Pounds 502,000
pre-tax.
The swing, from previous profits of Pounds 1.18m, reflected very poor
trading conditions in the transport and wire industries throughout the year.
Sales declined by 8 per cent to Pounds 23.32m, although exports showed an
improvement of 16 per cent. The interim dividend was passed and the final is
also being omitted - shareholders received a reduced total of 1.75p for
1989.
After tax, extraordinary items and dividend payments the retained loss
worked through at Pounds 84,000 (profits Pounds 239,000). Losses per share
amounted to 1.1p (earnings 2.66p).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4249</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAA3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Berry Starquest net asset value falls
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Net asset value per share at Berry Starquest, an investment trust managed by
GT Management, stood at 143.2p on January 31 1991, compared with 208.5p a
year earlier.
Mr Dennis Nicholson, chairman, said that the company's investment strategy
had remained largely unaltered, with the portfolio concentrated on smaller
UK companies. The year, however, had been one of the most difficult for
smaller companies, he said, and that accounted for the fall in net asset
value. During the latter part of the year the percentage of the portfolio
held in overseas markets had been increased.
Pre-tax profits advanced from Pounds 172,000 to Pounds 296,000 and, after
tax of Pounds 79,000 (Pounds 54,000), earnings per Pounds 1 share advanced
to 4.2p (2.3p). A single final dividend of 1.8p (1.5p) is proposed for the
year.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4250</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAA2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Geers Gross advances to Pounds 747,000
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
GEERS GROSS, the advertising agency whose chairman, Mr Bob Gross, died
earlier this month, has lifted pre-tax profits from Pounds 706,000 to Pounds
747,000 in 1990, and in doing so bucked the sector trend.
Turnover advanced 14 per cent to Pounds 33.75m (Pounds 29.56m) and, after
substantially higher tax of Pounds 184,000 (Pounds 55,000) and no
extraordinary gain (Pounds 122,000), earnings worked through at 3.72p
(5.11p). A final dividend of 1p has been recommended for a total of 2p (1p).
Mr Rick Bendel, chief executive of Geers Gross Advertising, has been
appointed to the board.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4251</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAA1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Scot Heritable dives Pounds 16m into loss
after provisions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD GOURLAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SCOTTISH HERITABLE Trust, the conglomerate, yesterday delivered a set of
results considerably worse than its profits warning last November, writes
Richard Gourlay.
In 1990 its losses were Pounds 15.89m (Pounds 10.08m profits), after making
a Pounds 7m provision covering the reduction in value of properties in St
James Development Trust. Turnover rose to Pounds 116.06m (Pounds 113.56m).
Mr Robin Garland, the chief executive, resigned just before the results,
following the finance director who left last December and has yet to be
replaced. Sir Ian MacGregor, the former head of British Steel and the
National Coal Board, is a non-executive director.
The final dividend is passed (4p), leaving a total of 1.5p (7p). After an
Pounds 8.41m extraordinary charge (Pounds 514,000 gain), losses per share
came to 59.7p (earnings 19.3p).
Mr Neil Butterworth, the group accountant, said that Pounds 4.1m of the
extraordinary item related to the closure of the Alabama-based modular
housebuilding subsidiary.
The balance covered the closure of textile businesses, anticipated losses
from the future sale of the John Letters golf club manufacturer, a Pounds
2.6m provision for debt due from joint-venture property companies and a
Pounds 1.7m charge for bank and valuers' fees connected with the arrangement
of new banking facilities.
As a result of the reduction in shareholders' funds, gearing on Pounds 66.4m
net debt rose to more than 300 per cent - shareholders are to be asked to
approve a temporary waiver of the borrowing limits.
On the operating side, the Scottish oriental carpet business plunged to
losses of Pounds 5.15m (profits Pounds 1.66m), following stiff competition
from Chinese imports which drove prices down.
Building and quarrying also fell to losses of Pounds 2.52m (profits Pounds
4.62m). Although Standard Fireworks achieved record results, the
manufacturing division did not perform well, falling to profits of Pounds
1.14m (Pounds 1.6m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4252</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAA0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Helical Bar drops 81% to Pounds 2.71m
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
HIGH INTEREST rates, weakening tenant demand and falling capital values hit
Helical Bar, the property investor, in the year ended January 31 1991.
They wiped out a 33 per cent increase to Pounds 18.87m in rental income, and
caused an 81 per cent fall in pre-tax profits to Pounds 2.71m (Pounds
14.5m).
The dividend is, however, being maintained at 10p with a final of 7.6p, from
fully diluted earnings per share of 14.8p (45.8p). The earnings included
extraordinary profits of Pounds 847,000 (Pounds 2.38m) arising from the sale
of investment properties.
Net asset value also suffered, falling from 429p to 303p over the year. That
reflected a reduction in reserves of Pounds 14.26m (increase Pounds 21.7m)
following a professional valuation of the investment properties, and a
surplus on directors' valuation of trading properties of Pounds 9.17m
(Pounds 19.8m).
At the year end the group had over Pounds 18m in the bank and a passing rent
roll of Pounds 18.5m, which more than covered annual net interest costs -
which were Pounds 19.1m last year (Pounds 15.6m).
Turnover came to Pounds 74.76m (Pounds 117.47m) and gross profit to Pounds
25.26m (Pounds 33.5m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4253</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Sale and lease-back deal on 34 P&amp;O ships
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PENINSULAR and Oriental Steam Navigation (P&amp;O) has arranged a leasing deal
on 34 ships with a market value of Pounds 400m, from its fleet of 128
vessels.
The deal will not affect the total of P&amp;O's loans, but it extends the
maturity of the finance for the ships, and secures the finance on them. It
will mean some savings on the interest bill, although these are not expected
to be sizeable, and the use of leases is also tax effective.
P&amp;O's shares jumped 31p to 629p initially, but fell back to show a gain of
5p to 603p when the market realised that group borrowings would not be
reduced. Analysts said the deal was modestly helpful to earnings and might
make a rights issue less likely.
The stock market had expected a rights issue from P&amp;O when it announced
annual results last month, because its gearing is regarded as high. The
company said then that it had not considered an issue.
The ships have been sold to a consortium which has leased them back to P&amp;O.
One of the providers of finance is Abbey National, the former building
society turned bank. Ship leasing is a new area for its treasury department.
The deal, arranged by Hambros Bank, the merchant bank which has a reputation
for ship financing, will replace ordinary loan finance for the ships. The
leases will cover the working life of the ships, which P&amp;O will still
control, and the change in finance will have no effect on the way the ships
are operated.
P&amp;O's fleet had a book value in its December 31 balance sheet of Pounds
1.03bn. The group's 128 ships include container and bulk cargo ships,
ferries and cruise liners. Of the total, 87 ships were wholly owned by the
group with the rest partly owned or leased. The 34 were taken from the 87
wholly-owned ships and include all types of P&amp;O's ships.
P&amp;O's balance sheet showed net debt of Pounds 1.4bn, just over 80 per cent
of shareholders' funds of Pounds 1.74bn. Its interest bill in 1990 was
Pounds 122.4m, up from Pounds 74.6m in 1989, a rise which contributed to the
fall in P&amp;O's pre-tax profits to Pounds 261.3m (376.7m).
P&amp;O is not planning any similar deals on its other ships at present.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4254</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Hawtal Whiting hit by adverse exchange
rates
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN WATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
POOR TRADING conditions and adverse exchange rates reduced profits at Hawtal
Whiting, the engineering consultancy group, from Pounds 2.17m to Pounds
884,000 pre-tax for 1990.
The 59 per cent downturn was struck on turnover 24 per cent ahead to Pounds
61.58m (Pounds 49.7m).
Mr John Whitecross, chairman, said stringent attempts to cut costs brought
working capital down early in 1990, but a worsening position with debtors
caused a second half rise.
Capital expenditure was down to Pounds 2.7m (Pounds 5m), with borrowings
averaging 52 per cent of capital employed over the year.
Mr Whitecross said that with profits concentrated in the high tax countries
of Germany and the US, and relief currently unavailable on the company's
trading loss in Canada, taxation was an exceptional 84 per cent of profits
at Pounds 743,000. Accordingly, earnings per share fell to 0.14p (16.9p).
The dividend is an unchanged 4p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4255</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Hammerson assets decline by 22%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VANESSA HOULDER, Property Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE SHARP fall in property values across the world, combined with currency
fluctuations, resulted in a 22 per cent drop in the asset value of
Hammerson, the UK's third largest property company, in 1990.
Mr Sydney Mason, who has been chairman since 1958, told shareholders: 'On
balance, I regard 1990 and potentially 1991 as two of the most difficult
years your company will have had to face.'
In previous property downturns in the UK, Hammerson has been shielded by its
high proportion of overseas assets. However, Mr Masom said the global
recession had taken its effect in the majority of markets in which the
company operated. 'The exception has been continental Europe, particularly
France, Germany and Spain, where markets have remained more active', he
said.
Pre-tax profits for the 12 months fell by 6.1 per cent, from Pounds 75.3m to
Pounds 70.7m. However, after allowing for adverse exchange movements and the
effects of refinancing two outstanding Canadian dollar preference share
issues, underlying operating profits would have been Pounds 64.6m - an
increase of Pounds 3.9m, or 6.4 per cent.
UK net rental income rose by over 19 per cent to Pounds 46.5m. At constant
exchange rates the increase in net rental income from overseas operations
was 11 per cent.
Net assets per share fell by 236p to 832p, of which 91p was accounted for by
the strengthening of sterling during the year. The investment portfolio
dropped in value by 11 per cent, following its revaluation.
Mr Mason said the company was well placed to take advantage of any buying
opportunities provided by a depressed market, where improvement appeared
unlikely before 1992. 'Uncertainty remains over the outlook for property
markets worldwide, but in the longer term I believe these markets will
improve', he said.
There was an extraordinary loss of Pounds 11.4m (gain Pounds 18.4m) relating
to a fall in value of some housing land in Connecticut.
That followed a change in the group's accounting policy on valuations.
Whereas in the past all shortfalls in valuation against cost were included
in the profit and loss account as extraordinary items, such items will now
include only those short falls which the board deems to be permanent. The
shortfalls that are deemed temporary will be reflected in the revaluation
reserve.
Earnings per share rose by 2.3 per cent from 30.3p to 31p. A final dividend
of 17p makes a 20.5p (19.5p) total.
See Lex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8 Graph (Omitted). Photograph Sydney Mason, uncertainty for
property markets (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4256</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: NatWest cuts syndicated loans division by
20%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SARA WEBB
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
National Westminster Bank is cutting 17 jobs in its syndicated loans
division, which was one of the largest in the City.
They include a handful of managers as well as administrative staff. Mr
Trevor Bush, senior director of asset sales and distribution at NatWest,
said the cuts meant roughly a 20 per cent reduction and that staff who lost
their jobs would be re-employed elsewhere in the organisation. He said the
bank planned to adopt a more aggressive strategy in selling credit.
The cuts are part of a wider reorganisation of the bank's activities,
bringing capital markets and syndicated loans business under the treasury
department. NatWest decided last August to cut 300 of the 3,000 jobs in its
corporate and institutional banking division. Most of the cuts will take
place in London over the next two years. The bank said 100 jobs had been cut
already, but some staff have been redeployed.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4257</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Pay cuts for Pearson directors
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND SNODDY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE DIRECTORS of Pearson, the publishing, banking and industrial group
suffered a sizeable cut in income last year.
Their earnings dropped dramatically because a large proportion of
remuneration is linked to the performance of earnings per share which fell
by 13 per cent last year against a 20 per cent rise in 1989.
As a result Lord Blakenham, chairman and chief executive of the group that
also publishes the Financial Times, saw his earnings cut to Pounds 265,000
from Pounds 465,000 in 1989.
The pay of Mr Frank Barlow, former chief executive of the FT and now chief
operating officer and group managing director of Pearson, dropped from more
than Pounds 395,000 to something over Pounds 210,000. Two other executive
directors, Mr James Joll, the finance director, and Mr Mark Burrell, earned
between Pounds 205,000 and Pounds 215,000 compared with between Pounds
355,000 and Pounds 380,000 in 1989.
Mr Luke Glass, director of corporate affairs, conceded yesterday that the
curve on performance-related pay went steeply upwards when the company's
earnings per share went steaming ahead. 'There is an equally steep curve
waiting for them on the downside and this year that's what happened.'
Mr Barlow supplemented his salary last week by exercising 10,000 Pearson
share options at 303p and selling them at 730p - a gain of Pounds 42,700.
The Pearson chief operating officer now holds 1,127 shares and options on a
further 206,183 shares.
Over the year Pearson's charitable donations totalled Pounds 871,000. It
also made a donation of Pounds 25,000 to the Conservative Party.
In 1990 Pearson's pre-tax profits were Pounds 226m (Pounds 250.5m). It made
a Pounds 71.4m provision against its commitments to BSkyB, the satellite
television venture in which it has a 14 per cent stake.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4258</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: BP proposals to reduce tax bill
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH Petroleum yesterday met officials from the Inland Revenue to discuss
proposals for cutting its tax bill by issuing shares in its Britoil
subsidiary to BP shareholders.
BP would make no further comment on the plan, but one tax specialist said
the Inland Revenue could take a dim view of the proposals.
Since the stapled shares would be offered free to shareholders, they could
be classed as a dividend payment and therefore be liable for advanced
corporation tax, he said.
In addition, the Inland Revenue could also take the view that BP was joining
with shareholders to evade tax.
The way the plan would work is that shareholders would be offered redeemable
preference shares with a nominal value in Britoil which would be stapled to
BP shares. The shareholders would then be able to elect to receive a
dividend payment from Britoil instead of from BP.
There would be no cash incentive for them to do this but, by paying its
dividends through Britoil, BP would be able to save money.
The plan would give BP the chance to offset the payments of ACT it makes on
dividends against Britoil's tax liabilities.
That would save BP about Pounds 150m in the first year of operation of the
plan and would add an extra 2p onto its earnings per share this year if the
scheme goes ahead. Since the shares would be stapled to BP shares, they
would not be eligible for trading in their own right. In addition, BP would
have to redeem the shares at some point which could mean making a small
payment to shareholders.
But BP stressed that it needed to put a lot more work into its plan before
it could be finalised.
The proposals would have little relevance for companies outside the oil
industry since they can get round this problem in other ways.
See Lex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4259</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAATFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Borrowing costs take toll on Roskel profits
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEVEN WATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BORROWING costs at Roskel, the USM-quoted group which installs suspended
ceilings and partitions, caused 1990 pre-tax profits to fall 26 per cent
after five years of growth.
Mr Simon Skelding, chairman and managing director, said the figure of Pounds
2.18m (Pounds 2.93m) was 'creditable' in a difficult year. Operating profits
were up 8 per cent to Pounds 3.04m, helped by stricter management controls
and reduced overheads, although there was an escalation in the provision for
bad debts.
Assisted by each of the group's three operating companies, and in particular
by contract business with major retailers, turnover rose by 47 per cent from
Pounds 31.3m to Pounds 46.22m, in line with the group's objective of rapid
sales growth.
Earnings per share fell to 11.01p (15.12p). The final dividend is 3p making
an unchanged total of 4.3p.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4260</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAASFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK Company News: Bundaberg quick to dismiss increased offer
from Tate
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KEVIN BROWN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TATE &amp; LYLE, the UK sweet-eners group, has increased its hostile bid for
Australia's Bundaberg Sugar by 40 cents to ADollars 4.1, valuing the
Queensland-based company at ADollars 319m, or Pounds 141.76m.
Mr Neil Shaw, chairman, said the new bid was 'generous,' and warned: 'This
is our final offer.' Mr Bill Beerworth, the Sydney merchant banker who is
advising Tate, said it was on a 'take it or leave it' basis.
However, Mr Roy Diecke, chairman of Bundaberg, said his board saw no reason
to change its advice to investors not to accept. He said Tate's decision to
raise the bid confirmed the inadequacy of its original offer.
Mr David Poole of Macquarie Bank, the merchant bank advising Bundaberg, said
institutional investors holding around 30 per cent of the shares had
indicated within two hours of Tate's announcement that they would reject.
'The Bundaberg stock price fluctuates according to the sugar price, and it
is low at the moment because sugar prices are low. But the institutions are
looking more to the long term value of the company,' he said.
Analysts were sceptical that the revised offer had been pitched high enough
to succeed. Most said Tate would have to increase it, or drop the insistence
on acceptance by at least 90 per cent of shareholders.
'At ADollars 3.7 the offer was ridiculously cheap; at ADollars 4.1 they are
in no-man's land; but at ADollars 4.4 they might have a chance,' said Mr
Angus Murnaghan, an analyst with Dominguez Barry Samuel Montague, the
investment bank.
In a statement to the Australian Stock Exchange, Tate said the revised bid
represented a premium of 57 per cent over Bundaberg's 1991 average market
price before the original offer in mid-March.
It represented a multiple of 15.4 times Bundaberg's estimated net earnings
for 1991, and 16.8 times estimated earnings for the following year.
Mr Shaw said: 'Bundaberg stockholders have a simple choice. They can take
ADollars 4.1 now in cash or they can wait in the hope that sugar prices will
rise enough to push Bundaberg's stockmarket price to ADollars 4.1.
'On the basis of (forecasts by) the Australian Bureau of Agricultural and
Resource Economics, this could take up to four years.'
Mr Shaw recalled that Bundaberg traded at ADollars 2.37 as recently as
February 18 - a month before Tate's initial offer. The shares closed 2 cents
higher yesterday at ADollars 3.9, but most analysts forecast a significant
fall if the bid fails.
Bundaberg has six processing mills in Queensland and a small refinery in the
city of Bundaberg, which it is in the process of expanding. The company
produced 640,000 tonnes of raw sugar in 1990, accounting for 18 per cent of
Australian output.
The company is also joint owner with Guinness, the UK drinks group, of
Bundaberg Rum, Australia's leading spirits brand.
The acquisition of Bundaberg would give Tate access to low-cost Australian
sugar cane growing and processing, which could boost the group's
profitability if world prices rise following the liberalisation of the
industry.
See Lex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4261</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAARFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Letter: Strong case for keeping options open on mining in
Antarctica
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr ROBERT DAVIES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, The apparent change in the British government's attitude towards mining
in Antarctica is disappointing. That Australia and France (an unlikely
combination if ever there was one) are pushing the issue for blatant
domestic political reasons is well known. For Britain to follow their lead
would be shameful. No one is actually arguing for full and immediate
exploitation of resources in Antarctica but to deny ourselves the mechanism
for doing so would be short-sighted. Perhaps just one example can be used to
illustrate the case for keeping our options open.
For many years North Americans have been concerned about pollution from car
exhausts and have progressively reduced the amount of carbon monoxide and
nitrous oxides (believed to be a factor in acid rain) that cars are allowed
to emit. Europe is belatedly following.
This trend is happening around the world. To achieve these standards car
manufacturers rely on a device called an emission control catalyst that uses
platinum group metals (PGMs) to convert these gases into less harmful carbon
dioxide and nitrogen. PGMs are rare and are currently only mined in any
quantity in South Africa and Russia.
PGMs are also expensive. Platinum, the most common at Dollars 400 an ounce,
is more expensive than gold, while rhodium, the most rare, is currently more
than Dollars 5,000 an ounce. Rhodium is crucial in an autocatalyst because
it is the only metal that can reduce nitrous oxides. Production problems and
increased demand have caused the price of rhodium to jump from Dollars 1,600
an ounce a year ago to Dollars 7,000 last summer. Some observers say it
could rise to Dollars 10,000 an ounce even with planned production increases
to meet rising demand.
But what has this to do with Antarctica? The answer is that PGMs are mostly
found in geological features called layered ultramafic intrusions, such as
the Bushveld of South Africa. However, an even larger one lies in Antarctica
called the Dufek massif which coincidentally occurs in British Antarctic
Territory. It has not so far been tested for PGMs.
If ecologists get their way at the Madrid conference next month we will
never know if the Dufek contains PGMs. Reform in South Africa and Russia is
continuing but if the Dufek process is interrupted, or becomes unstable, our
supply of PGMs, and rhodium in particular, could fall.
It is worth remembering too that it is only two years since the Monopolies
and Mergers Commission investigated this market. Autocatalysts, each of
which use at least 1.5 grams of rhodium, could be threatened and the pace of
emission control might slow rapidly, possibly increasing acid rain.
Environmentalists flying or driving to Madrid, in metal cars and planes
consuming fossil fuels, should contemplate whether they really want the
world's most barren continent to be denied a potential role in improving the
world's atmosphere.
Should not my former employer, the British Antarctic Survey, give our
diplomats a full briefing before the conference?
Robert Davies,
Hawthorn, 7 Green Trees
Avenue, Cold Norton,
Essex
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4262</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Letter: Change set to merely heighten the confusion
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   From Mr HUGH HENDRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir, I was dismayed by your article on the revision in the Japanese
commercial code ('Japanese scrip issues lose their bonus label', April 11).
The move to compel companies to refer to gratis issues as stock splits
reveals an alarming ignorance on behalf of Japan's omnipresent bureaucracy.
A gratis issue is a completely different animal from a stock split.
The former represents issues at nominal value but without charge to existing
shareholders and are principally designed to bring the company's share
capital back into line with the assets employed within the business. Stock
splits on the other hand, simply represent the division of existing share
capital into a greater number of shares, thereby reducing the nominal value
per share.
Given investors' traditional hostility to issues made above nominal value,
Japanese corporations have historically favoured gratis issues as their
principal signalling mechanism. As such, this high-profile change seems
destined only to heighten the confusion.
Hugh Hendry,
Baillie Gifford &amp; Co,
10 Glenfinlas Street,
Edinburgh
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 7
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4263</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Job In The News: Search for soccer fan with monetary goals -
Chief economic adviser to the government
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WANTED: bright, pragmatic economist, with nose for political issues and
proven organisational abilities. Should be a workaholic and may have to take
a salary cut. Interest in London soccer clubs an advantage.
This job description, or one very like it, is being discreetly circulated
through the financial world in a bid to find a new government chief economic
adviser.
The post at the Treasury became vacant this week following the appointment
of Sir Terence Burns, the current incumbent, as the youngest permanent
secretary at the Treasury for 50 years. Sir Terence, aged 47, is taking up
his new job early next month in place of Sir Peter Middleton, who is leaving
to become a deputy chairman at Barclays Bank.
Although the Treasury said yesterday that an early announcement was
unlikely, the government will probably not want to leave vacant for long the
position of what amounts to its top economist.
Providing top-quality economic analysis - and the policy recommendations
which flow from this - has become all the more important in recent months as
Britain has slid into its most serious recession for a decade. Just how
bleak the next few months may be was illustrated this week when the
government announced the biggest monthly unemployment rise on record,
bringing the jobless total to more than 2m.
Sir Terence is a highly practical northerner, with little interest in
economic dogmas. He was recruited to the Treasury in 1980, from a career in
economics forecasting and consultancy at the London Business School - over
the heads of several established Whitehall insiders.
The succession to Sir Terence presents ministers with an interesting
dilemma. Will the government appoint someone in Sir Terence's own mould  -
an outsider but with the 'people skills' both to get on with ministers and
run the Treasury's 100-strong economics group - or turn to an existing
Treasury official?
Another question is linked to the general election, which must be held by
mid-1992 and which could take place as early as June. Although the Treasury
stressed yesterday that the post of chief economic adviser was a matter for
the government alone, for practical reasons the Whitehall establishment will
probably want to ensure that whoever is appointed would be able to work with
the Labour party.
The issue of who takes over from Sir Terence cannot be divorced from a wider
question of the shift in style by Mr John Major since he became prime
minister in November. Mr Major has sought to convey an image of a 'man of
the people', and one open to new ideas. Both he and Sir Terence are keen
supporters of London football teams.
All these indicators point to the likelihood that several outsiders who are
not working for the government will be on ministers' short lists. Near the
top will be Mr Gavyn Davies, chief UK economist at the London office of
Goldman Sachs, the New York investment bank. The 40-year-old Mr Davies is
highly intelligent and articulate, and by the standards of his profession
fairly unassuming. His well-argued economic commentaries count among Mr
Major's favourite reading. Perhaps most important, he is an avid fan of
Southampton soccer club.
One aspect to Mr Davies's career might, however, be held against him by some
Tory politicians. Although he insists he is nowadays apolitical, he worked
during the 1970s as an adviser to the then Labour government. Since Mrs
Thatcher's election in 1979, he has not always been a supporter of
Conservative policies.
'Turning to Gavyn would have been unthinkable a few years ago,' said Mr
Andrew Britton, a former Treasury official who is now director of the
National Institute of Economic and Social Research. 'But in today's climate,
the fact that someone has been critical of the government in the past could
be an advantage.'
Mr Davies is a City superstar and as a partner in Goldman receives a
superstar's remuneration, reputed in some quarters to be around Pounds 1m a
year. Should he be offered the chief economist's job, he might have to enter
into serious negotiations about the salary on offer - a less than princely
Pounds 76,000.
Another contender from outside the Treasury is Professor Alan Budd, chief
economic adviser at Barclays Bank. He is good natured and highly practical,
as well as capable of being rude about economic theories from all parts of
the spectrum. What is more, he is a good friend of Sir Terence, with whom he
worked at the London Business School in the 1970s. Should Prof Budd be
appointed, he would join at the Treasury not only Sir Terence but another
former LBS economist - Dr Bill Robinson, who was last month appointed as
special economic adviser to Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor.
Among the internal candidates is Ms Rachel Lomax, aged 45 and currently Sir
Terence's deputy. She has been at the Treasury since 1968, knows Whitehall
inside out, and is bright, tough and good-humoured in roughly equal
measures.
Mr Hew Evans is another Treasury official who is almost certain to be on the
short list. He is on the same rank of deputy secretary as Ms Lomax, and is
keenly involved in the discussions about European economic and monetary
union. Interest in European issues is likely to become increasingly
important inside the Treasury during the 1990s as economic integration
proceeds.
Anyone interested in a long shot, meanwhile, should put their money on Mr
John Odling-Smee, a highly rated, former Treasury official. Mr Odling-Smee,
who is 48, a keen cyclist and has worked both for the London School of
Economics and the government of Ghana, was until 1990 a deputy secretary at
the Treasury, where he had worked since the 1970s. He left to take a top job
at the International Monetary Fund in Washington. 'I was surprised to see
him go - he was on a fast track,' said one Whitehall insider. Yesterday Mr
Odling-Smee was not in his office in the US, and was said to be visiting his
family in England.
Whoever takes over from Sir Terence will have to have an appetite for hard
work and - in view of the economic traumas that might lie ahead - be capable
of taking a few bloody noses. He or she might also like to try to emulate
Sir Terence's almost chameleon-like qualities, as a result of which,
seemingly effortlessly, he has glided to the top during the past decade.
'The thing you have to remember about Terry,' said one of his friends
yesterday, 'is that he started as an outsider, and ended up as the most
inside of all the insiders'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4264</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / A record week on Wall Street: Individuals powered the surge
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATRICK HARVERSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street has not seen a week like it for a long time. The Dow Jones
Industrial ended above 3,000 for the first time, and both the Standard &amp;
Poor's 500 and the Nasdaq Composite also closed at record highs this week.
On three consecutive days trading volume exceeded 200m shares, and a string
of broking firms announced massive increases in first-quarter profits.
It is individual American investors, not Wall Street's money men, who
deserve most of the credit for rewriting the record book and wiping the red
ink from brokers' balance sheets. The surge in demand for stocks from the
small investor has powered the market's rally in 1991.
A lot of that new money from private investors has been pouring into the
mutual funds. Mr Michael Hines, a vice-president at Fidelity Investments,
the biggest fund management group in the US, said last week: 'The amount of
new business coming into our funds has been high - something in the order of
two to three times what it was a few months ago.'
Investors have also been buying stocks on their own account. In the first
quarter of this year, Dollars 3.06bn of retail investors' money (measured by
orders of 10,000 shares or less) flowed into shares listed on the New York
Stock Exchange, against Dollars 1.36bn in the same quarter last year,
according to Birinyi Associates, the New York-based market analysts.
Individuals have turned to the stock market because they expect the return
there to be higher than on other assets. Real estate is in a decline, and
returns on cash, Treasury bonds, bank certificates of deposit and money
market funds no longer look as attractive as equities because of lower
interest rates.
The switch into stock has been most pronounced from money market funds, the
most popular investment vehicle of 1990. On March 7 individual investors had
Dollars 170bn in money market funds managed by the broker/dealer firms. A
month later, that figure had dropped to Dollars 157bn. Most of the missing
Dollars 13bn went straight into the stock market, say analysts.
In spite of the big rush into equities, individuals are still underweight in
the market by historical standards. Mr Robert Farrell, chief market analyst
at Merrill Lynch, says that only 17 per cent of household financial assets
is currently invested in equities. This compares with 21 per cent at the
height of the 1987 bull market, and the 30-plus per cent seen during the
early 1970s.
A survey of investor sentiment, conducted every month on behalf of Fidelity,
also suggests there is room for more. In the first three months of this year
an average of 41 per cent of private investors surveyed said they intended
to buy more stocks over the next few months. In January last year, only 26
per cent said they would increase their stockholdings. In July 1990, the
last time the Dow touched 3,000, just 16 per cent said they would buy more
shares.
Meanwhile, the institutions have approached the market more warily. Not
wanting to miss out on the rally, they have been buying stocks, but with
little conviction. Mr Laszlo Birinyi of Birinyi Associates says institutions
have been reluctant to jump on the bandwagon. 'Based on the approach to the
market most institutions use, the multiples, earnings, etcetera are not
overly compelling. The market is not necessarily cheap, it's just up.'
He has a point. The overall market is trading relatively high by historical
standards at about 17 times earnings, and about two and half times
companies' book value. The rally is beginning to look tired, the broad
market having risen by more than 30 per cent since its low of October 1990.
The economy will recover this year, but the recession is still biting and
corporate earnings will remain weak for at least another two quarters.
Interest rates look like falling no further, and could even rise again if
inflation picks up amid an economic recovery. It has been a good week, but
nobody on Wall Street is getting carried away. The memories of last year,
when the Dow dropped from 3,000 to 2,365 in just three months, are too
fresh. While a repeat of that decline is unlikely, by mid-day yesterday
there were signs that the market was begining to suffer from vertigo, with
the Dow 24 points below Wednesday's record high.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4265</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAANFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Commander says UN border team will take weeks to arrive
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARK NICHOLSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   KUWAIT CITY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE FIRST of 300 UN military observers will be in place on the Iraq-Kuwait
border by the middle of next week, Major General Gunther Greindl, who heads
the mission, said yesterday. However, it would be several weeks before the
whole 1,440-strong United Nations Iraq-Kuwait Observer Mission (Unikom) was
in a position to take full control of the border zone - the precondition for
a complete US military withdrawal from the area.
Gen Greindl added that his force would not assume responsibility for the
15,000 Iraqi refugees at present housed in two camps inside the eventual
demilitarised zone, which will extend 10km into Iraq and 5km into Kuwait.
Their fate was being discussed by other UN branches - although he was unable
to give any details as to which, or what arrangements were being considered.
Workers from the Kuwaiti Red Crescent and the US civil affairs unit running
the two refugee camps say they have been given no indication who will take
over the camps after the US withdrawal.
Gen Greindl also made clear that the UN force had no authority to defend the
refugees from Iraqi retribution, which many fear will follow the departure
of US troops. 'The Security Council has given no mandate that the Unikom
observers - who are unarmed - or the infantry coming with them, can take any
physical action,' he said.
The 500 infantrymen who will form part of Unikom will be solely responsible
for defending the military observers, he said.
Iraq and Kuwait will be entitled to police their territory within the
demilitarised zone, but Gen Greindl said he had still to discuss details
with both sides. 'The guiding principle has to be that they can only
establish a presence which is essential to restore law and order,' he said.,
He said he had not yet discussed questions such as whether Iraqi police
would be permitted to carry weapons, but that his decision would be final.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4266</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Kuwait pledge on rights abuses
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Foreign Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
KUWAIT admitted yesterday that its citizens might have committed human
rights abuses against suspected collaborators after the rout of Iraq's
occupying army.
However, it said law and order had been restored and offenders would be
brought to justice.
Mr Suleiman Mutawa, the planning minister, denied in an interview with the
BBC that human rights violations were continuing unchecked.
He was responding to an Amnesty International report which said that
arbitrary killing, arrest and torture of people in Kuwait, mostly
Palestinians suspected of collaborating with Iraq, was continuing.
Asked if Palestinians could feel safe in Kuwait, Mr Mutawa said: 'Yes, I
think, and I am sure, the majority of the Palestinians will, and ought, to
feel safe and secure.'
The US responded to the Amnesty report by saying the human rights situation
in the emirate had improved drastically in recent weeks.
The State Department said: 'The situation by most accounts in Kuwait is very
much improved over what existed some weeks ago.'
It said Kuwait's crown prince, Sheikh Saad al-Sabah, had personally looked
into many allegations of human rights abuses and had overseen many changes
for the better.
Mr James Baker, secretary of state, at present in the Middle East, will
visit Kuwait next Monday. The addition of Kuwait to his itinerary was widely
interpreted as a sign of growing US anxiety at the slow pace of
reconstruction after the Gulf War.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4267</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAALFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Poll go-ahead in Punjab and Assam
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KK SHARMA
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW DELHI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
INDIA'S caretaker government has decided to hold elections in the states of
Punjab and Assam despite violent insurgency there.
The Punjab decision has been taken in the teeth of opposition from most of
the main political parties. Two elections will be held simultaneously there
on May 20: for 13 parliamentary representatives, and for a new state
legislature. Elections in Assam are to be held three days later.
The only Indian state which will not be voting is Kashmir, which is also in
the grip of a violent insurgency by militants seeking secession from the
Indian union. Like Punjab and Assam, the state is ruled directly from New
Delhi.
Most political parties oppose elections in Punjab because they do not
believe fair and free voting is possible in the state.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4268</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / HK boosts powers over boat-people
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN ELLIOTT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   HONG KONG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
HONG KONG'S government plans to strengthen its powers to detain, screen and
repatriate Vietnamese boat-people by plugging loopholes in the law opened up
in recent court cases. It hopes thereby to underline its determination to
maintain a tough line at a time when the number arriving in the colony has
risen sharply.
More than 2,600 have arrived this year, compared with 916 in the same period
last year. This month alone has seen 1,100 arrivals.
Yesterday's legislation, to be debated in the Hong Kong legislature,
establishes the government's power to detain illegal immigrants from
Vietnam, whether or not they seek asylum or refugee status, and to determine
whether they are political refugees who qualify for resettlement or economic
migrants who should be repatriated.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4269</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Gloomy statistics underline Soviet decline
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LEYLA BOULTON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   MOSCOW
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FURTHER evidence of the Soviet economic crisis was provided yesterday by
statistics showing an 8 per cent fall in gross national product and a 33.8
per cent fall in foreign trade for the first quarter of this year, Leyla
Boulton reports from Moscow.
Goskomstat, official statistics agency, said investment declined by 16 per
cent, while labour productivity in the state sector was down 9 per cent. All
comparisons are with the equivalent period last year.
The agency blamed the drops on disruptions to centrally planned links
between enterprises, on unspecified 'imbalances' in the economy and on
industrial unrest.
It said imports had fallen by 45.1 per cent while exports had declined 18.4
per cent. A presidential decree to confiscate enterprises' hard currency
earnings from January 1 has been a big disincentive to foreign trade. A
switch to hard currency settlements with eastern Europe has devastated
business which once accounted for half the Soviet Union's foreign trade.
The output of oil, the country's main hard-currency earner, fell 9 per cent
to 132m tonnes, continuing a persistent decline. Gas output was unchanged,
while coal production was down 11 per cent from that of the first quarter of
1990.
A Goskomstat official also rectified an earlier report, in the government
daily Izvestiya, that coal production had fallen by 82 per cent in March
alone. He said the true figure was an 18 per cent drop in March, the first
month of the miners' strike.
Such figures come as little surprise, Soviet politicians having made
extensive use of statistics in recent weeks to do battle both with the
miners and with rebellious republics. The country's finance minister and
central bank chief wrote to President Mikhail Gorbachev this month demanding
action to force budgetary contributions from independent-minded republics.
They said the budget deficit for the first quarter of this year was expected
to reach Rbs31.1bn (Pounds 10.06bn) - more than the Rbs26.7bn deficit
planned for the entire year. Goskomstat put the budget deficit in the first
quarter at Rbs26.9bn.
The agency also revealed an inflation rate of 22 per cent in the 12 months
to the end of March, before swingeing state retail price increases came into
effect on April 2.
On Monday, Mr Valentin Pavlov, Soviet prime minister, is to defend in
parliament an anti-crisis programme whose avowed aim is to stop 'economic
chaos and collapse', but this is unlikely to begin to take effect unless the
central government reaches a political settlement with republican leaders.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4270</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / UK asks Japan for more pension, insurance reform
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ROBERT THOMSON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TOKYO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE British government has asked Japan for further reforms to the country's
pension fund and insurance industries, and has emphasised to Japanese
institutions that their UK operations are regarded as members of Britain's
'home team'.
Mr John Redwood, minister for corporate affairs, said yesterday that
discussions with Japanese officials this week confirmed that progress has
been made in liberalising the financial system, though this remains 'slow'.
He had asked Japanese officials to consider further changes to regulations
on pension funds, on which the government has taken only the 'first steps'
of reform.
Last April, the Japanese government allowed investment advisory companies,
including 36 foreign ones, to handle limited amounts of new money flowing
into Japan's pension system.
Mr Redwood asked Japanese officials to increase the opportunities for
foreign companies to manage money, and to ease restrictions on the types of
investments.
There is already a debate within Japan's Finance Ministry over the measuring
of pension fund performance. Mr Redwood said British companies could find
openings in performance analysis.
During his meetings, he raised the problems that Fujitsu, the Japanese
computer company, has faced since its purchase last year of ICL, which has
been expelled from some European joint research projects.
He emphasised that the UK businesses of Japanese institutions are regarded
as the 'home team'; their interests would be defended in Europe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4271</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Moscow catches a chill in Tokyo: Gorbachev in the Far East
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEFAN WAGSTYL and JOHN RIDDING
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SOVIET President Mikhail Gorbachev yesterday ended his first visit to Japan
and left behind a mixture of disappointment and bewilderment.
His current visit to South Korea may pass with less acrimony. He arrived on
the island of Cheju last night for talks with President Roh Tae Woo. This
first visit by a Soviet head of state to the divided Korean peninsula
reflects the rapid rapprochement between the two former cold war enemies.
The trip to Japan was a success - so Mr Toshiki Kaifu, Japanese prime
minister, and his officials maintained in public. In private, some officials
were disappointed they had been unable to wring from Mr Gorbachev any real
progress towards the settlement of the territorial issue which has dogged
relations between the two countries since 1945 and blocked a Soviet-Japanese
Second World War peace treaty.
The communique signed about midnight on Thursday by the two leaders
committed them only to 'work constructively and vigorously to finish
preparations for concluding a peace treaty'. It also contained an explicit
reference to the territorial issue, named the four disputed islands off
northern Japan which the Soviet Union holds, and called on the two countries
to take into account 'all positive elements that have been built up in
bilateral negotiations' since 1956.
The two sides are already disputing the meaning of the vague text. A
Japanese foreign ministry official said the reference to 1956 implied that
the Soviet Union acknowledged the validity of a promise it made then (and
later withdrew) to return two islands. Mr Gorbachev told a news conference
the reference meant no such thing: 'We have not revived what was missed in
the past.'
As long as the territorial dispute is unsettled, Japan says it will not lift
a ban on Japanese economic aid to the Soviet Union. However, this should not
obscure the likelihood that Japan will develop commercial links on a more
modest scale. Mr Kaifu and Mr Gorbachev signed 15 co-operation documents,
providing for Japanese technical assistance for perestroika, visits by
Soviet trainees to Japan, a Japanese trade fair in Moscow in 1992, new air
routes, and a new agreement on trade payments.
Soviet officials also handed over to their Japanese counterparts information
on some of the 55,000 Japanese who died in Soviet prisoner-of-war camps
after the Second World War. Older Japanese attach great importance to this.
However, these exchanges will do little to close the gap between the two
countries. Many Japanese were unable to understand why Mr Gorbachev had come
to Japan if he had no intention of a deal on the islands. They also had
little sympathy for the Soviet leader's great but vague hopes for building a
new order in Asia to match that in Europe.
At one point, Mr Gorbachev's press spokesman said his boss had tried to
speak on a 'philosophical' level to Mr Kaifu about improving relations. The
premier, representative of a deeply pragmatic and rather unphilosophical
people, had replied they should look at things 'case by case'. To the end,
the gulf in mutual understanding, as on the territorial issue, remained
wide.
The meeting in South Korea will be the third between the two presidents. The
talks, extended to a morning session today, will focus on ways to ease
tension on the Korean peninsula. South Korea's application to join the UN,
scheduled for September, and increased trade and economic links will also be
discussed.
Moscow, which supported North Korea in the 1950-53 Korean war and has since
been one of Pyongyang's principal allies, established diplomatic relations
with Seoul only last September. Despite repeated invitations, a Soviet head
of state has never visited North Korea.
South Korea is seeking Soviet assistance in pressing Pyongyang to allow
international inspection of its nuclear facilities. A Soviet academic said
in Tokyo this week that Moscow was considering an end to all its nuclear
supplies to North Korea, unless the latter allowed inspection of its
facilities.
As for the UN, it is unlikely that the Soviet Union will veto, in the
security council, South Korean membership. North Korea continues to oppose
separate Korean membership, arguing that it would perpetuate division of the
peninsula.
Other Moscow-Seoul issues include the legacy of the Soviet shooting-down of
a South Korean airliner in 1983. Demonstrators in South Korea have demanded
an apology for the destruction of Korean Airlines flight 007, which had
strayed into Soviet airspace.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 2 Photograph Tenuous link, President Mikhail Gorbachev and Prime
Minister Toshiki Kaifu joined only their little fingers (supposed to be a
good luck gesture) after they signed their joint declaration at the end of
the Soviet leader's first visit to Japan Tenuous (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4272</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Scargill warns on jobs
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Up to 30,000 jobs and 35 pits are at risk if long-term contracts to supply
indigenous coal to the electricity generating companies are not agreed soon,
miners' leader Arthur Scargill warned.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4273</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Quake in Tajikistan
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A quake which struck the Soviet central Asian republic of Tajikistan killed
one person and seriously injured six, the official Tass news agency said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4274</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: De Klerk initiative
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
South African President F. W. de Klerk launched a fresh initiative to solve
black faction fighting on the eve of his departure for a week-long trip to
Europe.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4275</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Cameroon clashes
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Anti-government protesters clashed with security forces in northern
Cameroon, killing and injuring an unknown number of people, national radio
said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4276</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Hammer falls on Bounty
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Australia's sinking economy has forced the replica of Captain William
Bligh's ship Bounty to go under the auctioneer's hammer, its owners said.
The replica, buit in 1979 by film-maker Dino De Laurentis bought by a
consortium in 1986, will be auctioned in Sydney on June 20.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4277</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Exam questions stump Major and Kinnock
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP STEPHENS, Political Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WESTMINSTER'S most compelling political mystery took another bewildering
turn yesterday when Mr Neil Kinnock admitted for the second time in a week
that he had inadvertently misled the voters about his O-levels.
As the Labour leader broke cover with a formal statement from his House of
Commons office, Downing Street kept its nerve. Mr John Major apparently
could still not remember how many of the precious certificates he had
stashed away with his boyhood train sets. If he did, he was not saying.
The view in No 10 is that the prime minister has rather more important
things to do than scrabble round in his Huntingdon attic looking for
dog-eared school records. There has, after all, been the Kurdish crisis, the
replacement for the poll tax, and the state of the economy to occupy him.
With some at Westminster beginning to take the issue seriously, however,
there was a suggestion that he might spare an hour or so this weekend to
unearth them.
Mr Kinnock's carefully-crafted statement said his schoolboy achievements had
included passes in eight O-levels, which mark the first
nationally-recognised educational hurdle for adolescents. He had,
incidentally, also clocked up three A-levels (two grade Cs and a D) and a
degree in industrial relations.
The admission followed his assertion on Tuesday that 'everyone remembers how
many O-levels they have'. In his case, he declared, the number was six. Five
minutes later that had risen to seven.
Unforgiving political journalists wondered cynically whether the syllabus
for the pass in 'special arithmetic' he had chalked up 30 years ago had
included simple addition.
The slip prompted the London Evening Standard newspaper to launch its own
intensive probe into what Westminster's investigative reporters have dubbed
'Schoolgate'.
The result was yesterday's statement and a terse warning to others not to
overstep the mark. Mr Kinnock has put the Standard's report in the hands of
his solicitors.
Mr Major is not off the hook. He recently told a television interviewer that
he thought he had picked up 'six, seven, eight' O-level passes from his
correspondence course studies after leaving Rutlish Grammar, aged 16. But
'to tell you the truth I can't remember'.
That was not good enough for Mr Eric Illsley. The Labour MP for Barnsley (10
O-levels, three A-levels) demanded that Mr Major lift the veil on his
academic record.
'I think we should be told,' Mr Illsley said in a phrase which clearly
reflected his O-level pass in English Literature.
Major defended, Page 4
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4278</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDTALAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910420
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  20 APR 91 / Low bank lending growth fuels credit crunch fears
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RACHEL JOHNSON, Economics Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
GROWTH IN bank lending is at a record low, according to figures released
yesterday, arousing fears of a credit crunch in a protracted UK recession.
The Bank of England announced that bank and building society lending rose by
Pounds 700m in March, against the City forecast of about Pounds 4bn. Lending
rose by just 0.1 per cent on the month to take the annual rate to 11.1 per
cent, the weakest since records began 15 years ago.
This sharp contraction in credit growth after February's Pounds 5.9bn rise
severely reduced hopes of an early consumer-led recovery to take Britain out
of recession in the second half of the year.
Mr Neil Mackinnon, economist at Yamaichi, the Japanese bank, said: 'When
bank lending collapses, economic recovery remains depressed.'
The monetary data underscored Thursday's bleak un-employment and factory
output figures, which suggested that the UK recession had yet to touch its
trough.
This sparked hopes of lower interest rates on London's money markets - which
the Bank of England extinguished by offering to lend yesterday afternoon at
the prevailing bank base rate of 12 per cent for seven days.
This firm signal that the authorities deemed current monetary conditions
appropriate for the next week led to the important three-month interbank
rate closing just  1/32 down at 11 25/32 -11 21/32 per cent.
The evidence of such tight monetary conditions caused amazement among City
economists and traders.
'Bank lending is extremely low. The markets regarded the figure as nothing
short of amazing,' said Mr John Shepperd, of Warburg Securities.
Economists offered two explanations for standstill in credit growth.
They suggested banks were restricting availability of credit because of weak
balance sheets and a dearth of quality borrowers. Demand for new finance had
dried to a trickle as the recession deepened in the early months of this
year.
Figures from the Committee of London and Scottish Bankers painted a
similarly depressed picture. Total group lending to the UK private sector
fell by Pounds 600m, after a large seasonal rise had been expected.
The Treasury played down fears of a credit crunch, pointing to a recent
industrial survey which showed that just 4 per cent of companies were having
difficulty obtaining external finance.
In a recent paper, however, the Bank of England concluded that borrowers did
seem less willing to add to debt and that lenders had tightened lending
criteria.
However, the Bank said there was 'little evidence of credit crunch in the
original sense of lenders being unable to lend because they are unable to
raise funds'.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4279</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDXBFAAGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / They're smiling all the way to the bank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   LONDON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE BOARD of the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development met for
the first time yesterday in London. The meeting will continue today. writes
Stephen Fidler in London. The board - comprising 23 executive directors and
Mr Jacques Attali, the bank's president (in foreground) - is meant to play a
strong role in guiding the operations of the bank, owned by 39 governments
and two European institutions.
The meeting will map out the lending criteria of the European bank - the
first multilateral institution to attach political as well as economic
conditions to its loans.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 23 Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4280</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDXBFAAFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Rock and roll
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Former Hungarian rock star Ms Sarolta Zalatnay has founded a Happiness Party
to cheer up recession-hit country folk: the most pessimistic people in the
world according to a recent poll.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4281</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDXBFAAEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / World News in Brief: US lottery record
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
California set a new US lottery record in a jackpot built up over several
days of frenzied ticket purchases. The Dollars 117.1m prize will be split
among 10 winning tickets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4282</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDXBFAADFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Soviet earthquake
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
An earthquake shook the Soviet central Asian republic of Tajikistan, causing
an unknown number of casualties.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4283</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDXBFAACFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Bonn spy sought
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
German prosecutors said they were still looking for a high-ranking spy in
the Bonn government suspected of passing secrets to former East Germany
during the mid-1980s.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4284</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDXBFAABFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Mitterrand jeered
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Hundreds of Romanian anti-government demonstrators jeered French president
Francois Mitterrand as he arrived at his embassy in Bucharest.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4285</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDXBFAAAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / World News in Brief: Dissident murdered
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
An Iranian dissident close to the late Shah's last prime minister, Shapur
Bakhtiar, was stabbed to death outside his home in central Paris.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
International Page 1
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4286</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDACHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / UK Company News: Hardanger Props - Correction
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Borrowings of Hardanger Properties at the end of September totalled Pounds
72m, compared with the group's gross assets of Pounds 134m. The asset figure
was incorrectly stated in Thursday's paper.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4287</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / World Stock Markets (America): Dow takes a break after
Wednesday's record close
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
Wall Street
AFTER the big gains of Tuesday and Wednesday share prices slipped back
yesterday to leave the leading indices just below their new record levels,
writes Patrick Harverson in New York.
At the close the Dow Jones Industrial Average was down 5.20 at 2,999.26. On
two occasions in the morning the Dow dropped below 3,000, then it recovered
to post a new high mid-afternoon, only to drop back amid late selling. The
broader-based Standard &amp; Poor's 500 spent the first half of the day in
negative territory, standing down 1.99 at 388.46, while the Nasdaq composite
of over-the-counter stocks was down 4.69 at 506.62. Turnover on the New York
SE was again heavy at 219m shares, with declining issues outnumbering
advancing issues by 923 to 684.
Two pieces of encouraging economic news failed to lift the market. The
latest jobless claims figures, for the week ending April 6, showed a 22,000
fall in the number of people claiming state unemployment insurance. Analysts
had been expecting the number to rise. The February trade deficit narrowed
to Dollars 5.3bn, the smallest since September 1983. Although the data
should have boosted optimism about the economy market sentiment remained
subdued, primarily because much of the coverage of the Dow's record close on
Wednesday suggested that the rally did not have much further to go.
Hasbro shares, traded on the American Stock Exchange, rose Dollars 2 to
Dollars 29 1/2 after the company said it had received more t approval from
Tonka bondholders for its cash tender offer. Tonka rose early on but
eventually ended unchanged at Dollars 4 3/4 on volume of 1.8m shares.
A batch of mixed quarterly results in the technology sector caused a stir.
Digital Equipment jumped Dollars 3 1/8 to Dollars 69 3/4 on volume of 2.1m
shares after the computer group announced fiscal third quarter income of 94
cents a share, up from 20 cents a share a year earlier. Tandem Computers
climbed Dollars 1 3/4 to Dollars 16 on news of fiscal second quarter net
earnings of 17 cents a share, against 25 cents a share the year before.
Texas Instruments fell Dollars 1 to Dollars 45 as it reported a first
quarter loss.
Sears, Roebuck rose Dollars 2 1/8 to Dollars 39 1/2 after the retailing
giant announced first quarter profits of 59 cents a share, which included a
charge against earnings. Lockheed fell Dollars  5/8 to Dollars 41 7/8 on
news that first quarter profits had fallen from Dollars 1.09 a year ago to
85 cents a share. Schering-Plough, the pharmaceutical and healthcare group,
fell Dollars 1 1/2 to Dollars 49 3/4 in the wake of an 19 per cent increase
in quarterly income to 79 cents a share.
Canada
TORONTO shares sagged from the opening bell, staged a brief rally then
faded, closing slightly lower in moderate trading. The TSE 300 composite
closed down 12.00 points to end the day at 3533.93, as declines led advances
by 293 to 270. Volume of 35.4m shares, which was boosted by trading in three
penny stocks, beat Wednesday's 28.56m shares and trading value fell to
CDollars 359.4m (CDollars 367m).
The transportation group lost 2.19 per cent for the biggest decline among
the sub-indices, followed by gold issues, off 1.22 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 45
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4288</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Capital Markets: Sainsbury reinforces debt
status with Dollars 150m deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SIMON LONDON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
J. SAINSBURY, the UK food retailer, yesterday became the latest corporate
borrower to tap the international bond market this week with a Dollars 150m
five-year issue.
The bonds carry a coupon of 8 1/2 per cent and were reoffered to investors
at the fixed price of 99.72, where the yield spread over US Treasury bonds
is 72 basis points.
The company's last Eurodollar bond issue was in 1989, a Dollars 150m
seven-year issue launched at a yield spread of 80 basis points over
Treasuries. Since 1989 many corporate yield spreads have widened
significantly. The narrowing of Sainsbury's yield spread reflects the
company's growing following among international investors. Lead managed by
JP Morgan, by late afternoon the deal was trading at 99.45 bid, for a yield
spread of 71 basis points over Treasuries.
The Pounds 100m five-year issue announced on Wednesday by Sears, the UK
retail group, was priced to yield 135 basis points over UK government bonds.
The coupon was set at 12 1/2 per cent and the issue price was 101.95. Both
the Sears and Sainsbury deals include an 'event risk' put option, giving
bondholders the right to sell back to the issuer at par if the company
becomes the subject of a hostile takeover bid.
Most of the Sears bonds were placed by Credit Suisse First Boston, the lead
manager, and Goldman Sachs and Warburg. The three firms reported strong
buying interest from institutions keen to pick up higher-yielding assets,
although retail companies are not favoured by many investment institutions.
The deal traded at 101.80 bid, against full fees of 1 7/8 per cent.
However, the highest yielding bonds of the day were launched by ANZ Banking
Group, which launched a Pounds 60m 10-year subordinated deal priced to yield
225 basis points over the 10 per cent UK government bond maturing 2001.
The issue was lead managed by Goldman Sachs and launched at Pounds 50m but
increased in the face of strong buying interest. ANZ carries A-2 and
single-A credit ratings for subordinated paper respectively from Moody's
Investors Service and Standard &amp; Poor's, the two big US credit rating
agencies. National Westminster bank, which launched Pounds 100m of 10-year
subordinated paper on Monday, is rated Aa and AA2 by the two rating agencies
and paid a yield spread of 135 basis points.
The European Investment Bank also tapped the sterling sector of the market,
selling Pounds 150m of five-year paper in a deal solely underwritten by
Barclays de Zoete Wedd. Participants in the deal reported continued buying
of sterling assets by continental European investors against the background
of a weak D-Mark. By the close of trading, the issuing was bid at around the
fixed reoffer level of 99.62.
Yesterday saw Ecu450m of three-year bonds issued, more new Ecu paper than in
the past three weeks. Credit Local de France came with a Ecu200m offering of
bonds paying a coupon of 9 1/8 per cent lead managed by Paribas. This was
quickly followed by a Ecu250m deal from IMI Bank, the Italian
state-controlled financial institution, with bonds paying a coupon of 9 1/4
per cent.
Both deals were aimed at retail investors and were held at the fixed reoffer
price by the lead managers throughout the day. The progress of the IMI deal
may be slowed by yesterday's announcement that Italy's triple-A credit
rating may be lowered by Moody's. IMI is controlled by the Italian state and
will automatically loose it's top rating if the downgrading proceeds.
GIBRALTAR yesterday made it's debut in the capital markets with a Pounds 50m
domestic bond issue lead managed by BZW. The paper matures in 2005 and was
priced to yield 175 basis points over the 9 1/2 per cent UK government
conversion stock of this maturity.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 33
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4289</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Government Bonds: Treasuries slide on news of labour market
revival
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
US GOVERNMENT bond prices fell sharply across the board yesterday after
signs of an unexpected revival in the labour market.
In late trading the benchmark 30-year Treasury bond was down  23/32 at 96
21/32 , to yield 8.169 per cent.
At one stage the long bond had been almost a full point lower.
The two-year note was even weaker, down  5/32 at 100 9/32 , yielding 6.948
per cent.
Bond prices fell on the news of a 22,000 drop in initial claims for state
unemployment insurance in the week ending April 6.
The market had been expecting a rise in the number of jobless claims, and
analysts said the figures pointed to signs of a recovery in the labour
market, and therefore, in the economy as a whole.
The jobless statistics, following on from last week's promising inflation
data, are likely to reinforce the view that interest rates do not need to
come down any further. The bond market has been troubled in recent days by
suggestions that the Federal Reserve is satisfied with the progress of the
economy, and sees no need for another easing of monetary policy.
The news that Congress had put a stop to the nationwide freight rail strike
also depressed prices, which had been higher on Wednesday on the expectation
that the strike would slow down the pace of economic activity.
IN EUROPE, the London gilts market fell about  3/8 point, despite a series
of economic data considered quite positive for the market.
The main influence on the market was the continued oversupply of paper, with
a further Pounds 335m of new sterling, foreign and corporate bond issues
added to the market yesterday. Interest in the new five-year gilt to be
auctioned next week was described as only moderate.
The long gilt future on the London International Financial Futures Exchange
ended at 91 3/4 , down from 92 5/32 .
Traders are focusing on provisional money supply figures due to be released
later today, particularly bank lending data.
German bonds eased slightly, but substantially outperformed the US bond
market.
The Bund futures contract on Liffe ended at 85.66, down from a closing level
of 85.78 on Wednesday. German monetary policy was left unchanged at
yesterday's Bundesbank meeting.
The French bond market also outperformed the US Treasury market, and was
also a little stronger than German. The yield spread between French and
German bonds narrowed a basis point or two to 46 basis points.
A two- and five-year bond auction in France was quite well received, dealers
said.
JAPANESE government bonds fell slightly yesterday afternoon following the
fall in the US market, but otherwise traded in a very narrow range. Traders
said market sentiment was poor and volumes were low.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4290</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Capital Markets: Bell Group bondholders at
risk
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MARK WESTHILL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SYDNEY
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
EUROPEAN bond holders owed USDollars 587m are at risk following the
appointment of a provisional liquidator at Bell Group, a subsidiary of Bond
Corporation.
The liquidator was appointed yesterday after the breakdown of talks with Mr
Kerry Packer over a proposed restructuring of Bell.
Mr Packer's Australian Consolidated Press had sought to inject ADollars 60m
of fresh capital into Bell in exchange for taking 15.1 per cent of the
company, but negotiations between the two sides broke down. Mr Packer was
seeking control of Bell's main asset, the West Australian newspaper.
Bell also has 39 per cent of Bell Resources (since renamed Australian
Consolidated Investments) an investment worth around ADollars 43m.
The directors of Bell group decided to seek a provisional liquidator when
they realised the company could not meet a demand for the redemption of
ADollars 150m in convertible bonds held by the West Australian state
government insurance commission (WASGIC). Bell defaulted on interest
payments on the bond last September, triggering an SGIC demand for full
repayment. Bell directors told their main bankers, owed ADollars 330m, that
they could not meet the repayments. The banks reportedly pressed Bell to
seek a formal manager.
Bell Group has ADollars 587m of convertible bonds outstanding, mostly held
by UK and European investors. The two series of bonds with coupon rates of
10 per cent and 11 per cent, mature in 1995 and 1992.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 32
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4291</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Time Warner posts slight slip
after merger costs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TIME WARNER, the world's biggest media and entertainment company, yesterday
posted a slight decline in first-quarter operating income, with softness at
the company's publishing and music operations offsetting gains from its film
and cable television operations.
Expenses related to the 1989 merger of Time Life and Warner Communications
pushed the company into the red for the quarter. Time Warner's net loss for
the three months ended March 31 was Dollars 50m or Dollars 3.39 a share
after preferred dividend requirements compared with a deficit of Dollars 51m
or Dollars 3.25 a share in 1990.
Revenues advanced 4 per cent to Dollars 2.84bn from Dollars 2.74bn. The
results were muddied by interest expenses and amortisation costs related to
Time Warner's Dollars 11bn of debt, which the company has been charging off
each quarter. Time Warner's operating income slid 1 per cent to Dollars 530m
in the first three months of 1991.
The company blamed economic softness and a drop in advertising revenue for
the 41 per cent slump in earnings before interest, tax, depreciation and
amortisation to Dollars 42m from its publishing operations.
Earnings before expenses from Time Warner's music business fell 8 per cent
to Dollars 137m in the quarter, which the company attributed to soft retail
sales and start-up investments. However, earnings from filmed entertainment
operations rose 3 per cent to Dollars 95m, with lower US cinema revenues
more than offset by record results from syndication and home video sales.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4292</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Weyerhaeuser earnings plunge by
60% in opening quarter
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WEYERHAEUSER has joined the lengthening list of North American forest
products companies whose first-quarter profits have been battered by weak
pulp and paper markets.
The Seattle-based company suffered a 60 per cent plunge in net earnings to
Dollars 52.4m or 26 cents a share from Dollars 130.1m or 61 cents in the
corresponding period of the previous year.
Sales dipped by 10 per cent to Dollars 2.1bn.
Mr John Creighton, president, told the annual meeting yesterday that
recovery in the forest products industry is likely to lag the overall
economy as a result of massive over-supply.
He predicted that the pulp and paper industry's capacity utilisation rate
will drop to just above 80 per cent later this year from the present level
of the low 90s.
Mr Creighton said that export markets, which make up more than a fifth of
total revenues, are much stronger than North American demand.
Weyerhaeuser's newsprint, fine paper, personal care products and bleached
paperboard businesses all turned in a better performance last quarter than
in 1990.
But earnings for market pulp and paperboard were lower.
Mr Creighton also warned that capacity due to come on line during the course
of this year is depressing prices for several pulp and paper product lines.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 31
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4293</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Dow Chemical surprises Wall St
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
LOWER costs for hydrocarbon and energy at the beginning of the year helped
Dow Chemical, the second biggest US chemicals group, post
better-than-expected first-quarter earnings. The increase came despite
prices pressure in March.
For the three months to March 31, Dow's underlying earnings per share fell
21.6 per cent, to Dollars 1.34 from Dollars 1.71.
With Wall Street expecting Dow to turn in earnings of about Dollars 1 a
share, the share price increased Dollars  3/4 to Dollars 51 5/8 at the close
on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday.
The company's results were distorted by a Dollars 213m, or 79cents a share,
gain from the initial public offering of Dow's Destec Energy business, and
Dow's net income for the quarter rose 25 per cent to Dollars 576m, or
Dollars 2.13.
Sales were slightly higher at Dollars 4.95bn, against Dollars 4.9bn.
Operating income, however, fell 12.5 per cent to Dollars 785m from Dollars
897m.
Analysts warned that Dow's prospects for the second quarter remain bleak. Mr
John Garcia, at Wertheim Schroder, expected Dow to post 90 cents a share in
the next quarter, reflecting weakness in Europe and the price squeeze that
started to be felt in March.
Prices of polyethylene started sliding in March and are expected to fall
further in the second quarter, with relatively stable demand. Lower ethylene
costs partly offset the decline in the first quarter.
Mr Frank Popoff, chief executive, said: 'While many of our large-volume,
hydrocarbon-based products were under price pressure by mid-February, the
financial impact wasn't felt until March, which allowed margins to expand
modestly early in the first quarter.'
Although hydrocarbon and energy costs were up 12 per cent on last year's,
they were 18 per cent below levels in the final quarter of 1990.
Mr Popoff said hydrocarbon feedstocks were expected to stabilise by the end
of the second quarter. The higher feedstock costs during the Gulf war pushed
up prices by 7 per cent, compared with 1990. Volume in the quarter fell 6
per cent, while manufacturing costs increased 9 per cent.
'The challenge of maintaining margins in an environment of soft economies
and weak industrial fundamentals typifies the current year,' he said.
Looking ahead, Dow expects modestly improved results in 1992, provided the
US economy picks up.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4294</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Travel side holds back American
Express
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AN IMPROVED performance by American Express's banking, brokerage and
information businesses in the first quarter was tarnished by a 25 per cent
tumble in net income from its travellers' cheque and other travel-related
services.
The company's overall net earnings reached Dollars 264m, or 55 cents a
share, compared to a loss last year of Dollars 620m, or Dollars 1.50. The
loss was due to a Dollars 787m charge for restructuring and accounting
changes at Shearson Lehman Brothers.
Revenues rose 6.5 per cent to Dollars 6.3bn. The travel businesses, which
make up 38 per cent of revenues, were hit by the Gulf war, the recession,
and a Dollars 50m loan-loss provision. Earnings from this source fell to
Dollars 162m from Dollars 215m.
Sales of travellers cheques fell 14 per cent to Dollars 4.4bn.
Although the number of American Express credit cards continues to rise, the
company said the rate of increase had slowed as a result of tighter credit
criteria and less active solicitation of new customers.
Shearson Lehman recovered to a Dollars 51m profit, from last year's Dollars
915m loss, largely reflecting the improved climate in the securities
industry as well as a 13 per cent cut in fixed expenses. Revenues from
market-making and principal trading soared by 81 per cent to Dollars 467m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4295</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: BankAmerica underlines strength
of recovery
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FIRST-QUARTER earnings of BankAmerica have confirmed that the San
Francisco-based group which was almost on its knees four years ago is now
one of the strongest banks in the US.
BankAmerica, the biggest West Coast bank, lifted earnings slightly to
Dollars 282m, or Dollars 1.24 a share, from Dollars 278m, or Dollars 1.23, a
year earlier. Net interest income grew by 10 per cent to Dollars 1.1bn. Fee
and other non-interest income was up 7 per cent, thanks to higher profits
and commissions from securities and foreign exchange trading.
Although return on assets and on common equity fell by 8 and 13 per cent
respectively in the first quarter, these ratios - at 1.02 and 18.9 per cent
 -are still among the highest for the big US banks.
BankAmerica also has one of the strongest capital positions, with a ratio of
common equity to assets of 5.4 per cent. Total assets stood at Dollars
111.9bn on March 31, up from Dollars 101.1bn a year earlier.
Ironically, BankAmerica owes much of its good fortune to the difficulties of
the mid-1980s. A radical restructuring has returned it to its California
roots, while sharply cutting back staff and other overheads.
'They got their wake-up call early,' says Mr Richard Fredericks, banking
analyst at Montgomery Securities in San Francisco.
BankAmerica's share price has soared almost six-fold since the depths of the
1987 crisis. It lost Dollars  7/8 yesterday, however, to close at Dollars 38
5/8 .
Nonetheless, the group has not been immune from the recession and the
property slump. Total non-accrual assets of Dollars 3.1bn on March 31 were
virtually unchanged from three months earlier, but the property and
construction component jumped to Dollars 740m from Dollars 551m. The
non-accrual portion of the bank's loans for highly-leveraged deals jumped to
Dollars 257m from Dollars 140m.
Net credit losses surged to Dollars 447m in the first quarter from Dollars
132m in the previous three months, and Dollars 48m last time. Excluding
third world debt, the increase was due largely to a Dollars 53m increase in
write-offs of consumer loans, especially on credit cards, and to lower bad
debt recoveries.
BankAmerica has expanded its operations in New Mexico and Arizona, partly
through the acquisition of savings and loan assets from the Resolution Trust
Corp. The group now has retail networks in eight western states.
Despite the addition of 2,900 employees as a result of the first-quarter
acquisitions, the total staff complement of 55,100 is virtually unchanged
from a year ago.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4296</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Selling costs hurt Tandem
Computers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TANDEM Computers, the manufacturer of fault-tolerant computers, reported
lower second-quarter earnings on increased revenues.
Revenues for the quarter rose 8 per cent to Dollars 489.4m, from Dollars
451.3m last time. Net income was Dollars 18.0m, or 17 cents a share, down
from Dollars 26.8m, or 25 cents.
Seagate Technology, the leading supplier of personal computer disk drives,
reported disappointing third-quarter results, sending its share price
sliding 23 per cent from a Wednesday close of Dollars 18 1/8 to trade at
Dollars 13 7/8 late yesterday.
Sales for the quarter were Dollars 676.6m, compared with Dollars 676m in the
same period last year. Net income fell to Dollars 25.3m, or 38 cents, from
Dollars 28.3m, or 44 cents.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4297</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Vista Chemical rises to Dollars
18.2m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TATE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
VISTA Chemical, the Houston-based commodity and speciality chemicals company
subject to a tender offer from RWE, the German utility, yesterday reported a
profits improvement in the second quarter of its financial year, writes
Nicki Tate.
It made Dollars 18.2m in the three months to the end of March, compared with
Dollars 16.2m last time.
The company saw sales of Dollars 191.6m in the period, compared with Dollars
184.8m in its second quarter in 1990.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4298</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Georgia-Pacific Dollars 7m in
red
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
WEAK demand and pricing pressures have pushed Georgia-Pacific, the largest
US paper manufacturer following its takeover of Great Northern Nekoosa in
March 1990, to a loss in the first quarter of 1991.
The company saw a Dollars 7m deficit, after asset sales in the three months
to the end of March, compared with a Dollars 101m surplus in the same period
a year earlier. If the gain on the sale of its container-board and packaging
assets was excluded, the loss widened to Dollars 50m.
'Business conditions in the first quarter became even more difficult as
demand and price pressures affected both our core businesses,' said Mr
Marshall Hahn, Georgia-Pacific's chairman.
He said pulp and paper mills were 'running well' but domestic businesses
were still hit by demand and price pressures, with little sign of
improvement.
Overall, operating profits from pulp and paper fell from Dollars 182m in the
first quarter of 1990 to Dollars 146m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4299</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Tonka says yes to Hasbro
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HASBRO moved closer to cementing its position as the biggest US toymaker
yesterday when Tonka's board of directors recommended that shareholders
accept Hasbro's amended takeover offer, valued at Dollars 486m, writes Karen
Zagor.
Under the terms of the revised bid, Tonka's shareholders will receive
Dollars 5 a share instead of the previously offered Dollars 7, while
bondholders will get Dollars 300.2m for 90 per cent of the bonds, an
improvement of Dollars 43.2m on the earlier offer.
Bondholders had balked at the earlier bid, prompting Hasbro to revise its
offer.
Mr Stephen Shank, Tonka's chairman, said the board had decided the offers
was in the best interest of shareholders, given the company's recent losses,
the uncertain outlook for the rest of the year, the deterioration in the
bank lending environment for highly leveraged companies such as Tonka, and
the uncertain availability of bank financing to meet Tonka's seasonal
working capital needs.
Shares in both issues were actively traded yesterday, with Hasbro adding
Dollars 2 1/8 to Dollars 29 5/8 and Tonka closing unchanged at Dollars 4 3/4
.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4300</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Pfizer advances to Dollars 267m
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KAREN ZAGOR and BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
PFIZER, the US pharma-ceuticals company, yesterday reported a 17 per cent
improvement in first-quarter net income on a 20 per cent rise in sales,
after stripping out discontinued operations from the 1990 results.
Including extraordinary items, Pfizer's net income in the first three months
of 1991 rose 6 per cent to Dollars 267.4m, or 79 cents a share, from Dollars
251.9m, or 75 cents, a year earlier. Earnings per share have been restated
to reflect a two-for-one stock split in January.
In the 1990 quarter, the sale of the DeKalb Pfizer Genetics seed business
contributed Dollars 39m in pre-tax income. Sales in the quarter rose 14 per
cent to Dollars 1.7bn from Dollars 1.48bn, led by growth on the health care
side.
Schering-Plough, The New Jersey-based pharmaceuticals and health care
products group, lifted first-quarter earnings to Dollars 173.2m, or 79 cents
a share, from Dollars 150.4m, 66 cents a share, a year earlier, writes
Bernard Simon in New York.
Sales rose to Dollars 949.3m from Dollars 865.1m, despite the sale last July
of the Maybelline cosmetics business.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4301</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Strong Digital result lifts
shares
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
DIGITAL Equipment's share price rose sharply yesterday on news of strong
third-quarter earnings as the US computer company continues to reduce its
workforce and realign operations.
Digital reported net income of Dollars 116.6m, or 94 cents, for the quarter,
up dramatically from Dollars 24.9m or 20 cents in the third quarter last
year. Revenues rose 8 per cent to Dollars 3.52bn from Dollars 3.26bn.
The quarter's results reflect the consolidation of earnings from
Digital-Kienzle, a German computer company in which Digital acquired a 65
per cent interest from Mannesmann for Dollars 230m last December. Before the
Kienzle consolidation, earnings per share were Dollars 1.14.
In response to the third-quarter results, Digital's share price rose sharply
in heavy trading to close Dollars 3 1/8 higher at Dollars 69 3/4 .
For the first nine months of 1991 the company reported revenues of Dollars
9.96bn, up 4 per cent from Dollars 9.58bn in the same period a year ago.
Net income for the nine months was down, however to Dollars 253.9m from
Dollars 331.1m. Earnings per share were Dollars 2.06, compared with Dollars
2.65 per share a year ago.
'The difficult economic environment of the past several quarters is still
with us,' said Mr John Smith, senior vice-president of operations.
'The uncertain business outlook, which was heightened by the Middle East
conflict, is resulting in delays in customers' investments in technology,
particularly for large systems.'
'We have made good progress in our programme of lowering expenses,
consolidating our facilities and restructuring our workforce,' added Mr
Smith.
During the quarter more than 2,200 employees left Digital, he said.
Worldwide service revenues from systems integration and other activities
grew by 20 per cent during the quarter, said Mr Kenneth Olsen, Digital's
president.
Sales of its Unix workstations have doubled since the same period last year,
but those of the high-end minicomputers were hit by economic conditions, the
company said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4302</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Lockheed hit by higher tax bill
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By BERNARD SIMON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
LOCKHEED, the US aerospace group, blamed sharply higher tax provisions for a
22 per cent drop in first-quarter earnings.
Net income dropped to Dollars 54m, or 85 cents a share, from Dollars 69m, or
Dollars 1.09, a year ago. Sales were virtually unchanged at Dollars 2.2bn,
but income tax provisions jumped by 53 per cent, to Dollars 29m.
The company ascribed the rise in its tax rate, from 21 to 35 per cent, to
payments becoming due on taxes deferred on contracts begun as long ago as
1985-86 but now completed.
Mr Daniel Tellep, chairman, described first-quarter operations as 'very
solid,' and predicted strong growth in operating profits this year.
Margins improved on missiles, space equipment, defence electronics and
aeronautical systems. On the other hand, the recession pushed down profits
from peripherals for commercial computers, while start-up expenses depressed
earnings from its aerospace services division.
Lockheed boosted its quarterly dividend last month to 50 cents from 45 cents
after Dallas-based investor Harold Simmons agreed to end his bid for control
of the company after an unsuccessful proxy fight.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4303</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Continental Air considers
reorganisation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By NIKKI TAIT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
CONTINENTAL Airlines, the US carrier caught up in Chapter 11 bankruptcy
proceedings since late last year, is considering a reorganisation involving
unsecured creditors of its parent company, Continental Airlines Holdings,
and the main operating business, Continental Airlines, converting into
equity.
It suggested yesterday there was a possibility Continental Airlines
Holdings' interest in its main operating subsidiary could be 'materially
diluted', or even eliminated.
Equally, the holding company said it 'could be deprived of a portion or
possibly all of its ownership interests in each of its non-Continental
subsidiaries pursuant to their separate plans of reorganisation'.
'Continental Airlines Holdings presently anticipates that equity holders
will likely suffer substantial dilution or possibly complete elimination of
their interests,' it said.
Word of the possible reorganisation came in an annual filing by Continental
with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Continental stressed, however,
that no decision on a reorganisation had been made.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 30
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4304</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Texas Instruments reverses into
red
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LOUISE KEHOE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   SAN FRANCISCO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
TEXAS Instruments, the US semiconductor and electronics manufacturer,
reported heavy losses for the first quarter of 1991, reflecting a slump in
semiconductor memory chip prices.
Net losses for the first three months were Dollars 54m, compared with net
income of Dollars 13m in the corresponding period a year ago.
Losses per share were 77 cents, compared with earnings of 5 cents per share
the previous year.
Operating losses rose from Dollars 2m in the first quarter of 1990 to
Dollars 35m in the first three months of 1991.
Texas Instruments' revenues were up 7 per cent to Dollars 1.65bn.
Higher sales of specialised semiconductor products other than memory chips,
was the biggest factor in revenue growth, Texas Instruments said.
'We experienced double-digit revenue growth in differentiated semiconductor
products in 1990.
'Our goal is to generate more than half of our semiconductor revenues from
this class of products by the latter part of the decade,' said Mr Jerry
Junkins, Texas Instruments' chairman, president and chief executive.
'During the weak semiconductor market environment, Texas Instruments
invested counter-cyclically in capital and in research and development, to
be in a better position for the market upturn,' said Mr Junkins.
Capital spending reached a high of Dollars 909m in 1990 but will be cut to
about Dollars 575m this year, he said.
'We are beginning to see signs of recovery in the semiconductor market, and
expect (it) will grow about 13 per cent in 1991,' Mr Junkins added.
Texas Instruments earned Dollars 76m in royalty revenues during the first
quarter from companies which have lic-ensed its semiconductor technology.
Profit margins in defence electronics fell slightly, while losses increased
in Texas Instruments' computer operations.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4305</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAGAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: BASF dividend cut after 45% fall
in income
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW FISHER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
BASF, one of Germany's big three chemical companies, will pay a lower
dividend after a steep drop in profits last year, writes Andrew Fisher in
Frankfurt.
Shareholders will receive DM13 a share compared with the previous year's
DM14, which included a DM1 bonus to mark its 125th anniversary. For 1988 the
group paid DM12.
Some analysts had expected a cut to DM11 a share in view of the poor result.
However, the dollar's slight recovery and lower oil prices have improved the
outlook for 1991. The group said net income totalled DM1.1bn (Dollars 622m)
in 1990, a decline of 45 per cent.
It has already announced a 37 per cent slide in pre-tax profits for 1990,
with the fourth-quarter figure plummeting by 64 per cent.
Like the other German chemical groups, BASF has suffered from the dollar's
weakness, the recession in the US and other markets, and higher raw material
prices. BASF said rising labour and environmental costs. especially in
Germany, had also depressed the final quarter's result.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4306</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAF9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / International Company News: Nedlloyd Fl 148m loss at high
end of forecasts
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RONALD VAN DE KROL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   AMSTERDAM
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
NEDLLOYD, the Dutch transport group, posted a net loss for 1990 of Fl 148.2m
(Dollars 78.4m), down sharply from a net profit of Fl 252.3m in 1989 and at
the high end of the company's previously forecast range of Fl 125m to Fl
150m.
The reversal in performance was due mainly to a severe downturn in
ocean-going shipping but also to a more modest decline in land transport.
These two sectors, which form the core of the Nedlloyd group, fell into the
red last year and are expected to be loss-making again this year, though
both areas should improve, Mr Henk Rootliep, the company's chairman, said.
Last year's losses would have been higher if it had not been for profits of
Fl 110m on the sale of fixed assets.
On the other hand, Nedlloyd also recorded an extraordinary charge of Fl 8m
in 1990 against extraordinary gains of Fl 54.2m in 1989.
Nedlloyd has come under pressure from a leading shareholder, Mr Torstein
Hagen, the Norwegian investor, to speed up the sale of non-core businesses.
Mr Rootliep repeated his view that management will not be rushed into
divestments. Shipping, which is in the middle of a restructuring, was hit by
declines in both the dollar and freight rates on significant east-west trade
routes. Operating profit swung into a loss of Fl 78m from a profit of Fl
111.3m.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 29
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4307</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAF8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / UK Company News: Pay of Booker chief rose 85% to Pounds 0.3m
in 1990
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAGGIE URRY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Mr Jonathan Taylor, chief executive of Booker, the food distribution and
agribusiness group, saw his pay rise 85 per cent to Pounds 331,459 last
year.
However, the previous year he had suffered a 25 per cent pay cut to Pounds
178,791 even though the group achieved higher profits and earnings per share
in that year.
Mr Taylor said that at Booker 'we operate a proper incentive scheme'. Up to
60 per cent of his salary can be made from bonuses linked to growth in
earnings and profits. Last year he received virtually no performance-related
pay.
In 1990 pre-tax profits rose 21 per cent to Pounds 119.7m and earnings were
12.9 per cent higher at 41.9p. Total pay for the directors was Pounds 1.6m
(Pounds 1.1m).
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 26
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4308</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAF7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Blue Circle declines 16%: Construction market collapse hits
sales
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ANDREW TAYLOR, Construction Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BLUE CIRCLE, the world's third-largest cement manufacturer, saw pre-tax
profits fall 16.6 per cent last year from Pounds 231.8m to Pounds 195m.
The fall was almost entirely due to the collapse of the UK construction
market where cement sales last year fell about 12 per cent.
Mr Jim McColgan, Blue Circle's chief executive, warned that group profits
were likely to fall further this year with UK cement sales forecast to
decline another 12 per cent. Rises of between 6 per cent to 7.5 per cent in
UK cement prices had been applied to all customers since March 1 and so far
had held, he said.
Cement profits in the UK last year fell 38.5 per cent to Pounds 68.1m. By
contrast, profits for cement, aggregate and ready-mix concrete in the US,
Blue Circle's second largest market, remained virtually static at Pounds
18.4m, despite a fall of a fifth in sales to Pounds 254.1m. Mr McColgan said
the group's new US management had significantly cut costs. US employee
numbers fell more than a third. Profits held up despite the recession in
many US construction markets.
'Residential permits last year declined by 21 per cent in Georgia, where
Blue Circle has its US headquarters. Cement sales in New England had fallen
by 10 per cent and were 30 per cent below levels in 1988,' said Mr McColgan.
He warned that recovery in the UK and US construction markets could be
delayed until next year although lower transatlantic interest rates would
help housing markets.
The group announced extraordinary provisions of Pounds 17.4m to cover
potential losses at its garden-products division put up for sale last year.
It also included gains and losses from the sale of the Wrighton and
Elizabeth Ann kitchen appliance business and the Birmid foundry business.
Mr McColgan said the group had received several approaches for the
garden-products division but had yet to be offered 'an acceptable price'.
The group announced on Wednesday it was closing its Derby lawnmower
manufacturing plant employing about 370 workers.
Last year profits at the home-products division, which formerly housed the
garden-products business, rose from Pounds 26.5m to Pounds 42.9m due only to
first-time contributions from the Myson heating products business and from
Ceramica Dolomite, the Italian sanitaryware manufacturer.
Elsewhere cement profits rose sharply in the Far East; remained strong in
Chile and Africa but were disappointing at Aalborg, the group's 50 per
cent-owned Danish company.
The group is proposing a final dividend of 7.5p making a total of 11.25p for
the year compared with a total of 11p in 1989.
Lex, Page 24
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25 Photograph Jim McColgan, Blue Circle's chief executive,
warned of further falls in profits (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4309</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAF6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / UK hotel group hit hard by Gulf war
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID CHURCHILL, Leisure Industries Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
TRUSTHOUSE FORTE, Britain's biggest hotelier, was hit hard by the Gulf war
and UK recession with pre-tax profits falling 27 per cent, from Pounds 260m
to Pounds 190m for the financial year ended 31 January 1991. This was on a
sales increase of just 7 per cent to Pounds 2.64bn.
THF has reacted to the downturn in trade by cutting more than 1,000
administrative jobs out of a total workforce of 100,000 over the past year
as well as pruning other costs.
Although the results were at the bottom end of City forecasts, the impact of
the war and recession had been anticipated and the shares closed 4p down at
268p.
Speculation now centres on THF's plans to create a new brand structure next
month for its UK hotels which is likely to include a change of corporate
name to Forte, dropping the Trusthouse part of the name used since 1970.
Mr Rocco Forte, THF's chief executive, yesterday declined to confirm or deny
the impending name change. Analysts believe the switch to the Forte name is
needed to create a stronger overseas image for the hotel group.
Mr Forte said yesterday that trading in the first half of the financial year
had held up well, but had fallen away in the second half. In December and
January alone he estimated that profits fell more than Pounds 12m.
After a low point of 35 per cent occupancy levels reached during the war in
January, THF's hotel occupancy has risen significantly since then. London
hotels now have an average occupancy level of 65 per cent to 70 per cent -
about the level expected for this time of year - although provincial hotels
are still running at a level of 55 to 58 per cent.
Trading profit in THF's hotels division - which operates a total of 840
hotels worldwide - fell by 5 per cent to Pounds 160m on sales 7 per cent
higher at Pounds 913m.
The acquisition of the Crest chain in May last year added some Pounds 4m to
profits after expenses.
Restaurant operations, which include the Harvester and Kentucky Fried
Chicken chains, produced trading profits 3 per cent higher to Pounds 73m on
sales 8 per cent up at Pounds 618m. Contract catering operations, achieved
trading profits up 8 per cent to Pounds 41m on sales 9 per cent higher at
Pounds 1.05bn.
The THF board is recommending a final dividend of 7.16p per share, unchanged
on last year. This brings total dividends for the year to 9.91p (9.66p).
Lex, Page 24
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4310</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAF5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / BP may issue Britoil shares to cut tax bill
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DEBORAH HARGREAVES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH PETROLEUM is working on a novel plan to issue shares in its Britoil
subsidiary to BP shareholders in an attempt to reduce its advance
corporation tax bill.
The company said yesterday the proposal would mean shareholders could elect
to receive their dividend on Britoil's shares rather than BP shares. This
would save BP about Pounds 150m in the first year of the scheme.
The shares are likely to be redeemable preference shares with a low nominal
value. They will be attached to BP shares and shareholders will not be able
to trade them separately.
Mr Bob Horton, BP chairman, said: 'BP has over the years built up an excess
of ACT which it is required to pay to the Exchequer whenever it pays
dividends to shareholders. Although its liability is reduced by these
payments, it may be some time before the excess can be fully utilised. By
contrast, Britoil could utilise ACT immediately.'
Mr Horton said there was still some way to go before the plan can be
finalised but he will meeting the authorities soon to discuss it.
There will be no cash incentive for shareholders to take their dividend
payments on Britoil shares beyond the benefit that will accrue to BP.
Mr Horton told shareholders at the annual meeting that the group expected
current production of 1.5m barrels a day of oil equivalent to continue into
the next century.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 25
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4311</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAF4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Hopes rise for agreed Kurdish camps: US and Iraqi officers
to discuss refugee havens as UN makes separate deal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By Our Foreign and Political Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A TOP level meeting between US and Iraqi military commanders is set to take
place today, raising hopes that Baghdad will not impede efforts to set up
camps in northern Iraq to save hundreds of thousands of Kurdish refugees.
The US European Command in Turkey announced yesterday that Lt-Gen John
Shalikashvili, who will command up to 15,000 Allied troops charged with
building and protecting the camps above the 36th parallel, would cross into
Iraq and meet Iraqi officers near the town of Zakho at noon.
Yesterday Iraq and the United Nations agreed on a separate plan to care for
Kurdish and other refugees and displaced persons in the country through the
establishment of UN-run 'humanitarian centres' controlled by civilians.
The accord was disclosed in a 21-point memorandum signed by Mr Ahmed
Hussein, Baghdad's new foreign minister, and Prince Sadruddin Aga Khan, the
official in charge of UN aid for the region.
The UN-Iraq agreement conflicts with the moves already under way to send US,
British, French and now Dutch troops to set up and defend safe havens in
Iraq, although western and UN officials hope to reconcile the two proposals.
Mr Richard Cheney, the US defence secretary, said the US and its Gulf war
allies would hand over control of refugee camps in Iraq to the UN and other
international organisations as soon as possible.
'We're moving in the direction of passing on the responsibility as soon as
we can,' he said. 'But our first responsibility is to care for those people
before any more of them die.'
Allied military forces were the only ones capable of building the camps and
moving refugees from the mountains, he said. 'If we waited around for all
the niceties to be resolved we could be here for two or three months.'
In Britain Mr Tom King, the defence secretary, announced that a brigade of
the Royal Marines would form the nucleus of the British forces to be sent.
Mr King said an advance party left yesterday and other units would leave
today. The plan is for most of the 2,000 or so men from 3 Commando Brigade
to be based in Turkey, with units rotating into Iraq. They will include
engineering and communications specialists, together with medical staff.
Camps for the Kurds would probably be in the form of tented villages around
a central distribution point, with the Kurds organising themselves and the
allied forces providing security. Mr King said British troops would not
allow the camps to become bases for Kurdish guerrillas.
While Tory MPs emphasised the role of Mr John Major as author of the plan to
create havens for the Kurds, Downing Street sought to play down differences
between the UK and the US over whose idea it had been.
Britain is also using the response to the plight of the Kurds to renew its
appeal to Iran for help in securing the release of British hostages held in
the Lebanon. Mrs Lynda Chalker, the overseas development minister, will take
with her a letter from Mr Douglas Hurd, the foreign secretary, requesting
the help of Iranian leaders when she visits Tehran tomorrow. She will also
discuss the question of aid for the 1m Kurdish refugees in Iran.
Yesterday the US state department said Tehran had indicated it 'would
welcome US participation' in any international relief effort to assist
Kurdish refugees in Iran. The statement, which did not make it clear what,
if anything, the US planned to do to help, comes after criticism that the
world has neglected the Iranian side of the Kurdish disaster. There are
fears that the Kurdish refugee population in Iran could rise to 1.5m.
The issue has been complicated by Iranian wariness, the hostage question and
continuing poor relations with Tehran.
Meanwhile Iraq last night met the first of the deadlines imposed by the UN
Security Council in the ceasefire resolution, submitting details about the
locations, amounts and types of the most dangerous weapons in its arsenal
that must be destroyed under international supervision.
The report made clear that Iraq still has ballistic missiles and chemical
weapons, Iraqi UN ambassador Abdul Amir Al-Anbari said yesterday that he did
not think it was in possession of any biological weapons.
The United Nations is to set up a special commission to conduct on-site
inspections and to destroy or remove all the forbidden items.
Page 4 King pledges speed for evacuation Page 11
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24 Photograph US Marines in Turkey brace themselves as a
helicopter arrives to take aid to the Kurds Oil well firefighters angered by
criticism (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4312</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAF3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / US urges World Bank policy shift
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By STEPHEN FIDLER, Euromarkets Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE US is pressing the World Bank to undertake a significant shift towards
lending to the private sector in developing countries and eventually to make
loans directly to private companies without government guarantees.
The World Bank currently lends only under government guarantee and a move
away from this would mark a profound policy change and be highly
controversial.
The US believes that the Bank should develop a strong expertise in the
private sector in the 1990s or risk being left without a big role in
developing countries which are increasingly privatising large parts of the
state sector.
The pressure from the US comes as part of talks about a capital increase for
the World Bank's private sector affiliate, the International Finance
Corporation. The US has said it wants to see half the lending of the World
Bank group, including the IFC, directed to the private sector by 1995.
A US administration official, who did not want to be named, said:
'Ultimately . . . the bank itself might become a lender directly to the
private sector.' This shift could be linked to the next capital increase of
the World Bank, he said. This is due in the mid-1990s.
The IFC, which is able to lend and to make equity investments in private
sector companies, is seeking to double its Dollars 1.3bn (Pounds 733.6m)
capital. Britain and Germany, among others, support this. The US wants to
limit the rise to Dollars 750m, and Japan is among those querying whether a
doubling is necessary.
Mr Barber Conable, World Bank group president, is keen to secure a capital
increase for the IFC before he steps down in September.
The administration official said: 'We like the IFC. We think it's done a
good job, but we think it should more private sector oriented and has not
done enough in emphasising privatisation.' But the World Bank's response to
developing the private sector had not been satisfactory.
The US feels the Bank should develop its dialogue with governments over
private sector reform, but this should involve the IFC. The US is also
looking for a private sector development division to be incorporated in
every regional department of the Bank.
The Bank has experience of lending to government financial organisations
which then lend to the private sector, but it is a policy which has proved
disastrous in many countries.
The controversy will come if the US presses for direct lending to the
private sector, which will add commercial risks to the current risks taken
by the Bank.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4313</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAF2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Chief of troubled NatWest Investment Bank resigns
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE unexpected resignation was announced yesterday of Mr Howard Macdonald,
the chairman and chief executive of NatWest Investment Bank, the troubled
subsidiary of National Westminster Bank.
The sudden departure of Mr Macdonald, one of the City's highest-paid bankers
last year, comes after a warning from Lord Alexander, the NatWest chairman,
that the investment bank has two years to return a profit on its securities
business or face closure.
NatWest sought yesterday to depict Mr Macdonald's resignation as a natural
progression in the development of NWIB. But coming after only two years, it
marks a further severe blow to the bank's senior management.
Formed to take advantage of the City's Big Bang reforms in 1986, NatWest
lost its first chairman and its first chief executive, Mr Charles Villiers
and Mr Jonathan Cohen, after losses experienced in 1987. Both face criminal
charges, alongside NWIB, over the way the failure of a rights issue for Blue
Arrow, the employment group, was not disclosed to the stock market in 1987.
Their successor, Mr Terry Green, a NatWest director who ran the investment
bank for a year, was later forced to resign following a critical Department
of Trade and Industry report into the Blue Arrow affair.
Mr Macdonald, a Scot whose background was in the oil industry, was brought
in to rebuild the bank's senior management and to bring it through the
traumatic aftermath of Blue Arrow. His departure after two years appears to
leave that job incomplete.
But in a statement yesterday Lord Alexander said: 'Mr Macdonald has
completed the task for which he was appointed and he has been successful in
introducing the procedures and the senior personnel necessary for putting
NWIB on a firm footing for the future.'
Mr Macdonald is replaced as chairman by Sir Geoffrey Littler, 60, whom he
recruited from the Treasury two years ago. The new chief executive will be
Mr John Drury, a 39-year-old Australian who joined the bank last year from
Capel Court Investment Bank.
Sir Geoffrey suggested yesterday that Mr Macdonald had been looking for the
right moment to leave, after a 'wearing' two years during which he had coped
with the backlash from clients to the Blue Arrow charges, and with a slump
in the securities markets.
NWIB plunged to a Pounds 49m loss last year, because of losses in its
equities division. That brought its losses in its six years of operations to
a total of Pounds 275m. The bank has said that its securities operations
were profitable in the first quarter of this year, thanks to the upturn in
securities markets.
Mr Macdonald's income has made headlines in recent weeks, and is thought to
have caused resentment at a time when NWIB is struggling to cut costs. He
was paid Pounds 497,612 in 1990, a 60 per cent increase from 1989. Most of
the increase was because of a delayed bonus relating to 1989, rather than
being related to the bank's performance last year.
Markets 'misled' Page 11Cautious strategy Page 20
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 24
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4314</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAF1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Consolidation of counter-revolution: The policy aspects of
the careers of Burns and Middleton
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SAMUEL BRITTAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Sir Terence Burns is the first chief economic adviser to make it to Treasury
permanent secretary. He is, for that matter, the first card-carrying
economist to do so. Nevertheless, there is nothing surprising about the
changes. Sir Terence (or 'Terry', as he is universally known) has had a much
wider range of interests than previous economic advisers, who were expected
to concentrate on the short-term forecasts.
Burns was a policy strategist as well as analyst. (Indeed he was often
referred to as 'Treasury strategists' in reports of non-attributable
briefings). He was understandably more interested in his share of Treasury
administration than in the more arcane minutia of the latest journal
articles; and he was widely respected even by those who disagreed with him.
He would almost certainly have obtained the Number One position had Mrs
Thatcher still been prime minister and Mr Lawson chancellor.
Thus yesterday's announcement is a consolidation. The real revolution - or
rather counter-revolution - goes back to 1979, when Burns was appointed
chief economic adviser at the age of 35 over the heads of many establishment
economists, earning headlines like 'Maggie's most unlikely mandarin'. He was
a miner's son who had grown to distrust the mainstream Keynesian orthodoxy
for pragmatic, not political reasons.
The counter-revolution goes back even further to the mid-1970s, when Sir
Peter Middleton, as a young official, began taking seriously magnitudes like
the money supply and the public sector borrowing requirement. Mr Denis
Healey, who was then Labour chancellor, had a lot of time for Middleton's
heresies, despite his own remarks about 'punk monetarism'. Healey actually
welcomed Middleton's appointment as permanent secretary in 1983.
Nevertheless, with the advent of the Conservative government Middleton and
Burns could move more overtly to the new approach. The main sponsors of the
medium term financial strategy were Sir Geoffrey Howe and Nigel Lawson
rather than the more sceptical Mrs Thatcher.
The reaction against technical monetarism, when inflation nosedived in the
early 1980s, despite sky-high M3 numbers, posed problems for all these
people. But perhaps slightly less for Burns than for Middleton, as the
former had never really been a City-type monetarist and soon devised the
notion of a 'nominal framework' which could encompass either money supply or
exchange rate objectives.
But it left little room for the post-war idea of a government spending its
way into full employment - a notion already discarded by James Callaghan.
However, conversion did not come easily either to the Labour party or to
Conservative 'wets'. Roy Hattersley declared that he would not expect to
work with Burns if he became chancellor. The present shadow chancellor is
far too shrewd to make such statements and would in all probability be glad
to take advantage of Burns's experience.
Burns and Middleton have both been advocates of a strong and stable exchange
rate and of ERM membership for purposes of economic policy. Bu they have not
pretended to be enthusiastic Eurocrats. Unlike many other monetarists, Burns
was always sceptical of floating exchange rates and could live with a
European currency, although he probably feels more culturally drawn to the
US or even Japan than to Europe.
But they regard these ultimate matters as ones for politicians. Middleton,
indeed distanced himself from Lawson's shadowing of the D-Mark as much
because of his belief in prime ministerial decision as for more technical
reasons.
Both men share the credit for establishing a new framework which is likely
to remain whichever party is in power and whoever is chancellor. But
together with the Bank of England and most other economic analysts, they
failed to see the demand inflationary effects of the credit liberalisation
of the 1980s.
Treasury watchers will be interested to see if a new chief economic adviser
is appointed, or whether Burns prefers to advise himself. There would be a
certain cunning in keeping the position vacant until after the next
election. A Labour chancellor will then be able to appoint his own economic
adviser without the bitterness involved in replacing anyone else. A
Conservative or minority government would be able to move up Bill Robinson,
Norman Lamont's personal adviser, or Rachel Lomax, the present deputy chief
Treasury economist, effortlessly into Burns's old job.
Either way we would be back with a happy Treasury, with only the
perversities of the British labour market and outside shocks to disturb it.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4315</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAF0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Leading Article: A painful shake-out
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THERE WAS never any doubt that one of the consequences of a long period of
exceptionally high interest rates, combined with Britain's entry into the
exchange rate mechanism (ERM), would be a massive labour market shake-out.
Even so, an exceptionally dismal set of official figures yesterday,
including the sharpest monthly jump in the seasonally adjusted unemployment
figures on record, indicates that the process is proving more brutal than
many expected.
After a dramatic acceleration in unemployment in the first three months of
this year, there must now be a real risk that unemployment will top 2.5m
well before autumn and that peak unemployment in the present cycle might go
well above 3m. Yet for all the talk of a change in climate in pay
bargaining, average earnings are a long way from showing an adequate
response.
The underlying increase in average earnings is admittedly down by a full
percentage point, to 9 1/4 per cent, since its peak last July. But that
compares with an underlying inflation rate of perhaps 5 per cent by year
end, giving a real rate of increase that looks high when compared with the
prevailing norm in continental Europe. Comparisons with Germany, where the
Bundesbank worries about British-style pay claims from IG Metall, are
irrelevant: the Germans are at a different stage in a cycle that has been
freakishly affected by the shock of unification. The more interesting
yardstick is France, where the trade-off for sharply reducing inflation has
been an unemployment rate averaging more than 10 per cent since the
mid-1980s, when currency realignments went out of fashion.
Competitive disinflation
It may be that the index of average earnings is not wholly representative,
or has yet to capture the more recent signs of moderation in pay
settlements. But the annual rate of increase in underlying average earnings
over the past decade has never fallen below 7 1/2 per cent, which is one
measure of how painful convergence with French inflation rates will be. And
if part of the case for ERM entry is increased competitiveness, convergence
is not enough. The game of competitive disinflation calls for more.
The output index suggests that February's manufacturing output was back to
the level of the second quarter of 1988, which is consistent with a deep and
protracted recession. Unit costs continue to rise faster than average
earnings, pointing to a substantial loss of competitiveness. Yesterday's
unemployment figures suggest that industry now responds more quickly to such
a cold climate than in the past. Against the background of a record
corporate sector financial deficit and exceptionally high real rates of
interest, companies are seeking to restore productivity growth and profit
margins chiefly by shedding labour.
Wage settlements
This torpid adjustment to new circumstances within the ERM carries a
powerful echo of the experiment with money targetry in the early 1980s.
Despite a clear monetary signal, the labour force continues to demand pay
settlements that reflect last year's inflation instead of this year's
financial clamp. Yet the government and most employers remain hostile to any
form of national pay co-ordination.
There are, however, some modest signs that positions are beginning to
soften, most notably the interest recently shown by the Number 10 Policy
Unit in some kind of pay co-ordination. If the monthly unemployment figures
continue to shock, as did yesterday's, that interest may be less readily
stifled in future. What is required is a switch, preferably one agreed by
employers and unions without anything more than a certain amount of
government encouragement, towards forward-looking pay bargaining instead of
the present tacit backward indexation of wages. In the absence of some such
mechanism Britain will be condemned to pay a needlessly high price in
unemployment for price stability. This is one area where Mr John Major could
usefully show that radical ideas have not departed with Mrs Thatcher, even
if they would not necessarily be to the former prime minister's taste.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 22
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4316</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Arts: The Two Gentlemen of Verona - Swan Theatre,
Stratford-upon-Avon
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CLAIRE ARMITSTEAD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
The reconciliation of love with friendship presents Shakespeare with no
small problems in this ramshackle early comedy: having sent the young
Proteus off in hot and dishonest pursuit of Valentine's sweetheart, he
somehow has to ensure that harmony is restored. Yet he signally fails to
give Proteus a chance to redeem himself, which in turn creates no small
problems of characterisation.
David Thacker sets the play among a salon society, circa 1930, interspersing
the scenes with snatches of popular song from a chanteuse at the back of the
stage. There is a logic to this idiom which emerges early on through the
horseplay of the two suitors. They are public school types whose
relationship, if not overtly sexual, has a competitive closeness. Schoolboy
rough-and-tumble lingers on the brink of adult eroticism; a boy's own
complicity is almost confusable with declarations of love.
Richard Bonneville's bumptious Valentine describes his friend's infatuation
with a sneer of distaste that throws the masculinity of his imagery into
focus. It is clear that these are two romantic adventurers who are amused to
let love 'master' them. It is not, therefore, surprising, that Proteus - in
Barry Lynch's account the more naive and impressionable of the two - should
find himself duplicating his friend's affections.
The difficulty is believing that this puppy-dog of a man could have the
drive or the egotism to follow his infatuation through - or that the
slighted Julia (a gutsy Clare Holman) should so doggedly pursue him in spite
of a deviousness that involves breaking all the rules of class and
comradeship. With the same spaniel-eyed innocence, Lynch hunts out the lofty
Silvia (an icily remote Saskia Reeves) and sneaks to her father (Terence
Wilton), a Floyd-like batchelor chef who rips the claws off a lobster as he
rages at his daughter's disobedience and would - one rather imagines - do
much the same to such petty tale-tellers as Proteus. The ducal choice of
son-in-law is a stuffed shirt of overbreeding, played on a gloriously effete
monotone by Guy Henry.
Granted that class plays such a part in this milieu, there is a streak of
perversity in Thacker's decision to make servants the equals of their
employers: to wit Josette Bushell-Mingo's bottom-wiggling Lucetta, who
lounges around in easy familiarity with her mistress, Julia, making the
delivery of a love letter into a game of pert one-upwomanship.
If Thacker fails to vindicate the play as coherently motivated drama, he
makes the most of it as entertainment. Hilary Cromie's singing strikes
mellifluous counterpoints with the scenes it punctuates, and Richard Moore's
bowlerhatted Launce, intransigent hound in tow, makes more of the clowning
interludes than one could reasonably expect, finding such sense in the sole
of a shoe as is signally lacking in the two gentlemen.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4317</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Arts: Peter Grimes - Coliseum
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MAX LOPPERT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Peter Grimes returns to the company - or, more accurately, the direct
descendant of the company - that gave the work its premiere. Tim Albery's
new English National Opera production (sponsored by TSB) is a shock of the
most challenging and invigorating kind. In its way it must prove as eye- and
ear-opening as was the Royal Opera's, by Elijah Moshinsky, in 1975: a
further notable stage in the progress of a great and important 20th-century
opera.
This is not at all the Aldeburgh we know. Lines and groupings belong to
Expressionist art. The chorus gather in clumps like characters in a Grosz
cartoon, a very North European Lumpenproletariat with faces often concealed
by the lighting, then climactically revealed in shapes of twisted violence.
The colours and visual currents of the staging belong to Nolde rather than
John Piper - the back and side panels painted in simmering sweeps of
crimson, black and grey, the general dullness of hue suddenly transformed
into threatening brilliance by fine shifts of light.
Though one gains the impression that old photographs have exercised a strong
influence on the set designer, Hildegard Bechtler, the modulation of visual
realism into a non-realistic world is achieved with extraordinary, and
specifically non-English, sophistication. Sea walls are angled to the point
of caricature; poles and boat-lines seem to curve into the distance;
Grimes's hut, cut in cross-section, is like a white sea-creature perched
unnaturally on the top of a startling blue cliff. In detail, and while its
1990s modernity is pronounced in countless ways, this Grimes reminds me of
nothing so much as the old Caspar Neher-designed Wozzeck at Covent Garden.
This is intended as high praise. But even if the ENO team have been entirely
uninfluenced by that landmark British production, a larger link with Wozzeck
comes across throughout the evening. For myself, I have never before been
made so constantly aware of the impact of Berg's opera on the construction
of Britten's, or the ties of kinship between the characters of both. In
Albery's staggeringly powerful and precisely-achieved production, the opera
becomes its leading character's nightmare just as Wozzeck becomes its; and
it moves with taut dream logic between states of frozen stillness and
regimented movement.
The chorus rise up from the floor - a great theatrical coup, this - in the
Prologue. Lines of blank bodies and faces are spread across the stage during
the storm. The violence of the hunt has never seemed more menacing, more
stirred up by irrational emotion. The character of Bob Boles, often a
crypto-whimsical cartoon, seems to sum up the style: in Graeme
Matheson-Bruce's terrifying account he is angular and frightening, a
dream-figure who haunts the action.
This is the most coherent Grimes I have encountered. In it, there is a place
for the fisherman's visions and ravings, the pub crudities (Auntie and her
'nieces' - Ann Howard, Rosa Mannion, Claire Daniels - dressed like fugitives
from Mahagonny), the drably expressive poetry of the daily working round;
everything hangs together. There is a price to be paid. The romance of
moonlight and birds wheeling, of local comic exchanges and Borough gossip,
of bright Sunday morning sunshine, is pictured in the music but finds no
echo in the staging. Characters like the magistrate Swallow (John Connell,
superb), the carter Hobson (Mark Richardson), the widow Sedley (Anne
Collins), and particularly the blunt, clear-sighted Balstrode (Jonathan
Summers in magisterial form) all belong to the world of Brecht; the
neo-Romantic English cosiness of Montagu Slater's libretto is expunged.
And so, to an extent, are the folk-opera influences that were no less
pressing on Britten than that of Wozzeck. There is no Porgy warmth in this
performance, no Boris grandeur. In David Atherton's magnificently controlled
conducting, which inspires the ENO orchestra and chorus to their highest
flights of corporate artistry, the score is closely geared to the activities
on stage. This is, therefore, a Grimes full of bated-breath silences, fierce
scratches of percussion, and remarkable verbal clarity from almost all on
stage; the staccato treatment of the great 'Grimes]' choral cries is
indicative of the approach.
Is Albery's price too high to be paid? The answer must be a matter of
individual taste; for myself, the production is nothing less than
revelatory. Philip Langridge in the title role is truly its pivotal point.
Mr Langridge, wiry of frame and sharp of profile, with a lyric tenor now
capable of surprisingly powerful outburst, is never placed to ham it up in
the central spotlight; his ability to make psychological and dramatic sense
of the outsider (learnt, no doubt, from playing Laca in Jenufa) reverberates
through the performance. No tenor, not Jon Vickers, not even Peter Pears,
sings all of the music equally well; Mr Langridge has passing trouble with
the Es of the pub soliloquy, firmly dealt with.
He is as crucial to the success of this Grimes as Vickers was to
Moshinsky's. And so is Josephine Barstow: sublimely economical, her
naturally striking stage presence distilled to a rare potency, singing with
a wealth of quiet colours and poetic nuances, she 'explains' Ellen's
active-passive modes more cogently than any other I have heard or seen.
There was too much scene-change noise at the Coliseum on Wednesday; this was
the only faint flaw on one of the ENO's great evenings.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 21 Photograph Philip Langridge as Peter Grimes in Tim Albery's
new production for English National Opera (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4318</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Technology: Little engine goes to Detroit
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID FISHLOCK
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
An idea for a type of compact internal combustion engine, developed in
Britain, will be introduced later this month to the US motor industry in
Detroit. Its backers claim that the engine can deliver power from as little
as half the space required by conventional engines of this kind.
For car designers the compact engine offers improvements in aerodynamic
efficiency and a reduction in fuel consumption. Its power density is also
attractive to light aircraft designers and in mobile industrial engines.
In the mid-1970s Brian Collins, then an engineer at the Railway Institute in
Perth, Australia, wanted to simplify the four-stroke engine. He argued that
fewer parts would mean that less can go wrong.
He used a mechanism called the scotch yoke to link the piston in the engine
to the crankshaft. This replaces the usual connecting rod which moves about
a pin, causing the piston to drive the crankshaft and so the wheels. The
scotch yoke allows one end of the rod to be fixed, so the highly stressed
pin is no longer necessary.
'Collins wanted a way of putting a higher volume of engine capacity round a
single crank pin,' says Graham Mountain, technical director of the engine
project. Subsequent development in Britain has shown that the scotch yoke
can reduce engine size and weight by as much as 150lb for an eight-cylinder
engine.
In 1980 Collins formed Collins Motor Corporation (CMC) to develop the new
engine. The central feature of this engine is the strength of the yoke
itself, and its lubricating systems. It comprises a scotch yoke arrangement
with hydrodynamic slider bearings. The slider block is mounted on a
conventional crankpin bearing and therefore orbits in a circular path. The
flat sliding surfaces of the slider block bear on the sliding surfaces of
the yoke assembly, which is attached to the pistons and moves along the
cylinder axis.
Harry Close, an engineer on the board of TNT Shipping and Development, the
chief source of CMC's development funds, has become closely involved in the
problem of transferring the engine technology to the motor industry's
factories. 'We're selling a technology - and people don't really want to buy
a technology,' Close contends.
Its main rivals are high-speed versions of today's engines, and
turbo-charged engines. The design has introduced no new manufacturing
problems, but the bearing design has caused difficulties. Close has a
graveyard of broken components caused by failures in lubrication for sliders
that stop and reverse at the end of each stroke, in a design which needs a
larger bearing area than for the equivalent conventional engine.
CMC has built a family of prototype engines and even installed some in
current car models. But Close says CMC's aim will be to continue as a
technology vendor, further exploring its compact engine not only for the car
industry but also for other markets.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 19
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4319</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Parliament and Politics: Major banks on lower bills for an
escape route - The Poll Tax
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN MAJOR will attempt next week to rescue the government from the poll
tax morass by publishing comprehensive figures intended to show how the
proposed relacement will keep household bills as low as possible.
The amounts paid under the new property-based system will be set out in
consultative documents on Tuesday or Wednesday. Exemptions are expected for
the lowest-paid, marking a significant break from the principle that
everyone should pay some of the community charge. No register of individuals
will be needed for the new system.
Cabinet spent an hour yesterday fine-tuning the proposals for a tax based on
two-people in a house or flat but with reductions for one-person households.
Properties would be grouped into a number of bands, with assessments
depending on elements of both house size and capital value. The aim would be
to take account of large variations in property prices across the country.
Downing Street appeared confident that cabinet ministers originally opposed
to a return to a property tax were now 'positive' about the plans put
forward by Mr Michael Heseltine, environment secretary.
The government's package will include strict capping powers to curb high
spending local authorities.
There will be consultation on parts, but not the broad thrust, of the
proposals. Scotland and Wales will have the same framework but possibly with
some variations.
The final demise of the poll tax will raise hopes among ministers of an end
to the traumatic and politically damaging rows within the Conservative party
over alternative forms of local taxation - even though the new system will
not be in place until 1993.
By setting out 'exemplifications' for all local authorities the government
hopes voters will make favourable comparisons with other systems of local
government tax systems - particularly Labour's 'fair rates' scheme.
Mr Major also appears anxious to quash accusations of dithering by
publishing as much detail as possible ahead of the May 2 local elections.
Although approved by the cabinet, publication has been delayed over the
weekend for the compilation and printing of the sets of figures. Officials
said the accompanying documents would be 'substantial'.
A separate paper on the structure of local government will expand on
proposals already set out by Mr Heseltine for a 'rolling' system of changes,
based largely on the preferences of local electors.
These could see the widespread dismantling of county councils but the
emphasis will be on extensive consultation before decisions are reached.
Downing Street appeared anxious to avoid unnecessarily large-scale changes,
suggesting Mr Heseltine's more grandiose plans may have been trimmed.
The continuing delay over the publication of the consultative documents
again provoked attacks from Labour yesterday.
Mr Bryan Gould, the shadow environment secretary, said the government was
'still running scared'. He suggested it might leak some details selectively
over the weekend. Alternatively, 'the government is so lacking in confidence
in its decision that it chooses to keep the House of Commons and the
electorate in the dark,' Mr Gould said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11 Photograph Winning a positive response, Michael Heseltine
yesterday (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4320</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Parliament and Politics (Local Election Diary): A Utopia
united in its indignation
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVO DAWNAY
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
'Welcome to Utopia,' said Ted, the cheerful official from the Milton Keynes
Development Corporation as, outside, arctic gales struggled to uproot the
pedestrian shelters of Midsummer Boulevard.
He was not being ironic. Briefed on the city project back in 1967 by the
late Richard Crossman, Ted had decided he would prefer the 22,000 acres of
North Buckinghamshire countryside in question to stay just that.
Now, like many other early sceptics, he is a passionate convert. To most
residents, the traffic grid, the 27,000 free parking spaces, the
mirror-glassed commercial zones and the 14m planted trees dotted round
man-made lakes are the ultimate expression of rational, modern living.
If an outsider complains that the city combines the culture of canned music
with the charm of an airport terminal, Milton Keynesians will point to the
clean streets and graffiti-free housing.
Mr Chris Pym, a Liberal Democrat councillor, also defensively commends the
place as a Mecca for community activists. 'You can have a bright idea on
Monday, get the money on Wednesday, and be under way on Friday,' he says.
*****
So how will the Utopians vote? As progressive thinkers, perhaps, Milton
Keynes residents could better adjudicate between the competing claims of the
political parties to have found the true path to Britain's future.
Unfortunately, it appears not. Like the rest of us, their eyes are firmly
fixed on poll tax bills and mortgage rates. For years, the borough has
returned Mr Bill Benyon, a diligent Tory MP, but left the city council
frequently hung between the three main parties. After two years of a
Lib-Tory pact, the voters punished their political masters for the poll tax
by returning Labour with its first-ever outright majority of two seats. That
is likely to increase marginally after May 2.
But a poll tax bill - expected before capping and the budget changes to top
Pounds 450 - has upset some residents, with the Tories generating mileage
from their claim that at least Pounds 27 of this can be attributed to
non-payers.
With Milton Keynes being split into two seats at the next general election,
Mr Edward Ellis, the Tory leader, is taking the May polls philosophically.
'When there is a Labour government in Westminster the council will be
solidly Tory,' he contends. 'With a Tory government, we are hanging on by
our bootstraps.'
*****
Currently the greatest concern for the council comes as a consequence of the
winding-up of the Development Corporation, due to finish its work in March
next year.
A fierce battle has now broken out over responsibility for Milton Keynes'
parks and housing. Starved by Buckinghamshire County Council of things to
administer - even car parking is controlled by the county - all three main
parties are determined to take control of both.
But, under Whitehall guidelines, the corporation has now put responsibility
for 10,000 houses out to a tenants' ballot and plans to turn the parks into
free-standing trusts, responsible to the Charity Commission.
The borough councillors are livid, united in opposition. Without the bulk of
public housing and the parks, Mr Ellis says the city would be left only with
cleaning, recreation and community development in its hands.
No greater proof is needed of Milton Keynes' arrival at the age of majority.
Twenty-one years after the first sod was turned, Crossman's Utopian city is
united in its indignation with Whitehall.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11 Illustration (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4321</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / UK News (Employment): Women win ruling on retirement
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DIANE SUMMERS, Labour Staff
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH GAS must compensate six women pensioners who were forced to retire
at 60, the law lords ruled yesterday at the end of a five-year legal battle.
The women, who were all employed by British Gas before privatisation, took
their case to an industrial tribunal in 1986.
It dismissed their complaint of sex discrimination and the case was pursued
through the UK legal system and the European Court before returning to the
House of Lords.
Four law lords ruled unanimously yesterday that British Gas, as successor to
the state-owned corporation, should compensate the women under EC law. An
industrial tribunal will decide how much should be awarded.
The six, all compulsorily retired between December 1985 and July 1986, were
backed by Nalgo, the public-sector union.
Lord Templeman said the 1986 Sex Discrimination Act, which came into force
in November 1987 after the women retired, made different retirement ages for
men and women unlawful.
Before that, public-sector (but not private-sector) employees could rely on
a 1976 directive of the European Court guaranteeing equal treatment for men
and women in working conditions and regarding dismissal. The question in the
present case was whether the old corporation was a 'body made responsible
for providing a public service under the control of the state'.
The women's claims were originally dismissed on the grounds that the
corporation was a statutory body engaged in commercial activities and not an
agent of the state.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4322</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFTFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Parliament and Politics: Drugs money fund
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
SEIZED DRUGS money will be paid to police and customs to boost the battle
against international traffickers, Mr Kenneth Baker the home secretary
announced last night.
Assets seized under international confiscation agreements will finance a new
multi-million pound fund also available for anti-drugs education or
treatment and rehabilitation of addicts, he told the Association of Chief
Police Officers drugs conference in Preston.
The fund, due to be established in April 1992, will be in addition to
resources already devoted to combating drug misuse and trafficking.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4323</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFSFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Parliament and Politics: Farming reform call
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR JOHN GUMMER, the agriculture minister, condemned the European Community's
farming policies as 'bankrupt' yesterday and said the government would be
pressing for a swift reform of the common agricultural policy. He said the
community needed to move towards more realistic prices at a pace the
agricultural community could accept. Mr Gummer also reiterated his
disagreement with the McSharry proposals to reform the CAP.
'You cannot bribe people to stay on uneconomic plots,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4324</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFRFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Parliament and Politics: Chancellor still sure of an upturn
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVOR OWEN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR NORMAN LAMONT, the chancellor, told the Commons yesterday he was 'still
confident' of an upturn in the economy in the second half of this year,
writes Ivor Owen.
Labour MPs cited the record rise in unemployment in March, increasing to
more than 2m, as further evidence of the failure of government policy.
To cheers from his supporters Mr Neil Kinnock, the Labour leader, said Mr
John Major was 'truly the prime minister of unemployment'.
Mr Lamont, who stressed that the unemployment figures lagged behind the
general performance of the economy, refused to be drawn on the prospects for
a further reduction in interest rates.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4325</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Parliament and Politics: Kinnock accuses Tories of
'filching' policies - Party Campaigns
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RALPH ATKINS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR NEIL KINNOCK, the Labour leader, last night accused the Conservatives' of
'filching' his party's polices and protested that the Tories could not claim
to be the party both of good public services - and lower taxation, writes
Ralph Atkins.
As campaigning in the local elections intensified, Labour sought to hit back
at charges that it was a party of profligacy by attacking Mr John Major for
wanting the best of both worlds.
In a party political broadcast, Mr John Smith, the shadow chancellor, that
Britain could not afford to cut personal income taxation 'for a period of
years'. Investment had to proceed consumption.
Meanwhile the Conservative local election campaign remains low-profile -
with party officials seemingly unworried by Labour's determination to turn
the contest into an extension of the general election.
Senior MPs on the executive of the backbench 1922 committee told Mr Major
this week they would prefer an autumn election. Party managers received the
same message from a general canvass of MPs.
Tory MPs, however, used prime minsters' questions to respond to the launch
of Labour's 'opportunity Britain' policy document. They claimed the
Conservatives had created opportunities, such as in council housing, and
sought to score points over Labour's defence policy.
Speaking to Scottish trade unionists in Dundee, Mr Kinnock said the Tories
were 'filching Labour party policies on a grand scale'. He said they could
promise 'social Toryism' and 'hope that people will suspend their memories'.
Or they could promise to cut income tax to 20 per cent, 'and hope that
people will make a bonfire of their values'. They could not do both.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4326</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / UK News (Employment): Changes at Revenue urged
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Inland Revenue was urged yesterday to replace the five pay agreements
covering staff in the department with a unified grading structure as a way
of increasing opportunities for staff, writes Michael Smith.
The Inland Revenue Staff Federation said the organisation's existing
structure made it difficult for staff to move between different areas of the
department and was 'a recipe for disharmony rather than team spirit'.
The recommendation comes in a submission on proposed changes for the Revenue
which the union wants to see as part of the government's plan to create
executive agencies with more autonomy than traditional civil service
departments.
The IRSF says the existence of separate staff groups has resulted in unequal
pay and opportunities. It wants an 'open promotion' system and a review of
staff appraisal, promotion and training systems to utilise staff potential
and help raise the quality of service.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4327</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / UK News (Employment): Pay harmony plan finds unions out of
tune - The controversy over Labour's hopes for co-ordinated wage deals
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN GAPPER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE words National Economic Assessment seem anodyne enough. 'All the unions
are talking about is a close relationship with the next Labour government,
and there can be nothing controversial about that,' Mr Ron Todd, general
secretary of the Transport and General Workers' Union, told fellow union
leaders in Dundee this week.
Yet it is proving controversial, and it may become damaging if Labour and
the unions fail to tame the issue before the next general election. As so
often in TUC disputes, it revolves around the meaning of words. In this case
the question is whether the three words really mean two others: incomes
policy.
Both the TUC and the Labour party are edging towards their own definitions.
Almost nobody expresses open support for an incomes policy under Labour, the
exception being the Usdaw shop workers' union. Many argue that if an NEA
performs any function, it will be to put pressure on unions to restrain wage
demands.
The dispute has another classic TUC ingredient - a complex web of factional
interests. Although it started last year as a straightforward clash between
left and right, it has developed into a many-cornered tussle between unions
of varying political views and memberships.
There are also shades of opinion within the Labour leadership, with Mr Neil
Kinnock appearing keener than some shadow cabinet members on unions trading
wage restraint for rewards, including a high national minimum wage.
Opponents of the idea believe Mr Kinnock has been influenced by Miss
Patricia Hewitt, his former press secretary, who now leads the Institute for
Public Policy Research. This research group has published a report backing a
strong form of national economic assessment which would set an affordable
pay norm.
Partly because of the controversy so far, the idea has not been fully
defined. Both Labour's policy document this week and a paper drafted for the
TUC's economic committee envisage a two-stage annual process.
The process would start with a statement of economic prospects by the
government in the autumn, followed by an NEA in which the government, unions
and employers would discuss economic indicators including pay and
productivity. The government would decide on the level of the national
minimum wage as part of the NEA debate.
In the strongest version of the idea, this would be followed by a
synchronised pay round in which most bargaining would take place at the same
time based on the outcome of the NEA.
There is little sign that many unions would accept such a strong model.
Support for pay synchronisation has been largely confined to the GMB general
union and UCW communications workers union, and both Labour and TUC
documents instead include a much vaguer commitment to the gradual
'co-ordination' of pay.
Unions supporting a form of wage adjustments under Labour fall into two
camps. In the first are those that believe stable economic growth will be
difficult unless unions take part in a national effort to rein back
inflation. The most vocal exponents are Mr John Edmonds of the GMB and Mr
Alan Tuffin of the UCW.
The second camp includes unions representing low-paid workers who stand to
benefit most from Labour not only introducing a minimum wage, but also
deciding it can afford to increase it regularly over a number of years.
There are at least two camps of union opponents. One comprises the left-led
unions which distrust the NEA proposal and would only consider it if strong
assurances were given that it would not involve any form of wage control.
This group is led by the MSF general technical union. Other opponents, whose
hostility has been even stronger, include the right-led private-sector craft
unions which fear their highly paid members will bear the brunt of any
pressure for wage demands.
The central question for Labour and the TUC is whether they can sustain the
rather uneasy consensus established at the Scottish Trades Union Congress
this week: that unions will publicly oppose any form of wage restraint, but
will nonetheless support an annual NEA in line with Labour's policy.
This is probably a politically acceptable front for the next general
election, but Labour would have problems if hard-line opposition, which
ruled out an NEA, made progress. MSF originally tried to commit the STUC to
an attack on the idea of discussing pay norms or bargaining a national
assessment.
The move was blocked by the TGWU among others, with Mr Todd arguing that an
NEA would not mean wage restraint. He appealed for the unions not to
'conjure out of the air something we are frightened of that is not even on
the horizon.' As long as the TGWU holds this line, Labour's policy looks
secure.
A difficulty would arise if the TGWU changed its mind about what an NEA
means. It will have an opportunity to do so at its biennial delegates
conference in the summer, which falls before the Trades Union Congress in
September. There is likely to be a move by the left at the TGWU conference
to commit the union to opposing economic assessments.
The TUC voting figures would then start to look quite gloomy for Labour. The
AEU, MSF and Nalgo public service union might join the TGWU in voting
against Labour's policy and thus give a vote of more than 3m as a starting
base for NEA opponents.
Those three words are not too painfully controversial for Labour, but they
could become so.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11 Photograph (Omitted). Photograph (Omitted). Photograph Aiming
at agreement, Alan Tuffin (left), Ron Todd (centre) and John Edmonds, who
favour some pay co-ordination (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4328</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFNFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Parliament and Politics: King pledges a speedy evacuation -
Kurdish Refugees
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By IVOR OWEN, Parliamentary Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
WITH HUNDREDS of thousands of people 'on the very edge of their lives'
Britain was determined to act with the utmost speed to get the Kurdish
refugees to safe havens in northern Iraq, Mr Tom King, the defence
secretary, assured the Commons yesterday.
He told Labour backbenchers who warned the commitment of British troops
might prove no more 'temporary' than that which they undertook in Northern
Ireland more than 20 years ago that the humanitarian considerations were
overwhelming.
Mr King acknowledged: 'It would have been much safer to stay out of this
altogether.'
The disclosure by Mr David Mellor, chief secretary to the Treasury, that
contributions from other nations would largely cover the Pounds 2.5bn cost
of Britain's participation in the Gulf war fuelled further criticism from
the Labour backbenches that more resources should have been devoted to
relieving the plight of the Kurds.
He said total cash contributions made or promised by other governments,
including the most recent Dollars 1bn (Pounds 564m) pledged by Saudi Arabia,
totalled Pounds 2bn.
Mr King, who revealed that some helicopter crews who had served in the Gulf
war had returned early from leave to assist the Kurdish refugees, said it
was imperative to rescue them from the appalling climatic conditions on the
mountains on the Iraq-Turkey border.
The initial purpose was to give those close near death a chance to survive
in the havens being created as a result of the prime minister's initiative.
Mr King warned: 'There is no guarantee yet it will succeed'. He assured MPs
that the British forces protecting the Kurds in the camps to be established
for them in northern Iraq would be able to defend themselves against any
attack by the forces of President Saddam Hussein.
He said any interference would be 'very severely dealt with indeed'.
Mr King described the operation to get the Kurdish refugees down from the
mountains and into the camps as 'phase one'.
The second phase, he said, would be to secure the return of the Kurds to
their homes 'in safety and confidence'.
When urged from the Labour benches to ensure that the Kurds were given the
right of self-determination Mr King stressed that this would become an
'academic' issue unless phase one of the operation was successfully
completed.
He welcomed the memorandum of understanding signed by the Iraqi Government
earlier in the day which allowed the operation of United Nations agencies in
Iraq.
Mr Robert Cryer (Lab Bradford South) alleged that British troops about to
leave the Gulf had destroyed thousands of pounds worth of medical equipment
which could have been used for treating the Kurdish refugees.
Mr King angrily attacked Mr Cryer for not bringing the matter to his notice
earlier instead of appearing to be more interested in engaging in a
'publicity stunt'.
Mr Cryer said that he had photographic evidence to substantiate his charge,
and promised to submit it to Mr King.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4329</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / UK News (Employment): Treasury rejects arbitration over
Civil Service offer
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SMITH, Labour Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE government yesterday rejected calls for arbitration over an 8 per cent
pay offer to more than 300,000 civil servants which union leaders say breaks
the spirit of long-term agreements.
Executives of the CPSA and NUCPS unions will meet on Monday to decide their
next moves. Mr Leslie Christie, NUCPS general secretary, said his members
were increasingly angry about the offer and an industrial action ballot
would be one option considered.
Under the agreements, Civil Service settlements should normally fall within
the middle range of deals agreed among comparable workers in the private
sector during the previous year. During the past year the private sector
middle range was 8 per cent to 10 per cent.
The unions say the spirit of the agreements has been broken because most of
their members will receive 7.6 per cent in the case of the CPSA and 7.8 per
cent in the case of NUCPS. The overall figures are boosted to 8 per cent by
adjustments for a minority of staff.
The Treasury, in a letter to the unions, said that pay should be determined
by what is required to recruit, motivate and retain staff and that
recruitment and retention have improved considerably. Controlling public
spending remains central to the government's economic strategy and
arbitration is 'not appropriate'.
In pay negotiations affecting other groups of workers, the Prison Officers'
Association said it had rejected a 7.75 per cent pay offer in negotiations
with the Treasury. Further discussions are due this month.
Lloyds Group Union said its managerial members at Lloyds Bank had voted to
reject pay rises of between 3 per cent and 4 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 11
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4330</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFLFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / The Blue Arrow Trial: Markets 'misled' over rights issue
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN MASON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE markets were misled over the outcome of the 1987 Blue Arrow rights
issue, a former deputy managing director of County NatWest Securities said
at the Blue Arrow trial yesterday.
Mr Stephen Raven, a prosecution witness, said press statements by County
NatWest and Phillips &amp; Drew, the advisers to the issue, gave the impression
that all the shares had been placed in the market and so did not reflect the
true position.
He told Mr Nicholas Purnell QC, prosecuting: 'We certainly misled people
into thinking this issue had been far more of a success than it really was.'
The shares taken by CNWS and County's corporate finance division did not
amount to placing them, he said.
County NatWest, NatWest Investment Bank, UBS Phillips &amp; Drew Securities and
seven individuals all deny conspiring to mislead the markets over the Pounds
837m issue.
Mr Raven said he only learnt CNWS had acquired 31.2m shares, 4.5 per cent of
the Blue Arrow equity, on October 14 when Mr Philip Rimell, then CNWS
chairman, said P&amp;D had a similar position and both stakes were indemnified
against loss.
After the stock market crash, he raised with Mr Peter Dale, then CNWS
managing director, his concern about how the position was being maintained
following the fall in the Blue Arrow share price.
He was told not to concern himself because NatWest, the parent bank, and Mr
Thomas Frost, its chief executive, were aware of the situation, he said. Mr
Raven, a member of the Stock Exchange council, said he told Mr Dale CNWS had
to be absolutely open with the exchange about the holding.
Mr Raven said he only learnt County had another tranche of Blue Arrow shares
shortly before it announced it held a disclosable stake.
He was concerned that CNWS might be seen as acting in a concert party, but
both Mr Charles Villiers, the former chairman of County, and Miss Elizabeth
Brimelow, the former County compliance director, told him legal advice had
been taken over the move.
Mr Raven denied a suggestion from Mr Jeremy Roberts QC that he only became
concerned once he realised that there would be some 'flak' and press
attention when County announced its disclosable holding.
Mr Roberts, for Mr Jonathan Cohen, a former County chief executive, said Mr
Raven was concerned, as a Stock Exchange council member, not to be
embarrassed by this. That was not relevant, Mr Raven said. He had been
concerned only with the facts.
The trial continues today.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4331</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFKFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Record photo finish
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
CHRISTIE'S record auction price for a photograph of Dollars 132,000 (Pounds
74,074) lasted just 24 hours. On Wednesday in New York Sotheby's set a new
high of Dollars 165,000.
It was paid by a Californian private collector for a platinum print of 1925,
Roses, Mexico, taken by Tina Modotti.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4332</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFJFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Maguire hearing
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Court of Appeal will conduct a full appeal hearing into the case of
members of the Maguire family who were jailed in 1976 for running an IRA
bomb factory.
At a preliminary hearing yesterday the court announced it would not limit
argument to the discredited scientific evidence against them. The full
hearing is scheduled for May 7 and is expected to last three weeks.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4333</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFIFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Investor claims
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
INVESTORS in Robert Carter &amp; Partners, a West Midlands-based investment
manager, may claim as much as Pounds 3.5m from the Investors Compensation
Scheme (ICS).
About 180 Carter investors are thought to have claims on the scheme, which
announced yesterday that it had declared the firm to be in default under its
rules.
The ICS also announced that it had declared the London-based share dealer,
Alexander Securities, to be in default.
About 600 Alexander investors are though to have claims on the scheme as a
result, with as much as Pounds 500,000 at stake.
Both firms were registered with Fimbra, the investor protection
organisation. The scheme, since its formation in 1988, has paid Pounds 5m to
about 1,000 investors and declared 20 firms to be in default. Under the
terms of the scheme investors can claim up to Pounds 48,000.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4334</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFHFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Minister to see pension managers
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By ERIC SHORT
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR TONY NEWTON, social security secretary, has agreed to meet
representatives of 18 of Britain's largest employers on Wednesday to discuss
equal state pension ages for men and women, writes Eric Short.
The pensions managers, who had written to Mr Newton calling for action on
equalisation, met last night in Torquay, where they are attending the annual
conference of the National Association of Pension Funds.
Occupational pension schemes are required to equalise pension ages for men
and women after last year's Barber judgment in the European Court. This
judgment has resulted in confusion for company schemes as their
administrators endeavour to equalise benefits within a framework of unequal
state pension ages.
The pension managers, whose spokesman is Mr Michael Swift, head of the ICI
pensions department, believed the quick results needed could be achieved
only by a direct approach to the government.
The independent initiative by the leading companies is seen as something of
an embarrassment for the association, which has adopted a lower profile in
seeking government action.
Mr Peter Stirrup, the departing NAPF chairman, told the conference yesterday
that the association was continuing to present its case on equal pension
ages and the Barber judgment at Westminster and in Brussels.
Gas pensions ruling, Page 11
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4335</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFGFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Fall in manufacturing output gathers pace
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH, Economics Staff and KEVIN DONE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE RATE of decline in output by manufacturers appears to be increasing,
underlining concern that the recession is some way from reaching its trough.
Officials at the Central Statistical Office yesterday estimated that
seasonally adjusted output by volume fell in February at an annual rate of 9
per cent, as against the 8 per cent seen in January 1991 and in December
1990.
Since manufacturing production reached a peak a year ago, it has declined in
each subsequent month, mirroring Britain's overall economic decline. In
November last year the CSO's estimate of the year-on-year fall was 6 per
cent and in October the figure was 3 per cent.
Although manufacturing accounts for less than a quarter of overall UK
output, activity in this sector is important because many other areas of the
economy, including services, depend on it. In the three months to February,
manufacturing output fell by 2.1 per cent compared with the previous
quarter. Between January and February the reduction in output was 1.6 per
cent, the biggest fall for three years.
The reduction in factory output was partly offset by increased production by
the energy and water industries, which in the period between December and
February saw a spurt of 0.3 per cent compared with the previous quarter.
This resulted mainly from improved output by the North Sea oil sector,
sparked by an end to maintenance work and by increased demand caused by the
February cold snap.
In February energy and water output expanded by 11 per cent. However, the
rise will probably prove a statistical 'blip' which will not be sustained.
In the three months to February, output by all production industries -
including manufacturing, energy and water - fell 1.5 per cent compared with
the previous quarter.
The decline in manufacturing in recent months has affected virtually all
industries - including the food, drink and tobacco sector which for much of
last year had been relatively buoyant.
Yesterday's figures will increase interest in next month's release by the
government of the manufacturing statistics for March, which could contain
hints of an upturn.
UK car production fell by 2 per cent in March to 123,495, the first monthly
drop in output since July last year, writes Kevin Done.
Export production last month at 60,274 was 85.9 per cent higher than a year
ago, but output for the UK market fell 32.4 per cent to 63,221.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10 Photograph Output cools, figures show that the recession is
some way from reaching its trough (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4336</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFFFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / The Guinness Appeals: Role of trial judge defended
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RAYMOND HUGHES
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Guinness trial judge did not usurp the jury's task of deciding whether
Mr Ernest Saunders, the former chairman and chief executive of Guinness, and
his co-accused had acted dishonestly, the Court of Appeal was told
yesterday.
In his summing-up, Mr Justice Henry from first to last had told the jury to
look for dishonesty, said Mr John Chadwick QC, for the prosecution.
Mr Chadwick was countering defence complaints that the judge had withdrawn
from the jury charges brought under section 151 of the 1985 Companies Act
after giving the impression that offences under that section, involving
dishonesty, must have been committed.
In relation to all the charges, which included conspiracy, theft and false
accounting, the judge had emphasised that the jury had to be satisfied of
the dishonesty of each defendant in relation to each charge, Mr Chadwick
said.
Mr Saunders, Mr Anthony Parnes, a City stockbroker, and Mr Gerald Ronson,
head of the Heron group, are appealing against their convictions and
sentences.
Mr Saunders is serving five years and Mr Parnes 2 1/2 years. Mr Ronson,
released in February after serving just under half his 12-month sentence,
was also fined Pounds 5m.
Mr Chadwick contended that when Mr Justice Henry told the jury that a
Guinness share-support operation during its takeover battle for Distillers
had been unlawful, he had not prejudged the issue of whether the defendants'
involvement in it had been dishonest.
The judge had plainly said that, even though indemnities and success fees
fell foul of section 151, which prohibits a company giving financial
assistance for the purchase of its own shares, the jury had to be satisfied
there had been dishonesty, Mr Chadwick said.
The appeals continue on Monday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4337</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFEFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Halifax mortgage rate cut to 12.95%
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PHILIP COGGAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
HALIFAX Building Society, Britain's largest mortgage lender, has cut its
mortgage rate from 13.75 per cent to 12.95 per cent following the latest
base rate cut last week. The new rate will apply to existing borrowers from
May 1 and to new borrowers immediately.
The two-thirds of Halifax's 1.8m borrowers on the annual review scheme will
continue to pay 14.5 per cent until next year.
The rate of 12.95 per cent puts Halifax in line with Nationwide Anglia,
which cut its rate last Friday, but above the Woolwich which yesterday
announced a cut of 0.85 percentage points to 12.9 per cent for existing
customers from May 1. All three offer discounts for larger loans, with
Halifax charging 12.15 per cent for loans of Pounds 60,000 to Pounds 99,995
and 11.95 per cent for larger loans. Woolwich charges 12.15 per cent for
loans above Pounds 60,000.
Halifax is also to offer a customer loyalty bonus of 1 percentage point for
borrowers with a good payment record who move house and stay with the
society.
The fall in base rates has been used by societies to widen their lending
margins, which Halifax said had been driven artificially low to protect
borrowers from the full impact of high rates. When the base rate was 15 per
cent, mortgage rates were 15.4 per cent, a spread of 0.4 of a percentage
point. With a base rate of 12 per cent the spread has doubled.
Halifax has cut its savings rates by up to 1 percentage point, although its
tax exempt special savings account (Tessa) rate stays at 14 per cent.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4338</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFDFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Insurance assets down
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MARSH
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
NON-LIFE insurance companies showed a net disposal of Pounds 53m of assets
last year, compared with a net increase in assets in 1989 of Pounds 2.2bn,
according to Bank of England figures published yesterday, writes Peter
Marsh.
The disposal was mainly effected through selling securities. It was caused
largely by the need to meet claims arising from a variety of worldwide
disasters.
Unit trusts increased their assets last year by Pounds 621m, compared with
an increase in 1989 of Pounds 4.9bn.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4339</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFCFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / CBI report finds large fall in R&amp;D
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By CHARLES LEADBEATER, Industrial Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITISH INDUSTRY'S investment in research and development has fallen
markedly since 1988 in spite of strong economic growth and profits over the
past three years, according to a report sponsored by the Confederation of
British Industry and published yesterday.
The report, produced by Sciteb, the management consultancy, shows that
industry-funded R&amp;D as a proportion of the domestic product of industry has
fallen from just over 1.4 per cent in 1988 to about 1.2 per cent, compared
with 2.3 per cent for Germany and Japan.
The report shows that British-owned companies which spend more than Dollars
100m (Pounds 56m) a year on R&amp;D invest about 2.8 per cent of their sales on
R&amp;D compared with 4.5 per cent in the rest of the world. The percentage of
US patents granted to UK residents has been steadily declining, whereas the
percentage granted to Germans and Japanese has risen.
R&amp;D Short Termism? Sciteb Ltd, 3 Berkeley Sq, London W1X 5HG. Pounds 100.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4340</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFBFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Labour-market road still seeks a turning: The jobless
figures offer more than just milestones in the recession
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RACHEL JOHNSON
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
YESTERDAY'S unemployment figures offered more than just milestones in
labour-market history. With their clear message that unemployment has yet to
peak, they provided a strong antidote to hopeful talk of the recession
bottoming out.
First, the milestones: The 113,000 monthly rise (to 2.1m) in seasonally
adjusted unemployment in March was the biggest since records began 20 years
ago; it was the first time the jobless total has passed 2m since December
1988; and the Department of Employment announced the first 'significant'
drop in service-sector employment for nine years.
This corroborates the picture that started emerging at the start of the
current recession, showing the service sector in the south-east worst hit.
The latest data also confirm that the recession struck quickly. Employment
in the 15m-strong service sector grew by 86,000 in the second quarter of
last year. By the fourth quarter, this had turned into an 82,000 fall - even
bigger than the 72,000 fall in the manufacturing sector (with around 5m
employees).
Unemployment is still rising fastest in the south-east, although in Northern
Ireland - an area which had resisted the national trend of rising
unemployment - there was also an unusually big increase in March, as the
slowdown in the housing market held up spring recruitment in the
construction industry.
After the twelfth consecutive monthly rise in unemployment, however, these
regional and sectoral disparities seem less important. Unemployment is now
rising in all UK regions and in all parts of the economy.
On the basis of last month's figures alone, it appears the recession is as
deep as the one in 1980-81. The biggest monthly fall in employment in the
last recession was of 109,600, which occurred in November 1980.
As unemployment data lag behind economic activity, the question that needs
to be answered now is how much, and for how long, unemployment will continue
to rise in the light of the government's forecast - which it repeated
yesterday - that economic growth is due to return in the second half of this
year.
Earnings, unit labour costs and productivity figures published yesterday did
not offer signs of the recession lifting or of a topping out in the
unemployment rate, which rose to 7.4 per cent of the workforce from 7 per
cent in February.
Average earnings across the whole economy eased a little, by a quarter of a
percentage point, to produce an underlying increase of 9 1/4 per cent in the
year to February. This was the result of falls in the increases of average
earnings in the economy's three main sectors.
Government officials said yesterday it would be misleading to read too much
into these falls. Lower wage settlements were exerting less of an influence
than the decline in bonus payments and overtime hours as a result of the
recession.
The recession has also de-pressed production so much that wage and salary
costs per unit of output have risen to their highest level for a decade -
11.6 per cent in the three months to February. In the three months ending in
February, productivity in manufacturing was down 1.8 per cent.
'With unit labour costs well into double figures, firms will be shedding
staff rapidly to try to get them down,' said Mr Christopher Johnson,
economics adviser to Lloyds Bank.
This week's producer price data have suggested companies are so far
resisting cutting factory gate prices in order to stay in business - so the
redundancy rate is likely to rise.
The bleak labour-market figures have, for the moment, retarded hopes of the
recovery roused by the recent cuts in interest rates.
Mr Norman Lamont, the chancellor, said yesterday: 'I'm still confident we
will see the upturn in the second half of the year.' Economists are
considerably less confident.
Most forecast unemployment rising by a further 0.5m to about 2.5m by the end
of 1992. Some are more pessimistic, pointing out that in the last recession
unemployment rose for five consecutive years, and that not until GDP returns
to yearly trend growth levels of around 2 1/2 per cent to 3 per cent will
employment growth resume. They expect the total to reach 3m next year.
The Treasury said the rise in unemployment was 'very regrettable'. But it
pointed out that the rise did not necessarily mean the recession was 'still
deepening'. With one set of figures, talk of bottoming out has been
overtaken by concern that the recession has not yet reached its trough.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 10 Map (Omitted). Chart (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4341</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAFAFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Wakeham's energy policy is criticised
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JULIET SYCHRAVA
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE GOVERNMENT'S energy policy is fiercely criticised in a report on energy
efficiency issued by the Commons energy committee yesterday.
The MPs condemn the view of Mr John Wakeham, energy secretary, that energy
efficiency can be left to market forces. They urge the government to set out
a comprehensive policy on energy efficiency.
Among the report's key recommendations are: Early publication of plans for a
carbon or energy tax.
A transport tax on fuel or vehicles and a scheme to minimise private
transport and improve public transport - the committee was 'particularly
disturbed' by the government's lack of clear objectives in this sector.
Speedy introduction of tighter building regulations. Obligatory introduction
of trained energy managers at local authorities and large companies.
Intensive publicity for high-efficiency lighting and the energy-labelling of
home appliances.
The report says EC targets for cutting carbon dioxide (CO) emissions due
shortly will give the UK an important goal for energy efficiency, as cutting
energy consumption is one important way of reducing CO.
It says the government has failed to assess the cost-effectiveness of
different energy-efficiency measures.
Dismissing the energy sec-retary's objection that cost-effectiveness is an
inaccurate science, the committee insists that there is no alternative.
The government must intervene to promote energy efficiency, the MPs
continue. More important, it should not impose costs on the economy in
pursuit of cuts in CO emissions unless it has explored fully energy
efficiency alternatives.
This would rule out, for example, investing in nuclear power to reduce CO
while neglecting options such as home insulation.
Mr Simon Roberts, Friends of the Earth energy campaigner, said: 'There were
27 explicit criticisms of the government and 20 implicit criticisms. The
government will not be able to dodge this report.'
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4342</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAE9FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Code urges separation of company boards' top roles
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By RICHARD WATERS
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
A BLUEPRINT for the way company boards should be run was put forward
yesterday by the Institutional Shareholders' Committee, which represents the
UK's main institutional investors.
The ISC's proposals, contained in a statement of best practice, include the
separation of the roles of chairman and chief executive, the appointment of
strongly independent non-executive directors to company boards, and the
complete separation of executive directors from any control over the way
their remuneration is set.
Mr Mike Sandland, ISC chairman, said the statement was not intended to be
aggressive or confrontational. It had been produced because companies had
sought the views of their main shareholders. The intention was to codify
best practice, rather than produce a list of requirements for companies to
follow.
The ISC's paper rejects the idea of splitting company boards and creating
separate management and supervisory boards. All directors, whether executive
or non-executive, 'have an equal responsibility in helping to provide their
company with effective guidance and leadership', the ISC says.
However, non-executive directors are expected to take on many supervisory
functions. The ISC says that:
Compensation committees should consist entirely of non-executives. They
should determine all aspects of the salaries and other benefits of executive
directors. They should also approve directors' service contracts. 'Executive
directors should not play any part in deciding their own compensation
packages.'
During a management buy-out, non-executives should form a separate committee
and retain independent advisers. They should report to shareholders on the
value of the bid being made by the management team.
Non-executives should monitor the performance of the board as a whole and
report direct to shareholders if they are unable to resolve any
dissatisfaction.
Non-executives, says the ISC, should be independent. That is more likely if
they have not been employees of the company in recent years, have not acted
as its professional advisers and are not significant suppliers or customers.
Also, non-executives should not normally benefit from share-option or other
incentive schemes, should not be in the company pension scheme and should
not be entitled to compensation for loss of office.
The ISC adds its voice to others in recent years calling for a division
between the roles of chairman and chief executive.
Combining these jobs 'constitutes a concentration of power and can give rise
to conflicts', it says.
Company boards should appoint, monitor and - if necessary - dismiss chief
executives. That job is difficult if the chief executive is also the
chairman. Where the jobs are combined, a strong body of non-executives will
be needed, the ISC says.
The ISC also recommends that directors' service contracts should not run for
more than three years (even though, in law, they can run for up to five
years); annual reports should contain details of all types of
performance-linked pay schemes, share options, profit sharing and bonus
arrangements of directors; and a company's articles of association should
always place a 'reasonable limit' on the directors' borrowing powers.
The ISC's recommendations follow closely a statement last year from the
Association of British Insurers, one of the committee's members.
Role and Duties of Directors, ISC, 10-15 Queen Street, London EC4N 1TT.
The Hapless And The Paradox, Page 20
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4343</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAE8FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / German and Scots groups to build Skye link
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JAMES BUXTON, Scottish Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE Edinburgh-based Miller Group, in a joint venture with the German company
Dywidag, was yesterday nominated as the Scottish Office's preferred
contractor to build a bridge from Kyle of Lochalsh to Skye at a cost of
Pounds 23m.
The project will be financed by tolls levied for 25 years by a consortium
involving the contractors and Bank of America. These will be based on the
present one-way ferry charges of Pounds 4 for a car, adjusted for inflation.
The bridge will be the first privately financed toll bridge in Scotland.
Trafalgar House is completing a privately financed toll bridge across the
Thames at Dartford and one will be built by John Laing and GTM Entrepose of
France across the Severn.
Miller Group and Dywidag (whose full name is Dyckerdorff &amp; Widmann) beat
Trafalgar House and Morrison Construction in tendering to build the bridge.
They are to build a box-girder bridge made of pre-stressed concrete with a
central span of 250m, making it the largest bridge of its kind in the
northern hemisphere.
A company named Skye Bridge Tolls has been formed to oversee the financing,
construction and operation of the bridge. Bank of America, which is also
involved in the Dartford bridge, will provide finance.
Construction is expected to start next April for completion in April 1995.
As well as finalising a contract with the Scottish Office, the start depends
on parliament passing the new Roads and Street Works Bill which will allow
projects of this kind to go ahead without a separate act of parliament.
Yesterday Lord James Douglas-Hamilton, Scottish Office environment minister,
said he hoped that the tolls would compare favourably with ferry fares.
Miller Group said that opening tolls would be in line with ferry charges,
with discounts for local residents.
Mr James Miller, chairman of Miller Group, said he was confident on the
basis of traffic forecasts that the bridge would pay for itself in 25 years.
At present the ferries carry 450,000 vehicles a year.
The project, which will remove some of the magic of going by sea to Skye,
has been controversial. Although most of the 9,000 residents of the island
believe it will be better than the ferry service operated by the state-owned
Caledonian MacBrayne, which is subject to long delays in the summer, they
object to paying tolls on the proposed bridge. Opponents of the bridge fear
it will irrevocably alter life on Skye.
While the crossing by ferry to Skye takes only four minutes, it transports
visitors to the most magical, as well as the largest, island in the
Hebrides. Thousands of touristscome for the magnificent vistas of lochs,
distant islands and above all the Cuillins, perhaps the most awesome
mountains in Britain.
While the island suffers from high rainfall, which justifiesSkye's
euphemistic title of the 'misty isle', in the summer tourists swarm in
Portree, the island's capital, and the narrow roads.
The people on Skye work at crofting, fishing and farming, as well as in
hotels and tourist shops. However, an increasing number are incomers from
England and southern Scotland. Many have come to retire or escape the modern
world on the other side of the water.
The Scottish Office has said that if Skye were to obtain a toll-free bridge
in the normal course of the roads programme it would have to wait well into
the next century.
Environmentalists have said a bridge would ruin a fine view of the Hebrides
and some proposed building a tunnel. The Scottish Office rejected that idea
as too costly but the height of the bridge was lowered by five metres to 30m
in order to blend better into the scenery.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8 Map (Omitted). Photograph Road to the isles, artist's view of
the proposed bridge between the mainland and Skye (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4344</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAE7FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Policy on export credits is defended
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER MONTAGNON, World Trade Editor
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
MR MALCOLM Stephens, head of the Export Credits Guarantee Department,
intervened yesterday in the growing controversy over the government's stance
on reinsuring export credits to politically risky developing countries.
He was defending the decision by Mr Tim Sainsbury, trade minister, to block
a parliamentary amendment requiring that such reinsurance be available for
three years after the partial privatisation of the department later this
year.
He said the government was still making a 'significant' commitment to
maintain such a facility.
Had the amendment been passed, legislation would have been needed to extend
the three-year period, he told a Confederation of British Industry meeting.
The government's alternative proposal to keep the need for political-risk
cover under continuous review meant the facility would be available as long
as needed with no limit set on the level or duration of the government's
commitment, he said. Businessmen attending the meeting said they were
sceptical about his efforts to reassure them.
They said the government's commitments were vague and half-hearted. Several
added they were made less credible by the restrictive attitude ECGD has
already adopted towards new political-risk guarantees.
Mr Stephens also sought to calm exporters' fears that the private market
would be unable to provide sufficient general commercial-risk reinsurance
after privatisation. The bulk of such reinsurance commitments have already
been placed, he said.
The government would provide a top-up facility for commercial-risk
reinsurance but, in contrast to its policy on political risk, this facil-ity
would expire after three years.
In a clear indication that ECGD's tough approach on cre-dit to developing
countries was likely to continue, Mr Stephens warned against the
'conventional wisdom' that economic resurgence in Latin America meant the
debt crisis was over.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4345</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAE6FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Big trade surplus for TVs
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL SKAPINKER
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
BRITAIN'S trade surplus in colour television sets rose to a record Pounds
271m last year as UK-based manufacturers responded to depressed domestic
demand by increasing exports.
Exports of colour sets were worth Pounds 471m last year, compared with
Pounds 301m in 1989, according to the British Radio and Electronic Equipment
Manufacturers' Association. Imports fell from Pounds 243m in 1989 to Pounds
200m last year.
The increased surplus has been achieved even though there are no longer any
British-owned television manufacturers. The leading exporters are Japanese
companies which began building factories in the UK in the 1970s. Ferguson,
the last big UK-owned manufacturer of TV sets, was bought by Thomson of
France in 1987.
The manufacturers' association said home demand was depressed last year,
with UK sales of television sets falling 9 per cent to 3.4m units.
The UK's trade deficit in video cassette recorders fell slightly to Pounds
48m last year, against Pounds 49m in 1989.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 8
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4346</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAE5FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / World Trade News: EC riled by states' trade barriers in US
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID BUCHAN
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Exporters to the US face more and more trade and regulatory hurdles erected
at the state, rather than federal level, the European Commission complained
yesterday in its annual report on America's trade barriers, writes David
Buchan.
'We are searching for ways of influencing state legislation,' a Commission
official said, 'but our problem is that our diplomatic contacts are with
Washington, which tells us how little control it has over individual
states.'
The EC report stresses that shutting foreigners out of state contracts
matters because of the growing proportion of public spending by state
governments rather than the deficit-ridden federal government. It says
setting by states of fiscal, technical and environmental standards also
causes foreigners problems.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4347</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAE4FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / World Trade News: Senators urge US retaliation on patents
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A GROUP of 25 US senators yesterday urged the Bush administration to
retaliate against four countries 'that tolerate the most egregious piracy'
of patents and copyrights: Thailand, China, India and Indonesia.
Under the so-called 'Special 301' provision of the 1988 trade law, Mrs Carla
Hills, the US trade representative, must name by April 30 those which fail
to protect intellectual property rights for books, films, music and computer
software. Mrs Hills is required to seek talks with those countries, and if
they fail, she can impose trade sanctions.
Indonesia is still in engaged in talks to avoid action, but negotiations
with the other three have broken off.
The senators also demanded action against Mexico, unless it implements
commitments to improve intellectual property protection, and it requested
talks with the EC for its quotas on TV programmes.
In the past two years, Mrs Hills avoided designating any countries on the
Special 301 list; instead she published a two-tiered 'watch list' which did
not require any retaliation.
Mr Jack Valenti, chairman of the Motion Picture Export Association, said the
US must not approve any Uruguay Round agreement that leaves the EC TV quotas
intact.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4348</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAE3FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / British government accused of secretly supporting a policy
allowing mineral exploration and extraction in Antarctica
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By JOHN HUNT, Environment Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
Greenpeace, the environment pressure group, and Mr Paddy Ashdown, leader of
the Liberal Democrats, yesterday accused the British government of secretly
supporting a policy which would allow mineral exploration and extraction in
Antarctica, writes John Hunt, Environment Correspondent. Mr Ashdown wrote to
Mr John Major, the prime minister, saying he had seen the British proposal
which was circulated to other Antarctic treaty parties before their meeting
in Madrid next week, but which was not given to MPs. He said the document
showed that Britain intended actively to promote a mining regime at the
conference.
Greenpeace is pressing for the continent to become an international nature
reserve. Lord Melchett, director of Greenpeace, protested that UK policy
would mean a moratorium on mining for a fixed term, probably 20 years, to be
followed by a minerals agreement.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4349</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAE2FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Mining ban splits Antarctica's guardians: Treaty nations
differ on how long to protect white continent
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By LESLIE CRAWFORD
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
THE 39 signatories of the Antarctic Treaty System are set to lock horns
again over the contentious issue of mining in the white continent when they
meet for an environmental conference in Madrid on Monday.
The guardians of the Antarctic have so far failed to draw up a new set of
environmental safeguards for the last great wilderness on earth because they
cannot agree on whether to ban mining forever or to allow the exploitation
of Antarctica's hidden oil and mineral riches sometime in the future.
The debate has been sharpened by the legacy of the Gulf War - 800 oil wells
on fire or gushing out of control in Kuwait. Supporters of regulated mining
in the Antarctic believe the struggle for control over the world's oil
resources will intensify. They argue that the Antarctic Treaty would be
planting the seeds of an international crisis if it were to deny the world
access to its estimated 45m barrels of oil.
Environmentalists argue with equal conviction that disasters will only be
averted from the white continent if mineral exploration is never allowed to
take place.
The question has split the Antarctic Treaty nations into two. But after the
deadlock that frustrated all progress at a three-week meeting in Chile last
November, there are signs that hardliners on both sides are shifting ground.
Britain last month dropped its defence of a defunct minerals convention that
sought to regulate mining in Antarctica. Its isolation had become clear at
the Chile conference and, in March, Mr Tristan Garel-Jones, the UK foreign
office minister, said Britain would propose a mining moratorium in an
attempt to forge a consensus at the Madrid meeting.
At the other side of the spectrum, a group led by Australia, France, Belgium
and Italy are still - officially, at least - campaigning for an outright
prohibition.
'Australia will not support a moratorium because it implies that mining will
almost inevitably take place after the prescribed period of time has
elapsed,' an Australian official said in Canberra this month.
Australia's position appears to leave little room for manoeuvre, let alone
negotiations. However, some delegations believe the group led by Australia
may agree to discuss a moratorium of 50 years or more.
The quarrelling parties know that failure to reach a compromise solution
would strike at the very heart of the Antarctic Treaty System, which has
been held as a model of international co-operation since its inception in
1961.
The treaty established the world's first international peace zone and froze
all territorial claims. Military installations, nuclear tests and the
dumping of radioactive wastes are forbidden. Scientific research promoted by
the treaty has helped unravel some of the secrets of the world's climate.
The ozone hole was first detected over the Antarctic, and now key work is
being done on the 'greenhouse effect' of global warming.
Mr Curtis Bohlen, who will be heading the US delegation to Madrid, recently
told Congress that 'although the parties remain far apart on the minerals
issue, there appears to be a universal determination to find a workable
compromise in Madrid'.
There was broad agreement, he said, on stricter environmental safeguards for
scientific work, on the need to regulate tourism and limit the proliferation
of research bases on the continent. These number more than 40, and
Greenpeace, the environmental pressure group, frequently denounces their lax
environmental standards.
If some form of mining moratorium is agreed at the Madrid meeting, the
debate will almost inevitably shift to what happens after the ban expires.
Countries such as Australia and New Zealand are expected to campaign
strongly for an open-ended moratorium which could only be terminated if all
contracting parties agreed. This would establish a de facto permanent ban as
any one nation would have the power to veto a mining regime.
Chile, whose position is close to Britain's, will seek to reverse the tables
by arguing that an extension to the moratorium should require the approval
of all parties.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6 Photograph One of several British bases on Signy Island in the
last great wilderness on earth (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4350</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAE1FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Sharp fall in US trade deficit for February
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   WASHINGTON
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE US trade deficit fell sharply in February to a seasonally adjusted
Dollars 5.3bn (Pounds 2.96bn), the lowest since September 1983, the Commerce
Department reported yesterday. The fall was due to a cut in the bill for oil
imports coupled with the effects of domestic recession.
February's figure compares with Dollars 7.2bn in January and a monthly
average of Dollars 8.4bn in 1990.
If the improvement is sustained, the trade figures for 1991 are likely to
show a marked improvement on recent years. The merchandise trade deficit has
exceeded Dollars 100bn every year since 1984.
A separate report showed a sharp drop in weekly claims for unemployment
insurance. This was interpreted by financial markets as a sign that the rate
of decline of employment is beginning to bottom out. Bond prices fell
sharply yesterday as traders postponed hopes of further cuts in interest
rates.
Mr Robert Mosbacher, commerce secretary, said the lower trade deficit
reflected a long-term trend toward improved export performance. Exports fell
2 1/2 per cent between January and February to Dollars 33.5bn, but remained
6 per cent higher than in the same period last year.
Exports remain a source of relative buoyancy for the US economy but their
rate of growth has fallen steadily in the past two years as demand overseas
has eased.
The fall in February's trade deficit was mainly caused by a 6 1/2 per cent
decline in imports from January to Dollars 38.8bn, roughly the same level as
a year ago. Two thirds of it reflected a Dollars 1.1bn drop in the crude oil
import bill to Dollars 2.8bn.
Oil imports were lower partly because of a recession-induced fall in demand
for petroleum and partly because the average price paid per barrel fell by
Dollars 4.40 to just over Dollars 18.
The non-petroleum trade deficit - a guide to the underlying trade balance -
is continuing to improve. It fell to Dollars 2.5bn, compared with Dollars
2.8bn in January and a monthly average of Dollars 3.9bn last year.
Initial claims for state unemployment insurance fell 22,000 to a seasonally
adjusted 451,000 in the week to April 6. This followed a 70,000 decline the
previous week which some analysts had attributed to distortions caused by
the timing of Easter.
If the trend is sustained, economists are likely to revise down forecasts of
further drops in employment. The Federal Reserve will also be less inclined
to cut interest rates.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4351</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAE0FT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Bush education initiative seeks national testing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL PROWSE
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
PRESIDENT George Bush yesterday unveiled plans for a national voluntary
system of examinations as part of an ambitious strategy for raising the
quality of American education, writes Michael Prowse.
Mr Bush said his 'America 2000 Strategy', which builds on educational goals
agreed jointly with state governors in 1989, would create a 'new generation
of schools' for tomorrow's students while making existing schools 'better
and more accountable'.
The 34-page blueprint devised by Mr Lamar Alexander, education secretary,
contains 'bold, complex and long-range' reforms that will require change in
every American community and home.
The most controversial element is likely to be a voluntary national
examination system, called American Achievement Tests, which will lay down
requirements in the core subjects of English, mathematics, science, history
and geography. National and state report cards will help parents monitor
their children's achievement.
The plan also envisages the creation of a business financed non-profit
organisation - the New American Schools Development Corperation - that would
award contracts for the development of non-traditional types of school.
Research and development teams could include companies, universities,
think-tanks, management consultants and others. There will be limited
federal support for the start up costs of 535 new-style schools.
New incentives to encourage choice in education are also a main plank of the
new strategy. The administration wants states and localities to give parents
greater freedom to choose schools. It proposes restructuring federal
assistance for disadvantaged pupils so that cash follows students to the
school of their choice.
The administration also intends to boost vocational education by encouraging
business and labour to devise job-related skill standards and 'skill
certificates'. But industry standards will be voluntary.
The proposals for national tests are likely to attract the most vocal
opposition. States and localities, which have primary responsibility for
education, have jealously guarded their independence in the past.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 6
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4352</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAEZFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Baghdad and UN sign accord to aid Kurd refugees
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS, UN Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IRAQ and the United Nations yesterday agreed on a plan to care for Kurdish
and other refugees and displaced persons in the country through the
establishment of UN-run 'humanitarian centres'.
The accord, disclosed in a 21-point memorandum signed by Mr Ahmed Hussein,
Baghdad's new foreign minister, and Prince Sadruddin Aga Khan, the official
in charge of UN humanitarian aid for the region, appeared to create a
potential policy conflict between the world body and the main Western
powers.
Independently of the UN, US, British and French troops are to be deployed in
northern Iraq over Baghdad's objections to feed, shelter and defend the
Kurds fearing Iraqi military reprisals.
The agreement reached grew out of an Iraqi offer to discuss the problem with
UN officials after the Security Council condemned the repressive measures
against Kurds and Shias and called for immediate access to the country for
international relief efforts.
Iraq rejected the resolution and reaffirmed that position in the accord,
which also stressed its sovereignty and the need for non-interference in
Iraqi internal affairs.
However, the government welcomed UN efforts to promote 'the voluntary return
home' of displaced persons and to take humanitarian measures to avert new
outflows of refugees. UN humanitarian centres will be set up wherever needed
and be run by international civilian staff, including the Red Cross and Red
Crescent, with the help also of the Iraqi Red Crescent Society. As well as
providing humanitarian aid, foreign officials will monitor the overall
situation.
'Routes of return' will be set up to ensure safe travel for groups of
refugees returning home, under UN protection.
Provision is made for United Nations aid to be airlifted. Iraqi military and
government officials are committed to facilitate the safe passage of
emergency relief throughout the country.
The government undertakes to help establish UN sub-offices to back-up the
main centres in Iraqi towns.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4353</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAEYFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Iraq provides list of ballistic and chemical weapons arsenal
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By MICHAEL LITTLEJOHNS, UN Correspondent
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   NEW YORK
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
IRAQ last night met the first of the deadlines set in a timetable imposed by
the UN Security Council in the ceasefire resolution, submitting details
about the locations, amounts and types of the most dangerous weapons in its
arsenal that must be destroyed under international supervision.
The report made clear that Iraq still has ballistic missiles and chemical
weapons, Iraqi UN ambassador Abdul Amir Al-Anbari said. He did not think it
had any biological weapons.
Mr Anbari was unable to give details of the types and numbers of weapons.
UN officials said the 15-page report, in Arabic, was being translated into
the other official languages and it was uncertain if or when it would be
published.
Mr al-Anbari told reporters the information supplied was 'very thorough and
detailed'. He confirmed Baghdad's agreement to accept international
oversight when the material - chemical and biological weapons and Scud and
other ballistic missiles - is destroyed.
The Iraqi government was required to deliver details at the same time - 15
days after ceasefire terms were approved - to the International Atomic
Energy Agency in Vienna about any nuclear weapons material in its
possession.
Reuter reported that Iraqi Foreign Minister Ahmed Hussein assured the agency
his country had no nuclear weapons or material usable for such weapons.
It knew of no subsystems or components related to nuclear weapons
manufacture and had no research and development facilities related to the
production of nuclear weapons.
The extent of compliance with the resolution is expected to influence the
council's sanctions committee when it considers an Iraqi request for
permission to sell more than Dollars 942m (Pounds 526m) of oil in order to
obtain funds to purchase food and goods to meet the ravaged country's basic
humanitarian needs.
Granting that request would require relaxing the mandatory trade embargo
imposed last August. The committee was expected to meet on the matter later
yesterday.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4354</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAEXFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Kurdish refugees wait for distribution of food
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
A little girl cradles several loaves of bread as she watches the slow queue
of Kurdish refugees waiting for the distribution of food at a camp near
Silopi in south east Turkey not far from the Iraqi border
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4 Photograph (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4355</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAEWFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / US seeks to block escape from peace process: Another round
of Mideast diplomacy
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HUGH CARNEGY and TONY WALKER
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JERUSALEM, CAIRO
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
MR James Baker, the US secretary of state, opens his third round of shuttle
diplomacy in less than six weeks in Jerusalem today, hoping to convert into
reality vague agreements from Israel and its Arab adversaries to hold a
peace conference.
Mr Baker clearly feels that his best chance of exploiting the 'window of
opportunity' he believes was opened by the victory of the US alliance in the
Gulf war is to generate a momentum which carries along all the parties and
allows as little room as possible for any one to wriggle out.
But will it work? There is still deep scepticism on both the Arab and the
Israeli sides, where examples of past failed attempts by US secretaries of
state, from William Rogers to George Shultz, are frequently cited. Both
sides continue to demand that the burden of concessions must fall on the
other.
Arabs express exasperation and anger over the policies of Mr Yitzhak
Shamir's hardline Israeli government - especially recent provocative moves
to expand Jewish settlement of the occupied territories. 'Unless the United
States is prepared to pressure Israel, there is no hope,' says Mr Mahmoud
Riad, a former secretary general of the Arab League. From Israel's point of
view, it is Arab states such as Syria and Saudi Arabia that must give first,
by formally recognising Israel.
'All they have to give is words. We have to give quality assets, the
territory, so people are suspicious,' says Mr Arye Na'or, a former cabinet
secretary to ex-prime minister Menachem Begin.
Against this familiar background of mutual suspicion, Mr Baker is promoting
the idea of a regional conference, under US/Soviet auspices, as a symbolic
opening to a series of substantive bilateral negotiations between Israel and
Arab countries. Parallel talks would take place to deal with the Palestinian
issue.
Israel, happy that the US has adopted the 'two track' approach to bilateral
relations and the Palestinian problem it always favoured, has accepted this
formula - with the important caveat that no disputes in the bilateral
negotiations could be referred back to the full conference where it fears an
Arab majority.
Saudi Arabia and Egypt, the most pro-western of the Arab states, are
prepared to go along with the regional conference proposal. Syria, the more
radical Arab states, and the Palestine Liberation Organisation have not shut
the door. But none are enthusiastic. They want the EC involved - which
Israel does not - and they want the full conference to have powers to ensure
the implementation of decisions taken. Above all, they want the UN to be
involved and the conference to be held on the basis of UN resolutions 242
and 338.
The resolutions call for Israeli withdrawal from occupied Arab lands,
matched by a guarantee of security for all states. This is the basis for the
'land for peace' formula now demanded of Israel by the Arabs, the US and
most of the international community.
Ironically, when resolution 242 was originally passed in 1967 Syria and the
PLO objected, while Israel accepted. Now Israel's position has shifted to
the extent that it will not accept 242 and 338 as dictating a 'land for
peace' settlement to any peace conference.
Mr Shamir is prepared to offer Palestinian autonomy in the West Bank and
Gaza Strip for an interim period, with the prospect of later talks on a
final settlement. But so far he has flatly refused to countenance
relinquishing Israeli sovereignty over the West Bank and Gaza, and has also
said Israel will not give up the Golan Heights to Syria.
'Mr Shamir,' says Mr Na'or, 'is not going to trade off the territories. He
is really ideologically committed to them.' Mr Baker also has to deal with
the vexed issue of Palestinian representation at any talks. The PLO is
highly dubious about the US initiative. It fears the US is seeking to
exclude it from the peace process - as Mr Shamir loudly demands.
'The US seems to be giving way to the Israeli view completely,' said Mr
Jamil Hilal, a PLO spokesman at the organisation's headquarters in Tunis.
But it is willing to play along up to a point in the hope that the process
may provide a pretext for the organisation to escape from the isolation
caused by its support for Iraq in the Gulf crisis.
Mr Baker is working on forming a Palestinian delegation from the West Bank
and Gaza where senior figures show signs of near desperation for any talks
which offer at least some chance of relief from Israel's unrelenting
oppression.
Mr Radwan Abu Ayyash, a prominent pro-PLO leader just released from five
months in jail, said there was a danger the Palestinians would be 'left in
the fridge. If something is cooking, we must be in the kitchen.'
Both local Palestinians and the PLO in Tunis agree that, while a local
delegation would not overtly carry a PLO label, it must clearly have a
mandate from Tunis. 'We want to make Mr Baker realise the address is Tunis,'
said Mr Hilal.
The US secretary of state is almost certainly ready to go along with this.
But, again, Mr Shamir has made repeated statements that any Palestinian
delegation which claimed to represent the PLO would be unacceptable to
Israel. So far, Mr Baker has sought to sidestep such potential landmines in
the interests of keeping the momentum going.
Most notably he has refused to react - at least in public - against a series
of recent moves on Jewish settlements which have enraged the Arabs.
On his latest shuttle trip, which will include Jordan for the first time, he
is likely to encounter a stiffer reaction on such issues from the Arab side,
which sees them as 'confidence-destroying' steps, not the
confidence-building Mr Baker has called for.
There is no doubt Mr Baker is playing against the odds. But there is also no
doubt that he and President Bush, with the Gulf war and a wealth of previous
experience behind them, command a good deal of respect from all parties.
It may just be that reluctance to say 'no' to them can be exploited by Mr
Baker to keep the window of opportunity open.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4356</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAEVFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Danes may block end of sanctions
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By HILARY BARNES
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   COPENHAGEN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
Danish opposition parties are set to force Prime Minister Poul Schluter's
centre-right minority government to block a decision by the European
Community to lift the remaining trade restrictions on South Africa, Hilary
Barnes writes from Copenhagen.
The move is aimed as a snub to South Africa's President F W de Klerk, who is
due to pay a one-day visit to Denmark next week.
Mr Schluter's minority government of the Conservative and Liberal parties is
backed by only 69 MPs in the 179-seat assembly. A coalition of the Social
Democratic party, the Socialist People's party and the Radicals, a small
centre party, with a total of 91 seats, has emerged to block government
policy on the embargo issue.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4357</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAEUFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / De Klerk initiative to end violence
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PATTI WALDMEIR and MICHAEL HOLMAN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   JOHANNESBURG
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE South African government is to set up a permanent commission of inquiry
into the violence which has left more than 5,000 people dead in the past
four years, and will convene a two-day summit of political and other leaders
next month to seek a formula for peace.
The moves were announced by President F W de Klerk on the eve of his
departure for a three-nation European tour and may go some way towards
meeting the demands of the African National Congress. The ANC has threatened
to boycott talks on a new constitution unless Pretoria takes further steps
to halt violence and prevent alleged involvement by the security forces.
Earlier this week, Mr Nelson Mandela, the ANC deputy president, rejected
planned multi-party talks on violence, but the announcement of a commission
of inquiry might persuade him to change his mind.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4358</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAETFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Amnesty urges end to Kuwait killing
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By VICTOR MALLET
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
AMNESTY International has called on Sheikh Jaber al-Sabah, the reclusive
Emir of Kuwait, to intervene personally to put a stop to arbitrary killings,
arrests and torture in the country since the Iraqi forces were driven out in
February.
In a report published today, the human rights group said scores of people
had been killed and many brutally tortured by the Kuwaiti armed forces and
self-styled resistance groups since February 26.
Most of those suffering persecutionhave been Palestinians suspected of
collaborating with Iraq during its seven-month occupation. 'Victims have
been gunned down in public or taken away, tortured and killed in secret,'
Amnesty said.
The organisation's fact-finding team reported that hundreds had been
arrested and many people had apparently disappeared. Detainees said at least
seven prisoners had died in custody after torture.
'These violations are continuing and appear to be largely unchecked,'
Amnesty said. 'Their scale and persistence threaten to leave an indelible
stain on Kuwait's human rights record. This is all the more lamentable in
the light of hopes that the kind of violations that occurred under the Iraqi
occupation would be a thing of the past.'
Most abuses immediately after the defeat of Iraq were carried out by
'resistance' squads, Amnesty said, but armed forces personnel were cited in
later cases.
Torture methods included the use of electric shocks, burning with cigarettes
and acid, biting and threats of execution and sexual assault.
Amnesty withdrew allegations that the Iraqis had killed large numbers of
premature babies by removing them from incubators, because of lack of
evidence, but it said the overall picture of serious Iraqi human rights
abuses during the occupation was correct.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4359</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAESFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Taiwan government gives way on points of democratic reform
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By PETER WICKENDEN
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   TAIPEI
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
FACED with a 17,000-strong street demonstration in central Taipei that
threatened to become violent and protracted, Taiwan's ruling Kuomintang
(Nationalist party) yesterday gave way to the opposition on crucial points
of democratic reform.
The island's Kuomintang-dominated National Assembly is currently meeting to
end a state of war that it has maintained against Peking since 1949.
Although it has long since been merely a war of words with the communists
who threw them out from the mainland, the Nationalists have kept Taiwan
under a form of emergency rule that suspended the constitution and precluded
full democracy.
After leading a night-long, 10km march through central Taipei accompanied by
an estimated 15,000 riot police, Democratic Progressive party leaders called
off the protest when the Kuomintang agreed to consider revising parts of its
proposed amendments to the constitution.
Under the Kuomintang's original plan, the powerful and furtive National
Security Council, which oversees intelligence activities, and two other
agencies under it that were set up to deal with subversive activities, would
retain their present status, outside the control of parliament and under the
direct supervision of the president.
The National Security Council was set up originally to counter the communist
threat. Opposition politicians say they fear that as the Kuomintang pursues
rapprochement with the Chinese communists, with a view eventually to
reuniting Taiwan with the mainland, these agencies would increasingly become
tools for suppressing the outlawed Taiwanese independence movement, from
which the DPP derives considerable support.
Under a consensus reached by the two parties in the early hours, the legal
status of these three bodies could not be fixed before a completely new
locally-elected National Assembly meets to amend the constitution further in
1992.
The present National Assembly is dominated by ancient Kuomintang cadres
elected in mainland China when the Nationalists were still in control there
more than 40 years ago. Under the continuing state of 'war', they have been
frozen in office indefinitely. Despite their age they are now being
empowered by the Kuomintang to make initial changes to the constitution, in
which the state of war has been enshrined.
The old mainland cadres are supposed to scrap the emergency war clauses,
thus ending their own marathon tenure, and retire by the end of the year. A
new assembly will then be elected from the people of Taiwan, plus a few from
overseas Chinese groups. The Kuomintang yesterday also accepted the DPP's
demand that any recalcitrant seniors be forced to step down by the year's
end.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4360</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAERFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Iran returns Saddam to hate list after experiment with
politeness
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By SCHEHERAZADE DANESHKHU
</BYLINE>
<TEXT>
SADDAM Hussein has changed from a president into a wolf in the Iranian
lexicon.
The restrained politeness accorded to the Iraqi leader last year by Iran
after he capitulated to Iran's main demands to end the Iran-Iraq war has
been all but abandoned, signalling a return to the friction that
traditionally characterises relations between the two.
The careful neutrality that Iran nurtured while the American-led coalition
was bombing Iraq has turned into scantily-veiled calls for President Saddam
Hussein's overthrow. Last month, President Hashemi-Rafsanjani called on the
Iraqi leadership to 'submit to the will of the people'.
Tehran has diverted its attention from calls on the multinational forces to
withdraw and allow countries of the regions to solve their own problems, to
increasingly identifying President Saddam as the root of these problems.
Ayatollah Ali Khamenei, Iran's spiritual leader, has called Saddam an
incompetent ruler who brought ruin upon himself and his country through his
Kuwait adventure, while Ayatollah Mohammad Yazdi, the head of the judiciary,
has said that Saddam must be tried as a war criminal.
The shift is a measure of the success of Mr Saddam Hussein's internal
security forces in crushing internal unrest, staged mostly by the
discontented Shia population in the south and the Sunni Kurds in the north.
Iran was careful not to appear too supportive of the Iraqi opposition
coalition - which includes the Shia groups - at the beginning of the
uprising, but has been sorely disappointed that the chance to remove Mr
Saddam is rapidly fading.
For its part, unnerved by the revolts and anxious to blame them on a foreign
enemy, Iraq has abandoned its own caution towards Iran, accusing it of
fomenting trouble in the south by sending in saboteurs across the border -
charges which Iran denies.
However, Iran's news agency has been giving extensive coverage to the
disturbances in Iraq, reporting successes which Baghdad claims are
exaggerated.
A new radio station, the Voice of the Islamic Republic in Iraq, began
broadcasting material hostile to President Saddam, from its base in Iran
less than four weeks ago. Tehran is also home to the main Shia opposition
group, the Supreme Council of the Islamic Republic in Iraq, headed by
Ayatollah Mohammad Baqr al-Hakim.
Both countries have accused the other of violating the 1988 ceasefire
agreement. In a move ominously reminiscent of the situation before Iraqi
troops invaded Iran in September 1980, Iraq sent a letter of protest to Mr
Javier Perez de Cuellar, the UN secretary general, on Sunday, listing
Iranian attacks on Iraqi positions on its side of the border.
Iran has also firmly ruled out a return of Iraqi aircraft which flew to Iran
during the height of US military operations. This week, Dr Ali Akbar
Velayati, Iran's foreign minister, denied that Iran was holding 148 aircraft
as Iraq maintained and said it only had 22 - a claim that has mystified
Western military analysts, who also support the higher figure.
Mr Hassan Ebrahim Habibi, the Iranian first vice-president, denied last
month that Iran was considering holding on to the aircraft as war
reparations. 'The damage inflicted on Iran during the eight-year war is so
huge that a few second-hand and wrecked planes cannot compensate even one
thousandth of it,' he said.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 4
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4361</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAEQFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / SPD threatens to block corporate tax reductions
</HEADLINE>
<TEXT>
MR BJORN ENGHOLM, chairman-designate of the German opposition Social
Democrats, yesterday promised that his party would veto government plans for
lower company taxes if the SPD won control of the upper house of parliament
in Sunday's regional elections, write David Marsh and David Goodhart in
Bonn. He also firmly ruled out any question of a 'grand coalition' with
Chancellor Helmut Kohl's Christian Democrats (CDU), saying the SPD was not
prepared to act as a 'lifebuoy' to help the government weather its problems.
Mr Engholm, due to be confirmed as the new SPD chairman at the Bremen party
conference next month, said he would not support government proposals for a
wider international role for the army.
He rejected as 'out of the question' Mr Kohl's suggestion that the
Bundeswehr might be deployed outside Nato under the auspices of the
nine-nation Western European Union. The government would need some SPD
support in the Bundestag (lower house) to change the constitution in order
to make this possible.
In an interview before the elections in Rhineland-Palatinate, where the SPD
has a good chance of dislodging the CDU from 44 years in power, Mr Engholm
condemned the government's plans to abolish property taxes in the next few
years. Speaking to the FT and three other European newspapers, he said it
was 'the greatest madness anyone can think of' to propose ending this tax on
companies and high-earners at a time of great economic hardship in east
Germany.
A victory in Rhineland-Palatinate would give the SPD a majority in the
Bundesrat, the federal council grouping representatives from the federal
states. The party would thus have power to block important laws, including
tax changes.
Mr Engholm said that if it won Sunday's elections, the SPD would use its
power in the upper chamber responsibly. But the suggested elimination of
property taxes - which bring in DM6.3bn (Pounds 2.1bn) a year - numbered
among 'a few central questions where we will allow the government to go to
the edge and then say, 'That's the end'.'
Mr Engholm's promise of confrontation with the government over taxation
comes as hopes of consensus between Mr Kohl and the opposition over
rebuilding the economy in east Germany have faded.
Observer, Page 22
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4362</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAEPFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / States resist Pohl plan to slim Bundesbank
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID MARSH
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
A SIMMERING dispute over the future of the German Bundesbank flared up
yesterday when reform proposals from Mr Karl Otto Pohl, the central bank
president, came under unusual direct attack from two regional Bundesbank
board members.
The outcome of the row, which is over Mr Pohl's wish to slim the bank's
unwieldy decision-making apparatus by closing some regional central banks,
will have an impact on Germany's policies regarding European monetary union.
The desire of German federal states (Lander) to maintain some influence over
domestic monetary policy indicates the scale of political misgivings about
eventually giving up currency sovereignty to a European central bank.
Mr Heinrich Schreiner and Mr Norbert Kloten, the presidents of the
Rhineland-Palatinate and Baden-Wurttemberg central banks, criticised Mr
Pohl's plans in separate newspaper articles in what Bundesbank officials
said was an increasingly evident spirit of 'rebellion' within the ranks of
the 18-man policy-making Bundesbank council.
The council decides the main elements of German monetary policy, above all
changes in the discount and Lombard rates. It groups 11 regional central
bank presidents and seven Frankfurt-based directorate members.
The council has been divided for several months over Mr Pohl's proposals to
cut the number of regional central banks to eight in united Germany from the
present 11 in west Germany. The restructuring, requiring new legislation by
October, results from unification with east Germany.
Increasing the uncertainty, Bonn has so far failed to decide whether to
support Mr Pohl's streamlining plans or to support Lander proposals to set
up five new central banks for the east German states.
A government official said Mr Kohl would have to make a decision, after
talks with Mr Theo Waigel, the finance minister, in the next four or five
weeks. 'This is a considerable problem - there is a conflict between the
Bundesbank and the Bundesrat (the upper house of parliament representing the
federal states),' the official said.
Mr Schreiner, the president of the Rhineland-Palatinate's central bank,
suggested in an article in the economic daily Handelsblatt that the smaller
central bank council favoured by Mr Pohl and other directorate members would
increase the Bundesbank's susceptibility to political pressure.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4363</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAEOFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Treuhand to give buy-outs a boost
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By DAVID GOODHART
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   BONN
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
THE TREUHAND wants to promote more management buy-outs in east Germany. They
have accounted for only 5 per cent of the 1,261 industrial companies already
privatised, according to Mrs Birgit Breuel, the privatisation agency's new
president. Foreign sales have accounted for another 5 per cent, with 90 per
cent going to west German companies.
Management buy-outs are expected to be a theme when the newly formed
Managers Association (East) meets Mrs Breuel next month.
However, she made clear yesterday, at a news conference to open the
Berlin-based Treuhand's new Bonn office, that the inadequacies of east
German managers were one of the main obstacles to corporate restructuring.
'We have so far received relatively few workable business plans from those
companies applying for restructuring money,' she said, adding that companies
which expected to get money regardless of the quality of their proposals had
better think again.
Providing the most detailed breakdown so far of Treuhand sales, Mrs Breuel
said that 40 per cent were in the capital goods and motors sector, 30 per
cent in food and drink, 17 per cent electronics and scientific instruments
and 12 per cent chemicals and rubber.
These sales, together with those of the large retail chains, most newspapers
and 200 hotels, had secured half a million jobs, said Mrs Breuel.
For those 7,000-plus companies that remain in Treuhand ownership, the
organisation has more 2,000 outstanding offers. Several key assets have been
given to the east German states: the Meissen china company and the Leipzig
Fair to Saxony, and Carl Zeiss Jena to Thuringia.
Only 333 companies, involving about 90,000 jobs, have been closed by the
Treuhand but Mrs Breuel said fewer closures would be required than
originally feared. She also said that 'privatisation or restructuring' was a
false antithesis and that both would be promoted where appropriate.
About 1,000 of the 8,000 companies which received the original DM30bn in
short-term credit guarantees were no longer in a position to repay their
loans, she said. The Treuhand would continue to pay interest until the end
of the year even on credits that could be repaid and would continue to pay
interest on the DM100bn in corporate debts inherited from the old regime. Mr
Klaus Schucht has just been appointed to the Treuhand executive. He is a
Social Democrat with good trade union connections and has been spokesman of
Ruhrkohle Westfalen, one of Germany's biggest coal companies.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4364</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAENFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Bank of Crete defendant dies
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KERIN HOPE
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   ATHENS
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
GREECE'S former deputy prime minister, Mr Agamemnon Koutsogiorgas, a
defendant in the Bank of Crete embezzlement trial, died in hospital
yesterday, eight days after suffering a stroke while questioning a witness,
writes Kerin Hope in Athens.
Mr Koutsogiorgas, who was 69, was accused of accepting a Dollars 2m bribe
from the bank's owner in 1988 in return for introducing legislation on bank
secrecy. The trial, adjourned after Mr Koutsogiorgas collapsed in the
courtroom, can now continue. But without his testimony, it appears
increasingly unlikely that Mr Andreas Papandreou, the former prime minister,
could be convicted.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3 Photograph Mr Koutsogiorgas in court last month (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
<DOC>
<DOCNO>FT911-4365</DOCNO>
<PROFILE>_AN-BDSBDAEMFT</PROFILE>
<DATE>910419
</DATE>
<HEADLINE>
FT  19 APR 91 / Conservative jitters in Helmut Kohl's heartland
</HEADLINE>
<BYLINE>
   By KATHARINE CAMPBELL
</BYLINE>
<DATELINE>
   FRANKFURT
</DATELINE>
<TEXT>
AS IF the federal government in Bonn were not beset by problems enough, one
of the country's bastions of conservatism is wobbling precariously.
When voters of the Rhineland-Palatinate go to the polls on Sunday, the
Social Democrats are hoping to tip the Christian Democrats (CDU) from 44
years at the helm. Ever since the Land (state) was created after the war,
the birthplace of Chancellor Helmut Kohl has been staunchly conservative.
Now the incumbents are visibly edgy.
While a recent Land election elsewhere hung on the provision of extra school
buses, pre-occupations this Sunday are firmly national. Bonn's
post-electoral imposition of taxes to finance unification - after Mr Kohl's
repeated assurances to the contrary throughout last year - could cost the
CDU its previously secure position.
'Our difficulties come directly from Bonn,' laments Mr Carl-Ludwig Wagner,
the premier. The criticism of his own party leaders is aimed not just at the
failure to allow for the possibility of extraordinary measures in the first
place, but also at the 'muddle in high places' when the tax increases were
announced in February.
Neither Mr Wagner nor his voters doubt the need for higher taxes. But at one
campaign rally after another comes the awkward question: can I trust my
party? The CDU, unsettled by the recently-formed red-green coalition in
neighbouring Hesse, worries that too many voters will stay at home.
Mr Wagner's embarrassment is compounded by having to vote today in the upper
house's (Bundesrat) ratification of the new tax law. While attempting a mild
amendment to appease the rural Land's many commuters (who drive long
distances to industrial centres and to Bonn and will have to pay higher
petrol taxes), the debate can but rub salt in the wound.
To make matters worse, the CDU has two candidates. Springing from
intra-party warfare in 1988 that deposed the popular premier Mr Bernhard
Vogel Mr Hans-Otto Wilhelm, cast as king-maker in the whole episode, will
take over from Mr Wagner at the end of 1992. Mr Wilhelm, a young 50 and
dubbed over-ambitious by some, contrasts with the avuncular Mr Wagner, who
tries to present the double ticket as preferable to a secret deal emerging
mid-term.
Meanwhile, the Social Democratic (SPD) candidate Mr Rudolf Scharping is
basking in the CDU's dramatic decline. 'One doesn't vote for people who lie
like that,' shout the party placards.
Mr Scharping, whose wooden manner can make him appear arrogant, is credited
with galvanising the Land's previously dejected SPD. His cabinet, were he
able to form a government, would consist of 'competent rather than prominent
people' with a sprinkling of non-politicians, notably a banker and
businessman.
Overshadowed though they are by national issues, there are still some
pressing regional issues at stake. In parts a rather sleepy, if scenic
place, the Rhineland-Palatinate has under way an image campaign with the
less than promising slogan: 'The Rhineland-Palatinate is more diverse than
one thinks.'
High among the issues preoccupying the Land, once dubbed the aircraft
carrier of Germany, is social dislocation arising from the withdrawal of US
troops. The Pentagon employs nearly 25,000 German civilians, and will be
leaving behind vast tracts of, in places, heavily-polluted land. Mr
Scharping, once a bitter critic of the American presence, is left promising
to woo new US companies to the Americanised shell-towns.
Meanwhile, the chancellor has made no less than 14 appearances for the
campaign. ('It won't help,' says Mr Scharping lugubriously). In Worms last
week, just 10km from Mr Kohl's home and where he is often seen at Sunday
service in the historic cathedral, even a thunderously loud public address
system could not quite drown the cat-calls from the normally placid home of
Liebfraumilch wine. His message: the SPD, at best reluctant fellow
travellers in the unification enterprise, could scarcely afford to criticise
now.
Among Mr Kohl's worries is that a defeat on Sunday would lose the Bonn
coalition its majority in the Bundesrat.
However, even if the SPD emerges the strongest single party, it may well be
unable to form a government, much hanging on the Greens who currently have
five seats but could fail to attain the necessary 5 per cent of the vote.
With the Free Democrats (FDP) pledged to support the CDU if a government can
be formed, a poor showing by the Greens could leave Mr Scharping with
nothing but enhanced opposition status. Alternatively, with the Greens in,
Mr Scharping believes the FDP, his preferred coalition partner, would be
forced to negotiate. The tea-leaf readers believe the FDP has just about
left the door open.
</TEXT>
<PUB>The Financial Times
</PUB>
<PAGE>
London Page 3 Map (Omitted).
</PAGE>
</DOC>
